
User Name: =
Date and Time: = 2024-04-15
Job Number: = 221953066

Documents (500)
Client/Matter: -None-
Search Terms:
Search Type: nat
Content Type	Narrowed by
news	Sources:  Sources: The Irish Times Content type: urn:pct:85

1. 'I'm crying thinking about it every day': Doctor returns from Gaza hospital Mohamed Shaalan recently witnessed 'horrific' scenes while volunteering as a doctor in Gaza

2. 'Rick Astley walked away with £5m' As the musical based on his 1980s hits heads for Dublin, Pete Waterman looks back at the days when he ruled the charts

3. 'Roghnaíomar sráid fhánach i bhFionnghlas'

4. 'The mother of all reforms': Meloni's plans to rewrite Italy 's post-fascist constitution

5. 'Vast majority of Ireland 's Jewish community do not support Netanyahu' Jewish community has been feeling pressure from wider public opinion

6. A career spanning the Troubles and emerging peace Noel Doran singles out the 1998 murder of Patrick Kielty's father in influencing his outlook as Irish News editor   a post he is leaving after 25 years

7. A dangerous new dynamic Iran attacks Israel

8. Air strike puts focus on US foreign aid Bill Congress has yet to pass legislation on Bill to give aid to Ukraine , Israel and Gaza

9. An Irishman's Diary

10. Appreciation Seóirse Bodley

11. Arsenal and Liverpool both hit a hurdle in race for the title Disastrous defeats for challengers hand Manchester City the initiative

12. Arsenal slip while Villa let rip with late goals Disastrous defending from Arteta's side brings sweet taste of victory for Emery

13. Asylum application predictions

14. Baird soars to new heights adding lineout calling to his skills Forward has blended remarkable athleticism with a dedication to graft

15. Biden leads condemnation of Iran 's missile strikes on Israel US president tells Netanyahu to treat repulsed Iran attack as a 'win'

16. Blair's late score seals title for Tipperary Premier County break lock of Cork, Galway and Kilkenny on sport's major titles going back to 2012

17. Bring back the cheap bedsit   it should never have gone away

18. Britain should not fear 'an honest approach' to past sins, says historian Mistakes in dealing with terrorism in Northern Ireland are being repeated elsewhere, argues Prof Richard English

19. Carbon capture critical for addressing climate crisis Technological solutions could be transformative but getting it wrong would exacerbate the situation

20. ChatGPT essay cheats are a menace to us all

21. Congress held hostage US support for Ukraine

22. Connacht undone by Benetton 's first-half blitz

23. Construction sector reports modest growth March sees renewed increases in housing and commercial activity

24. Cullen calls for fair play for fans as Croke Park beckons Coach wants EPCR to set fair ticket prices for semi-final against Northampton

25. Down make hard work of Antrim

26. Early Armagh goals kill off Fermanagh

27. Economy vulnerable to global events   Ibec Report warns Ireland will face lower trade openness and rising geopolitical risk

28. Electric vehicle charging 'arms' require permission

29. Employers have manufactured the SME 'crisis' to boost profits Employment and profits rising, an insolvency rate below average: this doesn't look very much like a crisis

30. End the culture wars by ending the blame game It is wrong to blame ordinary people for structural injustices, argues one political philosopher

31. EV owners seek solution to expensive and inadequate public chargers

32. Fianna Fáil gets into the budget 'flyer' business Fiscal initiatives flagged in advance of what is likely to be a key budget

33. Financial markets weigh up fallout from growing conflict in Middle East

34. French media lament a loss

35. Goal-hungry Louth see off Wexford Downey's two dynamite finishes and two penalties from Sam Mulroy seal the deal

36. Haaland has most important skill in the game

37. Hospital funding rise not leading to better results Productivity report is likely to lead to calls for reforms

38. How the Brexit catastrophe turned out to be a mere inconvenience

39. Ireland 's improvement finally rewarded with that winning feeling Wafer outstanding as home side wrap the game up inside the first half

40. Irish exports to Israel worth over EUR 0.5bn Trade versus geo-politics considerations should be dealt with by EU, says McGrath

41. Irish firms seek to unlock China market at Hainan trade expo Irish pavilion at key Chinese trade fair showcases food, drink and fashion

42. Israel woke up yesterday morning and breathed a huge, collective sigh of relief The most advanced missile defence system in the world managed to intercept hundreds of incoming projectiles

43. Liverpool's title bid derailed by Eze's winner Reds blow a host of chances at Anfield as Palace put major dent in trophy hopes

44. Lowry licks his wounds and moves on from Augusta Final round pairing with Mickelson can't make up for Offaly man's disappointing time

45. Mannion in sparkling form as Dublin cruise to victory over Meath O'Rourke's side gave in plenty in first half but a controversial opening goal for Seán Bugler was turning point

46. Martin promises big   keeping kids offline Party faithful wanted to get on with conference without having to talk about Harris

47. Meath hit with yet another bout of capital punishment No room for romance in the championship as a few hammerings are handed out

48. Modest Byrne kicks on and lays a few ghosts to rest

49. Modi enjoys unprecedented popularity

50. Mother gets barring order against son Woman tells court she believes son will kill her and lives in a constant state of fear

51. Mullins eyes first British trainers' title after Aintree triumph Irish champion trainer a 1-2 favourite to beat Nicholls and Skelton when season ends on Saturday week

52. My friend Donie   king of audacious overseas GAA start-ups

53. National acclaimed as 'cleanest' renewal with no fallers

54. Offaly find another gear and blow Laois away

55. OJ Simpson and the fatal flaw of jealousy Simpson escaped in his criminal trial but he did not escape the opprobrium of many who felt that he had got away with murder

56. Only 3% of private rentals available to Hap tenants, study finds

57. Passing the parcel or passing the buck; who pays for all the careless deliveries? In this golden age of online shopping, customers, shops and delivery companies discuss doorsteps, dodgy signatures and deposits in wheelie bins

58. Productivity in health fails to match spend Concern at 'divergence' between rising health spend and activity, report finds

59. Rangers hand Celtic title advantage after historic loss

60. Report sets out effects of Traveller feuding

61. Schleffer closes out the deal in Georgia World number one takes his second Major with a final round of 68

62. Seen & Heard

63. Sensory blitzkriegs and the art of smiling when finally winning

64. Sudan war marks one-year anniversary as donor conference is held in Paris

65. Super Leinster finally hit La Rochelle with a knockout blow Nienaber effect kicks in as home side find their defensive edge and sharpen their attack in a deserved victory

66. Suspension of development levies set to be extended Ministers expected to approve move to stimulate new housing developments

67. Sydney knife attacker had mental health issues, ideology was not a motive, Australian police say Assailant identified as 40-year-old Joel Cauchi and was known to authorities

68. Taighde baoth

69. Toulouse power past Exeter to reach last four

70. TV week Monday to Sunday

71. Ulster blown away in the second half

72. Varadkar asked to investigate motion against former TD Senior party member called for rules to be changed after no-confidence motion

73. Wicklow let Kildare off the hook in madcap and frantic finale

74. Zelenskiy calls on Congress to approve aid

75. An orange card, anyone?

76. Bayer Leverkusen secure maiden Bundesliga title

77. Beers and a dark horse

78. Champions Cup semi-finals

79. Champions Trophy line-up complete

80. Dugarry puts the boot into Mbappé

81. Keep cups

82. Man arrested after body found in Naas

83. Murtagh and Keogh take World Cup silver in Italy

84. National End of Life survey findings

85. Online renovations

86. Strengthening local government

87. No Headline In Original

88. 'Botched' dermal filler leaves woman with physical and emotional scars 'Every Tom, Dick and Harry is injecting people's faces at the moment. It has to stop'

89. 'Hurling counties should go out on their own' Coming up on 80 years of age, Babs Keating remains a force of nature unafraid of pulling hard off the pitch

90. 'I have women in their 60s and 70s watching TikTok fads' 'Sunscreen contouring', 'freckling' and DIY chemical peels are among the concerning trends people are absorbing online

91. 'Japandi' makeover in Raheny

92. 'My boyfriend and I get into horrible fights, can we learn to argue better?'

93. 'Time is so precious. It's terrifying' Maggie Armstrong, a former journalist, was always a 'bit envious' of the people she interviewed. As she prepares to publish her debut short story collection, Armstrong reflects on her decisio...

94. 'Turning its back on victims': Spain 's right accused of whitewashing fascism Activists fear some local governments are trying to rewrite the civil war history

95. 'You should be ashamed of yourselves! We're old enough to be your parents'

96. A CREATIVE CATHARSIS When Hilary Fannin began to write her new play, an adaptation of Gorky's Children of the Sun for Rough Magic and the Abbey, she didn't anticipate her work being interrupted by a double cancer diagnosis

97. A portrait of Paris behind the scenes Simon Kuper offers an absorbing, affectionate and cliche-free study of the French capital

98. A ruling that will focus minds Climate change

99. A Wild Atlantic Way to churn EUR 3bn annual tourist revenue

100. Admissions that go deep

101. AI skills critical to workforce, says IDA

102. An 'off-piste writer' who broke several glass ceilings

103. An extremely online Taoiseach is problematic

104. An Irishman's Diary

105. Andrew Hughes 'In crime fiction the villain drives the plot'

106. Answers

107. Ardagh's debt nears $11.2bn Debt ratings agency warns group's balance sheet may become 'unsustainable'

108. Artificial intelligence can already kill people

109. Avoiding a banana skin United Patent Court referendum

110. Bats alter hibernation habits as climate warms Plans are under way to convert a bat refuge in a disused school into a digital hub and exhibition space

111. Belgium opens case into Russian payments to MEPs

112. BETWEEN HISTORY AND EXPERIENCE Niamh Mulvey's hallmark is her control. She writes with an ice-cool tone, slicing through the status quo to reveal the complexity beneath

113. Biden's climate agenda faces legal challenges New rules to curb pollution set to face a barrage of claims in the courts

114. Brilliant value in the land of the yews A fantastic neighbourhood restaurant, deliciously under the radar in south Dublin

115. Campaigner for the most marginalised in Irish society

116. Centrists back EU asylum policy amid concerns over drift right in next parliament Legislation will be drawn up for Dáil to adopt reforms into law in the Republic over next two years

117. Chipping away at exactly that which makes us most human From the algorithms powering modern life to the AI taking over the task, technology is rewiring culture and the wider world in alarming ways

118. Christians cannot identify with anti-Jewish bigotry

119. Church of Ireland notes

120. Concern over fairness of TikTok's 'callous' redundancy process as more than 250 jobs cut Interviews with multiple TikTok employees based in Dublin have revealed concern over the transparency of the redundancy process at the social media giant

121. Connacht need to bring an extra intensity if they are to beat Benetton

122. Donald Clarke The last goodbye   why TV finales so rarely get it right

123. Elon Musk is now part of a US -China industrial cold war

124. Estate sales range from Minor to Milo Upcoming auctions feature highly sought after solid silver tea sets and an 18th-century map of Cork

125. Explorations of the unanswerable

126. FAI only reaping what they've sown with manager delay

127. FBI identified man who sought false Irish passport

128. Flores on the double settles the derby

129. France , women, death and class

130. FROM THE BEDROOM TO THE ARENA Five years after her first overseas show, the Norwegian songwriter Marie Ulven, aka Girl in Red, is returning to Dublin on her first arena tour, and this time she's on the brink of stardom

131. Full steam ahead for IDA as it boards the AI hype train

132. Funny, profound: Keyes has done it again

133. Garda watchdog granted access to recordings of Burke hearing melee

134. Generations of oppression

135. Give Me a Crash Course in . . . the skorts controversy

136. Glanbia investors strongly oppose plan to give CFO EUR 750,000 retention bonus Investor advisers ISS and Glass Lewis query proposed payout to Mark Garvey

137. Go wild with this easy green soup Wild garlic is one of Ireland 's best crops to forage

138. Guinness bottles and stout hearts

139. Harris and Sanchez discuss recognition of Gaza People of Palestine deserved equal respect, says Taoiseach

140. Harris narrows his political priorities Domestic issues, such as farming and childcare supports likely to feature

141. Hate speech laws are open to abuse

142. Haunted, cut off from the mainland

143. Have I ever thought about having kids? Ask me, I dare you

144. High-profile Dublin solicitor with an eye for a deal

145. How to . . . choose activities for your kids

146. Hugh Linehan What Netflix gets wrong about the news business

147. I can't understand why my plum tree isn't flowering

148. I've come to regard psoriasis as a barometer on my general well-being

149. In a Word . . . Good Friday Patsy McGarry

150. Investigators face tough task in Kerry baby murder case Criminal lawyer says it will be a 'huge leap' to advancing criminal case against couple arrested last year

151. INVITING NATURE INTO 'THE HARE'S CORNER' Farmers and landowners are encouraging biodiversity by situating ponds and woods in less productive sections of their land with supports from a landscape charity

152. Ireland made 'country of honour' at international trade expo in China

153. Irish homeowners left it too late to switch mortgages Central Bank report shows homeowners responded sharply to ECB rate hikes   but would have saved more if they had switched earlier

154. It took me leaving and going back to become a Derry girl As a child, I feared not monsters under my bed but men in balaclavas. But while I had many unhappy memories, I needed to return

155. Judge to decide if he should recuse himself from O'Doherty case

156. Justice minister battles to pull Poland back from 'rule-of-law collapse' Adam Bodnar is dealing with predecessor's 'messy' legacy which includes a EUR 66m slush fund and spyware

157. Kingsmill massacre 'an overtly sectarian attack by IRA', coroner rules

158. Klopp left to rue Liverpool's mental fatigue Manager says his team must regain their intensity, beginning tomorrow

159. Kyiv 's calls for more air defences fall on deaf ears Germany has sent two Patriot systems to Ukraine but is reluctant to give more

160. La Rochelle give Leinster some reason to believe O'Gara's champions never panic but their up-and-down form this season offers hope for the home side

161. La Rochelle have learned how to press all of Leinster 's buttons

162. LARKIN'S DAY IN IRELAND 'S FLEDGLING COURT 'Big Jim' Larkin was involved in the first case to come before the new Irish Supreme Court in 1924   and the trade union leader returned to the court just a year later

163. Leinster look to front up to overcome their biggest rivals Home advantage and Nienaber factor may swing the tie Leinster's way

164. LESSER-TOLD TALES OF THE IRISH IN BRITAIN Look Back to Look Forward, an exhibition showcasing stories that follow the waves of Irish emigrants to Britain from the early 1970s to today, has come 'home home' to Epic, the Irish Emigration Museum

165. Line speed and shitfights   how Nienaber has changed Leinster 's defence There have two identifiable shifts to Leinster 's defensive system under coach

166. Little, luckless Luton still have a shot at one of the great Premier League feats

167. Lowry: 'I'm here for the weekend, and I'll give it a run' Irishman hangs tough to make cut after 'the toughest two days of golf I've played'

168. Lynn ordered to provide statement of financial means

169. Mahler Mission can land a very contemporary National A record 26 Irish -trained horses line up in reduced maximum field of 34

170. Man who filmed himself sexually abusing baby boy is jailed for four years Judge imposes custodial sentence for 'depravity of the highest order'

171. McManus tees up National hopes with hat-trick Mullins lands two more top-flight prizes to help chances of success in trainers title race

172. Methodist notes

173. Monaghan confident Ireland can claim first win of campaign Captain sees positives from two defeats against France and Italy

174. More baggage-handling for Kelly

175. No let-up as Blackmore stays in the winner's circle Tipperary woman's completion of Cheltenham's big three a true feat

176. NO TO BREHON ROBES IRISH JUDGES WENT BACK TO BLACK AFTER INDEPENDENCE

177. NOTRE DAME RISING FROM THE ASHES Five years after being engulfed in flames, Paris's iconic cathedral is almost rebuilt

178. O'Donnell calls for reform of Chief Justice's role Chief Justice tells conference office holder faces unrealistic expectations

179. OJ Simpson might have got away with murder, but he lost what he craved After 30 years, it is difficult to think of another event where so many themes and tensions of American life collided

180. ONE NATION, DIVISIBLE In Alex Garland's propulsive new film, Civil War, an authoritarian US president is serving his third term, while escalating conflict engulfs the country

181. One night in Ballinakill how Wicklow are getting in the groove A unique insight behind the scenes at Wicklow training ahead of their showdown with Kildare

182. Our housing market doesn't need a rate cut

183. Over 100 people gather at vigil for fatal attack victim

184. Overworked and underfunded: Irish local government is hollow

185. PADDY COSGRAVE'S HIGH-RISK RETURN The businessman has returned to his chief executive role at Web Summit, six months after he resigned amid a tweeting controversy. Has he changed, and will his sponsors accept his return?

186. PEARL JAM'S BATTLE OF WILLS To make their new album, Dark Matter, the band wrestled creatively with just one question: how close should they go to their classic grunge sound? The answer, it turns out, was 'lots'

187. Pluck of the Irish always a runner down Boston way

188. Portrait of an enslaved man There is humour and humanity in Percival Everett's recasting of Mark Twain's controversial classic

189. Recognising a Palestinian state

190. Roasted monkfish with fricassee of peas and bacon

191. RSA welcomes directive on roads policing but Garda sources call it 'empty PR stunt' Instruction to gardaí to devote 30 minutes per shift to road policing met with scepticism

192. RTÉ SEEKS AS MUCH FRESH DRAMA AS IT CAN AFFORD 'No ghosts, vampires or mummies', RTÉ has told pitching producers. But as it plots its way out of its financial crisis, what type of stories does it hope to bring to screen?

193. Russian city faces mass evacuation due to floods

194. Ryanair 's shares are flying, but can O'Leary get his EUR 100m?

195. Ryanair claims search warrant was invalid

196. Seanad's leisurely pace must change

197. Settlement of EUR 200,000 for girl over care she received Medication changes saw teen become more anxious and stressed, court told

198. SF policies rule out coalition, says Martin Fianna Fáil leader criticises Sinn Féin's record in Government in Northern Ireland

199. Shares flat as traders look to ECB rate cut

200. Shed Distillery in Leitrim invests EUR 10m to double whiskey-making capacity

201. Shipley not shy and retiring

202. Sinn Féin is sick of experts. Have they forgotten Brexit?

203. Some minor bumps on the road to victory Sparks almost fly as Home of the Year picks its series winner; Michael Douglas is in his element as Benjamin Franklin

204. Stardust jury to resume deliberations on Monday

205. Ten Hag says United have had bad luck

206. The chaotic story of the Blues Brothers

207. The key decisions facing the new Taoiseach

208. The magic of making a garden

209. THE SECRET AUDACITY THAT LIT FIRE OF PEACE Denis Bradley's new book tells the inside story of the backchannel between the British government and the IRA that accelerated the ceasefire in Northern Ireland

210. The statues of O'Connell Street

211. The thorny question of devolution Alvin Jackson explores the political underpinnings of home rule, from Ireland to Holland , from Norway to Austria - Hungary

212. There used to be a ferocity to Dublin- Meath now it isn't even competitive

213. This week's soccer fixtures

214. Tipp set to test Galway

215. TV weekend

216. Two men hit by car on M9 hard shoulder in critical condition

217. Tánaiste now leading a more settled party Vast majority of existing Fianna Fáil deputies will be standing for re-election

218. Ulster 's semi-final hopes given lift as Henderson and Kitshoff are fit to start

219. Voices of the abused and the abandoned

220. Vote on elected Dublin mayor in June unlikely People in Limerick city and county will vote on directly elected mayor in June

221. Weather warriors

222. West's wild swimming pool passion Actor Dominic West built a naturally filtered pool at his Cotswolds home. Now he has plans for another at Glin Castle in Co Limerick

223. WHAT'S NEXT... FOR QUEER- FORWARD PUBLISHERS SMUT? Artists Jack Scollard and Jordan Hearns on showcasing the work of often 'overlooked and underrepresented' artists

224. When Jack B Yeats won the Free State's first medal In Paris in 1924, The Liffey Swim painting took the silver medal in the art competition, giving a new state a treasure that has lasted a century

225. Whimsical Joe plays the game of the name Talk of missed buses, obscure saints and baby names has Liveline host Joe Duffy in flighty form

226. Why does no one ask camogie players about wearing skorts? Motions to allow women to wear shorts were voted down at Congress , sending a message that, after 100 years, elite players must be ladylike

227. Woods defies ailing body to once again prove the headline act Former champion makes a record 24th consecutive cut as Homa sets early pace

228. A second-rate rail service to Sligo

229. Critical minerals

230. Dive into gardening

231. Dublin city centre traffic plan

232. Ex-Christian Brother accused of abuse offences in Dublin school

233. Four lighter wines to put a spring in your step Two whites, a sparkling wine and an almost summery red offer interest and good value for money

234. Gym goer wins EUR 3,000 in ageist case

235. Hamilton will make his Ferrari debut in Melbourne next year

236. More listening and less scrolling

237. Nature Diary Glenbower Wood

238. O'Mahony signs one-year extension with Munster

239. Poem Dandy By Cherry Smyth

240. Referendum on European patent court

241. Scoliosis patients and waiting lists

242. Weekend Rugby Fixtures

243. Year of the Nana

244. No Headline In Original

245. No Headline In Original

246. No Headline In Original

247. No Headline In Original

248. No Headline In Original

249. 'I know my children need me. I know my children's best interests are going to be served in Ireland '

250. 'It's been a huge push, a mammoth effort by the team' Brothers Fergal and Barry Doyle have just cut the ribbon on a EUR 4.5 million expansion of their Wicklow destination garden centre

251. 'Real' Iseq 20 market value is more than double the official list's EUR 100 billion The recent departures of a number of heavyweights from the Dublin stock market have triggered concern within the financial industry about its future viability

252. 'We could see that it's Ronan's city, and because of that, there are a lot of expectations' O'Gara's decision to bring La Rochelle direct from South Africa to Cork goes down well with team

253. Academics criticise universities over lack of action on Gaza

254. Almost 400 apartments to be built on Dublin's Grand Canal

255. An Irishman's Diary

256. An unlikely lesson in white-knuckle thrillers

257. Ask not what you can do in the road race, but what it can do for you

258. Blackstone to take majority stake in Winthrop Technologies

259. Brady guilty of perverting the course of justice Convicted killer accepted responsibility for recording footage of witness interview

260. Breaking 10,000 for the first time since 2007

261. Breathing life into the story of a doomed diva

262. Brennan proving a vital safe pair of hands for Meath After first-round win over Longford, goalkeeper is ready for Sunday's Leinster quarter-final against Dublin

263. Children's hospital to see patients from 2025 Donnelly expects hospital to be handed over to State in final quarter of this year

264. Cinema great returns with a meditation on the self

265. Cork developer Michael O'Flynn gets green light for Kildare scheme

266. Court rejects bid to save planning permission for 1,593 apartments

267. Court reserves decision in mother's appeal over full carer's allowance

268. Death sentence for Vietnamese businesswoman Lan found guilty of embezzlement, bribery and violations of banking rules

269. Debenhams staff compensation cut by 50%

270. DeChambeau makes up for lost time after rain-delayed start LIV golfer shoots stunning opening 65 to set the early pace at Augusta

271. Dispute over Waterford's long-vacant Ard Rí Hotel due back in court

272. Duff says crowd trouble 'has to stop' Shelbourne manager says if fans do not feel safe they will not go to games

273. ECB could be first big central bank to reduce rates

274. ECB maintains rates at record high but signals cuts may come in June The ECB kept its key deposit rate at 4%, but noted that inflation has eased

275. Eid in Gaza: ' Celebrating that we're still alive' War has upended what should be a day of celebration in the territory

276. Europe hardens its approach EU asylum policy

277. Everyone gets paid at the Olympics except the athletes

278. Ex-Aryzta CEO files lawsuit against group Kevin Toland left the baked goods firm in 2020 with a pay-off of EUR 1.81m

279. Fears for India 's press freedom as Modi bids for re-election NGOs accuse authorities of increasingly targeting journalists

280. Five secrets of workplace success There is no quick path to desk-based nirvana but there are things we can do to improve our experience at work

281. Former prime minister Wilson had secret Downing Street affair Westminster gripped by recent revelation that was buried for 50 years

282. Garland dials up the tension in dystopian thriller The director's latest offering imagines a bleak America of the future through a carefully ambiguous lens

283. Government housing targets review plan criticised Labour leader says autumn date for plan shows 'lack of ambition and urgency'

284. Grisly killing sparks debate over 'left-behind' children of migrant workers Schoolboy (13) beaten to death and three classmates held responsible

285. Guinness bottles and stout hearts

286. Harris an 'unknown quantity' in Brussels Whistle-stop series of meetings a dry run for Taoiseach ahead of EU summit next week

287. Harris rejects Israeli criticism that he failed to mention hostages

288. Henshaw admits Leinster's 'obsession' with winning a fifth European crown Centre explains how his team hope to beat their bête noire, La Rochelle

289. How a far-sighted father opened the door to a varied life in the Big Apple Galway native has had roles including teaching, community work for Irish immigrants, IT positions and consultancy

290. HSE controls 183 vacant properties, Seanad told

291. Inflation falls to under 3% in March

292. Iranian failure to respond to Israel would show weakness, but it may choose patience Limited options open to Iran but breakthrough in Gaza could curb regional tensions

293. Judge jails farmer for possessing drugs

294. June referendum in doubt amid Coalition fears Government reluctance to hold poll follows defeats in family and care votes

295. Killing of IRA men by soldiers justified, coroner rules

296. Liverpool's Dublin dream in tatters as Atalanta run riot Italians stun Europa League favourites will emphatic win on Merseyside

297. Maestros lament the fractured state of modern golf Honorary starters at Augusta National preach theme of togetherness amid traditional quips

298. McEntee welcomes EU pact on immigration New rules would allow for faster processing of applicants. says Minister

299. Menopause support must tread a fine line between awareness and stigma More employers are offering help but they need to avoid the risk of 'meno-washing'

300. Modi's grip tightens India 's election

301. Moloney named on bench for Wales clash Flanker McMahon, who missed Italy match, returns to the backrow

302. More focus on generic medicines will save HSE cash, says industry report

303. More than one in 10 who lost loved ones say their end-of-life care was fair to poor

304. Mullins has momentum in British title race Impaire Et Passe survives stewards' enquiry to hold on to Aintree Hurdle

305. National's appeal intact despite potential for more animal rights protests

306. Next election will herald an age of Independents If Sinn Féin can't speak clearly for themselves how can they speak for us?

307. OJ Simpson's 'trial of century' left US riveted Media circus as American football player acquitted of ex-wife's murder

308. Pets from Ukraine cost State EUR 1m a month

309. Player happy to weigh in on the future direction of the game

310. Premier League to introduce semi- automated offside

311. Protektorat still in prime condition for tilt at Melling Chase

312. Rebels push Myanmar troops out of key town

313. Recognition of a Palestinian state

314. Report sought on cause of sinkhole

315. Sex abuse scandal damages Orbán's reputation Cover-up at a Hungarian orphanage turns into political liability

316. Shares fall as ECB points to rates cuts

317. Sheffield United docked two points by EFL for defaulting on payments

318. Slump in sales of electric vehicles

319. South Korea 's 'Luke Skywalker' strikes election blow against President Yoon Convicted former minister's victory leaves president looking a lame duck

320. State must do the right thing by health workers with long Covid

321. Support grows for recognition of Palestine Israeli ministry expresses 'fury' at Ireland 's intention to recognise state of Palestine

322. TDs, scrolling and mobile etiquette

323. The cost of Irish unity

324. The eight people you meet in the posh hospital emergency department

325. The privatisation of monopoly public utilities can lead to losses for the State

326. Two men dead after crashes in Cork and Kerry

327. Two more candidates enter race for mayor

328. UK government mounts legal challenge over inquest into murder of GAA official

329. Ukraine workers in race to repair power grid Russia has intensified air attacks on power stations

330. Undermanaged employees get just as frustrated as overmanaged ones Timing is critical as intervention by a manager on a given task only late in the day is seen as less than helpful by workers

331. Unity question should not be solely dictated by finance

332. West and Arab nations urge Iran to avoid military retaliation against Israel Biden stresses America 's 'ironclad' support for Israel in event of any attack

333. Wild Atlantic Way worth EUR 3bn in annual revenue   Fáilte Ireland

334. Alonso signs new 'multi-year' deal to stay at Aston Martin

335. Devine signs first pro deal with Connacht

336. Dublin to Belfast train service

337. Image of the week Eclipse tourism

338. Nothing new under the sun

339. Ohtani's translator in plea deal over alleged $4.5m theft

340. Puberty blockers and children

341. Semi-final Croke Park could stage first rugby match in 15 years

342. No Headline In Original

343. No Headline In Original

344. 'Floating' beachfront house hovering over water in Howth Four-bedroom property cantilevered over lake with direct access to Burrow beach

345. A blood test for dementia

346. An Irishman's Diary

347. Arizona reinstates abortion ban law dating from 1864

348. Augusta confines itself to minor course tinkering this time around Tweaks unlikely to affect the longest hitters but may cause a change of approach for some

349. Barcelona recover to produce another big night in Paris

350. Blind internet users struggle with error-prone AI aids Unreliable software installed to comply with rules to help disabled people navigate online has prompted thousands of lawsuits

351. Bovine breathalyser aims to keep cattle under emission limit Capturing and analysing samples of a cow's exhaled breath help gauge concentration of methane and carbon dioxide

352. Bringing the voices of 16th century Irish women to life Trinity project will use AI and ChatGPT to transcribe documents from period

353. Can management service charges be claimed as an expense against rental income? Your queries answered

354. Classic elegance with modern comforts

355. Connacht have a 'point to prove' as they travel to Treviso

356. Court told of Quinn Group link to search Search of premises of late gangster's brother part of inquiry into Cavan attacks

357. Create a home that delights the senses

358. Dairygold sees fall in revenue and profit Cork-based dairy processor says turnover was down 15% to EUR 1.4 billion last year

359. Davy seeks EUR 26.5m for MetLife 's Dublin office

360. Diocesan downsizing only the start as attendance falls Six Catholic dioceses in Connacht are to reduced to three

361. Dispute over number of aid trucks entering Gaza

362. ECB expected to hold fire on rate cut

363. Elevated five-bed on edge of Clonakilty

364. EUR 420,000

365. Exclusive new development near sleepy Portuguese village beloved by Louboutin

366. FAI set new deadline to announce manager

367. Fertility clinic blames losses on IVF tourism

368. FF regains Gaeltacht portfolio Sources say FG ministers were unwilling to take on the job, or lacked language skills

369. Flying taxi notions distract from real transport solutions

370. Four homes near remote hubs

371. Garda arrested in connection with fatal hit-and-run

372. German politicians backtrack on unequivocal support for Israel Growing concerns for German public and media over Gaza offensive

373. Girl settles case over burn for EUR 320,000

374. Golf struggling to capture the public imagination in the post-Tiger era

375. Guinness bottles and stout hearts

376. Harris criticised for absence from Dáil on first day

377. Harris to raise case for Palestinian recognition in Brussels Group of EU states will put statehood on agenda of foreign ministers' meeting

378. Housing starts surge 67% in first quarter to 12,297 units

379. How big business is undermining our health and environment' Is corporate PR duping us and preventing effective solutions to global warming and chronic diseases from taking hold?

380. HSE to study report on UK gender healthcare Report finds thousands of vulnerable children questioning had been let down

381. Ireland one of six states willing to recognise Palestine The idea has gained momentum since the Tánaiste hosted a dinner of like-minded foreign affairs ministers in Brussels last month

382. Is it time to ban foreigners buying homes in Ireland ?

383. Kingspan investors urged to vote against chairman amid concerns Proxy advisory company Glass Lewis cites 'paucity of disclosure' on ESG issues

384. Langer Dan tackles Grade One company for first time at Aintree

385. Leinster need to keep Botia quiet if they want to win If the Fijian flanker gets his hands on the ball, it could all break down for Leinster again

386. Magnier's Coolmore pays EUR 8.925m for 591 acres

387. Man 'effectively admitted' causing crash leading to commentator's death, court told

388. MATTHEW DEVEREUX House Devil H H H Self-released

389. Modern, detached homes at new development

390. More than 4,000 people avail of First Home Scheme to buy property

391. Mother of girl who died after being swept into sea settles Scouting Ireland legal case Teenager went into water after scout leaders decided to stop at lighthouse, court told

392. Mulroy happy Louth still moving in the right direction post Harte transplant Players have responded well under Ger Brennan and are focused on returning to the Leinster final

393. New homes and the climate crisis

394. New migration pact will harden up EU borders Concerns that reception facilities will now proliferate across Europe

395. New three- and four-beds in west Dublin

396. O'Doherty denies harassing woman after being arrested and brought before court Journalist accused of breaching injunction obtained by mother of man who died

397. O'Gara and Ryan adding a layer of red to La Rochelle's mentality Head coach and his assistant have introduced their team to the rugby culture of Munster

398. One of the features of IoT to business is low data and power usage at a low cost With the majority of IoT systems built for 2G mobile networks, the old GSM network used by first-generation digital mobile phones, Three Ireland 's a...

399. Pauw breaks silence to hit out at Caldwell and Gleeson Ex- Ireland manager says she was 'destroyed' by player's criticism

400. PEARL JAM Dark Matter H H H H Republic

401. Period elegance on prestigious D4 road for EUR 10m

402. PILLOW QUEENS Name Your Sorrow H H H H Royal Mountain

403. Recognising Palestine sends dangerous signal to Hamas A unilateral recognition of a Palestinian state sends a dangerous signal and will be viewed as rewarding terror

404. Regulator wants conveyancing reforms

405. Rise in US inflation weakens hopes for interest rate cuts New data shows inflation hit 3.5% in March against 3.4% expectation

406. Running out of time on auto-enrolment

407. Russia and Kazakhstan hit by severe floods Deluge forces 110,000 people to move and swamps scores of settlements

408. Scalable Irish tech that can combat the climate crisis From milligrams to kilograms in carbon capture and generating electricity from industrial waste heat, Enterprise Ireland's Commercial Fund is helping fund the hottest start-up...

409. Sellafield is an innovation hub but with a toxic legacy The 700-acre complex is a centre of innovation but also a nuclear dump that continues to pose a risk to Ireland and other countries

410. Simon Harris's cavalcade of hubris

411. Sleek and stylish Churchtown four-bed for EUR 1.195m High-tech, A-rated south Dublin home with maintenance-free garden and cool interiors

412. Slovakian presidential election result another blow for EU solidarity Clear runway now to realign country towards Budapest or Moscow

413. Solar eclipse the latest shiny object in culture wars Trump peering at the sun is different to Biden's public safety announcement

414. Start and finish to remain in city centre This year's path will contain only minor tweaks to usual route despite fears of major changes

415. Studying the relationship between physics and the mystical

416. Supreme Court ruling may affect other SHD plans

417. Tensions are building on trade The US and China

418. Tesco announces 7.2% sales bump and EUR 1.2bn share buyback

419. The art of understanding baby stars Dr Emma Whelan, associate professor, Maynooth University School of Experimental Physics

420. Timely recognition Ireland and Palestine

421. Total eclipse of the Dáil as Houdini Harris does a disappearing act on first day

422. Two age-old questions: 'What is consciousness?' and 'Is it cake?'

423. Two dioceses lose bishops as Catholic Church downsizes

424. Virgin Media Streaming TV EUR 15 a month

425. Volunteers say they have run out of tents for homeless asylum seekers

426. Well-preserved period home with stunning sea views One of six houses on terrace in cul-de-sac at the foot of Bray Head, built around 1860 for British soldiers in need of rest and recuperation

427. Woman's case over rugby injuries can proceed, judge rules

428. 'If Israel succeeds in Gaza'

429. 'What about a Fanta, clubbers?'

430. Atlético withstand late Dortmund fightback

431. Cowan skips to top of list

432. Dublin to Belfast train service

433. Dublin traffic plan

434. Fenton suspended for Leinster quarter-final against Meath

435. Fine Gael   law and order

436. for EUR 295,000 By Elizabeth Birdthistle

437. Irish accent has been an asset in UK

438. Key trio in running to return for Liverpool's clash with Atalanta

439. Limerick Voice named newspaper of the year

440. Making sense of the referendums

441. Medvedev loses his cool during victory over Monfils

442. On view

443. Rugby anthems

444. Soccer Round Up

445. Three score and Tan

446. World Athletics to award prize money to gold medal winners

447. No Headline In Original

448. 'I like to talk with people. Locals, they know me' Taking over a newsagents in Dún Laoghaire has proved to be hard but rewarding work

449. Adviser backs plan for Smurfit Kappa chairman

450. After talking a tough game, Harris delivers a nearly new Cabinet with no blood on the carpet There were no axes wielded and precious few new faces in the Taoiseach's newly assembled Cabinet

451. Almost half of workers considering new jobs

452. An Irishman's Diary

453. Arsenal salvage draw with gutsy second half This was Arsenal's return to the elite and its significance crackled in the air

454. Auto-enrolment could deliver strong pension pots for 'average' workers EY numbers suggest workers could retire with pension savings of close to EUR 900,000

455. Bank of Ireland reworks green mortgage rates

456. Britain 's 'elitist' foreign office mulls overhaul Government ponders how to deal with 'offensive stereotypes' depicted in murals in its old colonial headquarters

457. Bundoran was as glamorous to me as Las Vegas

458. BYD's Dolphin is bound to make a big splash

459. Citywest office block guiding at EUR 6.2m

460. Clinical England prove too good for battling Ireland James and Greenwood strike for visitors as England hold off a late rally to keep a clean sheet

461. Company that controls Irish genomic data incurs EUR 21m loss as revenue drops Accumulated losses reached $121m at Genuity Science Ireland by end of 2022

462. Consumers should benefit Personal injury awards

463. Docklands apartment owners object to Ronan's plan for Citigroup 's office

464. Downpours likely to continue disrupting farming

465. DUP says Harris appointment is opportunity to 'reset relationships'

466. Ennis EUR 1.2bn data centre plan gets the green light

467. Escalating the conflict may suit Netanyahu

468. EU examines Chinese wind turbine companies over subsidies

469. European court's climate case verdict has big implications for Ireland As the EU 's second biggest carbon emitter per capita, Ireland is likely to be in the dock for years to come for not doing enough

470. European ports show the way in offshore wind development Bigger quaysides, deeper harbours, the ability to cater for trucks longer than 100 metres and large landbanks are key going forward

471. First-quarter jet deliveries lowest since mid-2021 as Boeing eyes slow recovery

472. Future might not be long arriving for Ireland 's women

473. Gavin and co grapple with an age-old challenge

474. Germany denies complicity in Gaza genocide at ICJ

475. Government to formally recognise Palestine as a state Tánaiste in talks with other EU and Arab foreign ministers on move

476. Harris must show he has substance Election of new Taoiseach

477. Harris not some fresh-faced ingenue who got the top job by accident Cabinet choices indicate a concern for geography and the next election

478. Hearts may rule heads when it comes to Irish unity Eight key points to bear in mind when weighing up the estimated EUR 20.5 billion a year price of a united Ireland

479. Heat records alarm climate scientists

480. How are car manufacturers responding to the slowdown in EV sales? China's electric-car makers stay confident but many EV brands elsewhere are hedging their bets

481. How would a right-wing party distinguish itself these days?

482. Hvivo on track to hit future growth targets

483. John Laing eyes investment in Dublin Metro

484. Keaveney drug driving case adjourned until June

485. Kildare footballers face season-defining weekend

486. Kildare town land with full planning for 168 new homes seeks EUR 7m

487. Man stuck skulls on neighbour's wall, court hears

488. Man who landed at airport without ID jailed for two months

489. Masters fare a nirvana of a kind for golfing shopaholics

490. McIlroy trying to normalise routine in latest bid for green jacket Curtailed press conference just part of the world number two's ever-changing methodology to finally crack the code at Augusta

491. McKillen jnr completes sale of majority stake in Dean Hotel Group

492. McManus opts for Townend to ride I Am Maximus in National Champion jockey aiming to pull off jump racing's unofficial 'Triple Crown' in single season

493. Moloney back in squad after three-year absence

494. Music shaped by the wild ocean waves   and a pause during a pandemic Littoral, the piper Leonard Barry's new album, draws inspiration from growing up near Banna Strand in his native Co Kerry

495. Newly elected Harris pledges to be 'Taoiseach for all' Taoiseach sets up committee on children, education and disability at Cabinet meeting

496. Nienaber could be point of difference for Leinster

497. Personal injury guidelines ruled legally binding Supreme Court finds woman not entitled to assessment under earlier guidelines

498. Potentially dangerous chemicals confirmed at airport Substances detected during assessment of ground water, surface water and soil

499. Relationship between NGOs and the State

500. Richard Shakespeare's vision for Dublin





'I'm crying thinking about it every day': Doctor returns from Gaza hospital; Mohamed Shaalan recently witnessed 'horrific' scenes while volunteering as a doctor in Gaza
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 601 words
Body


A Dublin-based surgeon who has just returned to Ireland after three weeks volunteering as a doctor in Gaza has described  nightmare  scenes in the hospitals there.
Mohamed Shaalan, originally from Egypt, has worked as an orthopaedic surgeon in Ireland for several years, after moving here in 2016.
 I used to travel to parts of Africa since 2010 to do charity work. After the war started in Gaza in October, I applied through different organisations to go there and volunteer as a surgeon,  says the doctor, who is based at a Dublin hospital.
 I didn t get any reply until February. I was supposed to go then, but even after it was arranged, it was cancelled by Israel. Later, we got approved in the middle of March. I stayed there nearly three weeks doing surgeries, treating injuries and fractures.
When Shaalan arrived at the hospital he was volunteering at in Gaza, he was told there were 250 patients awaiting surgery.
 I saw patients waiting five months. The problem about waiting on surgery like this is that their wounds will become infected. Some I had to work on just by hand. There is no chance to bring them to theatre because only one hospital is working on Gaza now,  Shaalan says.
 I worked from 9am until 6pm each day. Then I took a rest and worked again until 3am. It s horrifying there. The families are living behind bed sheets, in the corridors, on the stairs. There s no privacy.
 There s no services like enough toilets or water supply. When I went there, I was concerned about the surgeries and the possibility of infections. In Dublin, lots of the surgery patients are staying in single rooms. In Gaza, there s more than 12 patients in one room, some on the floor and some on beds.
As the hospital was the only place in the area with an internet connection, people were constantly flocking there to contact family and charge their phones.
 Hospitals are doing everything for them, not only treating patients, but providing everything. People say it s the safest place to be, but actually, I have seen there s no safe place there,  Shaalan says.
 Fortunately, all the patients I worked on, their wounds are so far fine. But I never saw anything similar to this at all and I have worked in other war zones. The kids come to us with over 40 per cent of their skin burned. You see horrible things every day.
Most of Shalaan s patients were children and middle-aged women, many of whom come into the hospital  in groups  from the same bombing.
 You can see three to five people from one family who were injured in the same bombing near their home. These are innocent people,  he says.
Terrible
 The bombing is terrible. The sound can make you mad. The first night I went there, our building, which is very close to the hospital, was just shaking. We stayed in mattresses on the floor in small rooms accommodating up to 10 of us. It felt like the bombing was just beside us even though it was a few kilometres away.
As an Irish and Egyptian citizen, Shaalan was able to leave through Egypt to return to work in Ireland, where his wife and children live.
 I thought I wouldn t be able to come back to them. But fortunately I am back because we have Irish citizenship. I travelled by my Irish passport,  he says, adding that he has been  unable to sleep  since he returned home last Wednesday and resumed work.
 It was horrific there. I m crying thinking about it every day.
Despite the conditions in Gaza, Shaalan intends to return in May for another three weeks of volunteering as a surgeon as he feels a sense of  duty  to help.
 I hope this war ends soon. It is really awful, like no other,  he says.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



'Rick Astley walked away with £5m'; As the musical based on his 1980s hits heads for Dublin, Pete Waterman looks back at the days when he ruled the charts
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 8
Length: 1198 words
Body


Pete Waterman, always the most visible member of the hit-factory triumvirate that also included Mike Stock and Matt Aitken, doesn t simply make entertainment. He is entertainment.
Remember when Kylie Minogue left Jason Donovan for  Michael Hutchence? Waterman has an epic account that ends with a light-bulb moment:  I turned to the others and said,  Better the devil you know.  And Kylie arrives, waylaid by all the press and paparazzi, and we have our backs to her so she can t see we are still writing the lyrics. It sounds fantastic, but it was a great way to work.
Name any star, and the veteran producer has a story about them.  I remember Steven Spielberg asking me,  Why are the British so obsessed with dirt?   says Waterman.  I was watching an episode of Minder on set. He just didn t understand. It was anathema to him that there was this gangster   but not a movie gangster, just some spiv around the corner.
You might say that  around the corner  was part of the Stock Aitken Waterman ethos. In contrast to today s Instagram- ready, micromanaged pop stars, the trio generally prized ordinariness above all else.
 If you re with us, you ain t going to turn up in a Rolls-Royce. You are not going to be wearing fabulous suits and dresses,  Waterman says.  It s cheating the public if you re in it for the money. You re going to turn up for work and look like the people who buy your records.
Rick Astley proved that the Stock Aitken Waterman system worked. He was the reluctant singer of a Lancashire duo when Waterman saw him play at a Christmas party at a working men s club in Warrington, near Liverpool. Astley dutifully served his apprenticeship as a tea boy in the producers  hit-making factory in London before Never Gonna Give You Up made him a star.
 We put Rick on a Youth Opportunities Programme government training scheme,  Waterman says.  He was on £40 a week. At that time, you signed for five albums over five years, and the artist always came out with less money than they thought. We went 50-50 on everything after costs.
 He walked away with a cheque for £5 million, which is pretty good for an apprentice. He was a lovely, shy guy, and at the moment when he could have broken America, he said,  I can t do this.  And we backed off. I wanted to stay friends with him. He had lived in my house for four years when he came to London.
Early pioneer
Waterman is a fascinating fellow. To cover his costs as a budding DJ and record collector, he worked as a gravedigger and for British Railways before being taken on by General Electric, where he became a shop steward.
At the moment when I Should Be So Lucky became one of the biggest hits of 1988, the impresario was struggling with illiteracy. He finally taught himself to read and write by scanning record contracts and books about the Motown label.
 Music has been important to me my whole life,  he says.  I was from a very religious family, so I was enrolled in the church choir at eight, and I d go to church three times a week. By nine, I was quite opinionated with the vicar about what hymns we should be singing. But the union taught me to fight for the underdog. I was the representative for 3,000 lady members and two men. And I carried that idea of fairness into music. Every member of staff had to get a bonus.
Waterman was, perhaps predictably, an early pioneer of talent shows. Between 2001 and 2003, he was a judge on the first two series of Pop Idol. He walked away with the canny observation that there could only ever be one winner from that format: his old friend Simon Cowell.
 I love TV, but I don t like too many TV executives, because they re too clever,  says Waterman.  They overanalyse their audience.
 The shows became basically about telling everything   I don t want to hear that your gran has just died, or that you ve survived a heroin overdose. Can you sing? No? Sod off. I was never rude. If someone turned up from Walsall dressed as a banana, you could have fun with them. But after Simon went to America, the show lost some of its charm.
Anyone who experienced adolescence during the late 1980s or early 1990s should prepare for a Proustian rush. I Should Be So Lucky, a jukebox musical based on Stock Aitken Waterman hits, touches down in Dublin next month. The plot concerns a jilted bride who goes on her honeymoon with her chums, pursued by her repentant fiance. And, yes, the show includes Never Gonna Give You Up and Dead Or Alive s You Spin Me Round (Like a Record).
The boppy repertoire also features no fewer than eight Kylie tracks (including two duets), two songs apiece from Bananarama and Mel & Kim, and assorted bangers made famous by Sinitta, Donna Summer and Sonia.
 I was involved in all the auditions,  says Waterman.  So I changed a few things. The ages the actors are, they weren t around for the originals   you see and hear them interpreting the songs completely differently. It s a new experience.
 So, for instance, I went to rehearsal, and they ve slowed down You ll Never Stop Me Loving You. Well, I had tears rolling down my face. I thought,  Oh, my God, did we write this song?  I would have never thought to slow it down, because it wouldn t have been a hit for us. And you go to the theatre and the audience reacts exactly like you. It s amazing.
 And then you see Toy Boy by Sinitta. I would have never in a million years thought the audience would have gone for that the way they do. If you had asked me, I would have said,  Leave it out: it wasn t that big a hit.  But the crowd love it.
Shifting goalposts
For a lot of the 1980s, the UK indie chart was dominated by the likes of The Jesus and Mary Chain, My Bloody Valentine and the Cocteau Twins. Then the rise of Stock Aitken Waterman and the founding of PWL, Waterman s independent label, shifted the goalposts. Indie was no longer synonymous with The House of Love. Pop music, conversely, was no longer the preserve of the major labels.
 We had to go to the European courts,  Waterman says.  The very nature of the title,  Independent chart , you can t decide to miss us out because we re not making Half Man Half Biscuit records. We re making Stock Aitken Waterman records. You can t just decide,  Well, yeah, but that s not really music .
 We were an independent record company, and we were going to show you what real sales look like. That was a difficult tightrope to walk. In the end, of course, they stopped the independent chart. It was the best way to stop us.
There has been much debate about popular music and the weird gendered dichotomy that characterises rock and hip hop, for example, as  good  or authentic music while dismissing pop as trivial, girly and  bad . These arguments seem especially relevant looking back at reviews of the records that Stock, Aitken and Waterman   or Schlock, Aimless and Waterdown, as the Guardian called them   made.  I d rather be able to pay my staff,  says Waterman.  I d rather feed my children than be the greatest starving artist in the world. It s not about what s artistic or not artistic. Can you sing along? Can you dance to it?
I Should Be So Lucky is at the Bord Gáis Energy Theatre, in Dublin, from Tuesday, May 7th to Saturday, May 11th

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



'Roghnaíomar sráid fhánach i bhFionnghlas'
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 8
Length: 1205 words
Body


Is minic a dhéantar cnáimhseáil faoi straitéisí rialtais nach gcuirtear i bhfeidhm, faoi éilimh oideachais nach gcomhlíontar, faoi phleananna móra teanga nach gcuirtear i gcrích agus faoi dhearcadh fuarbhruite an stáit go ginearálta i dtaobh na Gaeilge agus na Gaeltachta.
Seans nár chuir sé ionadh ar mhórán i bpobal na Gaeilge an tseachtain seo caite mar sin nuair a theip ar Fhine Gael aire sóisearach Gaeltachta dá gcuid féin a ainmniú.
Tuairiscíodh gur aistríodh an aireacht ar ais go Fianna Fáil toisc nach raibh teachta ar bith de chuid Fhine Gael sásta, nó sách inniúil sa teanga chun tabhairt faoin gcúram tábhachtach seo.
Pé chúis a bhí leis sin, agus an margántaíocht agus an imghabháil ar siúl ar Shráid Chill Dara, bhí margaíocht de chineál eile ar fad ar siúl 10 nóiméid ó dhoras Theach Laighin.
Ar shráid stairiúil Uí Mhóra i dtuaisceart na cathrach bhí Ardmhéara Bhaile Átha Cliath, Daithí de Róiste, i mbun gnó oifigiúil.
Thug an tArdmhéara cuairt ar Troy s Butchers agus ar thrádálaithe Shráid Uí Mhóra chomh maith le Hyne s Bar i mBóthar na gCloch chun tús a chur le scéim nua Ghaeilge.
Tá sé mar aidhm leis an scéim  Give Gaeilge a Go  atá ina chomhthogra idir Bhaile Átha Cliath le Gaeilge agus an Chomhairle Cathrach úsáid na teanga a spreagadh i siopaí agus i measc miondíoltóirí na cathrach.
 Tá an líon is mó cainteoirí laethúla Gaeilge sa tír i mBaile Átha Cliath,  a dúirt an tUasal de Róiste. Dúirt sé go bhfuil sé  thar a bheith tábhachtach  go mbeadh deiseanna acu siúd a labhraíonn Gaeilge  ár dteanga dhúchais a úsáid sa phobal .
Tá a lán ar bun ag Comhairle Cathrach Bhaile Átha Cliath i réimse na Gaeilge faoi láthair. Bhunaigh an chomhairle tionscadal píolótach anuraidh, Gaeilge 365, chun dea-chleachtas a chruthú i dtaobh na Gaeilge.
Ceapadh Daithí de Buitléir (a raibh dlúthbhaint aige le bunú chumann lán-Ghaeilge CLG na Gaeil Óga) mar bhainisteoir cláir ar an togra nua.
Tá sé mar aidhm leis an tionscadal bealaí nua a aithint ina dtiocfaidh le húdaráis áitiúla cuspóirí reachtaíochta agus beartais teanga a chomhlíonadh agus deiseanna labhartha na Gaeilge a mhéadú sa chathair ag an am céanna.
Dúirt an tUasal de Buitléir le Tuarascáil go bhfuil sé mar aidhm ag an tionscadal líon na ndeiseanna atá ag an bpobal an Ghaeilge a úsáid sa chathair a mhéadú faoi dheich faoi 2027.
Ceann de na rudaí is deise faoin gComhairle Cathrach ó thaobh na Gaeilge de ná go bhfuil  scóip iontach leathan ann  dar leis.
 Bíonn siad ag plé le féilte agus le himeachtaí éagsúla, na healaíona, cúrsaí spóirt, spórtlanna poiblí, leabharlanna, cúrsaí tithíochta agus forbairt an phobail.
 Tá an smaoineamh simplí go leor,  a deir de Buitléir.
 Gach rud a dhéanann muid, tá sé uimhirdhírithe nó spriocdhírithe,  a dúirt sé.
 Tá 360,000 duine i gcathair Bhaile Átha Cliath ar mian leo Gaeilge a labhairt níos minice,  a dúirt sé.
 Tá Gaeilge ag 164,000 duine ach níl ach 6,000 duine ag labhairt Gaeilge gach lá.
Creideann sé  nuair a dhéanann tú tochailt  ar uimhreacha an daonáirimh agus i bhfianaise an taighde atá déanta, go bhfuil sé  an-soiléir  go bhfuil daoine  ag iarraidh Gaeilge a labhairt níos minice.
Ach seachas a bheith  báite le straitéis  nó a bheith de shíor ag iomrascáil le polasaithe agus tionscadail fhadtéarmacha, molann de Buitléar gur cheart tabhairt faoi chur chun cinn na Gaeilge ar bhealach nuálach.
Cuireadh meitheal oibre d fhostaithe na Comhairle Cathrach ar bun chun tograí nuálacha a phlé agus a fhorbairt le deireanas ar a tugadh an Chomhairle Craiceáilte.
D eascair go leor smaointe ón bpróiseas, ina measc samhail tithíochta theangabhunaithe a chruthú do chainteoirí Gaeilge sa chathair, turasóireacht teanga agus clár teanga a fhorbairt do ghrúpaí leabharlainne.
 Rinneamar an-chuid oibre leis na fostaithe agus anois tá muid chun tacaíochtaí a chur ar fáil dóibh chun gur féidir leo a gcuid smaointe a chur i gcrích,  a dúirt de Buitléir.
Comhairle Cathrach
Cuireadh clár cinnireachta ar fáil d fhostaithe na Comhairle Cathrach chun tograí nuálacha a fhorbairt.
 Nuair a fheiceann daoine go bhfuil feidhm ag baint leis an teanga agus nuair a fheiceann siad gur rud beo í, tosaíonn siad ag cur spéise ann,  a dúirt de Buitléir.
Tá thart ar 100 fostaí ag freastal ar ranganna Gaeilge faoi láthair.
 Tá naoi rang dhifriúil ar siúl againn faoi láthair. Tá rang amháin ann do dhaoine nár fhoghlaim Gaeilge riamh   den chuid is mó is as lasmuigh d Éirinn dóibh. Tá siadsan ar aistear foghlama teanga anois.
 Tá súil againn go dtiocfaidh go leor tríd agus go mbeidh siadsan in ann páirt a ghlacadh sa Chomhairle Craiceáilte nó i dtograí eile. Is leosan an Ghaeilge sa chaoi chéanna gur liomsa agus gur leatsa í. Tá sé sin an-tábhachtach.
 Is daoine iad go leor acu a thagann ó thíortha ilteangacha nó ó thíortha ina gcuirtear go leor béime ar an ilteangachas. Feictear dóibh gur rud nádúrtha é an teanga a fhoghlaim.
Más é an teaghlach an áit is tábhachtaí leis an Ghaeilge a chaomhnú do na glúinte atá le teacht, tagann an pobal máguaird go te sna sála air.
Agus chun iarracht a dhéanamh an nósmhaireacht nua teanga sin a chruthú agus líonra nua teanga a spreagadh, reáchtáil Gaeilge365 togra nuálach ar leibhéal na sráide dar teideal Spraoi Sráide. Tugann an daonáireamh an-chuid eolais ar nósmhaireacht teanga an phobail agus d fhonn tástála, socraíodh díriú isteach ar shráid amháin.
 Is féidir breathnú ar an daonáireamh ar leibhéal na sráide agus is féidir feiscint cé mhéad duine a bhfuil Gaeilge acu,  a dúirt de Buitléir.
 Is minic a deirtear nach bhfuil na figiúirí sa daonáireamh a bhaineann le cumas agus labhairt na teanga fíor,  a dúirt sé.
 Cheap mise i gcónaí go raibh siad fíor agus creidim fós go bhfuil siad fíor, ach b fhéidir go bhfuil siad róchoimeádach in áiteanna.
 Roghnaíomar sráid go fánach i bhFionnghlas,  a dúirt de Buitléir.
 Ní raibh ann ach gnáth shráid i mBaile Átha Cliath.
 Bheartaíomar dul ó dhoras go doras. Chnagamar ar na doirse agus d fhiafraigh muid an raibh Gaeilge ag na daoine a d fhreagair.
 Thángamar ar sheachtar nó ochtar a raibh meascán de chaighdeán Gaeilge acu,  a dúirt sé.
Bhí daoine ón nGaeltacht ina measc chomh maith le daoine eile a raibh Gaeilge an-mhaith acu agus daoine eile arís a bhí tar éis filleadh ar fhoghlaim na teanga.
 D fhiosraíomar díobh  an mbeadh spéis acu togra ealaíona a reáchtáil trí Ghaeilge do mhuintir na sráide.
 Bhí suim acu ann agus chuir siad féile shráide ar bun i dteach duine de mhuintir na sráide.
 Tugadh cuireadh don chomharsanacht ar fad teacht agus tháinig 50 duine as an 200 atá ina gcónaí ar an tsráid.  Gaeilge go príomha a bhí á labhairt acu.
 B fhéidir, nach bhfuil muid dírithe ar an áit áitiúil sa chaoi ina smaoiníonn muid,  a dúirt de Buitléir.
B fhéidir go bhfuil ceacht le foghlaim ag na polaiteoirí ón gcur chuige seo. Ní hamháin gur léirigh fostaithe na Comhairle Cathrach agus muintir na cathrach toil agus suim sa dtogra, ach léiríodh gur féidir deiseanna nua labhartha a chruthú agus ní fios, bfhéidir go n eascróidh líonraí nua teanga as iarrachtaí nuálacha mar seo freisin.
Foclóir  Cnáimhseáil    grumbling; fánach   random; Fionnghlas   Finglas; margántaíocht   horse-trading; fuarbhruite   lukewarm; sóisearach   junior;  dea-chleachtas   best practice; tionscadal   project; iomrascáil   wrestling

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



'The mother of all reforms': Meloni's plans to rewrite Italy's post-fascist constitution
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 1864 words
Body


Inside the museum that holds the Ara Pacis, a marble altar celebrating the peace and prosperity brought by the 40-year reign of Ancient Rome s first emperor, Augustus, a group of prominent Italian business people were recently reflecting on the current state of the country.
The assembled entrepreneurs and executives   supporters of a fledgling civil society movement called Io Cambio, or I Change   lamented the heavy toll that chronic political instability had taken on contemporary Italy s prospects and international credibility.
In their formal discussions, and over sparkling wine, cheese and olives on the rooftop afterwards, they diagnosed what they see as the problem: Italy s constitution, written after the second World War and the fall of Benito Mussolini s fascist dictatorship, was no longer fit for purpose. An overhaul was needed if Italy is to deliver stronger governments capable of tackling the country s economic and social woes, they said.
 We hope for a reform of our institutions   that is, a new form of government,  Io Cambio s co-founder, Nicola Drago, the fourth-generation scion of an industrial dynasty, told participants.  The most important thing is that there are stable and effective governments that can do their job.
Prime Minister Giorgia Meloni is also focused these days on how Italy s postwar political system   notorious for its succession of short-lived ruling coalitions and intense palace intrigue   is failing, in her view, to deliver for its citizens.
Now, in what is likely to be one of the biggest battles of her political career, Meloni has unveiled plans for a contentious constitutional overhaul that she calls  the mother of all reforms , one she claims will deliver political stability. To pull it off, she will need the support of influential citizens such as the supporters of Io Cambio to overcome what is likely to be fierce resistance to her plans.
At the heart of Meloni s proposal is giving Italian voters the ability to directly elect prime ministers for five-year terms, ostensibly reducing the office s vulnerability to the type of parliamentary scheming, rebellions and desertions behind the premature demise of numerous past governments.
Meloni contends that establishing the  premierato    the elected prime minister   would end the revolving door at Palazzo Chigi, their official residence in Italy, which has had 68 governments, most lasting an average of just over a year, since 1946.
Longer, more secure tenures, she says, will give future leaders both the clout and time to tackle Italy s big policy challenges, from its heavy debt burden and chronically sluggish economic growth to a deepening demographic crisis.
 We want to take advantage of the stability of this government to give Italians a reform that will allow them to choose who is going to govern them and allow the ones chosen by Italians to have five years to realise their programme,  Meloni said at the end of last year in a social media video explaining her proposal.
Constraints on head of state
But in its attempt to boost stability and democratic accountability, the constitutional changes will put constraints on the ability of Italian presidents, the head of state, to serve as institutional guardrails against the impulses of populist politicians or restore stability and market confidence, as they have done at several critical junctures in the past.
The new rules would strip the president   chosen by legislators and other designated officials in an opaque process likened to a papal conclave   of the power to invite whomever they deem fit to lead the country at times of crisis, as President Sergio Mattarella did in tapping Mario Draghi, the former European Central Bank president, in 2021 at the height of the Covid-19 pandemic.
That erosion of presidential discretion, mainly used at times of acute political discord, is an unsettling prospect for some Italians, who have largely supported past presidential interventions that have helped to set the country on the right course with the appointment of apolitical, technocratic governments.
 The reforms are not touching the constitutional articles concerning the powers of the president of the republic, but they are emptying it from inside,  argues former constitutional court president Marta Cartabia, who served as justice minister in Draghi s government.  We will diminish a figure that has been one of the successful institutions and proved to be very useful in stabilising the country.
Winning support for this political redesign, which already has the approval of cabinet and is being scrutinised and debated by a senate committee, will be the toughest challenge Meloni has faced since entering politics in 1992 as a teenage activist with the neo-fascist Italian Social Movement, founded by Mussolini s surviving allies.
Though her right-wing coalition has a solid parliamentary majority, constitutional amendments must be approved either by two-thirds of the lawmakers in both houses of parliament or a majority of voters in a national referendum. Neither will be easy to obtain.
Yet Meloni, who has shown impressive political acumen in propelling her 12-year-old Brothers of Italy party from the political margins to the fulcrum of power, appears ready to stake her personal capital on succeeding where others have failed by reworking Italy s system.
 For me, the important thing is to be able to bring home this reform that in my heart I consider the most important legacy I can leave to Italy,  Meloni said in a TV interview last week.
Italy s constitution was written shortly after the end of the second World War and the onset of the Cold War   with the US monitoring closely. Memories of Mussolini s fascist regime loomed large as did speculation that Italy s Communist Party, the largest in western Europe at the time, could come to power.
In that fraught climate, Italy s constitutional drafters devised a strong parliamentary system, with a pre-eminent legislature, a weaker executive and a collaborative lawmaking process. At the pinnacle was the president, conceived as a widely respected, unifying figure with sufficient moral authority to arbitrate disputes and keep the country on track.
Opposition parties have expressed alarm at Meloni s proposed constitutional redesign, with Elly Schlein, leader of the centre-left Democratic Party, calling the premierato the  dangerous  result of a long-standing infatuation with the idea of a strong leader among the Italian right.
She says that the framework, if adopted, would undermine parliamentary authority and concentrate power in the hands of a single individual.
 In this country, we have already seen the model of one chief in command, with no limit from the parliament or the constitution, and it has not gone well,  says Schlein, referring to Mussolini.  I don t see any reason to go in this direction. Democracy is not voting every five years for a chief with no controls.
Historically, Italian voters have been wary of tampering with the country s political architecture, rejecting a significant constitutional overhaul promoted by prime minister Silvio Berlusconi in 2006 and then another set of amendments driven by prime minister Matteo Renzi, then the Democratic Party leader, a decade later.
Yet analysts say Meloni appears to have learned from the failures of her predecessors and could have a fair shot at securing popular support for her own amendments, which she is presenting as a few small changes to strengthen government s accountability to the public.
 The central concept   that the government should reflect the will of the people   is simple and popular,  says Lorenzo Pregliasco, founder of YouTrend, a Turin-based political polling agency.  If the referendum campaign was framed around this, it would have good chances of winning.
The battle over the premierato   which many expect will go full force after June s European parliamentary elections   could make or break Meloni s emerging reputation as a shrewd judge of the national mood and an emerging power broker on the European stage. But whether a directly elected prime minister within a parliamentary system would in reality help end years of political turmoil and misgovernance is a matter of fierce debate within Italy.
The concept has only ever been tried in one other country: Israel, which in 1992 changed its basic law to create directly elected prime ministers. The aim was to boost stability and reduce political horse-trading in an electoral system in which it was difficult for any one party to secure a clear majority.
But the experiment was abandoned after less than a decade, following three elections in which the popularly chosen prime ministers still struggled to forge coherent, durable governing coalitions in parliaments that were fragmented, or dominated, by rival parties.
Parliamentary majority
Elisabetta Casellati, Italy s minister of institutional reform, says Rome has learned from the Israeli experience and will avoid such outcomes by requiring prime ministerial candidates to be directly linked to parties  electoral coalitions.
As the Meloni government s proposal stands, elected premiers would require the confidence of a parliamentary majority. In the event of resignation or a no-confidence vote, the prime minister could be replaced once by another lawmaker from the same majority. If that alternative premier loses support, parliament would have to be dissolved and a fresh election called.
 I call it the premiership Italian-style,  Casellati explains, on the sidelines of the Io Cambio function where she had come to present the plan and seek support.  Why should we be afraid of novelty?
Some academics warn that Meloni s proposal could inadvertently lead to greater political turmoil. They foresee the risk of even more frequent parliamentary elections than in the past when several governments, and even alternative coalitions, have emerged from the same parliament.
 In many European countries we are witnessing parliamentary systems more and more affected by instability,  says Cristina Fasone, professor of comparative public law at Rome s Luiss university.  My fear is that we may have a similar dynamic in which the direct election of the prime minister in the end loses its substance because we are constantly re-electing parliaments.
Others believe that the root of Italy s chronic instability lies not in constitutional design flaws, but in a fragmented party system, which leads to fractious coalition governments that collapse due to ideological incoherence or personal rivalries.
 The main problem is the fragility of the coalitions,  says Cartabia, Draghi s former justice minister.  If we really want to find a way to bring stability, what we need is not to reinforce the leader, but rather to reinforce the strength of the coalitions and their capacity of governing together.
In her social media post, Meloni expressed confidence about achieving her goal.  It will be up to the citizens to support this revolution or not,  she said.  I am sure the majority of Italians will understand that they have the historic opportunity to make Italy into a mature democracy.    Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



'Vast majority of Ireland's Jewish community do not support Netanyahu'; Jewish community has been feeling pressure from wider public opinion
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 1278 words
Body


Criticism of Binyamin Netanyahu intensified last week both within Israel and among his international allies, with US president Joe Biden describing the Israeli prime minister s approach to war in Gaza as a  mistake . Is opinion also shifting within the Irish-Jewish community over Israel s response to the October 7th Hamas terrorist attack?
 The [Irish-Jewish] community spans the whole spectrum of the political divide. However, I am positive that the vast majority do not support Netanyahu or his clinging to power by bringing into government the right-wing elements of Israeli society,  says Maurice Cohen, chair of the Jewish Representative Council of Ireland, when asked what Irish Jews think of the Israeli prime minister.
 Nor do they agree with his handling of the war in Gaza. However, whenever I ask any person, whether from the Jewish community or even Irish politicians, as to how as prime minister of a country that had been subjected to the most outrageous premeditated planned attack they would deal with the situation, they generally agree that it would be to eliminate the perpetrators even though they hide behind their own citizens, hide under and in schools and in and under hospitals,  Cohen adds.
Cohen has been a leading spokesman for Ireland s Jewish community, along with Oliver Sears, founder of Holocaust Awareness Ireland. The latter is more blunt in his assessment of the Israeli prime minister.
 Netanyahu has a very poor approval rating among most Jews and has caused enormous issues for the diaspora during his almost 16 years of government. He is the worst thing to have happened to the state of Israel since its foundation,  says Sears.
At the 2022 census, there were 2,193 Jews in Ireland, a community whose highest number in the state was 3,907 (in 1946) and which is noted for its involvement with Irish life, including politics, the law, medicine, and the arts.
In his 1998 book, Jews in 20th Century Ireland, the late UCC historian Dermot Keogh said it revealed  that the community has contributed disproportionately to its numbers . In 2016, President Michael D Higgins spoke of  the commitment and dynamism of Ireland s small Jewish community, a community that has made, and continues to make, such a rich contribution to the life of this island   to Irish arts, professions and politics .
However, since the war in Gaza began, Ireland s Jewish community has been feeling pressure from wider public opinion. Cohen and Sears spoke to The Irish Times in recent days   prior to the weekend escalation of regional violence, with Iran s attack on Israel   about the mix of emotions experienced by Ireland s Jews over the past six months.
Cohen says the October 7th events  have had an enormous effect on the Irish-Jewish community, which is made up, not only those of us who perhaps go back five or six generations, but also many Israelis who have now become Irish citizens with Irish children. Many of us have close family and friends who were brutally murdered or kidnapped on that terrible day, which is the largest pogrom since the Holocaust 80 years ago.
Sears says:  The hostility towards Jews since October 7th in Ireland is worse than anything I have experienced in the almost 40 years of living here. We were shocked to see the level of vitriol thrown at Israel even as it was fighting Hamas while they were still butchering Israelis. The mask slipped immediately. I am not an Israeli citizen and have no say in how that country is governed. However, whenever there is an act of aggression by Israel, whatever the circumstances, the incidence of anti-Semitic attacks rises.
What of the Irish Government position?
 The community has no real issue with fair criticism of Israel,  says Sears. However,  leading politicians have jumped on the anti-Israel bandwagon without having the courage to publicly call out the shameful rise in anti-Semitism and to remind the public of the heinous attacks of October 7th, the ongoing fate of the hostages, the continuous and sustained fire coming from Hamas and the fact that Hamas have a genocidal charter to wipe Israel off the map. The rhetoric used by politicians in the Dáil is irresponsible and inflammatory and adds to the sense of isolation that the [Irish-Jewish] community currently feels.
Regarding condemnation of the Israeli Defence Forces, which has been accused of killing more than 33,000 Gazans, Sears says:  The violence is Gaza has been horrific. I called for a ceasefire on day one and a swap of all the hostages for as many Palestinian prisoners as was required.
While he says casualty figures released by Hamas should be treated with some caution,  the death of civilians is tragic and I wished the fight against Hamas had been prosecuted to minimise such deaths. That Hamas has total disregard for the safety of their own people and break every rule of military engagement does make the Israeli response impossibly hard where protecting the lives of bystanders is concerned.
Last week, the Irish Government stepped up its diplomatic efforts on the conflict, announcing plans to formally recognise the state of Palestine. What is the view of Irish Jews on a two-state solution for the Israel-Palestine crisis?
 Most Irish Jews, if not all, would believe that a two-state solution is the only way forward so that Palestinians and Israelis can live side by side in peace,  says Cohen.  However, the timing must be correct, as laid out in the Oslo Accords. It must be negotiated by both sides and it just won t work if it is imposed on either side.
 Hamas s charter calls for the elimination of the state of Israel and all Jews. The schooling in Gaza amounts to child abuse as they are taught to be martyrs. Until deradicalisation takes place, there will be no peace. Ireland, recognising a Palestinian state at the moment, is the ultimate in virtue signalling. Each political party outdoing the other, like lemmings following each other. It s the height of stupidity and it is rewarding the terrible atrocities of October 7th.
Sears says:  I believe in a two-state solution but one where Hamas has no power. It s the only way Jews and Palestinians can live in peace, but it requires the Arab world plus, most importantly, Iran to accept Israeli sovereignty. It has to be part of a two-state solution.
 An international coalition needs to guarantee its security and billions in funds are required to rebuild. It needs to be governed by a non-Hamas Palestinian body. Israel should have no say in the governance but there must be a non-aggression pact signed with Israel.
Israel paints Ireland as one of the least sympathetic western countries to its case. Would that be the opinion of Irish Jews?
 Yes, that would be the opinion of most Irish Jews and many Irish people, despite the noise of the activists,  Cohen replies.  The Israelis understand that the Irish have mistakenly taken up the Palestinian cause as they are deemed to be the underdog. The incorrect narrative is that as the Irish kicked out the British so did the Palestinians. In reality, it was mostly the Jews who were the ones that fought the British.
On the question of Irish bias, Sears says:  It s a matter of fact rather than opinion. Since 1967   the Six-Day War, when Egypt, Syria and Jordan attacked Israel and lost the war, Israel captured East Jerusalem and other territory as a result   Ireland has viewed Israel as a  colonising  entity and this word has been misappropriated ever since.  Traditional elements of anti-Semitism are always below the surface and, since October 7th, anti-Semitism is expressed openly. The conflation of Jews and Israelis is now commonplace, with little or no distinction.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



A career spanning the Troubles and emerging peace; Noel Doran singles out the 1998 murder of Patrick Kielty's father in influencing his outlook as Irish News editor   a post he is leaving after 25 years
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 1363 words
Body


In a lifetime in journalism, there is little Noel Doran hasn t seen.
As a reporter he covered some of the worst days of the Troubles. When he stood down this week after 25 years as the editor of the Irish News, he did so as the longest-serving newspaper editor in these islands.
 It was a great time to be involved in newspapers,  says Doran.  Trying to make sense, trying to respect the position of our readers, but also maybe trying to encourage them to go in a number of different directions while always maintaining the constitutional nationalist tone of the paper and having a sense of its history as well.
As deputy editor from 1993 and editor from 1999, he steered the Irish News   the North s only nationalist daily newspaper   from ceasefires and peace talks to controversies over decommissioning and policing, the abuse scandal in the Catholic church, Brexit and, most recently, the prospect of a Border poll and a united Ireland.
It has given voice to the nationalist North, but also been a voice.  Our line has always been, there were always options, every killing was not just wrong but cruel, and capable of causing bitterness and grief.
That time as a reporter   in weekly newspapers and then with the Belfast Telegraph    clearly  helped shape his outlook as an editor. Doran singles out the murder of Jack Kielty   the father of the Late Late Show host Patrick Kielty   in Dundrum, Co Down, in 1988.
 The first person I met that night was his [Patrick s] primary school principal, Jarlath Carey, who was an SDLP councillor and played midfield for the Down team that won the All-Ireland, and was also best man at my parents  wedding.
 The sense of shock as he explained the circumstances behind the murder of his neighbour was profound, and you have some sort of insight into what it must have been like for Paddy Kielty, who was still at school at the time.
 Watching the whole Paddy Kielty phenomenon, he s just been grand marshal at the St Patrick s Day parade, and I keep thinking how life has changed for him over the years ... but the Kieltys still live in the same house, his mother s still there in the same house on the same street.
There was also an interview with Gordon and Joan Wilson just after their daughter Marie had been killed in the IRA s Remembrance Day bombing of Enniskillen in 1987,  remarkable  people who it was a  privilege  to interview, Doran says.  They helped shape reconciliation, forgiveness.
Doran lists the moments when the Irish News had to make a call: over policing (ahead of Sinn Féin, the SDLP and the Catholic church); over decommissioning; over Rule 21.
With hindsight,  you can kind of see it had to happen . He references the attendance of the North s First Minister, Sinn Féin vice-president Michelle O Neill, at a PSNI graduation ceremony earlier this year.  It s remarkable how things have moved on. Incredible, and all hugely positive.
 Could it have happened a lot sooner? Well, maybe it couldn t.
In this, as in so much else, Doran speaks with an authority born of experience. That experience began at an early age growing up in Glasdrumman, outside Kilkeel in Co Down. His father, Arthur, was an independent councillor and  a big reader of newspapers .
Though sectarianism was  not as in-your-face as it would be in some areas ,  in Kilkeel there was nevertheless  a Protestant side of the street and a Catholic side of the street and that was what people were supposed to do, walk down your side of the street .
He had what he describes as  an awareness of things going on around you . Journalism placed him at the heart of it all; in Milltown Cemetery in March 1988,  I got a little too close.
Covering the funerals of three IRA members killed by the SAS in Gibraltar, he witnessed the attack by the loyalist Michael Stone. Desperate to get to a phone to file his copy, he was spotted by IRA stewards, one of whom  grabbed me, and somebody else saw him grab me and started throwing punches and the next thing, it went bananas.
 The guy who had me by the throat, we d met before ... it looked a little bit hairy for a while but then he realised ... he kind of backed off and after a few thumps they let go of me.
Things could have ended a lot worse.  I think they thought I might have been an associate of Michael Stone.
Over the years he got to know all the key figures, from Ian Paisley, David Trimble and Peter Robinson to John Hume, Martin McGuinness and Gerry Adams.
Always, there was a line:  You know them, but there are boundaries.  Their coverage was scrutinised.  You would get a quare touch sometimes:  all you re doing is covering Hume ;  all you re doing is covering McGuinness and Adams .
With Hume and McGuinness,  the personal contact there was crucial . In Derry during the 1980s,  the scale of Hume, as an international figure, was astonishing . That said, it was  pretty clear  he stayed on too long in politics once his health started to fail.  He left his party in a very difficult position.
His first meeting McGuinness was during a riot in Derry.  He was basically in the middle of it, but he still came over to talk.
On another occasion he was sent to knock on his front door early one morning after the entire Sinn Féin leadership had been arrested and then released.  The front window opened in the bedroom and McGuinness s head sticks out,  all right , and he brought me in and gave me tea and toast.
This meant that  when you did see each other in different circumstances many years later, you kind of understood each other a little bit more.
He has a photograph of himself and McGuinness at an awards ceremony, all in black tie; with them is the former chairman of the Irish News, the late Jim Fitzpatrick, who died in 2022 aged 92.  Two people who were different ways were central to my career with the Irish News,  says Doran.
On occasion after occasion, he describes Fitzpatrick s support as crucial, not least with the remarkable libel case between the Irish News and an Italian restaurant in west Belfast, Goodfellas, in 2000, which could have bankrupted the newspaper and effectively ended restaurant reviewing.
The restaurant owner sued them for defamation after a negative review and initially won £25,000 plus costs.
However, the ruling was subsequently overturned.  We had to pay our costs, they had to pay their costs, so it was an expensive experience, but if it had been upheld, how could you ever do a review ever again?
Doran looks back on the loss of colleagues, including the award-winning photographer and Olympic boxer Hugh Russell and Éamon Phoenix, the historian who covered the release of state papers for several media outlets including The Irish Times and was particularly associated with the  On This Day  column in the Irish News.
Work is under way on an Éamon Phoenix foundation. Doran misses him not just for his ability to understand the past, but to analyse the present.  He could tell you what was going to happen all the time, and he was nearly always right.
Doran s own analysis is that a Border poll is on its way    2030, maybe a bit beyond that, but it must surely be coming .
 There s just a complete logic to it,  he says.
Unionists  clearly are going to do everything they can to delay that, but they kind of know they can t veto it indefinitely, that over a period of time things will change and that the referendum is coming, and the debate hasn t even started yet.
However it plays out, he will still have a role, as will the paper. Doran will advise the Irish News on legal and regulatory matters as a consultant, while the paper recently backed the idea of a people s assembly  as a way of shaking things up and moving things on a bit ... the paper s been maybe a little bit more direct in terms of the whole unity debate, but that s because events have changed.
As political times have changed, so too has the newspaper industry. Though the Irish News is  edging things forward to digital first , Doran is in no doubt there will always be a print copy of the paper  in my lifetime , just as there will always be a place for quality journalism.
 Technology will move on, things will change ... it s the material which is of some consequence which endures.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



A dangerous new dynamic; Iran attacks Israel
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 459 words
Body


The shadow war is no more. The April 1st attack on the Iranian embassy compound in Damascus - widely attributed to Israel   has, as expected, triggered a retaliation. Iran launched a massive direct attack on Israel, aided by its Hezbollah and Houthi proxies in Lebanon, Iraq and Yemen, involving drones, cruise missiles and surface-to-surface missiles. Hezbollah also launched dozens of Katyusha rockets at an Israeli barracks in the Golan Heights, while Iranian commandos seized an Israeli flagged container ship in the Gulf of Oman.
Although successfully repulsed, the first direct attack on Israel by Iran has brought a dangerous new dynamic to the long-simmering conflict between the two countries, with US, British, French and Jordanian air defence forces now drawn in to defending Israel. Until recently hostilities had been maintained at arm s length, using Iranian proxies or targeted assassinations by Israel of Iranian military leaders and nuclear scientists. Now the risk is of a wider conflict in the region.
Whether and how Israel now responds is critical. Once again Israel s allies, the US and UK, having demonstrated their willingness to stand by it, are desperately pleading with prime minister Benjamin Netanyahu to stay his hand and avoid further tit-for-tat retaliation, particularly if provocative targets on Iranian soil are being considered.
Iran insists that  the mission is accomplished and the operation is over and we have no intentions of going further.  But Israeli retaliation would, it warned, prompt further,  much larger  attacks.
Israel would do well to show restraint. Its successful repulsion of the waves of drones and the very limited damage done are ample demonstration of its military strength. Its immediate boast of the support it received from allies is testimony to the strength of its alliances, despite the recent public spats with Washington. Revenge should not be part of the calculation.
Netanyahu, however, dangerously driven by personal and domestic political considerations, has shown himself reluctant to listen to allies  entreaties. Israel has promised to  do what is necessary  in response.
Meanwhile, the threat of what would be a devastating all-out assault on Rafah, opposed by all the country s allies and the UN, remains on the agenda, while talks on a humanitarian ceasefire stumble on. Israel has said that Hamas rejected the latest proposals.
If Israel expects its allies  support at this critical time, then it must hear them. The risk of a wider regional war in the Middle East is now real. The Iranian attack has dangerously upped the ante, with world leaders and the UN all trying to avoid further escalation. Only restraint now on all sides can avoid the situation deteriorating further.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Air strike puts focus on US foreign aid Bill; Congress has yet to pass legislation on Bill to give aid to Ukraine, Israel and Gaza
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 633 words
Byline: KEITH DUGGAN
Body


KEITH DUGGAN Washington Correspondent
 By mid-afternoon on Saturday, US president Joe Biden had abandoned plans for a sunny weekend watching the Masters tournament at his Delaware beach house and flown hastily back to the Situation Room in the White House to monitor information of Iran s imminent air attack on military facilities in Israel.
By evening, he once again found himself on a phone call with Israel s prime minister, Binyamin Netanyahu. Little over a week ago, he delivered a warning to Netanyahu in relation to the devastating humanitarian consequences of its attacks on Hamas in Gaza. This time, he was there to reaffirm  America s ironclad commitment to the security of Israel  while stressing the importance of de-escalating the  tensions and averting a generalised conflict in the region.
The barrage of weapons included more than 30 cruise missiles and 120 ballistic missiles, all of which were neutralised and taken down by a combination of US and Israeli missile defence destroyers.
The Biden administration had moved aircraft and ballistic missile defence destroyers over the past week at the president s direction and the attacks caused little damage, prompting Biden to urge Netanyahu to treat the engagement as an effective victory.
A senior White House official was reported as saying that Biden told Netanyahu,  You got a win. Take the win , which, in the formal language of the White House statement translated as:  I told him that Israel demonstrated a remarkable capacity to defend against and defeat even unprecedented attacks   sending a clear message to its foes that they cannot effectively threaten the security of Israel.
Latest flashpoint
For Biden, this latest flashpoint in the region will provide another indication of how much weight Netanyahu places on his words. While the US president engaged fellow G7 leaders to formulate a cohesive diplomatic response to the Iranian aggression, persuading Israel from a response that would further destabilise the region is key.
The president s foreign policy record was attacked by his Republican rival in the November elections, Donald Trump, who, speaking at a rally in Pennsylvania, used the Iranian attack as another example of US diplomatic weakness under Biden.
 Performative
Republican senator Marco Rubio, who ran for the Republican presidential nomination in 2016, told CNN yesterday that, while the air strike was interpreted as  performative , Iran s broader goal was to render Israel  an impossible place to live . He cited the impact the attack would have on Israel s tourist economy   declining to note that the six-month conflict can hardly have helped with domestic tourism   and castigated Biden s reported advice to Netanyahu to interpret the attack as  a win .
Shortly after the attack began, Tennessee Republican senator Marsha Blackburn posted a social media message urging president Biden to  launch aggressive retaliatory strikes on Iran .
In a week when recent polls found that Biden has made steady advances on the lead Trump enjoyed in the election race, the outcome of this flare-up offers an opportunity to demonstrate his experience and inherent faith in diplomatic solution. But it also places the spotlight on the unforgivable dithering in Congress in passing legislation, with the February Bill on foreign aid yet to go before the House of Representatives.
 That Bill is right on the floor ready for the House to act,  said Democratic senator Tim Kaine yesterday.  And I think it is very important, this Bill has defence aid for Israel, defence aid for Ukraine and humanitarian aid for Gaza in this bill. It has just taken way too long. My hope is that the challenges of the weekend will promote action. The events of the weekend make it clear that congress cannot just twiddle our thumbs.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



An Irishman's Diary
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 794 words
Body


On Christmas Day, 1891, the star of New York s Irish-set musical comedy, Mavourneen, took ill on stage in the Fourteenth Street Theatre during the matinee performance. Playing the role of an eighteenth-century Irishman, William J. Scanlan suffered some kind of violent fit. A seasoned pro, he seems to have struggled on to the final curtain and recovered quickly to return to the stage for the evening performance.
 The following day, however, Scanlan had relapsed and, for his own safety, his manager took him to his own home. Within weeks, Scanlan s increasingly violent behaviour led to him being committed to the Bloomingdale Insane Asylum in White Plains. It was here that Scanlan died six years later aged 42.
 Born to Irish emigrant parents in Springfield, Massachusetts, Scanlan had enjoyed a successful career in New York s burgeoning musical theatre scene before illness tragically cut it short. He began working in Vaudeville before becoming a song composer, despite not being able to read music. From one song, Peek-a-Boo, he was said to have made more than $20,000 in royalties in six weeks. Scanlan then moved into musical theatre, becoming a well-known actor, composer and lyricist.
 The sentimental flavour of the production in which Scanlan was performing when he succumbed to his breakdown may be gleaned from the names of some of the songs which featured. They included The Auld Country, Molly O! and Mrs Reilly s Party. The title, Mavourneen, an anglicisation of the Irish mo mhurnín, most likely drew on the popularity of the song Kathleen Mavourneen.
 Penned by English composer Frederick Crouch and poet Marion Crawford in the 1830s, Kathleen Mavourneen became very popular during the Civil War. Its haunting theme of parting sweethearts struck a chord with an audience coming to terms with the daily sundering of families and lovers, as well as the break-up of the Union.
 The song had first come to prominence a few years earlier when one of the greatest musical stars of the era, the Limerick-born soprano Catherine Hayes, arrived in the States, bringing her signature piece, Kathleen Mavourneen, with her.
 Hayes was born into a musical family in Patrick Street in 1818; her father was a bandmaster with the local militia. Having studied with a voice teacher in Dublin, in her twenties, she earned renown touring the country, even performing at one Liszt s concerts in the capital in 1841.
 Within a couple of years, she was performing in France and Italy, making her debut at Milan s La Scala in 1845 in Donizetti s Linda di Chamounix and, therefore, becoming the first Irishwoman to perform on the stage of the prestigious Italian opera house. She holds the same distinction at the Royal Opera, Covent Garden.
Hayes s talents were widely recognised in Italy. In the late 1840s, she performed regularly in Milan, Venice, Florence and Verona. It was in Verona, on St Stephen s Day, 1847, that she performed in the Italian premiere of Verdi s I Masnadieri. Two years later, she was invited to perform for Queen Victoria at Buckingham Palace. For her encore, Hayes chose to sing Kathleen Mavourneen.
 The 1850s saw Hayes become a global superstar. In 1851, she performed in New York at a benefit concert for Fr Mathew, the founder of the Total Abstinence Society, before embarking on a gruelling tour of the United States, partly organised by the roguish PT Barnum. Stops in South America, Australia, India, Singapore and Java followed.
 By 1856, she had returned to Europe. But tragedy struck the following year when the newly married Hayes lost her 35-year-old husband, the American-born promoter William A Bushnell, to consumption. Four years later, in 1861, the pressures of her career perhaps caught up with Hayes when she succumbed to a stroke. She was just 42, the same age as William J. Scanlan when he died in Bloomingdale Insane Asylum.
 But the character of Kathleen survived, becoming the subject of a Dion Boucicault play. In 1919, Fox released Kathleen Mavourneen based on Boucicault s play. It starred Theda Bara, the first  vamp  of the silver screen (she was literally nicknamed  The Vamp  by studio publicists).
 Bara had built a career on playing the  exotic  seductress in contrast to fellow star Mary Pickford s more innocent charms.
 But she was desperate to move away from her bad girl image and relished the role of sweet Kathleen Cavanagh.  However, she had not counted on the bigoted reaction of Irish America, which reacted to the casting of an actress of Jewish ancestry in the role of an Irish coleen by sending death threats and rioting in front of cinemas showing the film. The controversy helped put an end to Bara s career. And as sound arrived in the late 1920s, cinema had already lost one of the silent movie greats.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Appreciation; Seóirse Bodley
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 1120 words
Body


Seóirse Bodley, who was born on April 4th, 1933, and passed peacefully away on November 17th, 2023, was a composer of formative and decisive significance in the development of art music in Ireland. More than any other composer of his generation, Seóirse Bodley sought to reconcile within his own prodigious catalogue the rival claims of Irish traditional music and the aesthetic challenges of European modernism. His absorbed enchantment with both was lifelong. As a student at the Royal Irish Academy of Music and subsequently at University College Dublin, where he studied with John F Larchet, he made his first serious forays into composition. His artistic self-awareness was consolidated in Germany, where in the late 1950s he studied composition and conducting at the State Academy for Music and the Performing Arts in Stuttgart. He joined the staff of University College Dublin in 1959 under Prof Anthony Hughes, and taught in UCD until 2004   an astonishing record of service by any standards. Appointed to a personal chair in 1984 (as Associate Professor of Composition), he counted among his students Raymond Deane, Gerald Barry, Rhona Clarke, Michael Holohan, and Michael McGlynn, all of whom subsequently attained prominence as composers of distinction in Ireland, Britain and further afield.
Prof Bodley s public contribution to music in Ireland did not rest within the borders of UCD: in 1969, he became the founding chair of the Dublin Festival of Twentieth-Century Music (which was to feature many of his own compositions), and in 1970, he likewise chaired the newly-established Folk Music Society of Ireland. He was also a founding member (in 1981) of Aosdána, Ireland s Academy for the Arts, and became the first composer to be elected a Saoi of Aosdána in 2008.
Throughout the unfolding of his art, many of Prof Bodley s original compositions transpired as landmarks in the history of 20th-century Irish art music. His seven symphonies (including two chamber symphonies) were frequently written for public occasions of national significance and were expressly commissioned on that account. His second symphony, for example, entitled I Have Loved the Lands of Ireland (1980) commemorated the centenary of the birth of Pádraig Pearse; his third, Ceol (1981), was written for the opening of the National Concert Hall in Dublin; and his fifth, The Limerick Symphony (1991) commemorated the signing of the Treaty of Limerick in 1691. Other of his orchestral works, including A Small White Cloud Drifts over Ireland (1975) afforded strikingly original configurations of traditional music through the medium of a textural impressionism that Prof Bodley himself located in his encounters with Japanese music.
In his song cycles and vocal-orchestral works,he collaborated with several Irish poets, including Brendan Kennelly (A Girl, 1978), Mícheál Ó Siadhail (The Naked Flame, 1987 and Earlsfort Suite, 2000) and Seamus Heaney (The Hiding Places of Love, 2011). One of his earliest such settings was of WB Yeats (Never to have lived is best, 1965). He also made extensive settings of Goethe, George Russell, Thomas MacGreevy, Máire Mhac an tSaoi, Seán Ó Riordáin and many other writers, as well as settings of his own texts. Many of these settings were written for distinguished artists with whom Prof Bodley worked closely for sustained periods of time. These included Bernadette Greevy, Aylish Kerrigan and Sylvia O Brien.
As a writer of works for piano, he significantly enriched the repertoire of contemporary Irish keyboard music. Leading exponents of the instrument, including John O Conor, Anthony Byrne, Hugh Tinney and Dearbhla Collins, frequently featured his music within their recital and concert programmes. Works such as The Narrow Road to the Deep North (1976) and Aislingí (1977) broke new ground in their meditations on Irish history and experience, and also in their generic inventiveness. Bodley s chamber music was likewise constantly alert to Ireland as the prevailing subject-matter of his musical discourse, albeit through the agency of novel and often stringently modernist textures and techniques.
To a wider public, Seóirse Bodley was perhaps best known for his congregational settings of the ordinary of the Roman Catholic Mass, which hundreds of thousands of people will have sung throughout Ireland, and also for his film music, including his scores for From Ireland s Past (1978), James Joyce:  Is there One Who Understands Me?  (1981) and Caught in a Free State (1984). His very early orchestral arrangement of the Irish traditional air  The Palatine s Daughter  enjoyed enormous popularity as the signature tune for the long-running Irish television drama series The Riordans (1965-1979). He made over 100 choral and orchestral arrangements of Irish airs, many of them in the earliest phase of his career, and remained a student of the tradition throughout his life. His scholarly writings on the transcription of seán nós (slow) airs, which date from the late 1970s and early 1980s, remain of valuable account to the present day. As a pianist and conductor, Bodley was perhaps best known as a professional accompanist in recitals of his own music, and as a choral conductor, notably of the Culwick Choral Society and the UCD Philharmonic Choir.
His students in UCD will remember him above else for two constants in his teaching. The first was a quietly-voiced but unmistakable passion for contemporary art music, at a time when this repertory otherwise rarely featured in the university syllabus; the second was an absolutely fastidious sense of craftsmanship which he conveyed through the example of his own arrangements and settings for chamber ensemble as a teacher of compositional technique. In later years, his lectures on orchestration came as a revelation to many, not least on account of the impeccable scores he gently and skilfully elicited from those who participated in his seminars on this subject.
Despite his exceptionally prolific and widely-acclaimed achievement in composition, Seóirse Bodley was withal a very modest and self-effacing person whose retiring demeanour stood in contrast to the visionary courage and passion of his musical imagination. During the past two decades, his wife, the distinguished musicologist Prof Lorraine Byrne Bodley (also a graduate of UCD) was his constant advocate and companion, and published extensively on her husband s work. To those who knew Lorraine and Seóirse personally, Seóirse s deep affection and gratitude on that account (to say little of their supremely happy home life together) was always and everywhere apparent. His passing marks the end of an era in Irish musical modernism.
 HARRY WHITE,
Professor of Music, UCD

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Arsenal and Liverpool both hit a hurdle in race for the title; Disastrous defeats for challengers hand Manchester City the initiative
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 1
Length: 767 words
Body


Mikel Arteta admitted that Arsenal must  keep believing  they can still win the Premier League for the first time since 2004 after a disastrous 2-0 defeat to Aston Villa handed Manchester City the initiative in the title race.
Late goals from the substitute Leon Bailey and a 19th league strike of the season for Ollie Watkins condemned Arsenal to only their fifth loss of the season. It meant that Arsenal missed the opportunity to return to the top of the table having seen rivals Liverpool also slip up against Crystal Palace yesterday.
But having lost out last season to City, Arteta, after setting the pace for most of the campaign, acknowledged that their fate is out of their hands once again.
 That s the reality right now. We knew that this moment could come and now it s about reacting and keep believing,  he said.  We had one of the best performances in the first half that we have had this season by far against a really good team. It should have been three or four but it didn t happen and momentum shifted in the second half and we conceded two very poor goals. Now is the moment to stand up as a leader and a character to make yourself count. Now it s a big test for us.
Arsenal had conceded only four goals in their previous 11 Premier League matches but some slack defending allowed Bailey to score late on before Watkins compounded their misery with a smart finish. Having also gifted Bayern Munich two goals in the first leg of their Champions League quarter-final here on Tuesday, Arteta   who revealed that Martin Ødegaard had been unable to continue due to an unspecified knock   admitted his team must improve against the German champions to have a chance in Wednesday s second leg.
 The players are frustrated and sad,  he said.  But we have a beautiful opportunity that hasn t happened for this club for 14 years to go to the semi-finals of the Champions League. It cannot come at a better moment.
Dismal Liverpool
Meanwhile Jürgen Klopp said Liverpool would not win the Premier League on the evidence of their dismal first-half showing against Crystal Palace after their title hopes were hit by a first home league defeat of the season.
Liverpool, comfortably beaten by Atalanta in the Europa League on Thursday, produced another lethargic display in the first period at Anfield and were punished by ­Eberechi Eze s stylish winner for Palace, who gave their survival prospects a huge lift.
Klopp s team, who have dropped five points in the past two top-flight games, missed a procession of ­second-half opportunities to stage yet another comeback but paid a heavy price for their profligacy and a poor opening 45 minutes. Any repeat over the final six games of the season, said Klopp, and Liverpool s title dreams will be over.
The Liverpool manager, asked what defeat meant for the title rice, said:  The answer is pretty easy. If we play like we did in the first half, how should we win the league? If we play like we did in the second half, we can win football games. If we can win football games, we will see how many we can win and then we want to be around when the other guys struggle, if they struggle.
Criticism
 We have to win games anyway. We now have a string of four away games. That would have been tough anyway and it will be tough. We have to deal with that. The criticism in these moments is completely fine, it is absolutely right. It is all about how we deal with it. The first half we didn t deal with it but in the second half we pulled ourselves together and should have won the game.
Klopp said there was a lack of conviction in Liverpool s performance that originated from their two ­disappointing results away at Manchester United in the FA Cup and Premier League.
He said:  We lost in the Cup and it was like a catastrophe because we were that good and lost anyway and then we drew there and were really good. The problems we had in the United game were completely ­different to the things we had today.
 Yes, the goals we concede are too easy. That is a general thing. We all, players and me included, expected a reaction (to Atalanta) and we saw in the reaction that we lost in that game more than the game itself, so it didn t help. We were always too wide. The goal we conceded   it ends up with Eze completely free in the box and that cannot happen. But we had other moments where we were just not together.
 In the second half we had momentum and could put them under ­pressure. The boys really tried hard but it was not enough. We have to admit that as well. The conviction and our formation was never really there for causing Palace problems.
  Guardian

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Arsenal slip while Villa let rip with late goals; Disastrous defending from Arteta's side brings sweet taste of victory for Emery
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 7
Length: 835 words
Body


If this was the afternoon when Arsenal let it slip then Mikel Arteta will know they only have themselves to blame. Handed the perfect opportunity to lay down their title credentials after Liverpool had been surprisingly beaten by Crystal Palace, instead it was Aston Villa who celebrated wildly at the final whistle after late goals from substitute Leon Bailey and Ollie Watkins delivered a hammer blow to Arsenal s chances of ending a 20-year wait to be crowned champions.
It was a victory that will have tasted particularly sweet for Unai Emery, who was sacked by Arsenal in November 2019 after just 18 months in charge but is now a step closer to guiding Villa to Champions League qualification next season following this famous victory. Things could have been even worse for the home supporters   most of whom stayed until the bitter end in hope rather than expectation of a comeback   had Watkins and Youri Tielemans not seen their efforts strike the woodwork either side of half-time.
But just as Arsenal s young side showed their fallibility this time last season to allow Manchester City to overhaul them, they will fear that those failings have returned at precisely the wrong moment after disastrous defending gifted Bailey the opening goal six minutes from time before Watkins rounded things off with his 19th of the season.
Arteta had insisted that his side could  just focus on what we can do  but the surprise defeat for Jürgen Klopp s side at Anfield had certainly given Arsenal s supporters a stride in their step as they made their way to the ground. Tottenham s thrashing at Newcastle on Saturday had given Emery s side even more incentive to get a result against his former employers and they appeared to be a considerably more dangerous proposition than the team thrashed 4-1 by City 11 days ago, with Watkins leading the attack this time.
Three changes
Yet perhaps it was the absence of Villa s key midfielder Douglas Luiz through suspension that encouraged Arteta to deploy Kai Havertz in central midfield and shift Gabriel Jesus back into the central striker s role as one of three changes from the side that drew the first leg against Bayern Munich  on Tuesday.
Had Havertz made the most of two decent chances that fell his way inside the opening quarter of an hour then the gamble would have paid off handsomely. But he could not quite reach a cross from Bukayo Saka before firing straight at Emiliano Martínez after a brilliant pass from Leandro Trossard. Jesus was next to waste a chance when he headed wide after Saka had picked him out at the far post before the England winger fired into the side-netting from a tight angle thanks to Martin Ødegaard s precise through-ball.
Oleksandr Zinchenko had plenty to thank Trossard for when the Belgian forward made a crucial intervention on the edge of Arsenal s box to deny Watkins following a quick break, with the left-back nowhere to be seen. Zinchenko then tried a speculative effort from just inside Villa s half after intercepting Martínez s weak goal-kick but it never really looked like beating the Argentina goalkeeper. It seemed inevitable that Arsenal would find a breakthrough but Diego Carlos was able to outmuscle Havertz after another lung-busting run through the middle of Villa s defence.
Wayward pass  Arsenal were then lucky to escape after a wayward pass from Gabriel Magalhães struck the unsuspecting Zinchenko in the back but the unlucky Watkins saw his effort cannon back off the post and away to safety. Less than 30 seconds later Martínez incredibly managed to claw away Trossard s shot on the goal line after he was set up by Jesus in a breathless end to the first half that saw the hosts muster 14 shots but not find the breakthrough they desperately yearned for.
To Villa s credit, they had managed to frustrate Arsenal for large periods by keeping the ball and that pattern continued in the second half. Jesus went to ground claiming an unlikely penalty after tangling with Carlos when he could have attempted a shot instead and the referee David Coote waved away his appeals.
Arteta cut a frustrated figure on the touchline as his side struggled to recapture their rhythm after the break and the anxiety of the home supporters began to rise. Perhaps sensing that it just might be their day, Villa s travelling fans found their voices when their side won a corner just after the hour mark and Tielemans saw his brilliant effort smack off the crossbar and on to the post after dispossessing Zinchenko on the edge of his area.
Time ticked on
Martínez was then on hand to deny Jesus s curling shot after a rapid Arsenal break downfield as Arteta turned to Gabriel Martinelli and Emile Smith Rowe off the bench. But as time ticked on, if anything it seemed more likely that Villa would find the crucial goal   and so it proved as Bailey tapped home at the far post after William Saliba allowed a cross from Lucas Digne to reach him before Watkins put the final nail in Arsenal s coffin with a dinked finish into the top corner.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Asylum application predictions
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 251 words
Body


Sir,   The Government has announced that its current prediction is that Ireland will receive 16,000 asylum applications annually over the coming years ( New asylum-seeker accommodation agency is under consideration , News, April 4th). What this is based on is not clear. Just a few years ago, its prediction was for less than a quarter of this number.
Development economists, who study migration patterns, use a simple function to estimate whether migration is likely to increase, decrease or stay the same. All else remaining equal, in the presence of a significant income gap between country A and country B, migration will accelerate, until the income gap is significantly closed. The reason for this is the diaspora effect. When there is no diaspora of migrants from country B in country A, the costs of migration (finding a house, a job, etc) are significantly higher and often prohibitive to would-be migrants. As diasporas grow, these costs reduce, and this in turn encourages more migration.
Politicians who cite  global instability  as the reason for our current influx of asylum seekers should consider whether the world really is more unstable now, than during say, the 2015 Syrian civil war. That year, very few Syrians sought asylum in Ireland. The reason? The absence of any significant Syrian diaspora in Ireland at that time.
Any modelling for future asylum seeker numbers should therefore expect a steady increase year on year and plan accordingly.   Yours, etc,
SEAN CARROLL,
Blackrock,
Co Louth.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Baird soars to new heights adding lineout calling to his skills; Forward has blended remarkable athleticism with a dedication to graft
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 3
Length: 749 words
Body


Gone in 60 seconds. It s a catchy title. Rugby s equivalent played out at the Aviva Stadium right on the minute mark. Leinster s first lineout, Ryan Baird s first call, Ultan Dillane and La Rochelle s first steal, an action that temporarily sucked the noise, raucous and expectant from the opening whistle out of the stadium. In that moment, the anxiety level among the home  supporters was palpable.
What was going through Baird s mind is unknown, but it would have been a little disconcerting to have the first lineout go astray, especially as he shortened it to a four-man and called it on himself at the front. It was a timing play, but Dillane beat his opponent to the ball.
Leo Cullen had made two changes to the starting pack from the win over the Leicester Tigers, Jason Jenkins and Will Connors promoted. A knock-on effect was that Baird took over the lineout calling duties from Ross Molony.
It is a remit which the 24-year-old Baird has embraced with the zeal required to consume a lot of video analysis. Leinster captain Caelan Doris explained:  I think he s got a very good attitude, a great mindset and works very hard and puts a ton of time into lineout attack and defence in particular.
 The analysis he does and the plan he puts in place along with the other secondrows has been great. He s developed in that area a lot over the last probably five or six months.
No different from a place-kicker or a hooker, mental resilience is paramount to being able to be next task focused when calling the lineout. Arguably an equally pivotal moment arrived just shy of three minutes, Leinster s second lineout. Baird called it on Jenkins at two, a sensible ploy that worked.
A word here for Jenkins, who produced one of his best performances in the jersey and thoroughly vindicated his selection. He won five lineouts and had the second highest tackle count (10) on the team in his 50 minutes, even more laudable considering that Doris with 13 played an additional 20 minutes to the South African. It wasn t just the volume but the aggression and the quality of his clearing out.
Five minutes in and Baird won Leinster s third lineout and when La Rochelle get their first of the game on 10 minutes, Leinster s blindside flanker was a fingernail width from pickpocketing Judicaël Cancoriet to the ball having correctly identified the target of the throw. Baird leads his team in lineout steals in the tournament (five).
Doris was twice penalised at restarts, the first for sealing off, the second for not releasing in the tackle. La Rochelle, having experienced joy in that regard, continued to kick to the same position on the pitch but Leinster reconfigured their reception party. Baird assumed the responsibility on the next two occasions as he got into the air with a little help from lifters.
In between those two moments, he came up with a big play after La Rochelle had kicked a penalty to the corner. Baird insinuated his way into the French club s maul to force a knock-on turnover and a scrum to the home side.
Penalised for jumping across the space, Baird could only watch as La Rochelle doubled down by going to the corner again in first-half injury time. Jenkins is thrown in the air but cannot intercept the throw and the French club are rewarded for going to the back to Grégory Alldritt ; prop Louis Penverne is adjudged to have grounded the ball.
Baird dominated the opening throes of the post interval action, took the kickoff, dirtied La Rochelle possession on a throw and then starts and finishes a passage of play that goes a long way to deciding the outcome.
He won the lineout and when play next returned to that touchline, following a prolonged softening up process, Lowe s pass enabled him to get outside and past Jack Nowell and through Antoine Hastoy s brittle attempted tackle for a try, a fitting reward for his efforts.
Baird has blended remarkable athleticism with a dedication to hard graft on behalf of the team and all the while assuming a leadership role. There isn t a cause that is lost when he is chasing it as several La Rochelle players discovered, particularly Tawera Kerr Barlow and Ihaia West.
He continued to have a pronounced influence right up to the final whistle. Cullen entrusted Baird with the lineout, one that had an 85 per cent success rate going into the match. Against La Rochelle it reached the 91st percentile, a badge of honour for Baird, which not only makes all the hard work worthwhile but also highlights his growth in a leadership capacity.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Biden leads condemnation of Iran's missile strikes on Israel; US president tells Netanyahu to treat repulsed Iran attack as a 'win'
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 527 words
Byline: KEITH DUGGAN
Body


KEITH DUGGAN Washington Correspondent   United States president Joe Biden has led the  unequivocal condemnation  of Iran s air missile attack on Israel as western leaders vowed to work to avoid further destabilisation in the Middle East.
In a statement issued after an emergency meeting yesterday, the Group of Seven (G7) asserted that Iran s strike risked  provoking an uncontrollable regional escalation  while, in a phone conference with Israel prime minister Binyamin Netanyahu on Saturday evening, Mr Biden reportedly urged his counterpart to interpret the successful repulsion of the aerial barrage by an Israeli-US military coalition as  a win .
He also told Mr Netanyahu that he could be assured of America s  ironclad commitment to the security of Israel  as the White House sought to portray the outcome of Iran s aggression as a validation of the robustness of Israel s military capacity. Iranian military fired more than 300 weapons, including 30 cruise and over 120 ballistic missiles. According to the Israel Defence Forces (IDF), 99 per cent of these were taken down by a combination of Israeli and US missile defence destroyers.
Speaking yesterday, Israeli war cabinet minister Benny Gantz also praised Israel as  an anchor of security in the Middle East  and thanked the commanders and fighters of the IDF before vowing that Israel would  build a regional coalition and exact a price from Iran in a way and at a time that suits us .
The Iranian strike was interpreted as a retaliation to the Israeli aircraft bombing of an Iranian diplomatic facility in Damascus, Syria, on April 1st, which killed several military officials, including one member of the Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps. The nature of Saturday s attack   large in scale but telegraphed and led with slow drones   has fuelled some analyses in the United States that the Iranians wanted to deliver a message rather than inflict damage or casualties.
 Operation has ended
Speaking on Iranian state television, Mag Gen Mohammad Bagheri said the attack on Israel had  achieved its goals and, in our view, the operation has ended . However, Iran president Ebrahim Raisi warned in a statemen yesterday that should Israel or its supporters  demonstrate reckless behaviour, they will receive a decisive and much stronger response .
The ongoing plight of those in Gaza was also acknowledged in the G7 statement in which the leaders vowed  to strengthen co-operation to end the crisis in Gaza  by working towards an immediate ceasefire, the release of hostages by Hamas and to  deliver increased humanitarian assistance to Palestinians in need .
The G7 is an intergovernmental political forum consisting of Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, the UK and the US. The EU also participates but is regarded as a  non-enumerated member .
Mr Biden left his beach house in Delaware to return to the White House on Saturday afternoon as reports of an anticipated Iranian strike were confirmed. The latest episode of fragility in the Middle East generated loudening criticism of Mr Biden from Republican opponents, including Donald Trump, for what they perceive to be his placatory foreign policy stance.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Blair's late score seals title for Tipperary; Premier County break lock of Cork, Galway and Kilkenny on sport's major titles going back to 2012
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 4
Length: 633 words
Body


Tipperary celebrated the 20th anniversary of their famous league and championship double from an era when they were the queens of camogie, by winning their first national title since against Galway at Croke Park yesterday.
In becoming the Very League Division 1A champions, the Blue and Golds are the first county outside of Cork, Galway and Kilkenny to be successful in one of senior camogie s two marquee competitions since Wexford secured their All-Ireland three-in-a-row in 2012.
Karin Blair was the hero, as the scorer of the winning point in the 59th minute. But there were many who deserve the garlands, Eimear McGrath among them. The Drom & Inch star converted eight frees as Tipp made it back from the brink of being in real trouble, six points down after 21 minutes, to going in at the interval trailing by just 0-8 to 0-7.
Then there was the belter from just insider her own 65 in the second half. But team captain Karen Kennedy was probably the right choice for player of the match because her contributions that really swung things the way of Denis Kelly s crew.
Starting at centre forward, it was her point that ended Galway s run of six straight scores that threatened serious separation, particularly as it had taken a couple of last-ditch interventions from the likes of the brilliant Mairéad Eviston to deny the westerners a goal on top of that.
Cleverly, Kelly and co moved the Thurles All Star, better known as a centre back and sometime midfielder, to the edge of the opposition square after the restart and her 38th-minute goal   around 60 seconds after she had notched up her third point   helped Tipp move four clear.
Cathal Murray had to call on Niamh Hanniffy, back from a serious knee injury, to replace Róisín Black, who seemed to suffer a hamstring injury and some positional reshuffling followed. Then he turned to two of the greatest in the game right now in former player of the year Niamh Kilkenny, who made her return at the latter end of the competition after having a baby last year.
It was Niamh Mallon who had the biggest impact though. The former Down legend had to wait till now to make her bow for her adopted county. She scored with her first ever touch in a Galway jersey and finished with three points as the Maroons drew level.
She was also fouled for two frees but the normally unerring Carrie Dolan missed them both, including the more difficult chance to level from the last puck of the game after Blair had edged Tipp s noses back in front.
It had all seemed unlikely as Ailish O Reilly, who tasted defeat in Saturday s national intermediate basketball league final with Claregalway, zipped over two points in a minute to signal the Tribeswomen moving through the gears towards the end of the opening quarter.
McGrath did have a kicked shot at goal brilliantly stopped by the advancing Fiona Ryan but it felt at that juncture as if Tipp had really needed that to keep in touch as Aoife Donohue, Dolan and Siobhán McGrath added points.
In probably the game s most significant period, Tipp made a few substitutions of their own, calling on experienced duo Clodagh Quirke and Juilieann Bourke, and they began to compete more vigorously.
At a point down going in at the break, Tipp would have been bouncing and they carried that positivity into the resumption, going four points ahead via McGrath s stick. Immediately after, Kelly brought on Mary Ryan, who joined the Tipp panel in 2005   just missing out on the glory years   and played when the Premier last reached a national final in 2009. Mallon only needs an inch of space and she did her stuff, along with another sub, Niamh Niland, who pointed within seconds of coming on. Mallon equalised with a drilled shot in the 58th minute that didn t clear the crossbar by much. But it was Blair that had the final say.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Bring back the cheap bedsit   it should never have gone away
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 893 words
Body


Studio apartment rents should be capped at EUR 500 a month in cities, and at EUR 300-EUR 400 where they exist in towns and villages. This is still expensive for a lot of people who need basic accommodation, but it s also fair, and much less than the mad amounts currently being charged.
I ve been keeping track of  studio apartment    the nouveau name for a bedsit   rents for a good few years now, have written about them before, and they re still rising. I ve focused mostly on bedsits on the North Circular Road in the capital, which runs from the Phoenix Park gates in Dublin 7, all the way to North Wall in Dublin 1. Much like the South Circular Road, the housing on this stretch is especially relevant because traditionally it s been full of bedsits in large houses subdivided into flats.
In 2023, some bedsits here rose to EUR 1,500 a month. That record has been smashed. One North Circular Road studio, with a fold-out bed from a wall that doubles as a ledge-like  desk , is for rent at EUR 1,899 a month. This property (essentially a kitchen and fold-out bed), according to the ad,  enjoys a strategic location  while also  promising a rich and fulfilling living experience .  Perks  include  a designated bicycle rack . Spoilt, so we are.
The thing is, there s absolutely nothing wrong with bedsits or studio flats when they re priced logically. But they re not. This is meant to be cheap stock, but in terms of size, facilities and quality, it offers far less value than other accommodation in the private rental market, which is nonsensical.
Co-living developments, one of Eoghan Murphy s legacies from the menu of short-term-thinking failures he left, also benefit from the bedsit profit boom in Dublin. Try EUR 1,895 per month for a studio in Dún Laoghaire, or EUR 1,850 for a studio in a Rathmines co-living block, where renters are encouraged to  soak up the buzzing atmosphere and curate a new lifestyle . Or how about EUR 2,125 for a studio in the docklands, where the price of rent has about the same logic as a horoscope? Or EUR 2,050 for a studio in Stillorgan? Maybe you d prefer to pay EUR 2,100 for a studio in Dublin 1, or EUR 1,950 for one in Sandyford? Or would you rather the PowerCity-style pricing of EUR 1,999 for a studio in Harold s Cross?
That EUR 1,899 studio on the North Circular? The same company has another studio for rent in a completely different part of the city, Rathmines, with the exact same fold-out bed, magically set at that price of EUR 1,899.
I m going to propose something wild here, and suggest that the price of rental accommodation be linked to the size of a property. The measurements of rental properties are rarely even listed in Ireland, which must leave our European friends scratching their heads. How big is the place? Sorry, that doesn t matter in Ireland when it comes to the cost. Where is it located? Not applicable. How old is the building? Irrelevant. Of reasonable quality? You re boring me now, crack open the wallet.
By 2013, many bedsits were substandard. Instead of improving them and capping the price, the bedsit ban removed an entire layer of accommodation perceived as  cheap  in the private rental market, flipping to expensive  studios    sometimes in the very same buildings. This served to increase the wealth of corporate and multi-property-owning landlords. It did nothing for renters, young couples, someone suddenly evicted and scrambling for a place to live, students, single people on low incomes, or any type of person who actually needs to live in a small place they could afford.
It would be forgiving to label this myopia, and not yet another intervention that made landlords more money. Isn t it funny how the  unintended consequences  of interventions in the  market  always end up benefiting landlords? How about renters gaining something from  unintended consequences ?
We have no affordable rent in Ireland by any metric. Government has poured billions into rent assistance payments to plug the gap between affordability and landlord greed. Zoom out, and such waste looks like a scam. Why should the taxpayer be bolstering the wealth of private and corporate landlords? Why isn t the rate for a specific standard of accommodation set? This requires intervention, which would be simple. Cap studio rent.
Fine Gael and Fianna Fáil politicians love pointing to the supposed constitutional blocks to rent control. Guess what, they re in Government, and they can put constitutional change to the electorate. Thirsty for a referendum win? How about one on the right to housing?
The reason  the market  doesn t  want  rent control is because it hinders runaway profit. Long-term tenancies may be attractive to individual landlords who desire a decent tenant who pays their rent on time and never calls them asking for a light bulb to be changed, but the broader market needs churn, because it presents the opportunity to increase rents when tenancy gaps open up (or are forced open). Tenancy insecurity is no accident; it is designed.
We re constantly told rent control would  drive landlords out of the market , but the State could actually purchase any properties they want, transferring them to local authorities to alleviate housing lists. Too much property is privately owned. We need more public housing. Everyone knows this. Build it, buy it, cap it. That s common sense.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Britain should not fear 'an honest approach' to past sins, says historian; Mistakes in dealing with terrorism in Northern Ireland are being repeated elsewhere, argues Prof Richard English
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 1032 words
Body


From his eyrie in Belfast, academic Richard English has studied terrorism on his doorstep during The Troubles and afar in the Middle East, Afghanistan, and elsewhere for more than three decades.
Throughout, the same mistakes are made again and again by states responding to terrorists, the Queen s University Belfast historian argues in his latest book, Does Counter-Terrorism Work?
Often, states make matters worse, be it the scale of the Israeli attacks on Gaza after the October 7th massacres, or the British  dirty war  against republicans and nationalists in Northern Ireland.
 It s short-termism. People think about what s happening now, rather than about thinking long pasts and long futures. We should think about those long pasts and long futures,  argues the academic.
Bar the  pernicious legacy  of the Taliban s success in Afghanistan, the retaliation by states   such as the post-9/11 war on terror   has changed history more than terrorism ever did, he says.
Whether in Gaza or Northern Ireland, it is  tempting always to have goodies and baddies , English says, which though  comforting  denies  the much messier reality .
Some British actions during The Troubles, says English, were  not only deeply wrong in themselves, but deeply degrading for the reputation of the United Kingdom, not just in Northern Ireland, but more broadly .
Though he cites examples where British security figures  colluded  with loyalist paramilitaries, who were sometimes Ulster Defence Regiment soldiers, English does not accept that every British response was equally motivated.
 I don t think that s true. I think there was much done in counterterrorism that was about saving lives and that it was done with the intention of preventing human suffering.
Looking at the Kenova investigation into the IRA s Stakeknife informer, commonly known as Freddie Scappaticci, English says it is clear that the double agent did  more harm than good.
 There has to be an honesty about how many lives were saved and whether the lesser evil was chosen, or the greater evil,  he says, though intelligence gathering  saved a lot of lives.
 If you re saving more lives than you re losing, then you can justify some difficult choices. My point, though, is that we need to assess outcomes honestly.
The compromises made by the IRA in the 1990s before and after the Belfast Agreement were  made more likely because their violence was contained , denying them victory.
 Part of the business of the peace process was the containment of paramilitary violence, so that the pragmatic leadership in the IRA decided to opt for peace process,  he says.
Under the Legacy Act, all legacy inquests not completed by May 1st must transfer to the new investigative body, the Independent Commission for Reconciliation and Information Recovery, headed by the former Northern Ireland lord chief justice, Sir Declan Morgan.
However, past British sins including loyalist/UDR collusion should be recognised as reprehensible and unacceptable, English argues:  Not only did it do huge damage to the UK s reputation, it was in itself an appalling transgression of justice.
The legacy legislation, uniquely opposed by every Northern Irish political party, has won  virtually no consent  despite London s arguments that it is needed to protect ageing soldiers.
Arguing for London to be more confident about facing up to the past, English says paramilitaries were  far more guilty of extensive and egregious human rights transgressions  if  you look honestly at the record .
 An honest approach will not leave it [Britain] in the dock more than others. I don t think it does any state good to try to cover up things that shouldn t have happened. A more open approach would be in everyone s interest,  English says.
The Irish experience holds lessons for today:  In the early 1990s, when the Israel-Palestine process was going well and Northern Ireland was going badly, people would have said peace would happen there first.
However, the underlying problems between Israelis and Palestinians today must be probed once the current crisis is over, including the prospect of  a two-, or even possibly three-state solution .
The scale of Israel s response threatens its future relationship with Washington:  Opinion in the United States is changing, and Israeli politicians and people are noticing that.
Nothing will change while Binyamin Netanyahu remains in power, however:  The current Israeli government is not going to change, but a post-Netanyahu government simply can t have cycles of this kind of atrocity.
Israel must show that it is not just thinking purely in terms of Israeli self-defence but also that  it is looking to try to recreate some kind of dialogue, some kind of relationship-building .
Arguing for  ethical  counter-terrorism, properly overseen and accountable, he says:  The less ethical and the less moral counter-terror policies are, the less effective they are.
None of this means that a state cannot respond strongly against enemies, and justify it later:  The more selective it is, the more targeted, the more proportional it is, the more likely it s not only going to be ethical, but to be effective.
Usually, however, states exaggerate what military action can achieve:  That has caused huge harm in the past, and I think it s going to cause harm for all of us in the years in the future.
Strong counterterror actions soothe the public and help politicians win or hold power, but fail in the end:  The French found this out with Algeria, the Israelis with Palestinians, the British found it out repeatedly in Ireland. It was learned by the United States after 9/11.
 My regret is that [it] has to be learned again each time,  says English, who has previously written highly regarded histories of the IRA and Irish nationalism.
In a world where authoritarianism is on the march and democracies are under threat, English argues that it is now more important than ever for democracies to distinguish themselves from others.
 [They] have to abide by the rule of law and not alternate between extremes that give space for terrorists to justify themselves. Stress the things that make liberal democracies the precious kinds of community they are.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Carbon capture critical for addressing climate crisis; Technological solutions could be transformative but getting it wrong would exacerbate the situation
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 1066 words
Body


A technological revolution is ramping up, attempting to remove vast amounts of carbon dioxide from ambient air, and then lock the greenhouse gas away in an effort to reduce its heat-trapping effects and break the cycle of global warming. It comes in multiple guises and is as ambitious as it is controversial.
It is dividing climate scientists and policymakers. One camp says it is distracting from timely implementation of known solutions to climate change, when technologies   such as direct air capture and carbon capture and storage (CCS)   are immensely costly and unproven at scale. They absorb CO2 from the air and then release a stream of the concentrated gas that can either be buried in the ground, or sold as a useful product such as synthetic jet fuel   essentially, recycling CO2.
In the other camp are those who say the climate crisis requires bigger technological plays   such is the extent of failure to contain temperature rise arising from burning fossil fuels pushing towards dangerous tipping points. Some in this techno-fix brigade even support risky forms of  geoengineering  including scrambling weather   such as modifying solar radiation or brightening clouds   in an attempt to stabilise the planet.
It could be transformative in containing global temperatures and saving civilisation. Getting it wrong could exacerbate any degree of climate control and predictability we retain at present.
The issue is forcing its way on to agendas at climate Cop negotiations hosted by the UN, with blatant pushing of CCS by petrostates. Two factors are ensuring CO2-removal technologies are going mainstream. The UN Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (arguably the most authoritative specialists) concluded last year, after exhaustive evaluation, that CCS is technologically feasible and could play a significant role over the coming century. Secondly, big business is facing up to its sustainability obligations in drastically reducing its carbon footprint, and purchasing credits   investing in forest preservation, renewable energy projects or carbon sequestration   to get there as quickly as possible.
Two projects reflect the ambition; Carbfix s Mammoth project in Iceland and Occidental Petroleum s Stratos project in Texas   the latter also raises concerns that this course means Big Oil, the biggest source of carbon pollution, will persist with its activities.
Carbfix has developed a way of capturing and storing CO2 in water, and injecting it into basalt formations up to a mile below ground through an elaborate system of pipes. This forms stable carbonate minerals, capturing the gas in the igneous rock. The world s largest carbon storage facility is powered by geothermal energy and due to be fully operational in May with a promise of storing 36,000 metric tonnes of CO2 per year.
Its partner, the Swiss company Climeworks, has secured $650 million from investment firms, the largest private commitment for the burgeoning industry. Its customers include Microsoft (and former Microsoft chief executive Bill Gates), JP Morgan Chase and Irish-American payment systems firm Stripe   all eager to purchase verified  offsets , enabling them to claim they are operating on a carbon-neutral or even carbon-negative basis.
Occidental intends using some CO2 to enhance oil extraction in difficult-to-access underground areas. Its plant, powered by solar radiation, will be 10 times more powerful than Mammoth and sequester 500,000 tonnes of CO2 per year. It plans to build 100 facilities, each capable of capturing one million tonnes of CO2 per year, in a financial partnership with asset manager BlackRock. That includes direct air capture plants built with Adnoc, UAE s state oil company.
Meanwhile a plethora of technology start-ups are exploring options including use of chemical  scrubbers  to biochar manufacture from burning wood waste in absence of oxygen, which can be used as fertiliser.
Climate scientists, such as lead IPCC author Friederike Otto of Imperial College London, are concerned that the impression that there are viable options for CO2 removal will engender a false sense of security and become  an excuse for dithering and further delay , when the world is capable of containing temperature rise to within 1.5 degrees if knowledge and tools to do it are backed by urgency and political will.
Former UK chief scientific officer Sir David King has been a consistent advocate for more radical steps because of failure to act before now and immediately required cuts in greenhouse gases are unlikely to happen. That may mean having to refreeze ice caps in polar regions   ie repairing the climate, he believes   because overshoot of 1.5 degrees is almost certain.
Minister for Climate and Energy Eamon Ryan caused surprise when he accepted the case for deploying CCS  in the hard-to-reach sectors, like cement plants and incinerators, where you can scrub the carbon from the chimney and store it geologically .
Kinsale Head gas field
Under the Government s 2024 climate plan, a  carbon capture and removals working group  is being established to chart the way forward. Under the 2019 climate plan, the Department of the Environment, Climate and Communications examined the feasibility of CCS with semi-State utility Ervia, parent company of Gas Networks Ireland, assessing technical options. It confirmed Kinsale Head gas field has  attractive potential as a carbon dioxide store .
Emissions and temperature trends suggest it won t be enough to merely avoid putting more heat-trapping greenhouse gases into the air. We will need to actively remove CO2 to avoid the worst effects of global warming.
 There are plenty of ways to do that, including planting trees or restoring seagrass beds. But if you want to mop up CO2 in an easy-to-quantify way with few uncertainties, then direct air capture is a solid   if expensive   option,  a New Scientist team concluded last month in an assessment of five climate megaprojects that might save the world.
Just as every scalable scientifically proven option is needed to cut emissions, where we are now in the unfolding climate crisis means innovative ways and human ingenuity will have to play their part too in putting carbon back where we found it; in the earth before it was extracted and burned relentlessly in pursuit of progress. Carbon removal technologies will be critical to absolving environmental sins of our past.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



ChatGPT essay cheats are a menace to us all
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 728 words
Body


The other day, I met a British academic who said something about artificial intelligence that made my jaw drop.
The number of students using AI tools like ChatGPT to write their papers was a much bigger problem than the public was being told, this person said.
AI cheating at their institution was now so rife that large numbers of students had been expelled for academic misconduct   to the point that some courses had lost most of a year s intake.  I ve heard similar figures from a few universities,  the academic told me.
Spotting suspicious essays could be easy, because when students were asked why they had included certain terms or data sources not mentioned on the course, they were baffled.  They have clearly never even heard of some of the terms that turn up in their essays.
But detection is only half the battle. Getting administrators to address the problem can be fraught, especially when the cheaters are international students who pay higher fees than locals. Because universities rely heavily on those fees, some administrators take a dim view of efforts to expose the problem. Or as this person put it,  whistleblowing is career-threatening .
Underqualified
There is more at stake here than the injustice of cheats getting an advantage over honest students. Consider the prospect of allegedly expert graduates heading out into the world and being recruited into organisations, be it a health service or a military, where they are put into positions for which they are underqualified.
So how widespread is the cheating problem?
Panic about ChatGPT transforming educational landscapes took off as soon as the tool was launched in November 2022 and since then, the technology has only advanced. As I type these words, colleagues at the Financial Times have reported that OpenAI, which created ChatGPT, and Meta are set to release souped-up AI models capable of reasoning and planning. But AI s exact impact on classrooms is unclear.
In the US, Stanford University researchers said last year that cheating rates did not appear to have been affected by AI. Up to 70 per cent of high school students have long confessed to some form of cheating and nearly a year after ChatGPT s arrival that proportion had not changed.
At universities, research shows half of students are regular generative AI users   not necessarily to cheat   but only about 12 per cent use it daily.
When it comes to the number of student essays written with the help of AI, rates appear relatively steady says Turnitin, a plagiarism detection software group that checks generative AI use.
It says students have submitted more than 22 million papers in the past 12 months that show signs of AI help, which was 11 per cent of the total it reviewed. More than six million papers, or 3 per cent of the total, contained at least 80 per cent of AI writing.
That is a lot of papers. But the percentage of AI writing is virtually the same as what Turnitin found last year when it conducted a similar assessment.
 AI usage rates have been stable,  says Turnitin chief executive Chris Caren. And as he told me last week, just because you are using ChatGPT does not necessarily mean you are cheating.
Properly cited AI assistance
 Some teachers and faculty allow some level of AI assistance in writing an essay, but they also want that properly cited,  he says.  AI can be incredibly useful for doing research and brainstorming ideas.
I m sure this is correct. It is also true that university faculties are increasingly using AI to help write lesson plans and I know of some who have tested it to mark essays   unsuccessfully. But I still find it worrying to think a sizeable number of students are using tools like ChatGPT in a way that is potentially risky for employers and wider society.
Some universities are already increasing face-to-face assessments to detect and discourage AI cheating. I am sure that will continue, but it would also be useful if academics were encouraged to expose the problem and not deterred from trying to fix it. As the scholar I spoke to put it, the purpose of going to university is to learn how to learn. These institutions are supposed to teach you to think for yourself and evaluate evidence, not just recite facts and figures.
Anyone who outsources their thinking to a machine is ultimately going to hurt themselves the most.   Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Congress held hostage; US support for Ukraine
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 331 words
Body


For six months US Congress Republicans have stalled a vital $60 billion aid package for Ukraine, now forced to ration its depleted artillery stocks. Russian troops now outfire Ukrainian forces by a 5-to-1 ratio, a top US commander told a congressional hearing last week, warning that Ukraine could lose the war if the US did not send more ammunition, and fast. He was not crying wolf.
Western allies and Kyiv are entreating the US to free the cash. And a majority of Americans   58 per cent, according to a recent poll   favour sending more economic aid and weapons to Ukraine. In congress the vast majority of Democrats and most Republicans back the package which could well sail through on a bipartisan vote. When it is put to a vote.
Yet, such is the power of Speaker of the House Mike Johnson that he has been able to avoid putting it to a vote for fear of being toppled by a clique of Trumpite right-wingers who oppose more funding for Ukraine.
Some insist that the war is unwinnable and that the US should simply force Ukraine to sue for peace   Trump says it should cede the Donbas and Crimea in exchange for a ceasefire, and promises he would seek to impose such an outcome as president. Others claim the US cannot afford to fund Ukraine, or are explicit supporters of Putin and his war aims, regarding Russia as a friend.
In order to sweeten the pill for those far-right supporters who put him in place Johnson, who promises that a vote will be allowed shortly, is cynically tagging on to it a collection of unrelated measures from Republican wish-lists, like unfreezing the administration s pause on liquefied natural gas exports. Whether that will placate the far-right is not clear.
That Ukraine s beleaguered people should be held hostage to the Republicans  internecine war and the whims of isolationists, is a sorry commentary on the state of American politics.And it risks encouraging more Russian military aggression, if Moscow feels that the west s resolve is weakening.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Connacht undone by Benetton's first-half blitz
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 757 words
Body


Connacht were left licking their wounds after falling to superior fellow URC competitors Benetton in their Challenge Cup quarter-final in Italy.
Backed by a hugely enthusiastic crowd that embraced the occasion, Benetton delivered a confident and controlled display to ensure the  Leonis  were deserving winners.
Apart from the first try scored by Connacht within the opening two minutes, the home side led throughout as Connacht struggled against both the heat and Benetton s accuracy and physicality.
Both sides demonstrated their desire to play rugby in the opening minutes with Connacht benefiting from a penalty in the first minute. Opting for touch, Joe Joyce secured the lineout and the pack, aided by Bundee Aki and Dave Hawkshaw, drove forward before hooker Dave Heffernan, continuing his superb form, secured the try, with JJ Hanrahan adding the extras.
It was short-lived. After a yellow card to Darragh Murray, the home side capitalised, replicating Connacht s effort with their hooker Gianmarco Lucchesi touching down, with Tomas Albornoz converting. And within 28 minutes Connacht found themselves with a mountain to climb as the home side opened up a 26-7 lead.
Pete Wilkins s side did not help themselves with a plethora of handling errors in the face of a Benetton s abrasive defence. And it did not get any better when producing a determined foray into their opponent s half as a rare overthrown lineout put paid to any reward.
Connacht should have added to their scoreline with what looked like a certain try built by their pack with Heffernan touching down again, but on review it was overturned due to obstruction. Eventually, however, they delivered from a penalty to touch, with Joyce, Heffernan and Bealham making inroads before number eight Paul Boyle forced his way over for a much-needed score, with Hanrahan adding the extras, closing the gap to 26-14.
Patient attack
A 51st-minute try provided the travelling fans with reason to cheer when from a patient attack near the line Bundee Aki ploughed over, narrowing the gap to 10 points as Hanrahan s conversion was wide.
That was as good as it got for the visitors. The Italians kept the scoreboard ticking over with two penalties and a try through Albornoz, who plundered a ball and chipped over the defence to score. The Connacht replacements added energy to their cause. Conor Oliver gave them some hope when he scored on 68 minutes, and with nothing to lose, Connacht cut loose, but to no avail.
Wilkins says it is now crucial to move on.
 I think when this team plays its best rugby, they are good enough to beat anyone over 80 minutes. We have to look at our errors, have to look at how we could have played better, otherwise the pain of this defeat is fruitless. We have to take something from it and grow again. It does temper the disappointment, but we can use what we can take from this game to get better.
 I think the physicality and energy we demanded from these guys was perhaps at times in previous seasons inconsistent. I think in the conditions we were playing in, to front up and deliver that, it is hugely reassuring the lads understand that level of commitment that is required for us to progress.
 That might be small consolation, but it maintains the level of the bar we have set this season,  he added.  When this team plays its best rugby, we are good enough to beat anyone across 80 minutes, and when all the players are available, and you throw in a [Mack] Hansen, a [Santiago] Cordero, and some of the other guys who will be coming back to us soon, it becomes really exciting.
 I have enough belief in the guys and enormous trust, but we were not good enough today, and we take that on the chin.
BENETTON: R Smith; I Mendy, T Menoncello, N Brex, O Ratave; T Albornoz, A Garbisi; T Gallo, G Lucchesi, S Ferrari; N Cannone, F Ruzza; S Negri da Ollegio, M Lamaro (capt), T Halafihi. Replacements: Umaga for Mendy (7 mins); E Snyman for Ruzza (14); L Cannone for Halafihi, M Spagnolo for Gallo, G Zilocchi for Ferrari (all 46); B Bernasconi for Lucchesi (57); A Uren for Garbisi, R Favretto for Negri (both 75).~ CONNACHT: T O Halloran; A Smith, D Hawkshaw, B Aki, S Jennings; JJ Hanrahan, C Blade (capt); D Buckley, D Heffernan, F Bealham; J Joyce, D Murray; C Prendergast, S Hurley-Langton, P Boyle. Replacements: E de Buitlear for Heffernan, P Dooley for Buckley, S Illo for Bealham, C Oliver for Boyle (all 47 mins); T Farrell for O Halloran, N Murray for Joyce (both 52); M Devine for Blade (57); C Forde for Hawkshaw (62). Referee: Mike Adamson (Scotland).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Construction sector reports modest growth; March sees renewed increases in housing and commercial activity
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 403 words
Byline: LAURA SLATTERY
Body


LAURA SLATTERY
 Construction activity expanded in March for the first time in nine months, the latest index for the sector from BNP Paribas Real Estate Ireland indicates.
The index reading of 51.6 was the first to exceed the 50 no-change mark since June 2023, with the expansion following eight consecutive months of contraction. Although modest, the rate of expansion was the most marked for almost two years.
Renewed expansions in activity were registered for housing and commercial activity, with the rise in work on residential projects the first in a year-and-a-half and most pronounced since May 2022. Commercial activity also rose solidly, ending a four-month sequence of decline.
Survey respondents indicated that activity had risen on the back of increases in new orders, which also returned to growth during March following eight months of reduction. The increase was again modest, but the sharpest for a year.
Rising workloads encouraged construction firms to increase their staffing levels again in March, extending the current sequence of job creation to four months. Companies often reported that they had taken on new staff on a full-time basis.
Meanwhile, the rate of input cost inflation quickened to a seven-month high, with higher transportation and labour costs adding to general inflationary pressures.
 In many ways, the return to growth in March is no surprise. Employment, a classic leading indicator of activity, has risen in all but four of the last 36 months,  said John McCartney, director and head of research at BNP Paribas Real Estate Ireland.
 Moreover, when directly questioned about their future expectations, Ireland s building firms have been getting progressively more optimistic since July 2022.
While the March expansion was  broadly based , this conceals contrasting dynamics in the residential and commercial sectors, he added.
 A surge in commencements has led to a pickup in early-stage home-building activity. Our read is that housing delivery may struggle to reach the Government s target in 2024. However, the March PMI supports our view that the longer-term trend is positive.
By contrast, the expansion in commercial activity has been driven by a final push to finish office blocks that were started some years ago.  When completed, these properties will add to already elevated vacancy, meaning that the only new starts for the foreseeable future are likely to be pre-let buildings.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Cullen calls for fair play for fans as Croke Park beckons; Coach wants EPCR to set fair ticket prices for semi-final against Northampton
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 1
Length: 906 words
Body


Leo Cullen has implored the tournament organisers, European Professional Club Rugby (EPCR), not to overprice tickets for Leinster s Champions Cup semi-final against Northampton which will take place in three weeks at Croke Park on Saturday, May 4th, (kick-off 5.30pm) and will be televised live on RTÉ and TNT Sport.
Cullen highlighted the role played by Leinster s supporters in their 40-13 quarter-final win over La Rochelle last Saturday, a repeat of the last two finals which drew a noisy 51,700-capacity crowd at the Aviva Stadium with just a week to sell those tickets.
 We ve had amazing support today and amazing support last week, and if you get a big crowd there, it s a great thing. It s a special occasion.
 Hopefully EPCR price the tickets appropriately for an 82,000 venue because you want a big crowd, don t you? Obviously, it s an EPCR event, it s not a Leinster event. That s the big thing you d ask because you want a proper crowd there. You want to entice people to be there, to make it a special occasion rather than rip people off.
Leinster have earned home country advantage for the third successive semi-final but, tellingly, EPCR have failed to sell out either of their last two, both of which were against five-time winners Toulouse. They drew attendances of 42,067 and 46,823 to the Aviva. Tickets are expected to start going on sale next Thursday.
 You don t want to rip people off,  said Cullen.  So hopefully it s a proper game now as in we get a big crowd, because if we turn up and whatever, there are 20,000 people   20,000 is a lot of people but if it s in an 82,000-capacity stadium then it s a different kettle of fish, isn t it?
Cullen was Leinster s captain for the 2009 semi-final at Croke Park when they dethroned Munster with a 30-6 win in front of a then world record crowd for a club game of 82,208. That marked a shift in the balance of provincial power in Irish rugby, and something of a starting point in Leinster becoming a European superpower as they went on to beat Leicester to win the cup for the first time.
There appeared to be plenty of hurt from the last 11 months distilled into last Saturday s performance, their best of the season thus far, but Cullen maintained Leinster were not motivated by revenge.
 This point about losing in a final, the opposition is a bit irrelevant. I know that people like to make a lot of that part, but it wouldn t bloody matter, would it? As in, you lost in the final of the Champions Cup and the players are desperate to be in this tournament.
Change of scenery
Cullen will take a squad to South Africa tomorrow  for their upcoming games against the Lions and the Stormers, with some frontliners perhaps to travel for the first of those games before returning home in advance of the second. The Leinster head coach admitted a change of tournament, as much as scenery, is welcome.
 I think you have got to decompress after some of these games. It s not just this week, it was last week as well. Leicester are a bloody tough nut to crack.
The day after Leinster s semi-final, Toulouse will host Harlequins after completing the last four with a stunning 64-26 when scoring six tries after trailing with half an hour remaining.
Brian O Driscoll, a three-time winner, made Toulouse  firm favourites  to lift the trophy for a sixth time at Tottenham Stadium on May 25th. Acknowledging the quality of Leinster s win over La Rochelle, he maintained:  It will take a really good team to beat Toulouse.
Speaking before Northampton had completed their quarter-final win over the understrength Bulls, Cullen had noted that Toulouse had looked like  a team on a mission  and observed:  The English Premiership, you see how competitive it is. With the sadness of teams going bust   what s it done? It s thrown a lot of talent into other teams who have picked up five, six, seven players.
 They all have stronger squads this year and you can see they were able to manage things across the year because they ve a hell of a lot of bloody players in England. A great challenge.
Meanwhile a deflated Ronan O Gara   himself a two-time former winner as a player and coach   must now lift his weary side for an attempt at the French championship.
 The beauty of France is that the Top 14 is such a monster,  he said.  There will probably be disappointment tonight but turn the page tomorrow because the club have never won a Bouclier. It s a goal of all of ours but we need to make a plan first and make sure the appetite is there.
O Gara warning
Leinster s status as favourites will have been hardened by the manner they dethroned the champions, but they ve been here before, and as O Gara warned:  There will always be a challenge I think for whoever came out of this game because, all of a sudden now, they ll be hot favourites but the air gets thinner as you go semi-final/final. Toulouse are quality. Leinster have always had their measure in this competition but the way they play the game will pose challenges. I see Harlequins had a big win as well.
 For me, it s two teams with massive tradition left so it s not a final for Leinster today, I wouldn t think. There s still 160 minutes of rugby for them.  Thinking of that, he paused, and concluded:  We would have liked to have had that.
Leinster are the sole Irish side remaining in either European  competition after Connacht followed Ulster s exit the day before in Clermont by losing 39-24 to Benetton in the Stadio Monigo.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Down make hard work of Antrim
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 4
Length: 548 words
Body


Down made hard work of their   Ulster Championship quarter- final at Páirc Esler on Saturday evening but they got past Antrim despite a patchy performance in front of a bumper crowd.
There were four points in it in the end as Conor Laverty s men got the job done and booked their place in the semi-final against Armagh.
Down made three changes to the match programme, including Clonduff s Barry O Hagan in his first start since he suffered a cruciate ligament injury against Antrim in the league last season, and another injury returnee in Kilcoo s Shealan Johnston. For Andy McEntee s men five players made their debut.
A scuffle before the ball was even thrown in by referee Barry Cassidy resulted in yellow cards for Down s Odhrán Murdock and Antrim s Joseph Finnegan. Antrim were reduced to 14 men in the third minute when Conor Hand was dealt a black card.
Down only clocked up one point during that spell from a Pat Havern free, while Finnegan forced a terrific goal save from Down netminder John O Hare. Antrim  keeper Michael Byrne converted the resulting 45, aided by the strong wind. While Down enjoyed the majority of the possession, the Saffrons had every man behind the ball and were difficult to break down.
Ryan McQuillan levelled the game at 0-2 apiece midway through the half, but Down pulled away with four of the next five scores to lead 0-6 to 0-3 at the half-time whistle.
Dermot McAleese hit a wide for Antrim on the restart, a third for his side, while Down had clocked up six in the first period.
Fisted point
Oisín Savage, who had replaced Havern in the first half, converted a mark to extend Down s lead and Daniel Guinness made it 0-8 to 0-3 with a fisted point. But a brace of frees from Patrick McBride and Ryan McQuillan   the latter from a Liam Kerr foul just outside the penalty area   reduced Antrim s deficit to three points 0-8 to 0-5.
The wide count began to creep up for Antrim with three more in the next 10 minutes, while another fisted point for Guinness and a beauty from Kerr were cancelled out with scores from Marc Jordan and Eoghan McCabe.
Another free sent over the bar by Kerr saw Down lead 0-11 to 0-7 with five minutes of normal time remaining, but a long break ensued as Antrim s corner back Eunan Walsh took a knock and was carried off on a stretcher. Nine minutes additional time were announced .
Quick-fire points from Shane Annett and Ceilum Doherty extended Down s lead to six but Antrim replied with a couple of frees to keep in touch but it was not enough.
DOWN: J O Hare; P Fegan, R McEvoy (0-2), C Doherty; M Rooney (0-1), P Laverty, D Guinness (0-2); S Johnston, O Murdock (0-1); C McCrickard, L Kerr (0-1), R Johnston (0-1, mark); B O Hagan, P Havern (0-1, free), D Magill. Subs: O Savage (0-3, two frees,  one mark) for Havern (24 mins), E Brown for McCrickard (47), S Annett (0-1) for O Hagan (52), R Magill for S Johnston (61), R Mason for Magill (70+5). ANTRIM: M Byrne (0-1, 45); R Boyle, E Walsh, K Keenan; D Lynch, J Finnegan, D McAleese; C Hynds, M Jordan (0-1); C Hand (0-1), P McBride (0-1, free), E McCabe (0-1); R McQuillan (0-3, two frees), R McCann (0-1, free), D McEnhill.  Subs: N Burns for McEnhill (h-t), P McAleer for Boyle (52 mins), E Hynds for Walsh (65), P Shivers for McQuillan (70+7). Referee: Barry Cassidy (Derry).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Early Armagh goals kill off Fermanagh
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 4
Length: 553 words
Body


Three first-half goals saw Armagh cruise through to an Ulster semi-final against Down following a comfortable 11-point victory over a poor Fermanagh at Brewster Park.
Kieran McGeeney s Orchard side had the win in the bag before the interval, with Fermanagh punished for turning the ball over as Armagh broke at pace to find the net on a couple of occasions, as they went in at the break with a 3-4 to 0-2 advantage.
And they remained in control throughout the second half to set up that last-four meeting with the Mournemen.
Armagh were on top from the outset as Andrew Murnin and Rian O Neill landed the opening scores, although Fermanagh did have a glorious goal chance in the fifth minute when Oisín Smyth got on the end of an Ultan Kelm pass in front of the goal, but Armagh defender Aaron McKay blocked his shot on the line.
Fermanagh then lost Kelm to a black card as he was adjudged to have pulled down Murnin and Armagh swooped for two goals during the spell.
The impressive Rory Grugan danced his way through a porous Erne rearguard in the 16th minute before feeding the ball across the goal for Conor Turbitt to palm home.
And two minutes later the away side hit the back of the net again, Armagh forcing a turnover before breaking forward. And although Murnin had his shot saved by Ross Bogue, the ball spilled kindly to Jarly Óg Burns to tap home to make it 2-2 to 0-0.
Fermanagh finally opened their account in the 22nd minute through a Seán Cassidy free but Armagh replied with points from Ciarán Mackin and Óg Burns before they then struck for goal number three.
Again, Fermanagh were guilty of coughing the ball up, and Turbitt, Joe McElroy and Murnin combined to tee up Stefan Campbell who palmed in at the back post to put the game out of the Ernemen s reach by the 28th minute.
Complete control
 Fionan O Brien did rattle over a point for the home outfit late in the half but at the break Armagh were in complete control as they led by 11 points.
The Orchardmen were able to maintain their commanding advantage throughout the second half. Turbitt and Garvan Jones traded points before Mackin swung over a score for McGeeney s charges to make it 3-6 to 0-3.
A wonderful Grugan free from the right-hand sideline, and a Campbell point pushed Armagh further ahead, although Fermanagh did respond with points from Kelm and O Brien.
Although Fermanagh landed scores through substitute Conor Love, O Brien and Conor McShea effort, Armagh rounded things off with points form substitutes Barry McCambridge and Oisín O Neill.
FERMANAGH: R Bogue; L Cullen, C Cullen, O Smyth; D McCusker, S McGullion, C McManus; R McCaffrey, J McDade; C McGee, C McShea (0-1), F O Brien (0-3); U Kelm (0-1), G Jones (0-1, free), S Cassidy (0-1, free). Subs: J Largo Elis for McManus (22 mins); B Horan for McGee, C Love (0-2, one free) for Jones (both 48); J Cassidy for Smyth, D McGurn for McCusker (both 60). ARMAGH: B Hughes; P Burns, A McKay, P McGrane; J McElroy, Ciarán Mackin (0-2), A Forker; R O Neill (0-1), B Crealey; S Campbell (1-2), R Grugan (0-1, free), C Turbitt (1-1, 0-1 free); O Conaty, A Murnin (0-1), J Óg Burns (1-1). Subs: B McCambridge (0-1) for McKay (45 mins); O O Neill (0-1) for Óg Burns (48); Connaire Mackin for Rian O Neill, A Nugent for Murnin (both 56); T Kelly for Turbitt (63). Referee: J McQuillan (Cavan).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Economy vulnerable to global events   Ibec; Report warns Ireland will face lower trade openness and rising geopolitical risk
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 478 words
Byline: LAURA SLATTERY
Body


LAURA SLATTERY
 Irish economic policy now has  less room for error  amid changes in the global economy that are likely to bring heightened uncertainty to exporters, business group Ibec has warned.
In its latest quarterly economic outlook, Ibec said the global economy was entering a period of major change that would see more competition for investment in new technology, falling levels of trade openness and rising geopolitical risk.
The resulting uncertainty and volatility in the business environment facing Irish companies selling abroad will increase focus on reducing vulnerability to inflationary swings and addressing competitiveness concerns, it said.
 For domestic policy, these changes in the global economy will reduce the margin for error when it comes to improving our domestic cost competitiveness, skills, infrastructure and capacity to innovate.
Growth in GDP
Nevertheless, Ibec is forecasting growth of 2 per cent in gross domestic product (GDP) and 3.4 per cent in 2025, with higher export growth, investment and the overall economy expected this year and next as inflationary pressures ease and interest rates are cut.
This is an upgrade on the forecasts in its previous quarterly outlook, which predicted growth of 1.6 per cent this year and 2.9 per cent in 2025.
 Much of the underperformance in exports and capital investment last year was driven by once-off impacts caused by the timing of big investment decisions and reducing demand for Covid-related products in the biopharma sector,  said Ibec head of national policy and chief economist Gerard Brady.
 Headline economic figures for last year belie a robust performance on the ground, with 90,000 additional jobs added and a domestic economy that compares favourably with much of Europe.
GDP growth of 2 per cent this year will be driven by  a marginally stronger performance in the global economy  as well as  an improvement in some sectors and product-specific sales , he added.
 It remains the case, however, that intensified global competition in some sectors and relatively weak growth in key trading partners, particularly in the euro zone, will mean more subdued export growth than had been the case for much of the past decade.
Falling inflation and a cycle of rate cuts, expected to be initiated by the European Central Bank in June, are likely to provide a boost to the Irish economy, although consumers will continue to face prices that remain higher than in previous years as a result of elevated global commodity costs, Mr Brady said.
Housing
On housing, the report highlights  a promising increase  in the commencement of new homes in the early part of 2024 and said an increase in homes receiving planning permission was a  positive sign . However, a  significant gap  remains between the number of units that receive planning approval and the final count of completed homes, it said.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Electric vehicle charging 'arms' require permission
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 375 words
Byline: OLIVIA KELLY
Body


OLIVIA KELLY Dublin Editor   Electric car owners who do not have off-street parking could find themselves in conflict with Dublin City Council s planning rules if they erect new overhead charging  arms  outside their homes, it has emerged.
Electric vehicle (EV) owners without driveways have largely been reliant on public charging points. However, a Dutch-designed product that projects a charging cable across a footpath at a height of about 2.3m from a post installed on the homeowner s property, has recently started appearing across Dublin.
Nigel Daly, whose company NMD installs and maintains EV charging stations, said the device provides a much safer and neater solution than running cables across the footpath.
 It is a significantly better proposal than people cutting a channel into the footpath and running live cables through it, which we ve seen. Or people trailing the cable across the path, sometimes with mats over them. Even with mat, it s a trip hazard, particularly for older people using walkers, and we would point blank refuse to install chargers like that.
 Best solution
Mr Daly said he has so far installed almost 50 charging arms.  These units are safe, they extend at a height that doesn t pose any safety issues for pedestrians, they are in use in other European counties and in the UK and I think they are the best solution for people who don t have driveways.
Asked if the units required planning permission, Mr Daly said the onus would be on homeowners to establish that with their local authority, but he couldn t see why there would be a problem.  They are no bigger than many garden ornaments, or a tree someone might install in their garden.
But Dublin City Council said such structures require planning permission  as it is a permanent structure to the front of a house . Consent from the council s environment and transportation department is also required  for extending on to the public footpath  but due to the  high risk to public liability  the council  will not give consent for structures like these to reach across the public footpath .
A number of homeowners using the product told The Irish Times they cannot understand the council s reasoning and said they had received no complaints in relation to their use.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Employers have manufactured the SME 'crisis' to boost profits; Employment and profits rising, an insolvency rate below average: this doesn't look very much like a crisis
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 1079 words
Body


In the past few weeks, employer organisations have mounted a relentless campaign over a manufactured crisis that they claim is driven largely by government policy. This has resulted in employer demands to suspend progress on labour market initiatives, including the national minimum wage, auto-enrolment pensions, sick pay and family leave entitlements.
There are further demands for billions of euro in new business subsidies and the freezing of real wages for the lowest paid.
Critically, though, there is little evidence of a crisis. Since 2019, just before the start of the Covid lockdowns, profits in our domestic economy have increased substantially, including the wholesale and retail, and SME-dominated hospitality sectors.
This increase was so significant that it led the Central Bank of Ireland to conclude that profits were a major contributor to domestically sourced price increases in 2021 and 2022. Last year, employment increases in the hospitality and the wholesale and retail sectors exceeded the economy- wide average. This doesn t look like any kind of crisis.
Employer groups point to insolvency statistics showing an increase in business closures in 2023. However, insolvencies are still below their 2019 level and well below the long-term historical average. Insolvencies were kept artificially low during the pandemic with State subsidies extending the survival of many unviable businesses that, in normal times, would have closed down. Now that these subsidies have been removed, we are experiencing a return to normal trends.
Increased profits, increased employment, below-average insolvency rate: the crisis that employer groups describe is a manufactured one, based on anecdote and unsubstantiated assertions.
So what s really at play? Some businesses became reliant on State subsidies for survival. The Department of Enterprise estimated that in the past few years, EUR 32 billion was provided in Brexit, Covid, and direct and indirect cost of living business supports. While many of these subsidies were absolutely necessary to rescue sectors during the lockdowns, especially the temporary wage schemes, as these supports have been withdrawn, some businesses have been unable to return to commercial viability.
It is not in our economic interest, however, to maintain market-distorting subsidies that prop up nonviable companies. Still, employers  organisations affiliated to the SaveJobs campaign are demanding substantial tax cuts, with a price tag of nearly EUR 2 billion.
Ironically, this subsidy is not directed at struggling businesses. The demand for a cut in the standard Vat rate, which would cost EUR 1.2 billion, would spread this subsidy among successful businesses not in need of support. In effect, employers  groups want the State to subsidise their profit margins.
And not only through tax cuts; employers want a real wage freeze for the lowest-paid employees on the minimum wage, confining increases in the wage floor to inflation. This is not about reducing  labour costs ; it is about ensuring that wage increases don t reduce rising profits.
Calls to suspend labour market initiatives and increase business subsidies deflect attention from the serous issue of poor productivity in our domestic sector. The National Economic and Social Council recently referred to a slowdown or even negative growth in many domestic sectors.
In a paper to be published shortly, the Nevin Economic and Research Institute and Siptu found that Irish productivity in domestic sectors compares poorly with other small open economies in the EU; in particular, hospitality and wholesale retail. Poor productivity depresses both wage and profit growth (and, so, indirectly impacts negatively on business investment).
Trying to overcome these productivity deficits by suppressing wages and in-work benefits can only exacerbate this trend.
How can we develop resilient, sustainable and market- viable companies capable of overcoming these deficits?
We need a charter for good companies   businesses that prioritise investment over value extraction, promote collective bargaining, resource in-work training and career development, pursue decarbonisation and eschew precarious work contracts. The Government can promote these companies through social clauses that make public procurement contracts, grant subsidies and tax breaks conditional on meeting good company criteria. We can no longer afford to subsidise low-road business practices.
Quality of life
Supporting good companies requires an enhancement of labour rights, starting with collective bargaining. Collective bargaining not only increases workers  living standards and life quality, it is an efficient and effective process to promote productivity, innovation and enterprise performance. Collective bargaining is a space for resolving problems that businesses face. This enhancement can be achieved through a comprehensive transposition of the EU Directive on Adequate Wages into domestic law, vindicating the right of all employees to collective bargaining.
A further step the Government should take is to establish sectoral taskforces, as per the programme for government commitment. This would allow stakeholders   notably, employees and employers   to identify productivity and innovation deficits, and facilitate consensus on the best policies to promote high-road enterprise activity. A high-road future is a negotiated one.
In good times and bad, many businesses will struggle. Against the background of this charter, we can introduce short-term and temporary supports to businesses who are committed to good company practices. This would ensure that business subsidies are contributing to a resilient and sustainable enterprise base in our domestic sectors; and are being directed to companies that see employees not as a cost, but as partners in promoting productivity and performance.
The Irish economy is facing huge challenges: climate change, AI and automation, and a low-growth future. This is in addition to our infrastructural deficits, such as housing.
We need to negotiate new pathways and ensure all sectors of society benefit from increased prosperity. Most importantly, policy needs to be evidence-based, not relying on mere assertion and anecdote.
There are many strengths in the Irish economy that we can build on, to create a strong social state, good companies and greater diversity in decision-making. Let s not squander this opportunity.Joe Cunningham is general secretary of Siptu

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



End the culture wars by ending the blame game; It is wrong to blame ordinary people for structural injustices, argues one political philosopher
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 882 words
Body


Overwhelmed by the world s problems? You re not alone. There is so much structural injustice   inequality, exploitation and prejudice   it s hard to know where to start.
And if you dotake a stand on anything these days it means making yourself a target for resentment, if not hate.
A cynical response to this dilemma is to say that because I am not personally responsible for an injustice I ve no stake in the matter. I didn t benefit from slavery, for example, so the legacy of historical racism is no concern of mine.
Such thinking, though, is a path to political apathy. Moreover, it is based on what political philosopher Maeve McKeown argues is a mistaken conflation of responsibility and blame.
In a new book, the Belfast-born academic has produced a clear-sighted analysis of the scope of individual liability for other people s woes.
Structural injustice is different to other types of injustice, she points out, as it cannot be linked to individual wrongdoing. It relates to large-scale processes that create systematic disadvantages, like gender and racial hierarchies.
While these topics have led to angry debates and much finger-pointing in recent years, McKeown writes in With Power Comes Responsibility: The Politics of Structural Injustice,  the lack of intent and the lack of direct causal connection [to structural injustice] means that holding each other blameworthy for [it] is inappropriate; individuals  contributions to structural injustice are inadvertent or the product of social duress and therefore excused .
 Awful
McKeown, who is based at the University of Groningen in the Netherlands, knows about such injustice first hand, having experienced ill-health and job insecurity.  I have applied for over 300 jobs and had 16 job interviews in the course of writing this book,  she says.  Really, the conditions in academia right now are awful. It is structurally unjust.
But her main focus is on righting errors in our thinking, inspired by the work of American human rights theorist and feminist Iris Marion Young.
That McKeown has a cat called  Magnus Wolfe Tone  gives an indication of her philosophy, which leans towards unity rather than division. Asked whether she was trying to carve out a middle ground in the culture wars, she replies:  I think that s a fair characterisation, but it s where the philosophy led me, rather than being a response to the culture wars or other political debates.
 People feel defensive or powerless when they are blamed for things like sweatshops, global poverty or climate change, and there are good reasons for this. Many philosophers try to connect our individual actions to these structural injustices in a way that makes it possible to blame people for them. But I would argue that because these structural injustices are beyond our control, it is wrong to blame ordinary people for them,  she says.
How did blame and responsibility become so conflated in our moral thinking? Did western philosophy take a wrong turn somewhere?
 I m actually not sure why this happened. But it s a mistake,  she says.  It is possible to be responsible for something, meaning it is up to you to take care of something over time or try to remedy it going forward, without being blameworthy if you don t do those things.
 Blame is one type of response to someone not taking up their responsibility, it s not the only one. It s possible to criticise people or steer them in the right direction without making a judgment on their character or claiming that they have violated a moral norm. Sometimes blame is too strong and fails to take into account the reasons why someone might not be acting on their responsibility.
Solidarity
McKeown puts particular emphasis on solidarity as a  political virtue  that citizens should try to cultivate.  Pity is patronising , whereas  solidarity depends upon respect .
So what is the responsibility of the average citizen?  There has to be room for people to decide on that for themselves,  McKeown replies.
However, she identifies what she calls  parameters of reasoning  for grappling with the issue.
 You could act on the structural injustice you are benefiting the most from. Say, for instance, you love clothes. Then joining a campaign group that focuses on sweatshop labour, like Labour Behind the Label or the Clean Clothes Campaign, could be a way to act on your political responsibility.
 Another parameter is  collective ability , meaning that if you are a member of an already-organised group, you could work within that group to tackle a structural injustice. Being a member of a trade union, a church, a business association, a cultural institution, a private club; working within any of these groups to tackle a structural injustice can be effective.
Other factors worth considering are proximity to an injustice, or personal interest.
 Finally, it s worth pointing out that people have different amounts of time, ability and resources to get involved in political activism. Removing blame from the equation recognises that activism is something that will wax and wane over the course of someone s life, and that s okay. Maybe you can t take up your political responsibility now, but might again in the future.
In short, cutting back on blame could be the very way to empower us to make the world a better place.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



EV owners seek solution to expensive and inadequate public chargers
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 633 words
Byline: OLIVIA KELLY
Body


OLIVIA KELLY Dublin Editor  Thousands of households across Dublin, mostly living the period properties or apartment blocks without parking, have found themselves deterred from converting to electric vehicles (EVs) because of a lack of direct access to their electricity supplies.
Residents without driveways have resorted to trailing cables across footpaths to charge cars, with the risk of trips to passing pedestrians, or driving to public charging points where electricity costs can be five times higher than domestic rates.
However, a device designed to overcome this problem, in use in several European cities with similar parking issues, has recently appeared on Dublin streets. The Dutch-designed charging arm projects over the footpath from a post installed on the homeowner s property at a height of approximately 2.3m, allowing pedestrians to pass underneath. When not in use, the cable folds back into the post.
However, while the device appears to resolve the trip hazard, Dublin City Council said it is not authorised for use.
 It needs permission as it is a permanent structure to the front of a house,  said the council. Consent from the council s environment and transportation department is also required  for extending on to the public footpath  but due to the  high risk to public liability  the council  will not give consent for structures like these to reach across the public footpath , it said.
Homeowners using the devices said they cannot understand the council s reasoning.
 I ve had this about six months and before that I was using a cable across the footpath with a rubber strip, but I always felt uneasy about it. But I can t see why the council would object to this,  said one charging-arm user in Clontarf.  It s on private property, it s very discrete and in the summer months it s almost entirely covered by foliage,  he said.  It s not an eyesore, it s not a public hazard and it s far safer than what I had been doing. So I wouldn t really see the rationale for a request to remove it. And it hadn t crossed my mind to ask them.
There are no public charging points near his house, he said.  When I was buying the car most garages said to me,  if you can t charge at home, don t buy one .
In Glasnevin, another charging-arm user said the price difference between charging at a petrol station or other public point and charging at home was a factor in the decision to install the device.
 We charge at night, and the domestic night rate is about 15-16 cent as opposed to 60-70 cent for public charging. We don t charge very often, for EUR 12 we d get about 400km, and two charges would be about the same as a full tank of diesel.
He and his wife have been using the charging arm for about two years and did seek advice from the council before its installation.  Ours was the second in the county. We asked the council for guidance in relation to it, but we didn t get a reply so we emailed a load of politicians, and one councillor did come back to us, but the response she got didn t answer our questions,  she said.
The response from council officials in February 2022, seen by The Irish Times, said the council had commissioned a  strategic study  on EV charging, but the strategy  has not as of yet been fully finalised and agreed .
The Glasnevin couple said they had not had any complaints about their charging arm in the two years since its installation.  We ve had loads of people call in and ask where to get it, but no complaints. The Government has a target for phasing out Ice [internal combustion engine] vehicles, and there are thousands of homes in Dublin who like us don t have driveways, so I don t know how they ll meet that target.
The city council said it is  delivering high speed EV charging hubs across the city . So far it has one in place in Finglas.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Fianna Fáil gets into the budget 'flyer' business; Fiscal initiatives flagged in advance of what is likely to be a key budget
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 614 words
Body


One of the familiar refrains for Fianna Fáil in recent years has been complaining about former Fine Gael leader Leo Varadkar s budget  flyers .
Last year, Fianna Fáilers were especially annoyed at what they saw as Varadkar s attempt to bounce them into middle-class tax cuts in the budget for which he would then try to take credit. The trigger on that occasion was a newspaper article by three Ministers of State in May advocating tax cuts for the  squeezed middle .
Fianna Fáilers tut-tutted at this blatant attempt to roll the pitch for the budget to Fine Gael s political advantage. Not helpful, they complained, for a budget that had to be agreed by three parties. Not collegiate. Not conducive to heathly Coalition relations. Not on.
That was then, this is now. With a new Fine Gael leader and Taoiseach in place, Fianna Fáil has decided to take the initiative itself on the budget flyer issue, lest Simon Harris beat them to it.
As the party gathered for its ardfheis in Dublin at the weekend, Tánaiste Micheál Martin outlined several budget priorities for his party six months before the budget is due.
In his ardfheis speech to delegates, Martin avoided any specific commitments on tax and welfare. But in media interviews he was clear about what he would be seeking in the budget.
He told the Business Post that tax credits could be increased, mirroring and surpassing last year s level.  That would mean in effect that for every employee, pensioner, self-employed person, the first EUR 20,000 of their income would be exempt from income tax,  he said.
 That s new, it s something we ve worked on as a party and it s something we ll be bringing to the table,  added Martin.
In the Sunday Times, he declared his support for welfare increases, a EUR 10 increase in child benefit, further cuts to childcare costs, further energy credit and a EUR 12 increase in the old-age pension.
Not to be outdone, Minister for Finance Michael McGrath was using the ardfheis weekend to assure workers he wanted them  to keep as much of their hard-earned money as possible , in terms very similar to those used by the Tánaiste.
So one of the messages of the ardfheis was: get ready for another big giveaway budget, with the Government parties jostling to claim credit for it.
Fianna Fáil also defended the Government s record on housing, echoing similar messages from the Fine Gael ardfheis last weekend and the week s ceremonials at Leinster House. Fianna Fáil and Fine Gael may get few votes from those who still feel locked out of the housing market, but they reckon that 100,000 new homeowners since 2020 might have a more benign view of the Government s performance.
It is also noticeable that Fianna Fáil was talking about homeownership, rather than just housing.
Martin also used his speech to announce an initiative on smartphone use in schools.  Every school will be given funding to support the banning of smartphone use during school time,  he said.  And to the social media companies, our message is clear   take concrete steps to get underage children off your apps or we will impose those steps on you.
But while work is apparently under way on a package of proposals, there is no sign of a clear commitment that students  phones will be banned when the new school year gets under way in September. The appeal of such a move to parents would be immense.
Martin s announcement over the weekend   when he likened it to the smoking ban   means that if it happens, the credit will be his and his party s. But if he doesn t, it will be another unfulfilled promise. And with elections now dominating every aspect of politics, the stakes for success or failure of such initiatives are higher than ever.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Financial markets weigh up fallout from growing conflict in Middle East
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 412 words
Body


Financial markets will face the new week fretting about geopolitics with much riding on whether Iran s unprecedented weekend strike on Israel triggers rounds of retaliation.
When Hamas attacked Israel in October, the biggest fear for many market participants was that Iran would ultimately be drawn into the fighting. Now, as the conflict widens, many say oil could surpass $100 (EUR 94) a barrel and expect a flight to Treasuries, gold and the dollar, along with further stock-market losses.
A spike in nerves may still be tempered by Iran s statement that  the matter can be deemed concluded  and a report that US president Joe Biden told Israeli prime minister Binyamin Netanyahu that the US won t support an Israeli counterattack against Iran.
 Investors  natural reaction is to look for safe-haven assets in moments like this,  said Patrick Armstrong, chief investment officer at Plurimi Wealth.  Reactions will be somewhat dependent on Israel s response. If Israel does not escalate from here, it may provide an opportunity to buy risk assets at lower prices.
Bitcoin gave an early insight into market sentiment. The token sank almost 9 per cent in the wake of the attacks on Saturday, only to rebound yesterday and trade near the $64,000 mark.
Stocks markets in Israel, Saudi Arabia and Qatar posted modest losses under thin trading volumes.
 Middle Eastern markets opened with relative calm following Iran s attack, which was perceived as a measured retaliation, rather than an attempt at escalation,  said Emre Akcakmak, a senior consultant at East Capital in Dubai.  However, the market impact might extend beyond the Middle East due to secondary effects on oil and energy prices, potentially influencing the global inflation outlook.
Investors will now weigh the risk of a strike and counterstrike cycle, with many looking to oil as a guide for how to respond. Brent crude is already up almost 20 per cent this year and trading north of $90 a barrel.
Although the conflict in the Middle East hasn t yet had any impact on production,  attacks by Iran-backed Houthis in the Red Sea have disrupted shipping. Traders mostly fear a widening conflict could disrupt tanker shipments from the Persian Gulf through the Strait of Hormuz.
Worries about turmoil in the region have also been filtering through global markets. The S&P 500 is coming off its biggest weekly decline since October on the back of higher-than-expected inflation and disappointing bank earnings.   Bloomberg

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



French media lament a loss
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 307 words
Body


Vincent Bissonet, writing for Midi Olympique s website, lamented the fact that La Rochelle never got into the match in any sustained way outside of the pressure they managed to exert in first-half injury-time when they scored their only try of the game through prop Louis Penverne.  As a result, Ronan O Gara s men had few balls to exploit, offensively speaking.
 And moreover, even with the ball in hand, they frequently found themselves under pressure, both on their maul attempts, with their frequently hassled launch plays. The kicking game could have been an interesting alternative but, used very little, it did not make it possible to exploit the free spaces. Much of the credit for this goes to the Leinster men s aggressive defence instilled by Jacques Nienaber.
Nicolas Zinardi, in the same publication, singled out Leinster s Jamison Gibson-Park and James Lowe for special mention.  For this fifth match in the saga between European giants, the Leinster men finally took their revenge on the title holders thanks to an extraordinary performance from the Kiwi duo Lowe/Gibson-Park while, on the La Rochelle side, the usual leaders suffered considerably.
Only Levani Botia (inset) was absolved from the general torpor of the La Rochelle performance while the writer under the heading  Flops  singled out Tawera Kerr Barlow, captain Grégory Alldritt and Uini Atonio for substandard contributions compared to their traditional quality.
In Sud Ouest, under the heading  Leinster teaches a terrible lesson to La Rochelle  Benjamin Deudon wrote:  This time, the Rochelais did not survive. If the difference in the score between the two teams had never exceeded nine points (32-23 in the semi-final, in 2021), it took on proportions this Saturday, at the Aviva Stadium, reflecting the current difference between the Leinster and Stade Rochelais.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Goal-hungry Louth see off Wexford; Downey's two dynamite finishes and two penalties from Sam Mulroy seal the deal
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 5
Length: 862 words
Body


By the three-quarters mark in Portlaoise, this entertaining Leinster quarter-final was shaping up to be an uprising of the downtrodden, as Division Four Wexford were well in the contest against their privileged opponents, Louth, a couple of years in Division Two banked and earning them a good return.
In the end, it turned into simply an illustration of why teams are downtrodden. Louth had too much clinical efficiency and attacking quality and in time-honoured fashion, made off with that most capitalist of outcomes   a result that didn t reflect what the losers had put into the contest.
Four goals made the difference. Both managers accepted and mentioned that Wexford had put up more scores than the winners but there s a reason why green flags are worth three times a white one.
Kept afloat
Having been hustled out of the match for an extended period, Louth first kept afloat and then pulled away thanks to the buoyancy of their goal-scoring.
Wexford s four-point lead at the end of the first half was dismantled after the first of Ciarán Downey s thunderbolts.
His second gave Louth a three-point lead at the start of the final quarter, a dynamite finish after a surge through the middle of the defence. Wexford refused to go away but as they desperately sought points to get back into the match, they leaked two further goals.
Both were penalties and both were earned by the elusive movement of Ciarán Keenan, who ended up being taken down on each occasion. One of the game s leading dead-ball exponents, Sam Mulroy, extracted full compensation from the awards and Wexford were bailing out a sinking vessel, using egg cups.
Louth might even have had a third penalty, early in the match in the 13th minute when Eoin Porter looked to have taken down Ryan Burns although the latter s ostentatious reaction to the foul may have contributed to the referee s decision to wave on play.
Wexford manager John Hegarty insisted afterwards that they hadn t come to  give a good account  of themselves and that was why he was feeling so disappointed.
He was a little vexed at referee Séamus Mulhare s decision to black card corner back Eoin Porter in the 40th minute for provocative behaviour after Wexford had lifted a siege, featuring a point-blank save and a ball scrambled off the line.
 I ve never ever heard of it. He celebrated a block and went out celebrating. I mean, I think Derry, Dublin probably have had a few of those provocative type black cards.
 But look, that being said, my point is the response to each of the goals was not to drop our heads, not a lack of belief, and we pushed up and we got good scores into the wind.
A man down, they actually won the sin bin period by a point to nil.
In the first half, they had been very resourceful. Showing a feisty energy in pushing forward, they led by four, 0-8 to 0-4, after 27 minutes. Fluid attacking from the back and well-taken scores were in evidence from the team that had set a county championship record for scoring a week earlier when overwhelming Carlow.
They were also sharp at the back, cutting off the routes to goal, getting in deft tackles and breaking fast from defence on turnover ball whereas the centrefield of Liam Colemen and Niall Hughes mopped up a load of aerial ball.
Louth manager Ger Brennan was relieved to get his championship up and running even with question marks over performance.
 We made a lot of unforced errors in possession, which was frustrating when we didn t have the ball and allowing Wexford back into it. They didn t care that they were playing a Division Two team, so a lot of it is down to Wexford.
In the end, their forwards did the necessary, opening up their opponents for the four crucial goals but the defence also made it hard for Wexford to get within goal range themselves.
Louth progress to a semifinal against Kildare, who they defeated in the last round of the league. Their manager is aware that better may well be needed.
 We have to be a bit more adventurous in our defensive play in terms of stepping up and making contacts. I thought we were shrinking back a fair bit and allowing Wexford build momentum.
 We ve all played in games where you re going in as a favourite and expected to win and sometimes, are the juices flowing when the ball is thrown in? I don t think they were flowing enough for us today; they were certainly flowing for Wexford.
LOUTH: N O Donnell; D McKenny, D Campbell, P Lynch; L Grey, A Williams, C McKeever; T Durnin (0-2), C Murphy; C Downey (2-0), C Keenan, C Grimes (0-1m); R Burns (0-1), S Mulroy (2-4, two pens, four frees), T Jackson (0-1). Subs:  L Jackson (0-1) for T Jackson (46 mins), B Duffy for Murphy (46 mins), N Sharkey for Grey (46 mins), D Corcoran for Campbell (64 mins), P Matthews for Durnin (68 mins). WEXFORD: R Tubritt; E Porter, D Lyons, G Sheehan; D Furlong, P Hughes (0-2). G Malone (0-2); L Coleman (0-2, one 45), N Hughes; K O Grady (0-1), E Nolan, M Rossiter (0-2); G Cullen (0-3), S Nolan (0-3, two frees), B Brosnan. Subs: C Kinsella for Brosnan (49 mins), T Byrne for E Nolan (49 mins), R Waters for Cullen (61 mins), S Pettit for Rossiter (66 mins), J Bealin for O Grady (70 mins). Referee: S Mulhare (Laois).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Haaland has most important skill in the game
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 7
Length: 988 words
Body


Can you believe it s only two weeks since everyone was sniggering about Erling Haaland being compared to a League Two player by Roy Keane?
 The level of his general play is so poor and not just today . . . He s almost like a League Two player, that s how I look at him . . . Being a brilliant striker is fantastic, but he has to improve his all-round game,  Keane said after Manchester City drew 0-0 with Arsenal.
It was true that Haaland didn t have his best game that day. Afterwards he posted on Instagram pictures of him being manhandled by Gabriel Magalhães, which gave you a sense of what he thought had been going wrong for him out on the field. The pundits overlooked all that to pour scorn on his substandard skills.
We all know what Keane was getting at. Haaland isn t a beautiful footballer like Kylian Mbappé or either of the Ronaldos. He could spend hours every day for the rest of his career working on his technique and never get close to being like them.
The question is: who cares? Ever since he turned professional Haaland has been scoring goals at a pace nobody his age has ever scored them, not Mbappé, not Cristiano Ronaldo, not even Lionel Messi. He can only do one thing really well, it just happens to be the most important skill in the game.
Annoy him
Keane s criticism might not affect  Haaland in the sense of shaking his confidence but it would certainly annoy him. Players are acutely aware of what people are saying about them. This was, after all, the weekend in which Alejandro Garnacho made headlines by liking posts by Mark Goldbridge in which the Manchester United YouTuber suggested Garnacho had been harshly treated by Erik ten Hag.
With Haaland under fire for perhaps the first time in his career, it was touching to see the players of other leading Premier League clubs offering support to the embattled Norwegian by showing the sceptical world that scoring simple chances really isn t that simple.
Last week Darwin Nuñez s stuttering form caused a proliferation of social media clips compiling some of his best misses of the season. What impresses you watching these compilations is the way he has every type of miss in his locker: free headers, one-on-ones, open-goal tap-ins, penalties. People had often suggested Darwin was likely to miss  when he had too much time to think  but this body of work proves he is a miss-artist of stunning completeness and range.
He produced another huge miss in Liverpool s 1-0 home defeat to Crystal Palace yesterday, but this time his team-mates seemed determined to match him: Curtis Jones, Mohamed Salah and Diogo Jota all producing spectacular misses when they looked odds-on to score. Not to be outdone, Jean-Philippe Mateta sent solidarity to Haaland from the forwards of Palace by blasting straight at Alisson from inside the six-yard box.
With Liverpool s title challenge in tatters it was over to Arsenal, whose coach Mikel Arteta had made some changes to his attack, including supersub Leandro Trossard in the starting line-up and moving Kai Havertz back into midfield with Jorginho dropping to the bench.
Early criticism
Havertz has recently enjoyed relative success in a central attacking role after struggling to fit into the midfield during the first half of the season. The Arsenal fans responded to early criticism of his performances by making a kind of cult figure out of him, much as Liverpool fans have with Nuñez. The fans  response has something to do with the social media dynamics of modern fandom, where everyone is forever owning or being owned.
Unfortunately, performative  hero-worship alone cannot transform a cult figure into a really decisive player.
You might generously describe Havertz as an all-rounder. He is an in-between kind of player who scores quite a lot for a midfielder but not a lot for a forward, and gets quite a lot of touches for a forward but not a lot for a midfielder. He is a floaty player who likes to get on the end of moves rather than the type who consistently makes things happen for his team.
It is still not quite clear why Arteta paid £65 million for the chance to see if he could unlock Havertz s supposed potential   couldn t that have been someone else s problem?   but having argued for the signing the manager is determined to see him succeed.
Havertz had some of Arsenal s better moments in the first half   ghosting through from deep midfield positions as Gabriel Jesus dropped backwards in tandem   without ever looking particularly menacing. It was Trossard, the player with the best goals-per-minute ratio at the club, who missed the best chance of the first half, shooting straight at Emiliano Martinez from six yards with two-thirds of the goal open.
Villa got wise to Havertz  movements and Arsenal s chances dried up in the second half. The best set-piece team in the Premier League conceded in the 84th minute following a Villa corner, and in the 87th minute from a counterattack following their own corner.
Not a beautiful goal
You wonder what old League Two was making of it all. Haaland had forced Manchester City s opening goal on Saturday, charging into Luton s penalty area then volleying the ball in off Daiki Hashioka s face. Not a beautiful goal, but the feeling of taking the lead after two minutes in these tense run-in games is beautiful. Later he scored his 20th of the season from the penalty spot. It was the goal that made the game safe.
Haaland has missed a quarter of City s games through injury but he is still the top scorer in the league. His five assists doesn t sound like a lot until you consider that two of the Premier League s most gifted creative midfielders, Martin Ødegaard and Bruno Fernandes, have six each, while Bernardo Silva has four.
Maybe his all-round game isn t great, but every other forward in the world would love to have what he has. If Arsenal had the one-dimensional Haaland instead of the all-rounder Havertz, how many points clear would they be today?

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Hospital funding rise not leading to better results; Productivity report is likely to lead to calls for reforms
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 668 words
Body


Minister for Health Stephen Donnelly last November told Health Service Executive chairman Ciarán Devane about visiting one hospital where local doctors had been campaigning for greater investment to tackle rising admissions and emergency department attendances.
Donnelly  is known for immersing himself in the underlying data regarding an issue. He pointed out the hospital concerned had seen bed numbers rise by 17 per cent since 2016. Consultant staffing had increased by more than 50 per cent and funding by more than 60 per cent.
The Minister observed that preliminary data, at the same time, indicated that composite or weighted activity at the hospital had increased by less than 7 per cent.
He said the figures suggested  the number of outpatient appointments per consultant had actually fallen from 1,353 in 2016 to 894 in 2022.
Donnelly said  given the doctors at the hospital were dedicated and motivated, there was a need to understand what was driving this trend.
It is understood that the Minister has raised similar concerns on  other hospital visits. Why were activity levels not keeping pace when the overall health budget had increased from EUR 13.7 billon in 2014 to EUR 22.8 billion in 2024 and more than 50,000 additional healthcare staff had been employed?
The Minister asked officials in the Irish Government Economic Evaluation Service (IGEES) to produce a comprehensive report.
At the same time as Donnelly was highlighting productivity issues with healthcare chiefs, he was arguing  with the Department of Public Expenditure over why the health service needed so much additional money.
It is no secret that strong disagreements over spending overruns in the health service continued almost up to budget day in October.Ultimately the health service received about EUR 1.3 billion less than Donnelly had sought.
The HSE has signalled that it will likely need another supplementary estimate this year.
In January, Donnelly established a taskforce to look at generating savings and boosting productivity. The first action plan drawn up by this group will be released today as will the IGEES report.
The findings of the evaluation service report suggests that the problem of activity not rising at the same scale as investment was not only occurring at the hospital identified by Donnelly to the HSE chair last November. It was happening virtually everywhere.
 Our analysis shows the large divergence present in all sites between the expenditure and workforce provided, relative to the growth in either separate activity metrics or  composite  activity,   it says. The latter is an aggregate of activity in inpatient, day-case, outpatient and emergency departments, weighted by unit costs for each area.
 In most cases, the divergence is significant, with the percentage growth in composite activity between 2016 and 2022 either negative, or two times behind workforce growth, and up to three times behind real expenditure growth over the same period.
In the report, the head of the HSE, Bernard Gloster, and the secretary general of the Department of Health suggest its findings should not lead to finger-pointing but to encouraging improvement.
Coincidentally or otherwise, the HSE today released data to show that more healthcare than ever was provided to patients across the country last year. It said both the volume of its scheduled care waiting list and the time people were waiting had reduced. However, the demand for care will continue to rise as the population both grows and ages.
And while infrastructure or technological deficits may play some role in the figures set out in the IGEES report, across Government there are likely to be calls to address  productivity issues. The taskforce today will recommend several reforms. But whether they receive full support from management and staff across the system remains to be seen.
As does whether the proposed EUR 500 million in non-pay savings will be realised and the effect this may have on the negotiations for  next year s health budget.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



How the Brexit catastrophe turned out to be a mere inconvenience
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 876 words
Body


Of all the calamities forecast to befall Ireland but that never did, Brexit must rank top.
It certainly beats the Y2K fiasco of 1999 which had a much shorter lead-in period and disappeared almost on the stroke of midnight when the technical Armageddon predicted in some quarters morphed into a manageable computer glitch.
For the four years between 2016, when UK voted to leave the EU, and the country s formal exit in 2020, the implications of our nearest neighbour and biggest EU trading partner exiting the bloc approached us like an asteroid.
Warnings about the potential loss of trade and the threat to the peace process saturated the media cycle. At one point, it was predicted that Ireland might suffer greater economic harm than the UK itself.
We became au fait with the intricacies of a customs union. We analysed the ramifications of a hard and soft Brexit in exhaustive detail. In the months before the UK s official exit in 2020, the government set up a Brexit contingency fund, companies stockpiled goods, citizens braced themselves for a recession.
In the end, the whole affair, from Ireland s perspective, didn t exactly blow over, but it was absorbed without the disruption and economic fallout that many had predicted.
Irish exports, long seen as the first line of defence, rose by 9.5 per cent in 2020 and by 14 per cent in both 2021 and 2022, reflecting increased activity in the State s big pharma and IT industries, both of which prospered during the pandemic.
But even food and drink exports, which are heavily reliant on the UK market, fell by only 2 per cent in 2020 (largely on account of pandemic-related closures to food service businesses abroad) before rising by 4 per cent in 2021 and by a significant 22 per cent in 2022.
Exports (including food exports) fell last year, but for reasons other than Brexit.
Of course, there are problems ahead for food exporters here.
UK border controls on agricultural imports from the EU (including Ireland) are due to be implemented at the end of the month and could prove a significant obstacle.
According to the European Commission, the physical checks, health certificates and identification protocols on goods entering the UK, if fully enacted, will represent a 10 per cent tariff-equivalent increase for EU companies.
Brexit has also forced many businesses to ship goods to Europe along different supply routes.
 A lot of the existing transport and logistics costs have been carried in margins,  says Ibec s chief economist Ger Brady.  That might not carry through in the long run, but if it does, this leaves less for investment in growing exporting sectors,  he says.
Notwithstanding these problems, the great Brexit train wreck forecast to engulf Ireland never transpired. It morphed into a sort of manageable headache.
Economic dependence
Perhaps historians will see Brexit as final confirmation that the Republic has shaken off its economic dependence on Britain. Not that Britain isn t important   just that the Irish economy, in terms of its export markets, is more diversified.
Two key flashpoints that could have caused big problems were avoided   one at the outset, the other by an unexpectedly consistent and unified EU position throughout the process.
At the start of negotiations any change to the Common Travel Area (CTA), thearrangement between the UK and Ireland that allows citizens move freely to live, work and study, was ruled out.
The UK and Irish governments signed a memorandum of understanding (MoU) in 2019 reaffirming their commitment to maintaining  the CTA, and the associated rights and privileges, in all circumstances , including in the case of a no-deal Brexit.
A virtual single market
Many view Dublin s International Financial Services Centreas an offshoot of London s bigger financial centre, created and facilitated by friction-free travel between Dublin and London.
 The CTA creates a virtual single market for the professional skills underpinning international financial services,  one insider said.
A big divergence in immigration policy between the Republic and the UK could yet strain the operation of the CTA, but for now it has been unaffected.
The continued operation of the CTA also facilitated the operation of Europe s busiest air route and a vital artery for the Irish economy: Dublin-London.
The other big potential trap was the Border.
Dublin has always suspected London of being not fully cognisant or of not caring about Irish issues, and Brexiteer guff about high-tech, unseen borders seemed to underscore this.
Despite suggestions that the EU s unified stance would fracture (it struggled to reach common positions during the financial crisis and in  reaction to immigration) or that Ireland s controversial tax position would somehow get in the way, the Irish government and the EU s position that there could be no reversion to border infrastructure on the island held firm.
Former taoiseach Leo Varadkar and former minister for foreign affairs Simon Coveney can take significant credit that both these potential pitfalls were avoided.
They spent several years making it clear to EU leaders how critical the Border was to any agreement and how critical the Belfast Agreement was to maintaining peace.
For the Republic, Brexit is now a secondary issue.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Ireland's improvement finally rewarded with that winning feeling; Wafer outstanding as home side wrap the game up inside the first half
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 885 words
Body


Ireland s fifth try, after an hour, concluded the rout over Wales. Long before then, all doubts had been cast aside. Dannah O Brien moved left under pressure, keeping the ball alive; Dorothy Wall made a catch on the swivel; Edel McMahon made a pass out of contact; Aoife Wafer ran straight, burning a defender; Beibhinn Parsons exploded down the line. Four passes. Eleven seconds. Boom.
Everything about it reeked of bullish confidence and a different view of themselves. There was no space on the short side. They made space.
Around this time last year, the last time Ireland played in Cork, they hosted France and England and shipped 101 points; in reply, Ireland mustered one score. In last year s Six Nations, Wales had feasted on Ireland s frailties too, but in every sense that Ireland team no longer exists.
Under a new management the squad has been refreshed and revitalised. On Saturday, they snapped a seven-game losing streak in the Six Nations, that stretched back to the last round of the 2022 championship. Looking up again.
Still, they needed the validation of a win in the Six Nations. Inaccuracy and other gremlins in their execution had sabotaged them against Italy a fortnight ago but there were no such frustrations this time. In less than half an hour Ireland racked up three tries, each one beautifully conceived, and all tension floated away. Nobody was bothered in the raucous home crowd of more than 6,000.
It is hard to imagine that any game could have  a match-defining moment , after two-and-a-half minutes, but Scott Bernard, the Ireland coach, put a lot of store in how Ireland dealt with Wales  first attack, turning away their lineout maul just metres from the Irish line.  It s funny what momentum and confidence can do to a group,  he said.  We knew the maul was something we d have to deal with and I m so pleased for the girls that they ve been able to prove to themselves that they can do it.
Walws didn t make another entry into Ireland s 22 for over an hour, by which time they were more than 30 points behind.
Potential Lion
Ireland s attacking play was terrific and Wafer was at the heart of three of Ireland s tries. The young flanker, in her debut season, has already been touted by Bernard as a potential Lions tourist next year and was the outstanding player on the pitch here.
She scored Ireland s first try after 14 minutes, breaking a tackle in the corner to touchdown after a patient, multi-phased attack, and she was instrumental in Ireland s third try too. Wafer made a break, down the middle, and when she wasn t held in the tackle, just inside the Welsh half, she resumed her gallop.
Wales were penalised inside their 22 and with the whiff of blood in their nostrils O Brien kicked the penalty to the corner. The lineout maul worked and Neve Jones got the touchdown.
Ireland terrorised Wales in the lineout and their second try came from that source. Edel McMahon stole a Welsh throw inside the Irish half with a terrifically elastic jump and Ireland attacked from the turnover.
Aoibhean Reilly, who conducted the game from scrumhalf, flew through a gap in midfield and by the time Wales  scramble defence caught up with her Ireland were just five metres short of the Welsh line. Eve Higgins made the last surge to touch down near the posts.
Ireland led by 21-0 at half-timeIn the first couple of minutes of the second half. Ireland s teenage wing Kate Corrigan charged down an attempted clearance by Lleucu George and gathered the loose ball to score near the posts. O Brien, whose kicking from the hand and the tee was superb, added the conversion.
Ireland emptied their bench, and had no replacements left by the time Wafer had to leave the field with a few minutes to go. Prop Linda Djougang came off injured too, but in his post-match press conference Bernard didn t express any major concerns about their availability for Saturday s visit to Twickenham. Ireland will need everyone.
 We can t get too carried away with it,  said Bernard, who had been England s assistant coach for seven years before he took the Ireland job.  It s the next step.  It s great for the girls to be able to put a performance on   a winning performance.
The importance of that was lost on nobody.
IRELAND: L Delaney (Sale); K Corrigan (Leinster), E Higgins (Leinster), E Breen (Munster), B Parsons (Connacht); D O Brien (Leinster), A Reilly (Connacht); L Djougang (Leinster), N Jones (Gloucester-Hartpury), C Haney (Leinster); D Wall (Munster), S Monaghan (Gloucester-Hartpury); A Wafer (Leinster), E McMahon (Exeter Chiefs), B Hogan (Ulster). Replacements: F Tuite (Ulster) for Monaghan (49 mins); C Moloney (Exeter Chiefs) for Jones (51); M Scuffil McCabe (Leinster) for Reilly, A Dalton (Leinster) for Breen (both 55); S Ikahihifo (Ealing Trailfinders) for Hogan (58); S McGrath (Ulster) for Djougang, N O Dowd (Leinster) for Haney (both 63); N Fowley (Connacht) for McMahon (66). WALES: J Henketh; J Joyce, H Jones, K Lake, C Cox; L George, K Bevan; G Pyrs, C Philips, S Tuipulotu; A Fleming, G Evans; A Butchers, A Callender, B Lewis Replacements: N John for Butchers (28 mins); C Keight for Lake (35); S Jones for Bevan (51); M Reardon for Philips (52); D Rose for Tuipulotu, A Constable for Prys (both 57); G Hopkins for Fleming, K Powell for George (both 60). Referee: Sara Cox (RFU).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Irish exports to Israel worth over EUR 0.5bn; Trade versus geo-politics considerations should be dealt with by EU, says McGrath
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 510 words
Byline: MARIE O'HALLORAN
Body


MARIE O HALLORAN  Ireland exported more than half a billion euro worth of products to Israel last year and almost EUR 65 million in January alone this year, according to newly released information.
The largest valued group of goods was  chemicals and related products  which accounted for EUR 264.6 million last year and EUR 31.24 million in January this year.
This was followed by machinery and transport equipment worth almost EUR 185 million last year to Irish businesses and EUR 24.2 million in January. Food and live animal exports were the third most valuable category, worth EUR 31.93 million in 2023 and just over EUR 5 million in January.
Exports under a total of nine different categories also included  miscellaneous manufactured articles  (EUR 25.55 million in 2023 and EUR 1.94 million in January),  manufactured goods classified chiefly by material  (EUR 6.25 million and EUR 496,000 respectively), beverages and tobacco (EUR 3.1 million and EUR 350,000), mineral fuels and lubricants (EUR 3.058 million and EUR 222,000).
In total Irish businesses sold EUR 520.401 million in goods and products to Israel last year and EUR 63.75 million in January 2024.
There could be major implications for Irish businesses in the wake of the request for a review by the European Union of the trade association agreement between the EU and Israel and public demands for sanctions and that Ireland cut business ties with Israel, because of the war in Gaza.
Minister for Finance Michael McGrath said:  When it comes to international trade I think it s important that Ireland acts in concert with other countries.
On concern at the  impact on Irish businesses should trade sanctions be imposed on Israel, Mr McGrath said:  There is always a potential clash between the importance of trade and geopolitical considerations and that s why I think it s best dealt with at EU level.
He pointed out that the Ireland Strategic Investment Fund, which is operated by the National Treasury Management Agency, has divested itself of shareholdings worth just under EUR 3 million in six Israeli companies that have activities in the occupied Palestinian territories.
 Very important
Mr McGrath is establishing the long-term investment Future Ireland Fund and the Infrastructure, Climate and Nature Fund.  It will be very important for me in setting up the new funds to ensure that we have ESG [environmental, social and governance] considerations embedded in the investment strategy.
Taoiseach Simon Harris earlier this week met European Commission president Ursula von der Leyen and raised the issue of the request by his predecessor Leo Varadkar and Spanish prime minister Pedro Sánchez for a review of the EU-Israel Association Agreement, which governs trade relations between the bloc and Israel.
Mr McGrath said Mr Harris and Mr Sánchez planned to further discuss advancing that proposal  in Dublin last Friday.
Details of the level of exports from Ireland to Israel were released by the Taoiseach s department in response to a parliamentary question from Labour TD Seán Sherlock.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Irish firms seek to unlock China market at Hainan trade expo; Irish pavilion at key Chinese trade fair showcases food, drink and fashion
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 689 words
Body


In the middle of a vast, hangar-like space on a tropical island in the South China Sea on Saturday, stewards linked hands to control the crowd surrounding a replica Norman castle. This was the official opening of the Irish pavilion at the China International Consumer Products Expo in Haikou, where Ireland is guest of honour this year.
Painted a deep shade of green, the pavilion had a row of whiskey bars along one side and food producers led by Kerry on the other, with a couple of dozen other companies occupying stands in between.
Apart from food and drink, the pavilion showcased Irish healthcare, fashion and technology firms as well as State bodies such as Culture Ireland, Tourism Ireland, Bord Bia, the IDA and Enterprise Ireland.
 I suppose really what we d like is to meet buyers here and to make introductions, hopefully maybe start getting some small sample orders just to get your feet on the ground. I ve also got a lot to learn about the Chinese market,  said Sharon Hoey whose And Tate is one of the Irish fashion brands at the Expo.
Haikou is the capital of the island province of Hainan, which China is developing as a free trade port with generous tax breaks for business and more flexible regulations. The city is also home to the biggest duty-free mall in the world and Hainan s duty free shopping was of particular interest to Tom Keightley from St Patrick s Distillery in Cork.
 A lot of the business won t be done at the show. It s the introductions that are done at the show,  he said.
 When the show is over, we ll go and visit the people that we know that are genuine, that we feel that we can do business with, and we ll spend a day or maybe two days with them. And even if we only get three or four clients out of the show, it would be really good for the business.
New suppliers
Finbarr Cleary has been doing business in China for many years, but he was hoping to meet new suppliers for Shamrock GreenTech, a green technology company. He said that, for products such as solar panels, inverters, EV chargers, heat pumps and air pumps, China now beats most competitors for quality as well as price.
 China is not cheap any more, but China s quality has increased 200 per cent or 300 per cent. They have brought up the quality of the standard for export so that that they re able to compete on quality, and price-wise they re still able to compete,  he said.
Wen Chen from the Ireland China Science and Technology Association said the Expo gave Ireland an opportunity to build on its position as a hub for Chinese technology companies in Europe.
 The Irish people and the Irish Government, they are friendly, especially friendly with the Chinese. Secondly, Ireland is traditionally strong in ICT, pharmaceuticals, data centres, and also recently the AI cloud computing sectors that attract the high tech companies,  he said.
Tim Crowe first worked in China many years ago when he set up a supply chain for Dell to build desktop computers to sell to Europe and the United States. It was the experience of seeing the problems that arose in factories that inspired him and others to set up the software company WrxFlo.
 We give a real-time view of the entire supply chain and we make it work really efficiently and maximise the value from that,  he said.
Crowe opened a Beijing office for WrxFlo last week and he sees big opportunities in China to provide services to Chinese companies, but also to bring innovative technology back to Europe. He was one of a number of exhibitors at the Expo who identified the introduction of visa-free access for Irish visitors to China as an important step, but he believes that opening the office in Beijing is an essential move for his company.
 If I was in China and I was looking to an Irish company that was putting a presence in here, you re very far away. How are you going to support me? How are you going to implement your solutions? That s why we re putting in the office. We build a team here so that the businesses that we work with know that they can go to the local team and be supported here. I think that s really important if we re going to win new business,  he said.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Israel woke up yesterday morning and breathed a huge, collective sigh of relief; The most advanced missile defence system in the world managed to intercept hundreds of incoming projectiles
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 494 words
Body


Late on Saturday night, the first reports came in that the Iranian attack was under way. Hundreds of projectiles were already in the air and within a few hours would begin to enter Israeli airspace.
The shadow war between Israel and Iran, which has shaped the entire Middle East over the last few decades, was over.
The conflict was no longer between Israel and a host of Iranian proxies: it was now a direct, and potentially deadly, confrontation between the region s two biggest powers.
Just before 2am yesterday morning, residents of Jerusalem were woken up by a series of loud explosions in the sky   the sound of intercepts.
It sounded like it was above our heads, but it may well have been in Jordanian airspace, some 30km to the east.
We rushed to the collective bomb shelter, shared by all the residents of our residential apartment building.
Gallows humour
Betty, a 100-year-old Holocaust survivor from the Netherlands, told me on the way down the stairs:  I ve got a lot of things to say about this, but I ll have to speak Dutch.  Gallows humour, during  the mad dash to the bomb shelter.
Not surprisingly, Betty, accompanied by her daughter, was the last to enter the bomb shelter. As we closed the door she announced to the other neighbours:  Don t worry, I survived the war-time bombing in Holland. It was much worse than this.
We returned to our homes, following civil defence instructions, after the mandatory 10-minute wait, but, fearing the worst, we all thought we would be back and would maybe have to spend the entire night, if not the days ahead, in the shelter.
The reality was something entirely different.
Israel s layers of missile defence, the most advanced in the world, and Israeli planes, assisted by jets from western allies and Jordan, managed to intercept hundreds of incoming attack drones, cruise missiles and ballistic missiles   many of them hundreds of kilometers from Israel s border.
Ninety-nine per cent of the projectiles were successfully intercepted.
One nine-year-old Bedouin girl, hit by falling debris in the desert in the south of the country, is fighting for her life, but she was the only significant casualty.
One air force base suffered relatively minor damage.
Israel woke up yesterday morning and breathed a huge, collective, sigh of relief.
Miracle was the most overused word, and not only by the religiously observant.
Airspace reopened
By 7.30am, Israeli airspace was reopened, although most foreign carriers have still not resumed flights, and residents were informed that they no longer had to stay close to a bomb shelter.
It might be only the latest chapter of the never-ending conflict and the Gaza war drags on with 133 hostages in Hamas captivity for more than six months.
And, an even bigger conflict still looms on Israel s northern border if Hizbullah fighters are not removed from the south Lebanese border zone.
But, despite this, the night  of April 13th, will be remembered as one of Israel s finest hours.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Liverpool's title bid derailed by Eze's winner; Reds blow a host of chances at Anfield as Palace put major dent in trophy hopes
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 7
Length: 477 words
Body


The immediate reaction to the final whistle painted the picture of a truly damaging week for Liverpool. Jürgen Klopp hugged a victorious Crystal Palace manager, Oliver Glasner, before puffing out his cheeks and shaking his head. Andy Robertson sank to his haunches and stared into the middle distance disconsolately. Liverpool fans filed out without a sound. Their team has faltered badly in the title race.
Soundly beaten in the first leg of the Europa League quarter-finals by Atalanta on Thursday, Liverpool succumbed again on home soil as Eberechi Eze s early goal gave Palace a deserved victory and huge lift in their bid to pull clear of relegation trouble.
Anfield paid a moving tribute before kick-off to the 97 Liverpool supporters who were unlawfully killed at Hillsborough. After a stirring rendition of You ll Never Walk Alone on the eve of the 35th anniversary of the disaster there was a minute s silence in memory of the victims and a  97? mosaic appeared on the Kop.
Klopp had promised a reaction to the shock Europa League defeat by Atalanta. Instead, Liverpool served up more of the same throughout a poor first-half display. The malaise even afflicted Alisson, and he was making his first start since injuring a hamstring against Arsenal in February. Palace prospered from the lapses and were full value for an interval lead that could and should have been greater.
The visitors, their performance elevated by the supremely gifted duo of Michael Olise and Eberechi Eze, cut through Liverpool at will and had particular joy down their left against Conor Bradley and Ibrahima Konaté. Klopp s team failed to heed the warning signs and were carved open by a flowing Palace passing move involving Adam Wharton, Olise and Tyrick Mitchell.
Precise finish The defender pulled the ball back from the byline, through the legs of Wataru Endo, for Eze to slot a precise finish beyond Liverpool s recalled first-choice goalkeeper. Konaté and Virgil van Dijk were both slow to react to the danger, leaving Eze completely unmarked in front of goal. It was the fourth time in the last five Premier League home games that Liverpool had conceded first. They have won a remarkable 27 points from losing positions this season, and were in familiar unwanted territory again. Palace should have had a second before Liverpool cleared their heads.
 A moment that encapsulated Liverpool s first-half performance arrived in the 45th minute. Díaz did brilliantly to spin away from two Palace players and find Alexis Mac Allister via a nutmeg on Mateta. The World Cup-winning midfielder turned, spotted Bradley advancing down the right and miscued the pass straight out of play.
 Liverpool improved immeasurably after half-time, but bad luck and bad finishing only increased Anfield s torment. They were also guilty of scarcely believable misses, and several of them.   Guardian

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Lowry licks his wounds and moves on from Augusta; Final round pairing with Mickelson can't make up for Offaly man's disappointing time
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 10
Length: 512 words
Body


At least Shane Lowry got to see Phil Mickelson s escapology up-close and personal, for the Masters itself   from his perspective   proved to be a disappointing and frustrating experience where it took until the 14th hole of a final round 74 for eight-over-par 296 before he could allow a smile to cross his face.
 I love playing golf with Phil. He hit some shots that I m kind of right there enjoying as a spectator more than anything else. When I saw the draw, I was excited to go out and play a Masters Sunday with him. He lived up to his name. He hit some unbelievable shots,  remarked Lowry of playing with Phil the Thrill.
On a more serious footnote, though, Lowry s grand expectations of adding a second career Major to his Curriculum Vitae   to go with his Claret Jug of 2019   were undone in the opening two rounds and, in a case of better late than never, there was better feel with the putter in hand on the homeward run as he moves on to a favoured place at Hilton Head for this week s RBS Heritage, a signature event on the PGA Tour.
 I played all right golf throughout the week, just made a lot of bogeys, a lot of bogeys. No big mistakes, nothing disastrous. Just a lot of bogeys,  lamented Lowry. He was right: 19 bogeys proved to be too heavy a load to carry, while he also had no fewer than six three-putts in the tournament.  I just didn t really hole my par putts when I needed to. When you do that early on around this course, you get behind the black ball, and it was just tough. I took it on the chin the past few days that I wasn t going to contend and I was just doing my best to finish as high up the leaderboard as I could . . . went out, I tried, I failed and I will be back again!
Lowry will lick his wounds and move on, with this week s tour stop at Hilton Head bringing the additional benefits of sharing a house with Tommy Fleetwood s family so that his mind can be rested before going again.  It s over now. I m going to go back to the drawing board and see what I can do next week,  he said.
Indeed, Lowry s scheduling will mean he follows the Augusta National with Hilton Head   where he was third in 2022   followed by a novel two-man team event with Rory McIlroy in the Zurich Classic in New Orleans. Then there is a break before heading to Valhalla for the US PGA Championship, the second Major of the year.
 I m getting to a stage now in my career that I m going back to Major venues that I already know, so I feel like I m getting old. But that s nice, going back to Valhalla this year and back to Pinehurst [for the US Open], back to Troon [for the Open], so that s nice, and all the golf courses.
 Obviously, Masters week, you put a lot of pressure on yourself, it means a lot. But they all mean a lot, to be honest. Every tournament means a lot out here on tour. I think for me this week is probably the most special week of the year. Disappointed not to give it a decent run this year. Yeah, hopefully, I have a few more years left of giving it a run out here.
And more chances, only in the Majors these days, to play with Phil the Thrill.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Mannion in sparkling form as Dublin cruise to victory over Meath; O'Rourke's side gave in plenty in first half but a controversial opening goal for Seán Bugler was turning point
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 5
Length: 978 words
Body


A leisurely enough pipe-opener for Dublin in the end. They soaked up a bit of early chutzpah from Meath and eventually found their stride to run up the usual double-digit victory. You d say it drove another nail into the coffin of the Leinster Championship, except that the coffin ran out of nail space a long time ago.
 The Leinster Championship is a shambles,  said Colm O Rourke afterwards.  But that s not Dublin s fault. I suppose it s the fault of teams like Meath who haven t been competitive for a long, long time. To me, anyway, the obvious thing is the Leinster Championship should be played before the league. It s absolutely ridiculous that teams in the league are waiting, waiting, waiting and don t know what competition they are going to be playing in or when they will be playing.
 If the provincial championships were over, everyone would know exactly before they start the league, particularly those teams in the second and third division, what they had to do to ensure they play in the Sam Maguire. It s very unsatisfactory, the present system.
All of which is fine and true and old, old news. In the here and now, Meath gave it plenty but were outclassed by a Dublin team that wasn t firing on anything like the form they showed in the league final a fortnight ago. As O Rourke pointed out, Dublin had players who have more All-Ireland medals than some of his squad have championship appearances. The longer this went on, the more it told.
Still, they came out and had a go in the early exchanges. Far too often over the current reign of terror, they ve come to Croke Park and been beaten before the anthem ended. Here, they shied away from nothing and pressed up on Dublin without worrying about the consequences. It worked too   they won six out of 10 of Stephen Cluxton s first-half kick-outs.
Shanked it short  Cluxton was appearing for his first game of 2024 and looked every bit of it. Apart from the rust in his kick-outs, he came up for one first-half free and shanked it short and wide. It s 23 years since he made his championship debut   nobody has done more to earn the leeway of a creaking first day back.
As ever, Dublin had plenty of back-up to see him through it. Paul Mannion was in sparkling form at corner forward, landing one trademark skyscraper from out on the right and chipping in with his quota of frees as well. Mick Fitzsimons was making his first appearance of the year too and he was in full octopus mode every time Jordan Morris got on the ball. Colm Basquel was snappy and clinical in attack.
But the crucial moment of the first half was the Dublin goal. Meath had every reason to feel aggrieved about it   Bugler should have been called back for overcarrying as he bumped and dodgemed through to bury the ball into the roof of the Hill 16 net on 19 minutes.
Bugler was definitely fouled on his journey but referee Thomas Murphy neither blew for it nor raised his hand for an advantage. Instead, he looked on as Bugler gave it the AA treatment, taking all 12 steps on his way to finishing high past Billy Hogan. Later on, Murphy called a free against Meath sub Cian McBride for overcarrying after taking a mark. To fixate on such a venial sin while ignoring a game-changing mortal one seemed an odd choice.
In any case, Bugler s goal sent Dublin into a 1-3 to 0-3 lead, turning what had been a keenly-contested opening into more familiar Leinster Championship fare. Mannion raked in a couple of handy points as Meath tried to gather themselves and in the space of three minutes the Dubs were five ahead.
Meath kept at it, for a while. Eoghan Frayne and Morris both applied lovely finishes to energetic passing moves from O Rourke s side and you could see that they were adamant that they had come to play. But Dublin s cushion meant they could survive the odd errant kick-out and fluffed chance   Basquel and O Callaghan both found their range before the break and Dublin went in 1-9 to 0-6 to the good.
Dessie Farrell s side evidently used the half-time break to tighten the screws. They savaged the Meath kick-out in the third quarter   winning four of the first five   and though they weren t able to convert those specific possessions into scores immediately, the pressure told all the same. Niall Scully swished a mark, John Small got forward for a smart left-footed score. When Ciarán Kilkenny nabbed his second of the day on 42 minutes, Dublin s lead was out to seven.
It was shooting practice from there on out, really. Farrell ran his bench and got game-time into James McCarthy after a couple of months of rest. Cormac Costello and Paddy Small both came on and sniped a point and Mannion capped a fine display with a poacher s finish just short of the hour mark. It was all a done deal long before O Callaghan slid a goal to an empty net in injury-time.
Dublin roll on, then. Meath will fancy annoying somebody in the All-Ireland series though.
DUBLIN: Stephen Cluxton; Seán McMahon, Cian Murphy (0-1), Eoin Murchan; Brian Howard, John Small (0-2), Mick Fitzsimons; Tom Lahiff, Ciarán Kilkenny (0-2); Ross McGarry, Seán Bugler (1-1), Niall Scully (0-1, mark); Paul Mannion (1-6, 0-4f), Con O Callaghan (1-2, 0-1m), Colm Basquel (0-2). Subs: James McCarthy for Basquel (50 mins); Paddy Small (0-1) for Scully (52); Killian McGinnis for Mannion, Cormac Costello (0-1) for McGarry (61); Peadar Ó Cofaigh Byrne for J Small (66). MEATH: Billy Hogan (0-1, free); Donal Keogan, Adam O Neill, Harry O Higgins; Ciarán Caulfield (0-1), Ross Ryan, Seán Coffey; Ronan Jones (0-1, mark), Daithí McGowan; Darragh Campion (0-1), Eoghan Frayne (0-3, two frees), Cathal Hickey; Jordan Morris (0-3), Mathew Costello (0-1, free), James Conlon (0-1). Subs: Jack O Connor for Campion, (h-t); Cian McBride for McGowan (46 mins); Ruairí Kinsella for Ryan, Keith Curtis for Morris (58); Aaron Lynch for Conlon (62). Referee: Thomas Murphy (Galway).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Martin promises big   keeping kids offline; Party faithful wanted to get on with conference without having to talk about Harris
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 1264 words
Body


Fianna Fáil s finest showed commendable patience in the face of intolerable intrusion from an unwanted guest.
The new Taoiseach wasn t there in person, but his inescapable presence bugged the life out of his Government partners who wanted to get on with their annual conference without having to talk about him all the time.
They kept the eye-rolling to a minimum but ministerial resolve was sorely tested.
Why?
Because for 24 hours they were living next door to Harris.
Harris. Harris?
Who the feck is Harris?
Wait a minute. This was supposed to be Fianna Fáil s occasion. Their turn to make the flashy promises and showcase new policies. Their turn to talk big and talk about themselves. Instead they ended up fielding countless questions about how and if they can deliver on big undertakings pledged by the leader of Fine Gael at his party s corresponding political jamboree.
But all s fair in love, war and impending elections, as will become increasingly clear in the months to come.
Taoiseach Simon Harris enjoyed his first ardfheis without any interference from his main Coalition partner. He showed his gratitude by cornering all the best promises for the Blueshirts and leaving the Soldiers of Destiny to explain them at their ardfheis a week later.
Harris promised big across the board during his keynote address in Galway. But it was mainly Minister for Housing Darragh O Brien and Minister for Finance Michael McGrath who wound up dealing with the aftermath. Michael must have been looking forward to the weekend gathering in the new Royal Convention Centre in the heart of medieval Dublin. With elections on the horizon, he was in the happy position of being able to drop some nice, heavy hints about tax cuts.
He had a perfect word to dangle in front of the voting public:  substantial .
And when he wanted to switch things up he had another tantalising word:  significant .
Say no more, Michael.
Fianna Fáil s Minister for Finance will be opening the purse strings in September. Happy days.
Then Simon Harris declares that no worker on or below 50 grand a year should pay the higher rate of income tax. Immediate grounds for a demarcation dispute there.
McGrath s hopes of playing a pleasant game of Give Us a Clue over the finer details of his giveaway election budget were dashed. Instead, he was plunged into a game of Simon Says, forced to react to the Fine Gael leader s pronouncements while not saying anything negative about him.
The same went for Darragh O Brien, who has been pumping out stats about new home starts, enhanced allowances and expedited building programmes at a ferocious rate.
Then Simon Harris takes to the podium and wrecks his buzz by promising 50,000 homes a year over five years.
Simon says 250,000 homes.
How are you going to achieve that, Darragh?
The Minister for Housing remained calm as he politely poured cold water over what Simon said.
One exasperated reporter cut to the chase.  Minister, are you pissed off with the Taoiseach? He s now coming on to your territory. He s become the leader of Fine Gael and he s come in and said,  Actually I don t think what they re doing in housing is good enough. I want 250,000 homes.
The Minister wrapped himself in encouraging stats and overlooked the question. For this was a Fianna Fáil event and it was going be a feel-good experience despite the unwelcome encroachments.
Boot camps
With the local and European elections due in June, photographs and the right way to put them in to election literature was among the hot topics at the campaign boot camp for budding politicians. European election candidates were gearing up for the battle ahead with their branded merchandise and leaflets and stickers.
Billy Kelleher pen, anyone? What about a Barry Cowen cotton bag with Barry s face on it for going down the shops?
Barrister and first-time candidate Cynthia Ní Mhurchú, contesting the Ireland South Constituency along with sitting MEP Kelleher, was a very visible presence among delegates on Saturday. The former broadcaster   she co-presented the Eurovision Song Contest with Gerry Ryan when Riverdance was the interval act   was never far from a camera.
A lively cohort of Ógra Fianna Fáil members went some way towards tipping the age scale slightly out of the grey zone. Many retired politicians attended. One approached a veteran journalist to say he would, for the sake of accuracy, supply any details needed for his obituary.
A few lads in tight trousers and short jackets wandered around during the afternoon holding pints of stout, but their self-conscious presence only served to underline how orderly and well-behaved these events are now.
During the build-up to the leader s speech, the atmosphere crackled with the pulsating electricity of a power cut. Fianna Fáil general secretary Seán Dorgan was MC for the evening.
He s no Mairéad McGuinness.
There were video inserts of election candidates in what seemed like a promo for An Post, what with the leaflets and repeated claims of  Delivering for Ireland, Delivering for You .
Everybody wanted to know the identity of the warm-up act. It was MEP Barry Andrews.
Barry reminded his gently snoozing audience that he is from Fianna Fáil royalty. His grandfather was part of the struggle for independence and his grandmother spent a year in Kilmainham jail for her activities with Cumman na mBan. They were founder-members of the party. His father was one of the signatories of the Belfast Agreement and he was delighted to say that his father and mother were in the hall. (But not his cousin Chris, the Sinn Féin TD.)
Anticipation
 Whether it s the 1920s or the 2020s, Fianna Fáil delivers on the areas that count,  said Barry, whipping the faithful into a custard of anticipation as he came to the end of his warm-down. Micheál Martin may have been an excellent taoiseach  but we know it was only his first term. To borrow a phrase, he has a lot done and there s more to do.
The Tánaiste bustled in to cheers, thunderous applause and a heroic input from the lads gadding around earlier with the pints. The blood was up and he tore into his script. They should have given him a blast of Elton John s I m Still Standing when he entered because, clearly, Micheál is still passionate about the job of politics and government.
In a speech highlighting the Coalition s achievements, he further stoked expectation of a big-spending election budget. And now the race is on between Fianna Fáil and Fine Gael to claim responsibility for the best bits.
To nobody s surprise, Micheál remembered that the 20th anniversary of the smoking ban is upon us   his finest hour. It was the thing to do then, he said, but now parents are coming to him with a different concern.
Vaping?
No. The Tánaiste has embarked on a timely new crusade to tackle  the new public health crisis of our time   the impact on children of social media and being constantly online . His vow to take on the social media companies went down well with delegates. If Micheál can make headway with this initiative, it will be a popular move with parents.
It was a good, solid speech but the atmosphere in the hall fell short.
Local Senator Catherine Ardagh was given the honour of leading the celebratory gallop on to the platform, quickly followed by Lisa Chambers, Mary Butler and James Lawless. But newcomer Ní Mhurchú made a spirited dash from behind, shimmying around the lectern and muscling past the opposition. She grabbed Micheál, gave him a peck on the cheek and a big hug before moving centre stage to punch the air with both fists and holler at the crowd.
She s one to watch.
You won t be able miss her.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Meath hit with yet another bout of capital punishment; No room for romance in the championship as a few hammerings are handed out
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 1
Length: 547 words
Body


 I m surprised anybody stayed,  cracked Colm O Rourke as he walked in to meet the press after his Meath team had taken another Leinster  Championship hammering from Dublin.
Goals from Seán Bugler, Con O Callaghan and the excellent Paul Mannion put clear water between the perennial championship winners and O Rourke s up-and-comers. On a day when all but one of the provincial matches ended in a double-digit hammering, there was no space on the schedule for romance.
 They are an ambitious group,  O Rourke said of his charges after they went down to a 3-19 to 0-12 defeat.  They want to get to the level. It was a stark reality check for them to see how far they have to go, just in case anyone was losing the run of themselves.
 We haven t closed the gap on Dublin at all. But these players are ambitious and they are willing to work hard and, as I keep saying, a lot of them are very young and lacking experience.
 There is no quick fix on Meath football. It is not as if we have been dominating   and I have made the point before   at under-20 or 21 level. We haven t been in a final for 20-something years, or a senior club final in Leinster in over 20 years. It s not as if we have this vast pool of highly qualified winners out there that we can just draft in to the team.
 We have set ourselves on a course of action on a team that we knew was not going to be properly competitive in the short-term, but in the belief that within two to five years that this group will form the backbone of the Meath team for a continuous period of time and they would be a lot better then.
For Dublin, the best part of the day was probably getting Stephen Cluxton, Mick Fitzsimons and James McCarthy back into the mix. They had to claw and scratch for a while in the first half but eventually found their rhythm after the break.
 Look, it s a win and it s the Leinster championship so it s good to get up and running,  said Dessie Farrell.  I thought we performed patchy, which would be the best way to describe it. There were some decent spells and some poor spells so my initial reaction is that it was a mixed bag overall.
Earlier, Kildare escaped by the tightest of margins against Wicklow in Portlaoise, just about scraping through on a scoreline of 0-16 to 1-12. An injury-time penalty by Oisín McGraynor drew Wicklow level and they could have won it when wing back Matt Nolan had an open goal to shoot at from 45 metres out soon after. But his hurried shot bounced wide and Kildare were able to come up the other end of the pitch to steal the win through a Jack Sargent score.
 I wasn t actually sure,  said Wicklow manager Oisín McConville,  because it s a terrible angle to see a game from, but we had an opportunity like that against Down and we carried the ball and we butchered it. So we said the next time we have the opportunity, we ll all take responsibility for that one, it s not just one player. It s something we had looked at, that if we turned the ball over would we have a go, and we decided we would.
 It s gutting, it s very difficult to know what to say to players, it was a good performance, it s probably as well as we have played.
Elsewhere in Leinster, Louth ran in four goals to easily dispose of Wexford. And in Ulster, Armagh were 3-11 to 0-9 winners over Fermanagh.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Modest Byrne kicks on and lays a few ghosts to rest
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 3
Length: 502 words
Byline: GERRY THORNLEY
Body


GERRY THORNLEY
Rugby Correspondent
 Leinster s Ross Byrne wouldn t have been alone in his desire to lay a few ghosts to rest almost 11 months on from last May s heartbreaking final against La Rochelle.
As much as anyone, he did so with a polished all-round performance which resolved any lingering debate about who should be the boss at the helm.
Byrne pulled the strings confidently, opting when to launch targets flat to the line or picking when to pull the trigger.
His delayed pass for Josh van der Flier s carry in the build-up to putting width on the ball for Dan Sheehan s try was a case in point, so too when taking Caelan Doris s pullback and popping the ball virtually one-handed in setting up James Lowe for the breakthrough score.
 I was just trying to get it out of my hands without getting melted,  he maintained afterwards with both typical modesty and dryness, having been  melted  a couple of phases previously.
 It s just trying to do my job, which is trying to navigate the team around the pitch. Just get back in and do my job as best you can. You probably don t have too much time to think. You just trust your instinct and, hopefully, it comes off.
Leinster sprinted out of the blocks with three tries inside the first dozen minutes last May, all scored in the right corner, and Byrne narrowly missed two of the three touchline conversions.
Here, despite the swirling breeze, he landed three first-half penalties from a Byrne triangle circa 46/47m out to the left of the posts and also his first three conversions, including two from each touchline, for a 15-point haul.
 They re very important moments. It was pretty tricky all right. We were warming up into the other end and they were all over the place. It s pretty swirly in the Aviva. Thankfully they went over today.
His one miss, also from the touchline, rebounded from the upright, which   you d have thought   must also be one of his best days off the tee.
 No, I still missed one,  Byrne maintained, and although it was said with a smile, ever since he was a youngster he s always been a perfectionist about his goal-kicking.
Heights
Now he, and Leinster, need to again scale the heights of this quarter-final in three weeks.  We re going to have to if we want to win. Northampton, everyone s seeing what they re doing. We re going to have to be at our best.
While Leinster will forfeit familiarity with the Aviva, a semi-final at such an iconic stadium as Croke Park could be inspiring as well.
 It s pretty special . Hopefully we can get an incredible crowd and hopefully it s another special day,  said Byrne, who wasn t at the 2009 semi-final when Leinster beat Munster, although he was at the final in Murrayfield when the win over Leicester secured the first of their four Champions Cups.
He s been there supporting Dublin.
  I go to a few Dublin games. It s probably one of the premier stadiums in Europe.
Ever stood on the Hill?
 I was never in the Hill, no,  he said, smiling before he added, self-mockingly:  Prawn sandwich brigade.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Modi enjoys unprecedented popularity
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 506 words
Body


Sir,   Further to  The Irish Times view on the Indian election: Modi tightens his grip  (April 11th), Indian prime minister Narendra Modi enjoys unprecedented popularity and profile not only in India but globally because of his impeccable personal character and integrity and thought-leadership on innovative, inclusive governance and sustainable development. As he does not belong to any elite political family, his personal life inspires millions of ordinary people in India and other developing countries. Mr Modi has implemented a paradigm change in the ethos of development focused on empowerment and welfare of the poorest, including youth (making India the third largest hub of start-ups and unicorn companies), women (significantly improving gender-ratio and expanding their economic participation, including, inter alia, through 33 per cent reservation in parliament) and the poor (uplifting 250 million out of poverty). The people of India are excited to witness the vibrancy of democracy in action on the ground.
The fight against the deeply entrenched ecosystem of corruption (created by the 55-year rule, including first 30 years, by a single dynastic party in India) is a major factor behind Mr Modi s ever-growing popularity. There is huge sense of relief at the grass-root level to witness action being taken and recoveries made from the rich and powerful elites who operated with a sense of entitlement of impunity. The anti-corruption drive itself is so successful because the government has given free hand to the relevant agencies (their appointment, constitution and operating procedures are quite similar to the corresponding Irish/British agencies), and the adoption of innovative technology to facilitate detection of the nefarious, multilayered web of corruption and tax evasion by politicians, NGOs, and media. All cases of corruption are pursued strictly as per the established procedure, with availability of usual judicial remedies to the affected parties. India also, like the US, Ireland and other European Union countries, does not have a separate tax code or judicial process for journalists, human rights activists and politically influential individuals, nor there is any provision of special immunity to them during elections.
A stereotypical description of India as  80 per cent Hindu majority  nation is quite misleading because Hinduism is inherently inclusive and fundamentally pluralistic, for centuries preceding the birth of Buddha or Christ. Numerically, Hindus of India outnumber the entire population of European Union and the North America, and obviously do not represent a monolithic vote bank. Hindus of India possess incredible diversity of thought, ways of life and political beliefs, covering the entire spectrum from extreme left to extreme right. They regularly vote to power non- Hindu nationalists . Even now Mr Modi s BJP rules only in 12 out of 28 states of India. This can happen only in  Hindu majority  India.   Yours, etc,
AKHILESH MISHRA,
Ambassador of India
to Ireland,
Dublin 4.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Mother gets barring order against son; Woman tells court she believes son will kill her and lives in a constant state of fear
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 626 words
Byline: MARY CAROLAN
Body


MARY CAROLAN Legal Affairs Correspondent  A mother who said she locks herself into her bedroom because she is  terrified  of her adult son, a drug addict with a serious psychiatric illness, has obtained a barring order against him.
She said her son, who previously served a prison term, is threatening and abusive to her and drug dealers are coming to her home threatening her over his debts. She fears he  will kill me or someone will burn the house down , she said.  I can t take it any more, I am in a constant state of fear. Even the dog is afraid of him.
This situation was going on for years, her son appeared  a bit more normal  while in prison but  it all started again  when he got out, she said.
She obtained an interim barring order earlier this month but her son came to her house in recent days and smashed glass in a door trying to get in, she said. She locked herself into the house and called the Garda.
Judge Gerard Furlong, sitting on Thursday at the emergency domestic violence court in Dolphin House, Dublin, said he would grant a three-year barring order and recommend the man seek treatment.
Aged in her 60s, the woman was one of four parents, two mothers and two fathers, who separately got barring or protection orders against their adult children at the court sitting.
In one of those applications, a separated man living with his elderly mother, got an interim barring order against his adult son.
Slashed
His son has threatened to kill him and his mother, to burn her house down and smash the windows, has slashed the tyres of his car and keeps coming around to the house, he said. His son had told him he  wants my head on a stick and will get his gun and blow me away , he said.
He does not know if his son has a gun, he told the judge, and suspects he may have an addiction to tablets.
In a different application, a man obtained a protection order against his wife whom he said has been a  compulsive gambler  over years who becomes  hostile and threatening  when she loses money at gambling. His wife has  spells  where she can be out of the house for two or three days gambling and, when she wins, she gives him and the children some money and uses the rest to gamble again, he said.
If she loses, she threatens him for money and has used a knife and hammer in such threats, he said. If he refuses, she smashes furniture or objects in the house and has recently become  very hostile  at home, he said. She stole money from their teenage daughter and he called gardaí to deal with a recent incident in the house, he said.
Alcohol addiction
Judge Furlong said he was concerned the situation was spilling over to affect a young child and would grant a protection order.
 When he said the order would not address the gambling problem, the man said he understood but hoped the making of the order would lead to his wife addressing her problem.
In another case, a young man with alcohol addiction issues told the judge he was consenting to a safety order sought by his former partner.  I would like for you to give her a safety order, there s no need for a hearing,  he said.
The woman, a mother of young children, said the man is an alcoholic who had made threats against her and she feared for herself and the children because of his history of violent and unpredictable behaviour.
He served a prison term for assault on a former partner and can be  volatile , she said.
He had turned up sober, she said, and she did not object to him being in court for her application.
Describing the situation as  most unusual , the judge explained any breach of the order would result in the man s arrest and possible criminal proceedings. The man said he understood and wished to consent to the order.
As the woman left the witness box, the man hugged her.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Mullins eyes first British trainers' title after Aintree triumph; Irish champion trainer a 1-2 favourite to beat Nicholls and Skelton when season ends on Saturday week
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 778 words
Body


I Am Maximus did prove to be greatest in Saturday s Randox Aintree Grand National and he has set up his trainer Willie Mullins for what could prove to be the Irishman s ultimate annus mirabilis.
Considering how Mullins has transformed the face of National Hunting racing over the last decade, it s a seriously high bar. But a first British trainers  title when the cross-channel season ends at Sandown on Saturday week will mean the sport s dominant figure scales it in style.
Not since Vincent O Brien all of 70 years ago has an Irish-based trainer landed the British trainers  championship.
Mullins had a good go in 2016 only to come up short of Paul Nicholls on the final day. But after Saturday s National he stood proudly on top of the table with I Am Maximus s half-million pounds first prize boosting his sterling prize money haul for the season to £2,874,693 (just over EUR 3.3 million).
Bookmaker reaction was to make him a 1-2 favourite to maintain his narrow lead over both Dan Skelton and Paul Nicholls for the next fortnight, although it might mean pitching up in some unlikely places.
 We ll have to give it a good go so we might see you at Sandown, Perth, Ayr, or anywhere else!  joked Mullins.  I d love to win the championship. Vincent O Brien has done it in the 1950s and it is something different to do.
 As much as I d like to win it, my owners would like me to win it and so would my staff, so now we re in this position you have to have a real go.
 JP McManus [owner of I Am Maximus] has been telling me for the past couple of years to have a real go. But I always think just mind yourself at home rather than spread yourself too thin and leave yourself wide open to have a bad season at home.
 Travelling horses takes it out of them, especially early in the season, which is why we don t do it. But it s panned out well today,  he added.
Sure enough, the final leg of  National  season takes place in Scotland this Saturday and the Coral Scottish National sponsors have cut Mullins s MacDermott to 6-1 favouritism in anticipation of a rare raid across the North Channel to Ayr.
There are also a handful of entries from Closutton still in the valuable Scottish Champion Hurdle ahead of Monday s latest acceptance stage.
Before that, though, there are a couple of Mullins entries, Karia Des Blaises and Miss Manzor, on more familiar ground at Cheltenham on Thursday.
It could ultimately come down to the final weekend s centrepiece in Sandown where Mullins currently has 13 options for the bet365 Gold Cup, including the beaten Irish National favourite Nick Rockett.
With an 18th Irish title long since assured, the desire to pull of the championship double could mean an impact on plans for the Punchestown festival which starts three days after Sandown, with stars such as El Fabiolo perhaps being rerouted.
Exceptional campaign
That such a rare accomplishment is required to make it an exceptional campaign for Mullins underlines his persistent and overarching influence.
Along with his jockey Paul Townend, Mullins pulled off jump racing s unofficial Triple Crown on Saturday, I Am Maximus scoring on the back of Galopin Des Champs in the Gold Cup and State Man in the Champion Hurdle at Cheltenham last month.
Only for the long odds-on El Fabiolo fluffing his lines when pulled up in the Champion Chase, it could have been a repeat of the sport s Grand Slam, memorably accomplished by Henry de Bromhead in 2021.
If Nicholls and Skelton face having the Irishman on their own patch to an uncomfortable extent over the coming days, then Gordon Elliott can advise them on what to expect.
The Co Meath trainer described his rival as a  thorn in my side  having saddled the second and fourth, Delta Work and Galvin, in his efforts to win a record-equalling fourth National.
It may be an unwanted compliment, but Mullins has credited Elliott s annual attempts to dethrone him as champion trainer in Ireland with expansion into the greatest winning machine the sport has seen.
Elliott landed a Grade One double of his own on Saturday with Found A Fifty and Brigherdaysahead. It brought his top-flight haul for the season so far to 11. More National glory eluded him, however.
 It just didn t happen for us. No one remembers second, I don t anyway. Delta Work was awesome and Galvin is a warrior, I m so proud of him and I m so lucky with the horses I have.
 Delta Work was flying come here and I thought this was his year. He ran his race and just got beat by a better horse, that s it. The winner is exceptional, and Willie Mullins remains a thorn in my side!  he said.
Messrs Nicholls and Skelton are set to find out with a vengeance just how thorny a scenario that can be.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



My friend Donie   king of audacious overseas GAA start-ups
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 10
Length: 967 words
Body


You think you know somebody.
A few days after the death of Donie McCarthy, our clubmate and friend, a tribute appeared in the Irish Star newspaper in the US. In the piece Donie was remembered as the man who brought hurling to Atlanta and the American South, a vast wilderness on hurling s globe.
The other dreamer in this scheme was Kieran Claffey. They watched the 2001 All-Ireland hurling final together in the Fadó Irish bar in Atlanta and resolved to start a team. You can imagine the scene and the pints and the humour that came over them. You have made promises in that mood too. How many have you kept?
Claffey had tried to foster hurling once before, a few years earlier, but the seed died in the soil and no other attempt was made until Donie agreed to coach the team. For their first training session, in October 2001, 40 enthusiasts turned up, a mixum-gatherum of lapsed hurlers, novices and daredevils.
Many of them, according to Claffey, had never held a hurley before; some of them, he says, had never seen a hurling match. Standing in the middle, Donie was both arsonist and fireman.
 That first 20-minute game had players recklessly swinging hurleys and holding hurls the wrong way,  said Claffey.  It was dangerous, but Donal took control. At the end of training Donal said to me,  We have our work cut out, boy   that was like something out of Braveheart.
When they eventually fashioned a team, the nearest opposition was 900 miles away. Their first game was against Milwaukee, a miraculous outfit made up entirely of American-born players. The Atlanta team was half expat, half native. What had they done? Started something that had a heart.
 Today there are 14 men s hurling teams in the South,  says Claffey.  Hurling has truly spread and flourished in a part of the US where no hurling had been before. Donal McCarthy did that. He may not have started the other 13 teams but he lit such a fire under us in Atlanta and that helped light a spark that spread across the southern states.
Put down roots
Donie, though, was already a veteran of audacious overseas start-ups. Seven years earlier, in Saudi Arabia, he co-founded the Naomh Alee club in Riyadh. At the time he was working for an Irish company  who would create the world s largest dairy herd, without a blade of grass . That was the spirit.
Gaelic games has put down roots in the Middle East over the last 20 years, with 14 clubs spread across six jurisdictions now, but imagine what it was like when Naomh Alee came into existence in the mid-1990s? Imagine the energy it took to start from scratch.
The GAA wasn t nearly as tuned in to the Irish diaspora as it would be later; the Middle East county board wasn t founded until 2013. Donie, and others of like mind, were pioneers in the strictest sense of the word.
 In 1994, there was no Irish community within which to nurture the seed of Gaelic games in Saudi Arabia   nor across the broader Middle East. It simply didn t exist,  according to a history of the GAA in the region, published by Croke Park.  This was the literal  green field  project.
 The ambitious few, including Charles Sullivan, Donal McCarthy and Johnny Rea, took it upon themselves to organise the burgeoning Irish community in the region and express themselves through sport.
In later years Donie moved to the UAE. The Dubai Celts club was already in existence when he joined, but Gaelic football was their focus and Donie s passion was hurling. Under his influence, they broadened their horizon. When the Middle East fielded a hurling team at the World Games in 2014, Donie was the manager.
Every GAA club is a village, no matter where it is in the world. For Irish people starting a new adventure overseas, GAA clubs are a place of asylum, if that s what you need. Never  full .
Breadth or soul
For much of his adult life, miles from our sight, Donie drove that dynamic, wherever he went. We didn t appreciate the breadth of it, or the soul of it. After he died a series of glowing tributes appeared on the Facebook page of Dubai Celts; one, above others, captured his place in their world.
 Today, we lost one of the greatest,  Conor O Riordan wrote.  Donie s love for hurling, people, and general craic never ceased to amaze me. He went on to help me and hundreds of other expats that landed in Dubai, looking for accommodation, a job, a friend.
Though he spent a lot of time overseas, Donie was wrapped up in Carrigtwohill. His family was steeped in the jersey, stretching back generations. In the 1960s and  70s he lined out for us in county finals, either side of a stint playing for London. When the club was gathering money for a new pitch in the 1980s, Donie raised funds in England and sent it home, like the Dagenham Yanks.
Many years later he managed our hurling team for a couple of seasons during a long recession in our fortunes. For too many seasons around that time our year was bluntly divided between six months of bubbling optimism and six months of sour recrimination. There was no oasis of middle ground. Adele hasn t written a song about this yet, but the simplest way to have your heart broken is to give it to the GAA. If you re lucky you ll get it back in two pieces. Expect it to come back as a jigsaw. Donie understood this too.
He spent the last few years of his life at home, battling a long illness with grace and good humour. During that time he immersed himself in the club. Conversations about matches and players were his daily bread. Feedback from Donie sometimes had an unfiltered quality, but only because he was desperate for us to succeed and drive on.
He spent his last year scoping out the best solution for the new hurling wall we need to build and an astro pitch to go with it. He wouldn t have stopped until it was done. We d better step up.
Rest in peace Donie. Carrig Abú.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



National acclaimed as 'cleanest' renewal with no fallers
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 9
Length: 583 words
Body


The alterations made to Saturday s Randox Aintree Grand National have been praised for helping produce what has been described as the  cleanest  renewal of the world-famous race.
There were no fallers in a race famed as the most gruelling test in National Hunt racing as 21 of the 32 runners completed the course. It was the highest number of finishers since 1992. There were two non-runners from the original maximum declared 34.
There were four casualties, but they were all unseated riders. The quartet included the 2023 winner Corach Rambler who exited at the first fence and then fell at the second when running riderless. He was unscathed afterwards as were all the National runners. Seven horses were pulled up.
Despite soft ground conditions, and the winner I Am Maximus ultimately scoring by over seven lengths, rarely before have more runners been in contention in the closing stages of a National, something that former champion jockey Tony McCoy described on ITV as a  brilliant spectacle .
For a race annually under spotlight from a horse welfare perspective, and which saw animal rights protesters delay the start by 15 minutes a year previously, Saturday s outcome represented an ideal result for racing authorities in Britain.
Reducing the maximum field from 40 was one of a number of changes introduced by the Jockey Club, which owns Aintree. The first fence was also moved forward while the 11th fence was lowered by two inches.
 The changes have clearly had a very positive impact. I think it was probably the cleanest National I ve ever seen,  the Jockey Club s chief executive, Nevin Truesdale, said.  You ve got to go back to 1992 to find more finishers, so we re really pleased. I think the standing start seemed to work and I thought the jockeys were very sensible and it was a very well-ridden race, great credit to all involved. It was a really exciting finish, the National exactly as we want it.
If traditionalists might argue that and point out how integral to the National s popularity has been a sense of lottery, the absence of negative welfare headlines in the aftermath underlines the race s new reality.
Rachael Blackmore, who partnered Minella Indo into third, and was a 2021 winner on Minella Times, said the race didn t feel any less exciting to ride.
Fantastic race
 I got a nice passage round and had plenty of space when I wanted it. It was still a fantastic race to ride in,  she said.
The former dual National winner Ruby Walsh commented on ITV s coverage:  It all looked to be a success. I know I enjoyed watching the race and it was a great showpiece for the sport.
 It s how we advertise what we have and if that doesn t convince people that it s a wonderful sport, I m not sure what will.
Not surprisingly, animal rights bodies would argue that too and the Animal Aid organisation pointed to a pair of equine fatalities at Aintree on Friday. Giovinco sustained fatal injuries in a fall over the Mildmay course fences while Pikar fell in a handicap hurdle.
In other news, Wednesday s rescheduled Gowran card is the latest to fall foul of the weather after 70mm of rainfall in the last week.
Clerk of the course Paddy Graffin said conditions had improved slightly over the weekend but conceded defeat on the meeting getting a green light.
 It has been a trying autumn, winter and spring as everyone knows and it has been frustrating for everyone. But despite the great work of the team at Gowran this is out of their control and Wednesday will come too soon,  he said.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Offaly find another gear and blow Laois away
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 5
Length: 546 words
Body


Offaly clicked into top gear in the second half to record their first Leinster Senior Football Championship win over Laois in Portlaoise since 1978 on Saturday evening.
The visitors were the better side on the day by the distance, even though their cause was helped significantly by a 20th-minute red card for Laois corner back James Kelly. Laois were not happy with that sending off, though his elbow did appear to go back and Dylan Hyland went down holding his ribs after the home side had won a free out.
Even the numerical advantage doesn t fully count for Offaly s superiority on the day and they played most of the football on the day, apart from a 10-minute spell coming up to half time.
Blasting over  The teams were level at the break   Laois 1-5, Offaly 0-8   and the home side were certainly the happier to be in that position. Offaly were the better team for much of the first half and their performance warranted a three- or four-point lead. They missed two real goal chances with Jack Bryant blasting over from point blank range after 20 seconds and Eoin Carroll drawing a good save from Killian Roche with a snap shot in the 24th minute.
Laois converted their goal chance in the 28th minute with Shaun Fitzpatrick finding the net after Ian Duffy made a fine save from his first shot. That goal brought Laois back into it, making it 1-3 to 0-7.
Offaly had been 0-6 to 0-2 ahead when James Kelly was sent off and Laois were struggling to get anything going. Offaly had played very well early on and had four points on the board before Laois got their first point from an Evan O Carroll free in the eight minute. Ruari McNamee got the next point after Fitzpatrick s goal but points from Eoin Buggie and a Killian Roche free levelled it up at half time.
Evan O Carroll put Laois ahead for the first time with a free two minutes into the second half but that was the high point of their evening. Just when the home support were beginning to dream, Offaly found another gear and blew them out of the water.
The hard working Dylan Hyland tapped over two frees and Keith O Neill got in for a 41st-minute goal after intercepting a short Killian Roche kickout. That 1-10 to 1-6 lead was a more accurate reflection of the play and Offaly went for the jugular.
Their second goal came three minutes later when Eoin Carroll turned over the ball in midfield when Laois were pushing men forward. Jordan Hayes raced into open ground, stayed clear of the chasing defenders and finished very well to the net.
OFFALY: I Duffy; D Dempsey, D Hogan, L Pearson (0-1); C Egan, P Cunningham, J Furlong; E Carroll, J McEvoy; D Hyland (0-5, four frees), R McNamee (0-1), J Hayes (1-0); J Bryant (0-3, two frees), N Poland, K O Neill (1-3). Subs: C Flynn for Bryant (49m), C Farrell for Hyland, inj. (57m), J O Brien for McEvoy (61m), R Egan for McNamee (63m), D McDaid for Pearson (64m). LAOIS: K Roche (0-2, two frees); B Dempsey, S Lacey, J Kelly; E Buggie (0-1), M Timmons, J Lacey; K Lillis, D Larkin; K Swayne, E Lowry, S Fitzpatrick (1-0); M Barry (0-2, two frees), E O Carroll  (0-3, two frees), P Kingston. Subs: C Heffernan for Larkin, inj. (10m), D O Reilly  for Lillis (50m), D Kavanagh for Dempsey (50m), N Dunne for Kingston (55m), S Fingleton for Timmons (64m). Referee: J Henry (Mayo).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



OJ Simpson and the fatal flaw of jealousy; Simpson escaped in his criminal trial but he did not escape the opprobrium of many who felt that he had got away with murder
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 572 words
Body


On Thursday, I went over to South Bundy Drive in Brentwood, where the double murder happened.
OJ Simpson was dead at 76. And that famous scene of violence was eerily quiet on a shimmering spring day in Los Angeles.
I wrote nearly 30 years ago about the barbaric slayings of Nicole Brown Simpson and her friend Ron Goldman at her condo, and the infamous trial that drilled into the most sensitive parts of the national psyche, exposing conflicting views about race and policing and celebrity and legal equality.
There were farcical elements of OJ Simpson s  trial of the century , from witness Kato Kaelin, the houseguest with the frosted shag who had starred in the comedy Beach Fever, to Judge Lance Ito, who was such a narcissistic camera hog that he became known as Judge Itomaniac.
But I always thought of it as a great American tragedy. It had echoes of Othello, the most trenchant work ever written on the fatal flaw of jealousy.
Othello was a hero, a black man beloved for his exploits on the field, a man who conquered racial setbacks and beguiled his fans and soared to great heights.
He was married to a beautiful younger woman. But, thanks to Iago   a deputy to the general who was jealous himself because he was passed over for a promotion in favour of another aide de camp   Othello was poisoned with jealousy, unable to cope with the demons in his head.
Desdemona, his wife, was confused, because Othello was spun up over false information. Her servant, Emilia, explained that jealous people  are not ever jealous for the cause, but jealous for they re jealous. It is a monster, begot upon itself, born on itself .
Othello murdered Desdemona, while still loving her.
The lawyer who got OJ off
A year after OJ s murder trial, I stood in line behind the football legend s lawyer, Johnnie  If the glove don t  fit, you must acquit  Cochran, at Bill Clinton s second inaugural.
Cochran, who acted as if the Simpson case was a civil rights struggle akin to Brown v Board of Education, would soon have his own show on Court TV.
A stream of men and women excitedly approached Cochran, wanting to have their pictures taken with the lawyer who got OJ off.
Celebrity trumps all. Or almost all.
OJ escaped in his criminal trial but not in his civil trial, though he never paid the penalty or expressed any penance.
He did not, however, escape the opprobrium of many in America who felt that he got away with murder.
The victims
In 1995, as an acquitted OJ plotted to rehabilitate himself, I felt that the victims had got lost in the circus.
I drove an hour outside Los Angeles to the Ascension cemetery in Lake Forest. There were bougainvilleas, carnations, sunflowers and daisies heaped on the plain dark marble marker at Nicole Brown Simpson s grave. People had left teddy bears and rosaries.
One little boy wrote a note promising he would never be mean to a woman when he grew up. A mother wrote a note assuring Nicole that her two kids would be okay:  Your children s guardian angels will take care of them.
I talked to a woman named Teresa Myers, who stood staring at the grave for a long time.  Maybe she s better off now because she s at peace,  Myers told me.  But maybe she s not because she knows now that nobody can touch him.
When I left South Bundy on Thursday, I said a little prayer for the victims and their families. Fred Goldman, Ron s father, said upon hearing of OJ s death,  No great loss.
I feel the same.   New York Times.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Only 3% of private rentals available to Hap tenants, study finds
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 416 words
Byline: KITTY HOLLAND
Body


KITTY HOLLAND  Just 38 rental properties, across 16 areas, were available to households dependent on the housing assistance payment (Hap) last month, a report published
today indicates.
The Locked Out of the Market report, released quarterly by the Simon Communities, finds just 3 per cent of homes to rent in the private market were available to Hap-dependent households   down from 4 per cent in 2023, 8 per cent in 2022 and more than a quarter (28 per cent) in 2021.
The report series examines the rental market in representative areas and counts the total number of private rented properties available.
This latest report, which looked at availability on March 11th, 12th and 13th, found 1,180 properties available  to rent at any price  in Dublin city centre and south and north city; Cork city centre and suburbs; Limerick city centre and suburbs; Galway city centre and suburbs; Waterford city centre; Sligo town; Co Leitrim; Athlone; Portlaoise; Kildare; and Dundalk.
Although this is a 3 per cent increase from the 1,149 properties available in December, and a 77 per cent increase since March last year, there were significant regional disparities.
Decline
More than three-quarters (77 per cent) of the homes were in the three Dublin areas, while eight areas saw a decline in properties available at any price   Cork city centre (-13 properties), Cork city suburbs (minus one property), Dublin city centre (-21 properties), Dundalk (-10 properties), Galway city suburbs (-19 properties), Galway city centre (minus two properties), Limerick city centre (minus seven properties) and Sligo town (minus three properties).
Kildare saw a significant increase of 32 available rental properties. Dublin city south increased by 43 properties, and Dublin city north increased by 13.
Similar regional disparities are evident in the supply of homes within Hap limits, with 84 per cent (34) in Dublin area and just three areas outside Dublin with any properties available to households dependent on Hap.
Ten of the 16 areas had no homes available for Hap-dependent households.  These were Cork city centre, Waterford city centre, Limerick city centre and suburbs, Sligo town, Leitrim, Galway city centre and suburbs, Athlone and Portlaoise.
To qualify for Hap a household must qualify for social housing. To qualify for social housing and Hap, households must have incomes below certain limits. For a single person the limit is between EUR 30,000 and EUR 40,000, depending on where in the country they are.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Passing the parcel or passing the buck; who pays for all the careless deliveries?; In this golden age of online shopping, customers, shops and delivery companies discuss doorsteps, dodgy signatures and deposits in wheelie bins
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 2451 words
Body


When it comes to shopping, we are probably living in the best of times with a seemingly endless stream of options that can make it as easy to shop in Shanghai as in Shankill, Texas or Termonfeckin.
The pandemic fuelled an explosion in online retail in Ireland, where growth had been sluggish compared with some European Union countries, and the Covid restrictions prompted many shops and shoppers to overcome barriers to online shopping that they might otherwise not have.
With more people buying and selling online, more demands were placed on delivery companies and delivery drivers, who often found themselves working from dawn to dusk getting parcels into the hands of consumers.
Sometimes they did not actually get parcels into hands, though. The need for contactless deliveries and social distancing meant companies dispensed with signatures as a proof of delivery and drivers engaged in what amounted to a guessing game with their customers.
Doorbells would be pushed, parcels would be left on doorsteps and drivers would leave as if fleeing the scene of a crime.
Generally speaking it was grand. But sometimes it was not.
Stories started to emerge of enthusiastic dogs wolfing down clothes and expensive technology left on the street for all the world to steal. Books and art were deposited in wheelie bins and taken away by binmen unaware of the new world order and the fact that they were sometimes compacting the shopping of those living along their routes.
The hangover from the pandemic has yet to lift and many drivers working with some companies remain under extreme pressure to deliver, which has led to some parcels of high value still being left on the doorsteps of houses, exposed to bad weather and bad people.
On at least four occasions in recent weeks Pricewatch has bought fairly low-value products from a popular online retailer and had them delivered straight to our door   but only to the door   before the delivery vans disappeared into the gloom.
This page calls Dublin s north inner city home, and while it is a lovely place to live it is neither crime- nor rain-free, so the fact that none of the parcels was stolen or destroyed by downpours despite lying unattended for hours is close to miraculous.
The carelessly delivered parcels   which could just as handily have been left with any one of a dozen direct neighbours who are all wearily accustomed to accepting packages for others on the street   prompted Pricewatch to take to the platform formerly known as Twitter to see if others had noticed deliveries being dumped on their doorstep.
In not much more than a day we had received hundreds of responses, with virtually all of the companies whose vans are seen criss-crossing the country being called out for poor deliveries.
The shoppers
Caroline Sweeney had three parcels  dumped  at her door over Christmas. They were  not even addressed to here,  she said. She couldn t get hold of the delivery company so  delivered them myself to correct addresses .
Louise Cuddy had a package left on her doorstep in November.  I was away for half an hour at the time but package never turned up. Retailer took no responsibility and I couldn t get through to the delivery company despite trying. Was EUR 70 out of pocket.
Rosita Apaza Machaca sent us a picture of a parcel  left a few days ago in the pouring rain, completely unattended on a busy street. Companies do not hold their delivery drivers accountable. I ve lost several items in this way. No buyer protection.
Aoife Ryan noted that it happens  all the time  despite the fact that she works from home.  It takes me 10 seconds to open the door, but the driver is back in his van by then; they re not waiting to see if anyone s home. So on days I don t happen to be home things would be left at the door until 5.30pm.
Seanie Flanagan had it even worse with parcels  usually fired over the fence or left on the gate pillar, often dumped at the wrong address. Will sometimes say they attempted to deliver, even though somebody might have been home all day waiting for it.
For Simon Dyke, it s equally annoying  when you see on the delivery details that they attempted to deliver the parcel and you know they didn t even try   it got near to finishing time and they couldn t be bothered to actually deliver.
Sam Kirwan recalled how a delivery company  left several rolls of attic insulation at my front door in the rain. Didn t even ring the Ring doorbell   just left it all there and drove off. And no customer service number available, of course.
Fiona McCardle had an order that didn t come within the retailer s two-day delivery target, and was going away for a week.  I went to great lengths ringing them and [the delivery company] to ask for a hold to be placed on delivery. They still left the box outside . . . while I was gone.
 I literally just got home now to receive a package only to find the package was delivered sometime during the day, even though I was told it would be delivered between 5pm and 6pm. It was lying on my lawn in the rain . . . and no call from anyone to say it was delivered,  wrote Kathy Newman.
 Everyone knows that the delivery people are doing this more often, and in general we are glad of it because the alternative is the driver has to try deliver again,  posted Eamon Moran.  Seems like the benefit of delivering first time every time outweighs the risk of theft to the delivery companies.
Gillian Morrissey said a delivery company has  taken to not knocking on the front door and placing orders in the wheelie bin! It happened to me with a laptop. I only noticed the package in there when I needed to open the bin.
Declan Swanton lives in Germany and said the practice was  totally normal  there.  They don t even bother ringing. Countless times when I ve been at home, I get an email telling me that the package has been  handed to a resident . I check outside and find it dumped somewhere in the yard in the rain.
Sometimes the parcels are very, very expensive. Catriona Aken ordered an iPhone and it was due to be delivered last week. It was but left  just outside the door in the rain. I was away, himself at work but a neighbour came and picked it up. I live in an estate so it is busy enough. Usually I wouldn t panic but the phone was very expensive.
Not as expensive as the package Marty Duffy was waiting for. He had  EUR 5,000 worth of Formula 1 GP tickets thrown into the garden at the wrong address the other side of my village last year. The householder brought them to the village post office and I found out due to the diligent postmaster. Courier was a disaster.
Eamonn Keating had a disaster of his own at Christmas when a hamper was  thrown over my front gate. Two bottles of wine smashed inside, destroying all other contents. The  fragile  sticker obviously wasn t large enough!
Rowena Neville found a delivery  on wet grass (it had been thrown into the garden probably a couple of days previously). It had been raining solidly. Box clearly stated it was something for a disabled person (who could never have retrieved it independently). The box and item were full of slugs.
The shops
While consumers tend to be front and centre when it come to sharing horror stories, retailers can have a tough time too.
Darragh Murphy has been running the always funny Hairy Baby T-shirt site from his Cork base for more than 15 years but he is not laughing when he talks about his tribulations dealing with delivery firms.
 I ve been through almost every courier company in the country and have seen some shocking stuff,  he says.  We have had courier companies dropping stuff off and signing for it themselves and then our customers are getting on to us looking for the parcels.
He says that nine times out of 10 the customer will find a parcel  because it has been delivered to a shop down the road or put in a bin out the back or in a shed or by a wall, or it s been given to a neighbour,  Murphy says.  But it takes a number of days for us to find that out, so there can be double deliveries.
Far too often he has endless over and backs with the courier companies and  it s a real headache. Speaking to drivers over the years, I know the pressure that is put on them. Some get paid per parcel, and in some cases get only cents per parcel delivered.
He stresses that the issues are  ultimately between us and the courier company. The onus is on us to deliver to you. It can come down to them saying  we delivered it  and if we ask for proof of delivery they will send us a copy of a scan of a signature which is totally illegible. We have to go back to the customer and the customer says that s not their signature, and then we go back to the courier company, and a whole week has gone by and the customer is getting irate, so we have to send out another parcel and we re out of pocket.
Ultimately we never get a rebate from the courier companies. It s a head melt and it can consume hours of our day dealing with it.
What Darragh Murphy calls a head melt, Mike Conn of Conn s Cameras in Dublin describes as a  vortex of sh*te .
While Hairy Baby delivers relatively low-cost items to discerning consumers, many of the products Conn s Cameras ships are very expensive indeed.
 I would say 99 per cent of our orders get through the next day around the country and it s a brilliant and efficient service for the money that we spend,  he begins.  But the 1 per cent that are a problem are a real problem.
The shop has taken to putting stickers on its boxes telling delivery drivers not to not leave them on doorsteps.
 The reason we do that is that we ve had stuff left on doorsteps in busy environments or left in an apartment block inside the door where 500 people have access. If a parcel is left sitting there and goes missing we have had to take serious hits on the chain. We never go to our insurance company because we know that all our insurance will go through the bloody roof or we may not get insured at all if the claims are so high, so we re regularly taking a hit on stuff.
He has sympathy for the drivers, many of whom are self-employed.  They get paid per drop and may have driven 15 miles out into the country and there s no other delivery anywhere near that particular place and they don t want to have to come back a second time. The chance of it being robbed is small, but they may not have somewhere dry to put it so it s left in the elements.
He says the shop now uses An Post for those types of rural deliveries because while it might cost more, there is more security that the parcels will arrive safely.
 Our biggest thing is the security,  Conn continues.  When Covid came, companies no longer took signatures from people and they still don t take signatures. What they say is that their van was outside that premises so that s all they re proving. They are not proving that the driver got out and actually delivered the product. I would love to see the signature thing coming back.
Like Murphy, he picks up the tab for lost products.  The retailer is taking it on the chin. It s not worth fighting it so you are just absorbing it into your business costs and take it as a kick in the nuts every time it happens. They will say they have a process but you re passed from Billy to Jack, you get the runaround and put into the vortex of sh*te. They have no interest in resolving it and they just want you to go away. It isn t worth the time involved.
The delivery company
We also contacted some of the State s leading delivery companies to get their view on the state of things. Only one company, An Post, responded to our queries.
Do delivery drivers working for your operation ever leave unattended parcels outside
homes, and does the company believe this amounts to a successful delivery?  An Post delivery postmen and postwomen should never leave unattended parcels outside addresses   unless the receiving customer has expressly asked them to do so. Customers receiving barcoded parcels will receive an email or text notifying them in advance of the delivery and offering them a number of options should they not be home to accept the parcel, eg: have it delivered to a different address; left with a neighbour; left in a  safe place  of their own choosing (eg a porch or shed or under decking); or pick up from the local An Post delivery depot or post office.
 If the customer is not at home, and has not indicated an alternative delivery location, the post person will leave a docket detailing the attempted delivery and the times the parcel will be available for collection within five working days from either their local delivery unit or local post office. A successful delivery is achieved only when the customer receives their parcel.
What forms of proof of delivery are sufficient in the company s eyes? Is it a signature? A photograph of the parcel at the doorstep?
 For proof of delivery, An Post records the recipient s name, or requests a signature for a registered post item, or a clear digital request from the customer that the item be left in a particular place.
How are delivery drivers paid for their work? Are they paid an hourly rate or per parcel delivered?
 An Post is very clear about saying no to the gig economy, where people are paid piecemeal rates per parcel or hour worked with no income security. Our postmen and postwomen receive a pensionable salary to cover their full day s work on a postal route. Rates of pay are determined by length of service and responsibility. Staff receive overtime pay for working additional hours and have access to career progression, training and health-and-safety programmes. All An Post delivery staff are fully Garda vetted and wear distinctive uniforms.
On a typical day, what volumes of deliveries are drivers expected to handle?
 This depends on whether it s an urban or rural area, and on the terrain and nature of the buildings to which we are delivering. An urban postwoman delivering to a development of 500 apartments and duplexes would deliver a whole lot more items than a postman on an isolated rural route   but he would have far greater driving and delivery time (accessing one-off isolated farmhouses, etc).
 As the number of traditional letters continues to decline steadily and parcel volumes increase, delivery routes are designed using the perfect mix of expertise from local post-people, their managers and the latest route-design technology, and reviewed on a regular basis.
 Changes in the profile of mail (fewer letters, more parcels), new housing developments or rural depopulation mean regular reviews are vital to ensure best service for customers and fair workloads for staff. Everything that goes out in the van/electric trike must be delivered, or an attempt made to deliver it.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Productivity in health fails to match spend; Concern at 'divergence' between rising health spend and activity, report finds
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 393 words
Byline: MARTIN WALL
Body


MARTIN WALL  Large increases in healthcare funding and staffing in recent years has not been matched by a similar level of rising activity in Ireland s hospitals, a significant new report has found.
The data, showing the growth in hospital activity is lagging considerably behind the level of State investment, is expected to be used by the Government to make the case for addressing productivity challenges.
The report drawn up by personnel in the Irish Government Economic Evaluation Service and the Department of Health says the health budget has risen from EUR 13.7 billon in 2014 to EUR 22.8 billion in 2024 and that more than 50,000 additional healthcare staff have been employed.
However, it says,  our analysis shows the large divergence present in all sites between the expenditure and workforce provided, relative to the growth in either separate activity metrics or  composite  activity . The latter is an aggregate for inpatient, day-case, outpatient and emergency activity, weighted by unit costs for each area.
 In most cases, the divergence is significant, with the percentage growth in composite activity between 2016 and 2022 either negative, or two times behind workforce growth, and up to three times behind real expenditure growth over the same period,  the report says.
In a foreword, Department of Health secretary general Robert Watt and HSE chief Bernard Gloster describe the  identified divergence between resourcing and activity  as  a big concern .
The report is to be published today by Minister for Health Stephen Donnelly. He will also unveil a new plan under which the health service will seek to generate savings of more than EUR 500 million and introduce new reforms aimed at improving productivity.
The plan will look at making savings in non-pay areas such as on medicines, the procurement of items such as medical and surgical supplies as well as diagnostics and food.
Under moves to drive efficiencies and boost productivity, GPs would refer patients to a team of specialists rather than to individual consultants as part of the introduction of  mandated central referrals per region per speciality .
The plan proposes new initiatives to avoid duplication of scans for patients ordered by both GPs and hospital doctors and the introduction of extra clinics and the maximum use of clinical infrastructure late evenings and Saturdays.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Rangers hand Celtic title advantage after historic loss
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 407 words
Body


Philippe Clement revealed Rangers failed to heed his half-time warning before slipping to a historic defeat to Ross County which dented their Scottish Premiership title hopes.
Staggies skipper Jack Baldwin scored an own goal after 15 minutes of a first half in which the home side could have netted at least twice against a below-par Gers outfit.
County then scored two quick-fire second-half goals through Simon Murray and George Harmon before Josh Sims added a stunning third and the hosts survived a late penalty from Gers skipper James Tavernier to win 3-2.
It was the Dingwall club s first victory over Rangers after 20 defeats and four draws in 24 previous meetings.
The result left Rangers four points behind leaders Celtic with a game in hand against Dundee on Wednesday night, while second-bottom County moved to within a point of 10th-placed St Johnstone as they go into the split.
No t lethal
Clement said:  We threw away the points today. We didn t start well enough in the first half on the ball and in the duels. We had chances but we were not lethal with the chances we had in the first half, a few of which were clear ones.
 You come into half-time in a good way 1-0 ahead and I warned the players it was not good enough in the first half and I wanted to see more second half and keep the clean sheet, but then you concede two goals in five minutes or something like that and start to chase the game.
 That makes it more difficult and you give energy to the opponent who get more energy and put their bodies in front of the ball all over the pitch to make a decisive duel.
 In the last half-hour, I saw the urgency and I wanted to see that 90 minutes long, not 30 minutes long. There were too many mistakes made in our defensive part which is not usual from our team.
 There were some strange goals to concede and we didn t score enough with the opportunities we had.
 In the end we give a lot of energy to our opponent and all credit to Ross County who defended with a big heart until the end. We need to see the opposition team don t get so much energy by being better with and without the ball.
Clement explained why he did not shake hands with County boss Don Cowie immediately after the game   he waited until they met at post-match media duties.
The Gers boss said:  I went inside directly. I wanted to prepare really well what I had to say to the team. Nothing towards him, a lot of credit for him and what he has been doing here.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Report sets out effects of Traveller feuding
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 477 words
Byline: KITTY HOLLAND
Body


KITTY HOLLAND Social Affairs Correspondent  Traveller feuding is engaged in by a
minority of the community with far-reaching negative consequences for the majority, a report on the issue has found.
These include mental health difficulties, homelessness, discrimination, injury and in some instances death, according to the study from the Traveller Counselling Service, Exchange House and the Traveller Mediation Service.
Social media is fuelling violence between some families, exacerbating the issue which has its root causes in the poverty, marginalisation and powerlessness, it says.
The report, The Impact of Traveller Interfamily Conflict on Individuals and Families, draws on research conducted in April and May 2023 with four focus groups as well as 38 in-depth interviews, including with 32 Travellers with direct experience or insight into violent feuding. Other interviewees included gardaí and members of Traveller organisations.
The project arose following a 2019 conference on the issue and was  co-created by the three Traveller organisations and the  settled  researcher [Dr Sarah Sartori, a researcher specialising in higher education at southeast Technological University] .
Publication of the report tomorrow will coincide with a conference, Travellers Transforming Conflict, at Dublin Castle  to be addressed by Minister for Children and Equality Roderic O Gorman.
Bare-knuckle fighting
The report says feuding is  historically linked to the culture of bare-knuckle fighting by which a male Irish Traveller upheld his family s honour  but has evolved in recent years  to typically involve weapons, ramming of vehicles, destruction of property, that includes the setting of sites and homes on fire, and can result in loss of life, severe mental-health difficulties, and families forced to leave their homes .
It adds:  In the absence of an alternative system of  conflict resolution  because of well-founded mistrust of the police and of the criminal justice system, such oppositions are misunderstood by some in the community as an element of Traveller culture .
 Only a minority of Travellers engage in inter-family violence, yet it . . . negatively impacts on virtually all sections of the Traveller community . . . Google  Traveller feud  and you will instantly be brought to a spate of news articles, images and TikTok videos or  callouts  provoking a member of a  rival  family into a fight.
It continues:  There is increasing recognition within the Traveller community that inter-family violent conflict is leading to widespread intergenerational trauma, seriously damaging mental health and undermining progress in . . . education and accommodation.
Among the report s nine recommendations are a campaign to bring  attitudinal change within the Traveller community  including  frank conversation within . . . about how to address the violence .

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Schleffer closes out the deal in Georgia; World number one takes his second Major with a final round of 68
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 10
Length: 732 words
Body


The great ones exude an aura of invincibility; and, for Scottie Scheffler, while others faltered, his route to a second green jacket in three years was surefooted and achieved with considerable aplomb as his mind remained focused on the task at hand and his shot-making and distance control set him apart from all others.
On a beautifully sunny day, a final round 68 for an 11-under-par total of 277 gave Scheffler a dominant win, four strokes clear of Sweden s Ludvig Aberg with the trio of Collin Morikawa,  Max Homa and Tommy Fleetwood   who finished with a bogey-free 69 to leapfrog his way up the leaderboard   sharing third position, a further three shots adrift.
There were no distractions for Scheffler, least of all the sound of any medical bleeper   with his wife Meredith due the couple s first born child   which may have required some detour. No such decision, however, was needed; and Scheffler s task was aided and abetted by some serious errors from those would-be pretenders who failed to deliver on their intent.
Aberg, the 24-year-old Swede in his maiden Major championship appearance, had moved into position to pose a threat until a sling-hooked 5-iron approach to the 11th green found a watery grave, as he ran up a double-bogey six. Still, he recovered to claim solo runner-up after a 69 for 281.
Morikawa s stumble had come on the ninth hole, where his tee-shot finished on the pine straws amidst the cathedral pines and the two-time Major champion ran up a costly double-bogey six that was followed two holes later   a la Aberg   with a double bogey on the 11th. His quest was run.
Homa s own bid for a green jacket was cruelly undone by a wicked bounce on the angelic Par 3 12th, where his tee-shot   which looked so good in the air   hit a downslope and kicked on into the bushes at the rear of the green. A penalty drop, a chip and two putts later, and he was signing for a double-bogey five.
One by one, each of Scheffler s challengers self-destructed. But not Scheffler, as the world one extended his brilliant form-line of late to a run of 1st-1st-2nd-1st which has set him apart from all others.
The 27-year-old American had carried a one stroke lead into the final round and found himself in a share of the lead with Aberg and Homa and Morikawa until a birdie on the Par 5 eighth saw him then share the lead only with Morikawa. He birdied the ninth for the solo lead and then the 10th for a hat-trick and recovered from a bogey on the 11th with birdies on the 13th, 14th and 16th to move beyond one and all.
Scheffler was only making his way to Amen Corner, that stretch from the 11th green to the 13th hole, when McIlroy s work was already done. The career Grand Slam, if it ever comes his way, will wait for another year at least after he finished with a 73 for 292 in tied-23rd position that had his emotions running between frustration and philosophical.
 I don t really know what to say,  remarked McIlroy, before collecting his thoughts.  I guess it s more of the same of what I ve shown this year. It s not as if it s been a down week in comparison to the way I ve been playing. It s just a matter of me trying to get my game in a bit better shape going towards the rest of the season.
At this point it might seem like a fruitless search for El Dorado, or the Holy Grail; yet, McIlroy has plotted a route going forward to make it all attainable with another busy schedule going forward   playing the next two weeks, in the Heritage and the Zurich Classic   and then taking a week off before playing the Wells Fargo the week before the US PGA Championship.
 I need to take a little bit of time and reflect on this week and what I did well, what I didn t do so well, and sort of try to make a plan for the next few months, especially from here going through obviously the end of July. It s Major season, they re going to come thick and fast, so hopefully I get myself in a bit better form for those last three (Majors),  said McIlroy.
For McIlroy, the world number two, and without a Major title in the 10 years since he last lifted the Wannamaker Trophy in 2004, the actions and deeds of Scheffler have set a high bar to match. No pressure.
And especially when you consider the altitude Scheffler has scaled. The last player to win the Arnold Palmer, the Players and the Masters in the same season? Tiger Woods, in 2001. That s the rarefied air Sheffler has moved into.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Seen & Heard
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 351 words
Body


Tech giants issue warning over constraints on electricity grid Amazon, Google and Microsoft have warned that the State is likely to lose significant levels of investment due to a failure to address constraints on the Irish electricity grid, the Business Post reports.
The tech giants have significant concerns over Ireland s ability to facilitate future data centre growth amid ongoing restrictions on connection requests from big business.
In a recent document seen by the newspaper, industry group Cloud Infrastructure Ireland, which represents the three companies, took issue with several aspects of a proposed new policy that will decide how they can connect data centres to the grid.
The group said proposals put forward by the Commission for Regulation of Utilities to restrict data centres would  send a signal to the market that a portion of Ireland is closed for new investment and business growth .
 Debt warehousing Companies in the Revenue s debt warehousing scheme will be forced to settle their pandemic liabilities in full unless they clear other outstanding tax business before May 1st, reports the Sunday Times.
Updated Revenue guidelines for setting up phased payments to clear the debts by the deadline state that applications will be rejected if there are outstanding tax bills, unpaid penalties or interest, or returns not filed.
The rule means companies that have still to agree a long-term payment plan with Revenue have less than three weeks to get their tax affairs in order or face immediate payment plus backdated interest.
Intel grants and credits Irish taxpayers funded most of the $645 million (EUR 605 million) in grants and tax credits that tech giant Intel received outside the US last year, newly filed financial records show, reports the Sunday Independent.
It suggests Intel will benefit from at least $322.5 million in grants and refundable tax credits from Ireland.
These are related to the significant expansion of its silicon wafer manufacturing facilities in Leixlip, Co  Kildare.
The $17 billion investment in the facility is one of the most substantial ever made in the State.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Sensory blitzkriegs and the art of smiling when finally winning
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 683 words
Body


Yet another weekend when you d be in desperate need of a bank of TVs to keep an eye on the copious amounts of rich sporting fare on the menu, and in the absence of such a luxury, you know yourself, you end up missing the bulk of the tastiest stuff with all the channel-hopping.
And what Sky Sports Golf missed, because it happened on the Golf Channel, was possibly the highlight of the weekend, namely the fortitude of their joint pundit Paul McGinley when he, somehow, retained a straight face when Brandel Chamblee, sitting to his right, started talking about  sensory blitzkrieg  during the Masters.
 Solitude is important,  Brandel declared.  There is so much discovery in solitude, but it is so absent on the driving range. I see all of these great players and they are surrounded by sensory blitzkrieg. At some point somebody has to have the guts to say  go away, I m the genius, leave me alone . The greats of all time were so good under pressure because they didn t have sensory blitzkrieg.
Most of us might have opted for  people yapping in their ear , but Brandel isn t most of us, a good egg but one who delivers the kind of golf guff that us bandwagoners are, mercifully, only subjected to during the glory weeks.
Mind you, our Paul can deliver no end of guff himself, mountains of it, but in fairness he didn t describe Bryson DeChambeau as  an intellectual earthquake that transforms itself into this athletic majesty . Brandel, what are you like?  It s not bomb and gouge, it s laser-guided missiles that you re watching here.  Stop.
Bandwagoners, as you know, can also be quite parochial folk, so once Rory and Shane drifted out of contention ... okay, okay, plummeted ... it was time to put our heart and soul in to rugby.
(And after Tiger hit that 82? Ah here, heart shredded. It was like seeing your favourite fighter being pummelled when he should have stayed retired. Watching Tiger limping about the place will never not be a heartbreaker, even if the cameras  focus on him, while neglecting the leading bunch, will never not be amusing   and telling, as they desperately search for a box-office successor).
The happy relief came on Virgin Media. Hearts mended.  This is the first time we ve smiled during our coverage in a year of doing it,  said Joe Molloy after the women of Ireland slayed their Welsh visitors at Musgrave Park, Jenny Murphy having to offer an effusive apology for ever doubting them.
 I hope I m wrong, but the Welsh to potentially get the win,  she d said when Joe had asked her for her prediction. But here, look-it, it had been so long since Ireland enjoyed a happy Six Nations outcome, she was forgiven for struggling to picture one. Would she have taken a 36-6 triumph prematch? She d have bitten off your hand, wrist and elbow.
As for Leinster. Well now.
First, some housekeeping.
 You laid out the red carpet for them in Cork,  Cork woman Jacqui Hurley said, somewhat accusingly, to Cork man Donal Lenihan prematch after the Rebels made the city a home from home for ROG s lads during the week.
Dónal tried to explain himself, while half promising that he wished Leinster well against La Corkchelle. And he tried to change the topic by swooning at Joe McCarthy s size 17 boots.  I ve never seen a man as big as him. At six foot five, Donal is no pygmy, so this was saying something.
Over on TNT, Craig Doyle was whipping Brian O Driscoll in to a frenzy.  Whatever happens, this game will go to the wire,  he promised him. The promise ended up being well and truly broken, Leinster mullering ROG s reigning champions, Leo Cullen losing the run of himself in his post-match chat with RTÉ.  Yeah, the guys are pretty happy.
Next? A semi-final against Northampton Saints in Croke Park.  I grew up on the Wicklow/Carlow border, so I never imagined getting to play there,  said Bernard Jackman, somewhat dissing the counties  GAA credentials.
The chat before that semi-final will amount to a sensory blitzkrieg, but Leinster, quite evidently, are now an intellectual earthquake that transforms itself into this athletic majesty.  Wha,  Leo Cullen might ask. Ourselves too.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Sudan war marks one-year anniversary as donor conference is held in Paris
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 626 words
Byline: SALLY HAYDEN
Body


SALLY HAYDEN
 A major political and donor conference will take place in Paris today to mark the first anniversary of Sudan s war, which is being called the worst displacement crisis in the world by the United Nations.
Senior aid officials have been holding weeks of briefings, as they appeal for more attention and funding for what is widely being called a  forgotten  war.
By yesterday, the United Nations Humanitarian Response plan for Sudan for 2024 was less than 6 per cent funded, with $155.2 million (EUR 145.45 million) raised of a projected $2.7 billion needed.
Sudan   Africa s third largest country geographically, with a population of roughly 45 million   erupted into conflict on April 15th, 2023. The Sudanese army, commanded by Abdel Fattah al-Burhan, has been fighting against the Rapid Support Forces (RSF) paramilitary group, led by Mohamed Hamdan Dagalo, known as Hemedti.
Both sides stand accused of war crimes, and the full death toll is unknown, though a UN report found that as many as 15,000 people may have been killed in one West Darfur city last year in ethnic violence perpetrated by the RSF. By March, nine million people were displaced inside Sudan, two thirds as a result of the last year of fighting. More than 1.9 million more had fled into other countries, according to the UN.
Today s conference will be co-chaired by French foreign minister Stéphane Séjourné, German foreign minister Annalena Baerbock and EU foreign policy chief Josep Borrell.
 It is clear that the people of Sudan can no longer wait,  said Sofia Sprechmann Sineiro, the secretary general for CARE International, in an online press conference last week.  This is a crisis within a crisis and the current war must be understood in that context of years of protracted conflict, economic hardship, suspensions of life-saving funding and climate shocks as well.
She said that the Paris conference is a chance to  turn the tide . It  must be a turning point in the global response to this conflict . . . We need global leaders in Paris to take this opportunity to come up with immediate concrete solutions to the human tragedy that continues to unfold.
Anette Hoffmann, a senior research fellow at the Netherlands Institute of International Relations, accused both warring sides of  using starvation as a weapon of war . She said her findings  suggest that Sudan is already experiencing famine-like conditions [in] parts of the country, particularly in RSF-controlled territories .
Between May and September, she said, seven million people are likely to face catastrophic levels of hunger, though that number could rise to 18 million.
Fatima Ahmed, the president of Sudanese women s rights organisation Zenab for Women Development, said among everything else, this is a war  against the women and girls  with  violations and all kinds of abuse, sexual abuse .
Sudan s economy had contracted by about 40 per cent since the war began by February this year, the government has said, with finance minister Gibril Ibrahim suggesting it could shrink another 28 per cent in 2024.
 Extreme levels of suffering
In another online press conference on April 8th, Médecins Sans Frontières international president Christos Christou called Sudan  one of the worst crises the world has seen for decades  with  extreme levels of suffering across the country.
He called on the UN to scale up its humanitarian response, saying that, before the war,  there were dozens of humanitarian actors in the country and now there is almost no one. It is vital that they return, despite the challenges .
The suffering also extends to neighbouring countries, said Christou. In Chad, where more than 570,000 people fleeing the war have sought shelter, the situation in the camps is  devastating to see .

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Super Leinster finally hit La Rochelle with a knockout blow; Nienaber effect kicks in as home side find their defensive edge and sharpen their attack in a deserved victory
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 3
Length: 1077 words
Body


Almost 12 minutes into this Champions Cup semi-final, Tawera Kerr-Barlow fed big, bad Will Skelton, Leinster s supposed kryptonite, near halfway. Tadhg Furlong tackled the lumbering Wallaby lock and dumped him on the ground, prompting a loud roar. Two phases later, with Skelton still on the ground, Furlong drove Ultan Dillane back in the tackle and dumped La Rochelle s Irish lock on the ground too.
If ever there was a line drawn in the sand, it was in those moments, and a fully engaged 51,700 crowd appreciated them. After two trophyless years featuring bitter losses in finals to their new bugbears, the Leinster supporters not only shared their players  hurt but have bought into the Jacques Nienaber effect as well.
Starting with a lineout just inside the Leinster 10-metre line, La Rochelle were driven back just inside their own half through seven phases, obliging Kerr-Barlow to opt for a box kick.
There had been loud cheers at the preceding La Rochelle lineout when they kicked a penalty up the line and went to their catch-and-drive; the destructive Dan Sheehan muscled through the visiting pack to envelop Tolu Latu and completed the steal.
Even after Kerr-Barlow s kick, La Rochelle countered dangerously through Dillyn Leyds and Teddy Thomas before Jason Jenkins  scrambling tackle on the scrumhalf led to the rejuvenated Jordan Larmour winning a turnover penalty.
Initially Leinster misfired a tad with the swirling breeze behind them but soon after their attack began to find its rhythm. James Lowe reclaimed a clever cross kick by Jamie Osborne which found grass before eventually running in his first try when Ross Bryne provided the link from a Caelan Doris pull-back.
Unceremoniously dumped
But even in the midst of slightly wild and frenzied multi-phase attack, when Skelton went into jackal mode a large chunk of the home supporters delighted in seeing him being unceremoniously dumped on the turf by Joe McCarthy s clear-out.
 They get excited by guys coming in with big hits, which is good,  agreed Leo Cullen afterwards.  Tadgh Furlong, at the outset, sort of set the tone by picking up Skelton and driving him back, and putting in a big hit shortly after that as well. And he talked well this week, Tadhg. He showed great leadership.
 It is one thing doing it off the field but doing it on the field is the really important piece so that was a big moment I thought early in the game.
Back in early December, Nienaber had foretold and forecast that his defensive system would take a specific amount of time to bed in.  It took 14 weeks with Munster, it took 14 games with the Boks when we took over in 2018.
And so it came to pass, in Leinster s 13th game and the 14th week since the arrival of the dual World Cup-winning coach, that his team delivered their statement defensive performance to date.
 Jacques has added hugely to the group and continued on the work that obviously other coaches have delivered over the last number of seasons,  said Cullen.
 The guys are buying in to what he s doing. He has a great presence, brings a lot of experience to these big games, obviously a World Cup which is probably the highest pressure in the game, isn t it? Knockout rugby, quarter-final, semi-final, finals, and thankfully it wasn t a one-score game today. It s a bit more relaxing for the last five minutes at the end there which is a credit for all the work that s gone in.
 It s been a pleasure to have him on board and he works unbelievably hard in the detail he brings to the team from a defensive point of view and lots of other aspects of the game as well, in the mindset going into the game.
 He s been a fantastic addition and huge credit to everyone, I suppose, in the club that allows us to bring him here in the first place as well. He s been a breath of fresh air.
But the harder defensive edge has not come at the expense of Leinster s cutting edge. Indeed, this was a satisfying day for all of the coaching ticket, for their set pieces and breakdown work were sharper, and Andrew Goodman s attack countered La Rochelle s rush defence cleverly. Leinster varied their point of attack and depth, and found the edge through the hands or the boot, be it the left-footed Osborne or right-footed Robbie Henshaw.
There was no looking back from Lowe s first try, and four more would follow. After a brilliant McCarthy offload, big, young Joe was everywhere, and Lowe had the first of two try assists with his offload to Jamison Gibson-Park, his former Maori All Blacks  team-mate and kindred spirit.
Big carries
Granted, the La Rochelle pack rumbled over with a catch-and-drive in first-half overtime, but the blue die was cast within three minutes of the restart.
Big carries by Osborne and the colossal Doris, a deft pull-back by Furlong and fingertip passes by Henshaw and Larmour enabled Lowe to find Ryan Baird on the edge to go through Antoine Hastoy. For the holders, after 10 successive knock-out wins, there was no coming back.
Leinster pummelled them some more and Lowe s third try assist allowed Sheehan to finish in the corner before Lowe scored his second off Henshaw s cross-kick as the visitors wilted.
It ended as it began, Leinster defying La Rochelle twice when they went to the corner. McCarthy muscled through their catch-and-drive once more to emerge triumphantly with the ball in his right paw, as if posing with his catch.
La Rochelle didn t like that. The crowd loved it.
LEINSTER: Ciarán Frawley; Jordan Larmour, Robbie Henshaw, Jamie Osborne, James Lowe; Ross Byrne, Jamison Gibson-Park; Andrew Porter, Dan Sheehan, Tadhg Furlong; Joe McCarthy, Jason Jenkins; Ryan Baird, Will Connors, Caelan Doris (capt). Replacements: Josh van der Flier for Connors (49 mins); Ross Molony for Jenkins (51), Rónan Kelleher for Sheehan, Michael Milne for Porter, Michael Ala alatoa for Furlong (all 58); H Byrne for R Byrne (63); Jack Conan for Doris (72); Luke McGrath for Gibson-Park (73). LA ROCHELLE: Dillyn Leyds; Jack Nowell, UJ Seuteni, Jonathan Danty, Teddy Thomas; Antoine Hastoy, Tawera Kerr-Barlow; Louis Penverne, Tolu Latu, Uini Atonio, Ultan Dillane, Will Skelton, Judicael Cancoriet, Levani Botia, Grégory Alldritt (capt). Replacements: Ihaia West for Leyds (h-t); Teddy Iribaren for Kerr-Barlow (45 mins); Quentin Lespiaucq for Latu, Alexandre Kaddouri for Penverne, Joel Sclavi for Atonio (all 53); Paul Boudehent for Cancoriet, Yoan Tanga for Botia (both 63), Thomas Lavault for Skelton (66). Referee: Karl Dickson (RFU).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Suspension of development levies set to be extended; Ministers expected to approve move to stimulate new housing developments
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 452 words
Byline: PAT LEAHY
Body


PAT LEAHY  The Government is likely to extend the suspension of development levies this week in a move to increase housebuilding for the rest of the year. The Cabinet committee on housing will meet today to discuss the issue and several senior sources said they expect Ministers to approve the extension.
The temporary waiver of development contributions   levies charged by local authorities on new housing developments   was introduced last year but is due to lapse later this month.
The suspension of the levies was intended to stimulate the building of new housing developments, and the level of commencements has increased sharply in the last 12 months. Ministers and senior officials believe the measure is working, and want to extend it.
It is expected that it will be extended from April 24th, when it is due to lapse, until the end of the year.
Figures on housing commencements for the first two months of the year show an increase of more than 70 per cent compared with last year, the Department of Housing has said.
The total cost of extending the levy is calculated at EUR 240 million.
Meanwhile, Taoiseach Simon Harris is to meet the Road Safety Authority this morning to discuss the recent spate of road deaths. It is expected that the significant backlog in driving tests across the country will also be on the agenda.
It follows a meeting on Friday with Garda Commissioner Drew Harris and Justice Minister Helen McEntee where road safety was also discussed.
The number of road deaths so far this year is 25 per cent higher than at the same point in 2023.
Hot school meals
Mr Harris is also due to announce an expansion of the hot school meals programme today.
 The Taoiseach and Minister for Social Protection Heather Humphreys will announce the move at a primary school in Lucan, where they will say that an additional 900 primary schools have been approved to join the scheme, bringing to more than 2,000 the number of schools covered. This is the largest single expansion since the scheme was started in 2019 as a pilot programme in 30 schools.
Meanwhile, Fianna Fáil used its ardfheis weekend to make a series of pledges on tax reductions and welfare increases before budget day in October.
In a series of speeches, briefings and interviews over the weekend, the Fianna Fáil leader Micheál Martin and his Ministers made clear they expected further tax cuts in this year s budget as well as specific welfare increases of EUR 10 to child benefit, EUR 12 to the old-age pension and potentially a further round of energy credits.
Mr Martin also used his ardfheis speech to promise a  joint initiative  by the departments of health and education to ban the use of smartphones by children during school hours.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Sydney knife attacker had mental health issues, ideology was not a motive, Australian police say; Assailant identified as 40-year-old Joel Cauchi and was known to authorities
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 713 words
Body


The man who fatally stabbed six people in Sydney had mental health issues in the past and there is no indication ideology was a motive in the attack in one of the city s busiest shopping centres, Australian police said yesterday.
The attacker, identified by police as 40-year-old Joel Cauchi, was known to police in the neighbouring state of Queensland, and police have spoken to his family after Saturday s attack, according to police from New South Wales and Queensland states.
Mr Cauchi s family recognised him and contacted police on Saturday after seeing news reports of the killings.
 The family, when they viewed footage of the event on TV, thought that may well have been their son and they reached out to authorities,  said Queensland Police assistant commissioner Roger Lowe.
The family said they were devastated by his actions, expressing condolences to the victims and the police officer who shot him dead.  Joel s actions were truly horrific, and we are still trying to comprehend what has happened,  the family said in a statement.  He has battled with mental health issues since he was a teenager.
Witnesses described how Mr Cauchi, wearing shorts and an Australian national rugby league jersey, ran through the Westfield Bondi Junction mall with a knife.
He fatally stabbed six people and injured at least 12 before he was killed by Inspector Amy Scott, who confronted him solo while he was on the rampage.
Some shoppers and staff at the mall in Sydney s east tried to stop him and crowds sheltered in shuttered shops.
 This was a terrible scene,  New South Wales Police assistant commissioner Anthony Cooke told reporters.  There is still to this point nothing that we have, no information we received, no evidence we have recovered or intelligence that we have gathered that would suggest that this was driven by any particular motivation, ideology or otherwise.
Mr Cauchi had recently moved to Sydney, the capital of New South Wales, from neighbouring Queensland.
Police said they had searched a small storage facility he had been renting, but found no major evidence to indicate an attack was coming. He had been diagnosed with mental health issues when he was 17 and had been in contact with police frequently in the past four to five years, said Mr Lowe. Mr Cauchi had not been arrested or charged with any crimes in Queensland, he said.
Itinerant lifestyle
Mr Cauchi led an itinerant lifestyle, had recently been sleeping in his car and had only infrequently stayed in touch with his mother via text messages, Mr Lowe said.
Attacks such as Saturday s stabbing are rare in Australia, a country of about 26 million people with some of the world s toughest gun and knife laws.
Five of the six people killed were women, police said on Sunday, while those taken to hospital with stab wounds included a nine-month-old baby, who was in a serious but stable condition. The baby s mother, Ashlee Good, died in hospital from her injuries, her family said in a statement.
Faraz Tahir, a 30-year-old security guard at the mall who was the sole man killed during the attack, arrived in the country last year as a refugee from Pakistan, according to a statement from the Ahmadiyya Muslim Community of Australia, to which he belonged.
There was a heavy police presence yesterday at the mall, which was closed to shoppers, with nearby streets cordoned off. A mound of floral tributes to the victims began to grow, with mourners arriving every few minutes.
 The individual stories of those who have been killed, the complete strangers rushing in to help as well as acts of courage and bravery mean that   whether you know the individuals who have been killed or not   you re grieving today,  said New South Wales state premier Chris Minns.
 The entire state will get behind those families in the days ahead as they recover and go through the inevitable grief of such a horrifying event.
Britain s King Charles, who is Australia s head of state, posted on the royal family s X account:  Our hearts go out to the families and loved ones of those who have been so brutally killed during such a senseless attack.
Prime minister Anthony Albanese said he had received condolence messages from all over the world, adding that the attack had highlighted the bravery of ordinary citizens.   Reuters

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Taighde baoth
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 8
Length: 567 words
Body


Tharla gur thuirling taighde eile fós anuas orainn i dteannta na báistí síoraí an tseachtain cheana. Ceann eile ó eacnamaithe, an ghairm úd a thuar seacht gcinn den trí chúlú geilleagair deiridh. Is iad atá oilte ar fhigiúir a ionramháil is a shuathadh, ach ní féidir leo miosúr a chur ar fhairsinge an duine. Ba dhóigh leat gur leor gurb eacnamaithe a chum is a cheap mar leithscéal le neamhaird a dhéanamh ann, ach toisc é a bheith i ngob an phobail agus daoine ag tachtadh air, ní foláir pus a thabhairt air.
B é taighde é sin ná an ceann a dhein John Fitzgerald agus Edgar Morganroth a léirigh, dar leo, go gcosnódh athaontú an oileáin (gan trácht ar Thoraigh, ar Reachlainn, ar na hÁrannachaí, ar Inis Bigil, ar na Blascaoid bheannaithe ná Béarra, ar Gharinis agus ar Gharmna, ar Sceilg Mhichíl agus ar Sceilg na Scannán, ar eagla go ndéanfaí leathcheal ar oileán ar bith) suas is anuas le fiche billiún d airgead Ursula von der Leyen in aghaidh na bliana sa chás is go nascfaimis le chéile arís uair éigin amach anseo ar maidin.
B fhéidir go bhfuil an ceart acu, nó b fhéidir go gcosnódh sé a dhá oiread, a thrí oiread sin.
Nach cuma, agus nach róchuma?
Chum James Carville, comhairleoir Bill Clinton, nath a leathnaigh ó shin agus ar geall le halt creidimh é ag a lán:  Is í an eacnamaíocht í, a éagain!
Ní hí an eacnamaíocht í, a éagain, ar ais! Is cuimhin linn go léir, sinne atá níos críonna ná na trioblóidí, an mana simplí a bhíodh ann,  dá mbeimis (is é sin, an phoblacht, na sé chontae fichead, an saorstát) níos saibhre, níos rafaire, níos raimhre airgead ná iad siúd eile (an Tuaisceart, na sé chontaetha, Uladh thoir thuaidh) go mbeadh a mbundún Oráisteach á gcur amach acu gabháil isteach linne!  Bhuel, tá an taobh  ó dheas , níos fearr as go mór is go fada le glúin nó le dhá ghlúin anuas agus ní léir aon ghluaiseacht shimplí aontachtach anoir aduaidh i dtreo ceangail leis an deisceart in ainneoin go bhfuilimid níos fearr as feoirling ar fheoirling, euro ar euro, punt an rí ar phunt an rí. Dá ainneoin sin is uile, ní léir go bhfuil oiread sin in íochtar úd na tíre sásta glacadh le lira na Vatacáine nó le pingin an Phápa. Ní féidir a mhaíomh go bhfuil a ndílseacht don leathchoróin (nuair a bhí ann) seachas don choróin ríogúil, mar adeirtí le seanbhlas.
Is de shuimiúlacht dhoshéanta gur bheag an plé mionscagúil a déanadh ar staid eacnamaíochta na tíre seo nuair a bhí an díospóireacht mhór ar siúl roimh agus le linn chogadh na saoirse. Gabh ag tumadh leat go domhain sa cháipéisíocht uile, sna hóráidí uile, san áiteamh uile a bhain leis an suathadh mór gur dá bharr a gearradh Saorstát Éireann amach as an Ríocht Aontaithe le gunnaí scréach is le lámhach na bpiléar agus mún dreoilín in uiscí na bhfarraigí fairsinge an costas eacnamaíochta. Ní léir dom go raibh pearsa mhór phoiblí ar bith, ná leipreachán de chuid na linne ach an oiread, a d áitigh go mbeadh an tsaoirse inmholta ach nach mbeimis in ann íoc as.
Aisteach go leor, tar éis dom snámh ar bhóchna an phlé ar éileamh an neamhspleáchais sa Laitvia, sa Liotuáin, san Eastóin lenár linn, i dtíortha na hAfraice le ceithre scór bliain anuas, i gcríocha leathana na hÁise Bige is Móire gan trácht ar an dioscúrsa stairiúil nuair a bhíothas ag iarradh cosa na himpireachta a ardú ó bholg an domhain, níor léir mórán eacnamaithe ar nós Fitzgerald agus Morganroth ag fiafraí cad a chosnódh athrú réime ná an tsaoirse féin.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Toulouse power past Exeter to reach last four
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 558 words
Body


Five-time champions Toulouse booked their place in the semi-finals of the Champions Cup as they disposed of visiting Exeter Chiefs with a nine-try 64-26 victory at the Stade Ernest Wallon.
The French giants were made to fight in an end-to-end first half, but in the end their vast European experience proved too much for Rob Baxter s youthful side, who were denied the opportunity of an all-English semi-final with Harlequins.
It was the Chiefs who started on the front foot, taking the lead inside five minutes when Henry Slade slotted them in front with a penalty.
That early lead, however, lasted just a matter of minutes as Toulouse claimed the game s opening score when a burst down the left flank from Matthis Lebel carved the opening for Romain Ntamack to glide over for the try, converted by Blair Kinghorn.
A second Slade penalty kept the visitors firmly in the hunt, before fellow England international Ethan Roots got the Chiefs back in front once more, thundering his way over from a crafty tap penalty move, which Slade was able to add the extras to.
Kinghorn and Slade exchanged successful penalties apiece But, as half-time approached, it was the French side who clawed their way back in front.
Centre Pita Ahki was the architect, his powerful run shaking off the attentions of Josh Hodge, before he fed the ball to ack Willis, who steamrollered his way over Harvey Skinner for the converted score.
Although there was little to choose between the sides at the turn, it was Toulouse who came out firing in the second period. Playing with advantage just minutes into the half, the hosts used their powerful pack to punch their way into enemy territory, the fruits of which allowed Kinghorn to find his way over for the score he also converted.
Worse was to follow just moments later as Ahki was able to race over for their fourth score, the centre given the freedom of the field as he finished off a brilliant switch back to Lebel.
The quick one-two from Toulouse had left the Chiefs reeling, but they were floored by a knockout double as first Kinghorn finished off a stunning back move in the right corner, before Antoine Dupont got in on the scoring act, sidestepping his way  for another converted score.
To their credit, the Chiefs refused to go quietly, claiming a consolation score  through   Zack Wimbush.
That would, however, be a rare highlight in a second half dominated by Toulouse, who wrapped up their victory with tries in the final quarter from Ahki and two from Juan Cruz Mallia.
Northampton win
On Saturday,  Northampton feasted on a Bulls team weakened by the absence of their Springbok stars by registering a 59-22 victory at Franklin s Gardens that propelled them into the semi-finals.
Saints amassed nine tries, including two from England scrumhalf Alex Mitchell, to book an appointment with Leinster    the first time they have reached the last four since 2011.
What should have been a thunderous collision between the Gallagher Premiership leaders and the best team in South Africa instead turned into a procession as the Bulls paid the price for leaving out big names such as Willie le Roux, Canan Moodie and Kurt-Lee Arendse.
They blamed injury and their epic journey from Pretoria via eight different airlines and myriad routes for the omissions, but stood accused of devaluing the competition in order to prioritise the URC.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



TV week Monday to Sunday
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 828 words
Body


Monday (Apr 15th)
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, 12.40pm-2.30pm
Stage 1   Tour of the Alps
ATHLETICS  Eurosport 1, 2.30pm-5.15pm
Boston  Marathon
SOCCER   TNT Sports 1 (Serie A)
5.30pm   Fiorentina v Genoa
7.45pm   Atalanta v Hellas Verona
SOCCER   Sky Sports Premier League
8pm   Chelsea v Everton
  Tuesday (Apr 16th)
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, 12.35pm-2.30pm
Stage 2   Tour of the Alps
SOCCER   RTÉ 2 & TNT Sports 1 (CL Q-F)
8pm   Barcelona (3) v PSG (2)
SOCCER   TNT Sports 2 (CL Q-F)
8pm   B Dortmund (1) v At Madrid (2)
SOCCER   Sky Sports Football
8pm   C: Southampton v Preston
  Wednesday (Apr 17th)
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, 11.35am-1.30pm
Stage 3   Tour of the Alps
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, 1.30pm-5.15pm
Men & women Fleche Wallonne
SOCCER   Sky Sports PL & Showcase    Women s Super League
7pm   Chelsea v Aston Villa
SOCCER   VM Two & TNT Sports 1 (CL Q-F)
8pm   Man City (3) v Real Madrid (3)
SOCCER   TNT Sports 2 (CL Q-F)
8pm   B Munich (2) v Arsenal (2)
SOCCER   Sky Sports Football
8pm   SP: Dundee v Rangers
  Thursday (Apr 18th)
GOLF   Sky Sports Golf, 12.15pm-11pm
S Carolina  RBC Heritage
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, 12.35pm-2.30pm
Stage 4   Tour of the Alps
RACING   Virgin Media One, 1.10pm-4pm
Newmarket  Including the Craven Stakes
GOLF   Sky Sports Mix, 3-7pm, 11-1am
LPGA  Chevron Championship
SOCCER   TNT Sports 3 (ECL Q-F)
5.45pm   Lille (1) v Aston Villa (2)
DARTS   Sky Sports Action, 7pm-11pm
Rotterdam  Premier League
SOCCER   TNT Sports 4 (ECL & EL Q-Fs)
5.45pm   Fiorentina (0) v Vik Plzen (0)
8pm   Roma (1) v AC Milan (0)
SOCCER   TNT Sports 1 (EL Q-F)
8pm   Atalanta (3) v Liverpool (0)
SOCCER   TNT Sports 2 (EL Q-F)
8pm   W Ham (0) v B Leverkusen (2)
SOCCER   TNT Sports 5 (EL Q-F)
8pm   Marseille (1) v Benfica (2)
  Friday (Apr 19th)
F1    Sky Sports F1 from 4am
Practice   Chinese Grand Prix
GOLF   Sky Sports Golf, 12.15pm-11pm
Harbour Tn  RBC Heritage
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, 12.35pm-2.30pm
Final stage  Tour of the Alps
GOLF   Sky Sports Mix, 3-7pm, 11-1am
LPGA  Chevron Championship
RUGBY   TG4, BBC 2 & Premier 1 (URC)
7.35pm   Ulster v Cardiff
SOCCER   TNT Sports 1 (Serie A)
7.45pm   Cagliari v Juventus
SOCCER   RTÉ 2 (AL Premier Division)
7.45pm   Derry City v Shamrock Rrs
  Saturday (Apr 20th)
F1    Sky Sports F1 from 3.30am
Sprint & Q Chinese Grand Prix
SNOOKER  BBC 1 & 2, 10am-12, 1.45-4.30
   BBC Four, 7pm-9pm
   Eurosport 1, 10am-1, 2.25-10pm
Sheffield   World Championship
ATHLETICS  Virgin Media Two, noon-2pm
China   Diamond League
GOLF   Sky Sports Golf, noon-3pm
South Africa  Joburg Ladies  Open
SOCCER   Premier Sports 2 (S Cup S-F)
12.30pm   Aberdeen v Celtic
SOCCER   Sky Sports Football
12.30pm   C: Leicester City v West Brom
SOCCER   TNT Sports 2 (Women s CL S-F)
12.30pm   Barcelona v Chelsea
RUGBY   RTÉ 2 (URC)
2pm   Lions v Leinster
RUGBY   BBC 2 & VM One (Women s 6N)
2.15pm   England v Ireland
SOCCER   Premier 1 (Premier League)
3pm   Luton Town v Brentford
GOLF   Sky Sports Golf, 3pm-11pm
S Carolina  RBC Heritage
RUGBY   TNT Sports 1 (Premiership)
3.05pm   Northampton v Leicester
5.30pm   Exeter v Bath
RUGBY   RTÉ 2 & Premier Sports 2 (URC)
4.05pm   Bulls v Munster
RUGBY   BBC 1 Scotland (Women s 6N)
4.45pm   Italy v Scotland
SOCCER   BBC 1 & Premier 1 (FA Cup)
5.15pm   Man City v Chelsea
SOCCER   Sky Sports Football    Championship
5.15pm   QPR v Preston North End
SOCCER   Sky Sports Arena
5.30pm   Union Berlin v Bayern Munich
SOCCER   TNT Sports 3 (Women s CL S-F)
6pm   Lyon v PSG
GAA   RTÉ 2 & BBC 2 (Ulster SFC)
6.15pm   Derry v Donegal
GOLF   Sky Sports Mix, 7pm-11pm
LPGA  Chevron Championship
SOCCER   Sky Sports Premier League
7.30pm   Wolves v Arsenal
RUGBY   TG4 & Premier Sports 2 (URC)
7.35pm   Connacht v Zebre
  Sunday (Apr 21st)
F1    Sky Sports F1 from 7am
Shanghai  Chinese Grand Prix
ATHLETICS  BBC 1 from 8.30am
London  Marathon
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, 9.30am-11.30am
Stage 1   Tour of Turkey
SNOOKER  BBC 2 & 4, 10am-12.25, 7-9pm
   Eurosport 1, 6.45pm-10pm
Sheffield   World Championship
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, 11.30am-5.15pm
Men & women Liège-Bastogne-Liège
TENNIS   Sky Sports Tennis, noon-2pm
WTA   Final from Stuttgart
GOLF   Sky Sports Golf, noon-3pm
South Africa  Joburg Ladies  Open
SOCCER   Sky Sports Football
12.30pm   C: Blackburn v Sheffield Wed
SOCCER   Sky Sports Premier League
1.30pm   Everton v Nottingham Forest
4.30pm   Fulham v Liverpool
GAA   RTÉ 2
2pm   SH: Clare v Limerick
4pm   SF: Roscommon v Mayo
HORSE   TG4, 2.30pm-5.40pm
RACING  Tramore
SOCCER   Premier Sports 2 (S Cup S-F)
3pm   Rangers v Hearts
GOLF   Sky Sports Golf, 3pm-11pm
Harbour Tn RBC Heritage
RUGBY   TNT Sports 1 (Premiership)
3pm   Sale v Harlequins
TENNIS   Sky Sports Tennis, 3pm-5pm
ATP    Final from Barcelona
RUGBY   BBC 2 Wales (Women s 6N)
3.15pm   Wales v France
SOCCER   UTV & Premier 1 (FA Cup S-F)
3.30pm   Coventry City v Man Utd
GAA   BBC 2 (Ulster SFC)
4pm   Cavan v Tyrone
SOCCER   Sky Sports Football
4.30pm   B Dortmund v B Leverkusen
SOCCER   TNT Sports 1 (Ligue 1)
6pm   Toulouse v Marseille
8pm   PSG v Lyon
GOLF   Sky Sports Mix, 7pm-11pm
LPGA  Chevron Championship
SOCCER   LaLigaTV & Premier 1 (La Liga)
8pm   Real Madrid v Barcelona

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Ulster blown away in the second half
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 486 words
Body


Ulster s hopes of making the European Challenge Cup semi-finals were simply obliterated by a rampant Clermont who scored seven tries in what turned into a second-half rout at Stade Marcel-Michelin.
The northern province had no answer to the power Clermont brought to the contest and after trailing 20-14 at the break, the visitors went on to concede 33 unanswered points and fell well short in containing the uber physicality of Peceli Yato and Pita Gus Sowakula who scored two tries each.
 We weren t good enough and there s a lot of stuff we need to look at,  interim coach Richie Murphy admitted afterwards, Nick Timoney s two first-half tries not being added to by the province in a scoreless second 40 minutes.
The visitors had the ideal start when Timoney got on the ball after the province had opted for a tap and go under the Clermont posts, which John Cooney converted.
Six minutes later Clermont tied things up. A penalty put towards the corner led to a lineout, Baptiste Januneau made ground down the blindside before Yato was put through a gap to score. Anthony Belleau converted.
Belleau then put his side in front for the first time with a 28th-minute penalty and increased their lead shortly afterwards with another kick.
It soon became 20-7 for the home team when a penalty was put to the corner and from the lineout   Sowakula smashed his way over, which Belleau again converted.
But not long after a Sowakula tap tackle on Nathan Doak had saved a potential score. And with the clock in red, Ulster put a kickable penalty to the corner and from some muscular close-in work Timoney got through for his second, Cooney s conversion making it 20-14 at half-time.
Even though Belleau missed an early penalty he converted from a challenging angle after Alex Newsome scampered down the narrow side, the conversion taking the lead to 27-14.
From there, Ulster imploded. Sowakula mauled over for his second and Rob Simmons burst through off a lineout turnover. And it got worse, Yato went over again on 68 minutes, with Joris Jurand doing likewise in the final minute.
CLERMONT: A Newsome; B Delguy, L Darricarrere, J Heriteau, A Raka; A Belleau, B Jauneau (capt); G Beria, Y Beheregaray, R Slimani; T Lanen, T Lavanini; K Tixeront, P Yato, P- G Sowakula. Replacements: A Fischer for Tixeront (49 mins); E Fourcade for Beheregaray (50); D-B Biziwu for Beria, G Dzmanashvili for Slimani (53); R Simmons for Lanen (54); S Bezy for Jauneau (55); T Giral for Lavanini, J Jurand for Raka (both 67). ULSTER: S Moore; R Baloucoune, J Hume, S McCloskey, M Lowry; N Doak, J Cooney; S Kitshoff, R Herring, T O Toole; A O Connor, I Henderson (capt); H Sheridan, David McCann, N Timoney. Replacements: E McIlroy for Moore (5 mins); T Stewart for Herring (41); D Ewers for Henderson (42); S Wilson for O Toole (51}; Marcus Rea for Timoney (54); A Warwick for Kitshoff (55); C Izuchukwu for O Connor (64).  Referee: C Ridley (England).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Varadkar asked to investigate motion against former TD; Senior party member called for rules to be changed after no-confidence motion
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 671 words
Byline: JUSTINE McCARTHY
Body


JUSTINE McCARTHY
 A Fine Gael TD and party vice-president told then party leader Leo Varadkar the circumstances surrounding a motion of no-confidence in former Waterford deputy John Deasy five years ago should be investigated and, subject to the findings, the organisation should apologise to him, his staff and supporters.
John Paul Phelan, a TD for Carlow-Kilkenny and a member of Fine Gael s executive council, wrote to Mr Varadkar and John Carroll, party secretary general, last October describing the successful motion against Mr Deasy in June 2019 as  entirely irregular . Mr Phelan said  approximately 20 to 25 emails and letters  alleging  bullying and intimidation  in Waterford that were sent to Mr Varadkar, Mr Carroll and Simon Coveney, when he was the deputy leader, had gone unanswered.
 The idea that a cabal of disgruntled members can undermine an elected reps (sic) entire career and also bring reams of unfavourable local media coverage down on the party is unacceptable and frankly wildly outside the existing rules of the party,  noted Mr Phelan in the letter dated October 10th, 2023. A former junior minister at the Department of Housing, Planning and Local Government, he said the next ardfheis needed to amend party rules governing motions of no-confidence in TDs, senators, MEPs and local councillors.
Objections
The motion of no-confidence in Mr Deasy, who was a sitting TD and the government s envoy to the US Congress at the time, was proposed by Eoin Coffey, a brother of then senator Paudie Coffey, at a meeting in Dungarvan in June 2019. There was no advance notice of the motion and some members complained that their objections to it were  shouted down . Mr Deasy, who had informed Mr Varadkar the previous March that he would not be contesting the next general election in 2020, was not present.
After the motion of no confidence in him was passed, Mr Deasy made a complaint of bullying to Fine Gael headquarters. In September 2019, then secretary general Tom Curran told a meeting in Dungarvan the allegations had been investigated and no evidence was found to support them.
Seven members whose claims in writing were not responded to have withdrawn from active participation in the party.
Waterford s selection convention for Fine Gael s next Dáil elections takes place tonight in the city s Granville Hotel. The two candidates seeking selection are Senator John Cummins, who failed to take Mr Deasy s seat in 2020, and Cllr Declan Doocey.
The 2019 meeting had been called to discuss Fine Gael s poor local election results in Waterford the previous month. Mr Phelan had been the national director of those elections.
 I ve nothing to say on the Waterford issue,  said Mr Phelan when contacted by The Irish Times.
Resolution
This month s Fine Gael ardfheis approved a resolution tabled by the executive council to change the rules for motions of no confidence in its elected members, restricting them to  exceptional circumstances  and requiring  appropriate notice .
Under the new rules, only a constituency executive will be permitted to move such a motion.
Asked if the rule-change arose from the motion relating to Mr Deasy, a Fine Gael spokesman replied:  Following the 2020 general election, there was a review of a number of meetings held in advance of the same election. It was established there were no procedures for dealing with motions of no confidence or similar tabled in public representatives. Subsequently, a motion was proposed at this month s Fine Gael ardfheis and agreed by it that no-confidence motions could only be moved by a constituency executive and only in line with procedures set down by the Fine Gael executive council.
 Those procedures shall have regard to the fact that such motions should only be moved in exceptional circumstances and shall set down, amongst other matters, the requirements in terms of moving such a motion, the threshold for the passage of such a motion [and] the appropriate notice.
Mr Deasy, who was a Waterford TD for 18 years, declined to comment.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Wicklow let Kildare off the hook in madcap and frantic finale
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 5
Length: 829 words
Body


Oisín McConville called it gutting while Glenn Ryan wasn t quite sure how to sum it up. In a manic endgame, Jack Sargent proved to be the calmest man at O Moore Park as his point in the fifth minute of injury-time won this Leinster SFC quarter-final for 13-man Kildare.
Sargent s score came just seconds after Wicklow had squandered a glorious opportunity, with Matt Nolan kicking wide of an open goal at the other end of the pitch.
Kildare, who had Kevin Flynn sent off in the 30th minute, led 0-15 to 0-12 with the encounter in the second added minute of the four announced when Eoin Doyle was turned over in defence and the dispossession sent Kevin Quinn straight through on goal.
Doyle scampered back and cynically rugby tackled the Wicklow forward   in doing so the Kildare centre back conceded a penalty and received a black card.
Oisín McGraynor made no mistake with the penalty, drilling it beyond Mark Donnellan. Draw game, Kildare down to 13, and the wind in Wicklow s sails as they searched for back-to-back Leinster SFC victories for the first time since 1989.
Wicklow turned Kildare over again moments later, further out the field this time, and as they broke wing-back Nolan carried possession forward. History beckoned. Donnellan was way out of goal while Kildare were light on numbers back. But rather than carry the ball further forward, Nolan attempted to shoot for a goal from 45 metres out only for his effort to bounce agonisingly wide of the right post.
 In hindsight, we d all work it (in), but we had the same opportunity against Down, carried it and we butchered it. We said the next time we have the opportunity that if we turned the ball over would we have a go, so we ll all take responsibility for that one, it s not just one player,  said McConville.
Dropped dangerously Alex Beirne won the resulting kickout and the passage of play finished with a Kevin Feely skied a shot, his first mishit of the day, but the ball dropped dangerously in front of the Wicklow goal. Niall Kelly won it, offloaded to Sargent and the Kildare wing back fisted over from close range. Game over. The Wicklow players reacted to the final whistle with a synchronised collapse to the ground.
 It s gutting,  added McConville.  It s very difficult to know what to say to players.
It was a game Kildare had led from the eighth minute until McGraynor s injury-time penalty, and yet at the final whistle it felt like a win they had snatched.
 Hard to put into words really,  stated a relieved Ryan.  But the one thing you d take out of it is that it could have been very easy after the few months we ve had, and after the way the last couple of minutes went from our own perspective, for fellas to sit back and say,  Well, not again, here we go  and let it happen.
The Lilywhites played with the wind in the first half and their high press on Shane Doyle s kickouts had Wicklow struggling to retain possession on their restarts.
Feely was hugely influential, he brought a calmness to Kildare s play and finished the game with 0-7, four of his left, three of his right.
The impressive Niall Kelly floated over a couple of neat points midway through the half and Kildare led 0-8 to 0-5 in the 30th minute when they were reduced to 14 men.
Kevin Flynn arrived late and with a high to catch Patrick O Keane on the left side of his face, leaving referee Seán Lonergan with little option but to brandish a red card.
Kildare were 0-9 to 0-7 ahead at the break but Wicklow appeared to have taken the momentum. However, to Kildare s credit they grabbed the initiative back by scoring the first three points of the second half - Paddy Woodgate, Feely and Kelly all on target.
Woodgate had replaced the injured Daniel Flynn just before the break, and Kildare also lost their captain Mick O Grady to injury during the opening period. Unfortunately for Wicklow, a heavy shower during half-time saw the wind fade away, but they did rally to keep it a one-score game entering injury-time when in a madcap finale Sargent had the last word.
KILDARE: Mark Donnellan; Ryan Burke, Shea Ryan, Mick O Grady; Jack Sargent (0-1), Eoin Doyle, Paddy McDermott; Aaron Masterson (0-1), Kevin Flynn; Shane Farrell, Niall Kelly (0-3), Alex Beirne; Kevin Feely (0-7, five frees), Darragh Kirwan (0-2), Daniel Flynn. Subs: Brian Byrne for O Grady (inj) (24 mins); Paddy Woodgate (0-2, one free) for D Flynn (inj) (35 +3 mins); Tony Archbold for McDermott (61 mins); Harry O Neill for Byrne (inj) (64 mins); Shane O Sullivan for Farrell (70 mins). WICKLOW: Shane Doyle; Tom Moran (0-1), Malachy Stone, Cillian McDonald; Darragh Fee (0-1), Patrick O Keane (0-1), Matt Nolan; Craig Maguire, Jack Kirwan; Jonathan Carlin, Dean Healy (0-2), Gavin Fogarty; John Paul Nolan (0-1), Kevin Quinn (0-2, two frees), Christopher O Brien (0-2). Subs: Gearóid Murphy (0-1) for Carlin (33 mins); Oisín McGraynor (1-1, 1-0 pen, one free)for Maguire (62 mins); Joe Prendergast for Kirwan (70 mins).  Referee: Seán Lonergan (Tipperary).

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Zelenskiy calls on Congress to approve aid
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 418 words
Byline: DANIEL McLAUGHLIN
Body


DANIEL McLAUGHLIN
in Kyiv
 Ukraine urged the US Congress to approve provision of long-delayed military aid after Germany pledged to send another Patriot air defence system to the embattled country and its top general said his troops were under mounting pressure in the east.
Ukrainian president Volodymyr Zelenskiy condemned Iran s massive air attack on Israel yesterday, and said his compatriots  know very well the horror of similar attacks by Russia, which uses the same Shahed drones and Russian missiles .
 The sound of Shahed drones, a tool of terror, is the same in the skies over the Middle East and Europe. This sound must serve as a wake-up call to the free world . . . The world cannot wait for discussions to go on. Words do not stop drones and do not intercept missiles. Only tangible assistance does,  he added.
 It is critical that the United States Congress make the necessary decisions to strengthen America s allies at this critical time.
Republican congressmen loyal to former US president Donald Trump have for months blocked a White House request for $60 billion (EUR 56 billion) in new military aid for Kyiv, even as Russia has destroyed much of Ukraine s energy grid, pounded cities such as Kharkiv, and continued a creeping advance in the eastern Donetsk region.
Russia has launched hundreds of Iranian-supplied Shahed explosive drones at Ukrainian cities and infrastructure during 26 months of all-out war, and Mr Zelenskiy said that  the obvious collaboration between the two regimes in spreading terror must face a resolute and united response from the world .
Ukraine is frustrated by the refusal of allies to supply more arms, even as they publicly profess to be ready to do whatever it takes to ensure that Russia s invasion fails.
German chancellor Olaf Scholz announced on Saturday that his country was providing Kyiv with another US-built Patriot air defence system, which has shot down even Russia s most advanced ballistic missiles over Ukraine.
 Russian terror against Ukrainian cities and the country s infrastructure is causing immeasurable suffering,  said German defence minister Boris Pistorius.  It is jeopardising people s energy supply and destroying the operational readiness of the Ukrainian armed forces.
Mr Zelenskiy thanked Mr Scholz and said Ukraine also hoped to secure another advanced Iris-T air defence system and more missiles from Germany.
Moscow urged restraint after Iran s missile and drone barrage against Israel, but rejected Israeli calls to condemn the attack.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



An orange card, anyone?
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 4
Length: 116 words
Body


BBC NI pundit Philly McMahon  got plenty of grief last week for his decision to award Man of the Match to Rory Beggan, who conceded three goals, in the Cavan v Monaghan match but he doubled down on it in his newspaper column on Saturday ( there s no retrospective angst, no buyer s remorse, from this pundit ).
Yesterday, the former Dublin star was back on co-comms, this time for Fermanagh v Armagh in the Ulster quarter-final.
After a high, late tackle by Jarly Óg Burns on Fermanagh captain Declan McCusker, right, lead commentator Thomas Niblock asked him his thoughts.
Niblock:  You think that s a yellow?
McMahon:  Ehhh  well if there was a colour in between yellow and red.
An orange card, anyone?

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Bayer Leverkusen secure maiden Bundesliga title
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 10
Length: 155 words
Body


Bayer Leverkusen sealed a maiden Bundesliga title in style as Florian Wirtz s hat-trick wrapped up a comfortable 5-0 win over Werder Bremen.
Against a backdrop of expectation and cauldron of noise at the BayArena, Xabi Alonso s side extended their unbeaten streak this season to 43 matches to end Bayern Munich s run of 11 successive league titles.
Victor Boniface eased any nerves in the stadium with a 25th-minute penalty. Leverkusen were thwarted until Granit Xhaka curled home a left-foot strike from 25 yards on the hour to effectively end any hope of Bremen spoiling the party.
Wirtz, introduced on the stroke of half-time, then rifled high into the net from a similar distance midway through the second half and a brief pitch invasion followed when he bagged his second in the 83rd minute after going clean through on goal.
He had his treble with a fine finish, the last kick of the match which sparked another pitch invasion.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Beers and a dark horse
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 38 words
Body


Sir,   On a visit to Kerry in the early 1970s, I recall that in Winnie Hurley-O Connor s licensed establishment in Sneem, you could   order a quarter-pint of Guinness called a  pony .   Yours, etc,
DAVID MILNE,
Glengarriff,
Co Cork.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Champions Cup semi-finals
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 1
Length: 43 words
Body


Saturday, May 4th Leinster v Northampton Saints, Croke Park, 5.30pm Live on RTÉ/TNT Sports  Sunday, May 5th Toulouse v Harlequins Le Stadium, Toulouse, 4pm  (Irish time) Live on TNT Sports   Final (Saturday, May 25th) Tottenham Hotspur Stadium, London, 2.45pm.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Champions Trophy line-up complete
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 10
Length: 105 words
Body


The line-up for the Champions Trophy quarter-finals is complete after the conclusion of the EY Hockey League on Saturday, Catholic Institute, Pembroke Wanderers, UCD and Old Alexandra in to the last eight with champions Loreto and runners-up Railway Union having already secured their places in the semi-finals.
At the other end of the table, Pegasus staved off relegation with a 2-1 win over Corinthian, Monkstown, with whom they were level on points going in to the final game, going down after losing to Railway.
Loreto had long since wrapped up the title and finished their campaign undefeated with a 3-1 victory over Alexandra.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Dugarry puts the boot into Mbappé
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 7
Length: 165 words
Body


 The chef always used to put out a  bowl of harissa on the table. Balotelli thought it was tomato sauce and began plastering it over his pasta. Us other players thought:  That s hot stuff    and he s taken a lot of it.  Inside five minutes he was weeping and the sweat was pouring down his face. We were crying with laughter   it was exceptional.    Mario Balotelli s former Marseille team-mate Florian Thauvin on yet another  why always me?  moment in his career.
  He showed the worst attitude that a top player can have. His behaviour is simply scandalous. He spat in the face of the Champions League. He was an absolute disgrace. I did not think that this boy could fall this low.    Apart from that, Christophe Dugarry thought Kylian Mbappé did quite well for PSG against Barcelona last week.
  Erling Haaland was very bad. If he doesn t score, he s quite useless.     Apart from that, Rafael van der  Vaart thought Haaland did quite  well for Manchester City against  Real Madrid last week.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Keep cups
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 77 words
Body


Sir,       Unlike Paul McDermott (Letters, April 10th), I search out the businesses that encourage the use of a  keep cup . I  bring it wherever I can, even on my bike spins, and thus obviate the extra cost of the disposable cup. This also avoids the collection of tons of throwaway waste, much of it ending up as litter on our roads. The Government should have a mandatory scheme   for all businesses, as promised   years ago.   Yours, etc,
DONAL DEERING,
Kilkenny.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Man arrested after body found in Naas
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 166 words
Byline: COLM KEENA
Body


COLM KEENA  A man has been arrested following the discovery of a man s body in a residence in a housing estate in Naas, Co Kildare,
yesterday afternoon.
The body has been removed to Naas General Hospital and a postmortem is expected to take place this afternoon, the results of which will determine the course of the Garda investigation, the Garda Press Office said in a statement. The scene is being preserved for technical examination.
 Discovered
 Gardaí are investigating all the circumstances surrounding the discovery of a body in Naas, Co Kildare, on the afternoon of Sunday April 14th 2024,  the office said.  The body of a man was discovered at approximately 1.30pm at a residence in Eustace Demesne in Naas.
No details about the approximate age of the deceased or the nature of any injuries were available.
Gardaí said a man in his 40s, who had been arrested as part of the investigation, was being detained in a Garda station in Co Kildare under Section 4 of the Criminal Justice Act 1984.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Murtagh and Keogh take World Cup silver in Italy
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 10
Length: 156 words
Body


Irish crews picked up two medals at the World Cup rowing event in Italy yesterday, with Fiona Murtagh and Aifric Keogh winning silver in the women s pair final on Lago di Varese, as Philip Doyle and Daire Lynch took bronze in the men s double.
Up against reigning world champions Veronique Meester and Ymkje Clevering of the Netherlands, the crew from Galway were happy with their medal.
 It s our second event since Worlds, our second event in the pair together so we re constantly learning and this is a good start to the Olympic year  said Murtagh.
The men s double of Doyle and Lynch are also coming home with silverware after winning bronze. Just squeezing past the German crew into third position coming to the line, they finished behind the Netherlands and Italy
The women s four crew of Emily Hegarty, Natalie Long, Eimear Lambe and Imogen Magner had to settle for fourth, with Sanita Puspure coming home in fifth in the women s single.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



National End of Life survey findings
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 129 words
Body


Sir,   Should the report  on the National End of Life survey findings, headed  More than one in ten who lost loved ones say their end-of-life care was fair to poor  (News, April 11th), not in fact be headed  Almost nine in ten who lost loved ones say their end-of-life care was good or very good ? There continue to be shortcomings and areas where palliative and end-of-life care must improve, but the quality of care has improved very significantly in recent years, a point reflected in the survey s findings. The survey was conducted by the National Care Experience Programme, a joint initiative of the Health Information and Quality Authority, the HSE and the Department of Health.   Yours, etc,
MARK BRENNOCK,
National Director
Communications,
HSE Communications,
Dublin 8.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Online renovations
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 98 words
Body


Sir,   Viewing the recent  improvements  to your online letters page, one could be forgiven for believing that you had been invaded by a gremlin armed with Adobe Illustrator. Adjacent to the newly designated  Letter of the Day , we find an illustration that takes up roughly half of the screen. Every other letter, too, is now accompanied by an overpowering illustration, to no apparent end. In my humble opinion, these images detract from your pages, and the  Letter of the Day  would be better served by being denoted with elegant restraint.   Yours, etc,
 ROBERT LEONARD,
Montevecchia,
Italy.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



Strengthening local government
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 189 words
Body


A chara,   I was interested to read Paul Gillespie s article about local government and local elections in Ireland ( Overworked, older and mostly male: Ireland has Europe s weakest local government , Opinion & Analysis, April 13th). I found myself nodding along as I read it. The points raised might be more suitable to cover in the run-up to the next general election.
It is national politicians and government who have power to reform local government. I hope that there ll be serious media coverage of local government reform when the people are next asked to elect TDs. We lowly councillors will continue to exercise those functions bestowed on us by central government.
Reform or not, I m still looking forward to local election media coverage focusing on what councillors actually do in our roles. We will also continue to proudly advocate for our constituents in areas we have no direct control over, as most councillors do this role out of a desire to do right by our communities. At a quarter the remuneration of a backbench TD, it s certainly not for the money!   Is mise,
Cllr OISÍN O CONNOR,
Green Party,
Ballinteer,
Dublin 16.

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 15, 2024 Monday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 10 words
Body


Other weekend results   France 38 Italy 15; Scotland 0 England 46

Load-Date: April 14, 2024


End of Document



'Botched' dermal filler leaves woman with physical and emotional scars; 'Every Tom, Dick and Harry is injecting people's faces at the moment. It has to stop'
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 502 words
Body


Five years after having what she calls a  botched  dermal filler procedure in a beauty salon,  Elaine  says she has scars on both sides of her face.
 It looks like a game of Xs and Os on one side,  says the woman, aged in her 30s, who was admitted to hospital some days after she had had the fillers. She had them in a bid to counter what she believed were her  flat  cheeks.
Dermal fillers, which contain injectable hyaluronic acid and can be legally administered in Ireland without a professional qualification, are used to plump up the face, targeting cheekbones, jawline and lips.
In hospital, Elaine (a pseudonym as she did not wish to be identified) says staff tried to convince her that the swellings, which she described as  like two eggs under my skin on each side , were hard mass.
 Eventually they cut open the sides of my face and there was projectile pus all over the room,  she recalls. Even after being leaving the hospital, where she was given a dose of IV antibiotics, Elaine says she continued to suffer and her face swelled.
When she went to see consultant dermatologist Prof Caitriona Ryan some months after the procedure, she had abscesses on her face.  Prof Ryan could feel that there was still filler in my face.  The dermatologist removed the remaining filler and prescribed antibiotics.
The woman, who has done some modelling in the past, admits that she would still consider having fillers but only from a dermatologist such as Prof Ryan.
 I feel very strongly about this. I don t think anyone other than doctors and nurses should be allowed to put a needle near anyone s face.
 You hit the wrong place in the face and it kills a nerve. You can be left with serious long-term damage to your face, your self-esteem, your confidence.
She says that low self-esteem was a factor in her having the dermal fillers that caused her so much pain. She was going through a hard time after a relationship broke up and she had lost a lot of weight.
 I had lost a lot of volume in my cheeks. I was barely a size 6. I was on antidepressants. My confidence was down.
The night she had the fillers, she knew she was in trouble.  It got very red and hot and sore.
After a few days the filler looked like it was  dropping down into my neck below the jawline .
She couldn t go to work as she was so self-conscious about her face. She knows now that she had too much filler injected.
 A lot of clinics do packages to draw you in with a set price for a large amount of filler. I had 5-6ml of filler in one sitting. Looking back, that was not a good idea.
She has had Botox since and says she finds it hard to countenance  growing old gracefully  even though she is still under 40.
 I have always taken care of my appearance. I did quite a bit of modelling and I keep comparing myself to younger girls in their photos.
But she says the lack of control when it comes to who can inject fillers is dangerous.
 It is getting out of control. Every Tom, Dick and Harry is injecting people s faces at the moment. It has to stop.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



'Hurling counties should go out on their own'; Coming up on 80 years of age, Babs Keating remains a force of nature unafraid of pulling hard off the pitch
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 4
Length: 1383 words
Body


It wouldn t be unusual for Michael  Babs  Keating, of a random midweek day, to get in his car and make the short trip from his home in Kildare to Johnny Murtagh s stables on the edge of the Curragh gallops.
His daughter, Orla, or Johnny, his son-in-law, are usually knocking about. Either way, most mornings he ll swim a mile in the pool and there tends to be racing on TV in the afternoons. Invariably, no day will pass without talk of hurling or football or both.
He s not convinced the Tipp hurlers have the stuff to go all the way this year, but more than anything he finds himself growing increasingly concerned about the state of the GAA; where it s going, what it stands for, who it represents.
No intercounty activity in August or September, the tinkering with the age grades and what he sees as the ostracization of older people by the GAA, none of it sits well with him. And then there s hurling.
 I m saying it loud and clear, the first thing hurling counties should do is break from Croke Park and run their own association.
 Hurling is treated as a second-class citizen and it s never going to get enough support in the current arrangement, because football dominates in terms of votes. Hurling counties should go out on their own and do so immediately.
This is Babs at 80.
After all these years, he remains a force of nature.
Even within the pantheon of the game, mononyms are reserved for only a select few. Ring, Mackey, Henry, that s the kind of rarefied air he shares. He s a living icon.
His broad frame remains, and you still get the impression that if Babs Keating hit you, you d stay hit.
But the truth is, these days, he s just grateful to be here. In 2020 Babs received a bleak cancer diagnosis.
In the preceding years he had been dealing with various aches and pains, including a banjaxed shoulder which ended his golfing days. The shoulder pain lingered. In August 2020 he met Dr Pat O Neill, and the former Dublin manager said he d have a look at it.
O Neill spotted something of concern when Babs removed his shirt, a black circle in the centre of his back, about the size of an egg. His wife, Nancy, had been telling Babs for ages to get it checked out, but he d procrastinated.
He went in for surgery the following week but subsequently his entire back became inflamed. The medical team were concerned.
 I sat in front of the specialist and he said,  Look, you ve a serious problem, I m not sure you ll be here in 12 months.
  Come back at 6.30 tomorrow morning, we re going to put you in a chamber until the team determine the source of this and I ll operate straight away.
It was several long weeks of worry before the results returned.
 The surgeon put his head in the door and said,  I ll cut out the small talk, you re one of the lucky ones.
 It was such a relief. I owe a lot to Dr Pat O Neill and to Denis Lawlor and Professor Murray in the Mater. I also found great strength during that period from the blessings of Father Anthony of the Carmelites in Kildare. I m so grateful to everybody who helped me and thankful that I m still here today.
It was during the Swinging Sixties that Babs became a household name. He won his first All-Ireland hurling medal in 1963, with the Tipp intermediates.
A senior hurling All-Ireland followed in September 1964, and one month later he added an under-21 medal. During that time he also played with the Tipp under-21 and senior footballers, laying the foundations of what would be an exceptional dual career.
A broken hand denied him gametime in 1965 but he was on the bench for that All-Ireland SHC final and won a second senior medal. He collected his third in 1971.
The Irish Times headline following Tipperary s All-Ireland semi-final win over Galway that August declared:  Keating Puts Tipperary In Command . He scored 2-12 that day.
But if he was celebrated before the 1971 final, events that afternoon immortalised him.
In the days before that decider, his gear bag was robbed from inside the door of a local hotel and Babs had to dig out an old pair of football boots, which he took to a cobbler for some repairs.
About 10 minutes into the second half of the final, he felt a sharp jab on the bottom of his foot   a nail had come up through the sole of the boot. He pulled the boot off, but that left him lopsided, so the other one was also sacrificed. The socks, straining off his feet, went next.
Michael O Hehir namechecked him in commentary as  the barefooted wonder . In an instant, a legend was born and that iconic moment forever elevated Babs Keating from hurler to a sort of mystical storybook character.
 Michael O Hehir made me more famous than I was entitled to be. Sure, it was utter stupidity,  he smiles.
 People still come up to me saying they remember watching me play barefoot in Cork or Limerick or somewhere else, which never happened, the story just took off.
Tipp didn t win another Liam MacCarthy until 1989   this time with Keating as manager. He led them to victory again in 1991.
 They were great times but it wasn t easy, when I took charge the county board didn t have a shilling.
So, he started the Tipperary Supporters Club and their first major fundraiser was to raffle a horse. Trips were made to New York, Boston, London. At one stage, a call came from Highbury, Niall Quinn confirming he d offloaded 20 tickets and providing the names of the various Arsenal players who had just invested in Tipp hurling.
But other later intercounty management ventures didn t prove as positive. Keating s spell as Offaly boss ended prematurely, and in controversy, after his  sheep in a heap  comments.
 I was working for Esso in the area at the time and when the opportunity came up to manage Offaly it seemed to make sense,  recalls Babs.  But I should have considered it in more depth before committing. Looking back on it now, it was one of my mistakes.
And returning to manage Tipp in late 2005 was another.
 Huge regrets there, huge. There were disciplinary issues I tried to deal with but when I did suddenly the support from most of the board disappeared. If I was to do it all over, I wouldn t have gone back to manage Tipp, no.
On the broader picture, he sees the swift and rigid move to online ticketing as the GAA demonstrating a complete disregard for older people.
 It s not right, that kind of sh*t, there s none of our generation want to get in for nothing, we ll pay for a ticket, all the GAA have to do is put somebody outside the gate.
 Having only online ticketing is such a barrier for so many older people. It s a dangerous road we are going down if we are driving off and seemingly prepared to leave those people behind.
 And playing the All-Ireland finals in July, we are giving away two months of summer. And for what gain? Pat Spillane recently said it s lunacy, and he s right, it s stone f**king crazy.
As for the weight of the sliotar, don t get him started.
You wonder why he still cares so much? The night Tipp won the 2020 Munster SFC, on the anniversary of Bloody Sunday, Keating shed a tear. His granduncle, Tom Ryan, had played in November 1920. For better or for worse, he s rooted to the games.
Babs and Nancy moved to Kildare almost five years ago. There s a small family gathering planned next week to celebrate his 80th birthday.
He s a proud grandfather of seven. Grace and Lauren won an All-Ireland intermediate football title with Kildare last August. Tom has played under-18 rugby for Ireland while Bella plays camogie with the Kildare under-14s.
And where would he be without Nancy.
 We ve had a great life together, we have a great family, great friends. I ve been very lucky,  he says.
With the days brightening up, they ll soon make for Rosslare for a chunk of the summer where Babs will swap the swimming pool for the Irish Sea.
 I don t know where the years have gone, but if I was told 20 years ago that I d be in the form I am, and have the life I have at 80, especially after the health scare, I would have gladly taken it.
The hurling championship begins next weekend but the Tipp footballers lost their opener to Waterford last Sunday. The outlook is grim. But Babs reckons traditional football powerhouse Fethard are developing quality players again and he already knows of several tidy footballers on this year s minor team.
 There s always hope,  he smiles.
Ain t that the truth.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



'I have women in their 60s and 70s watching TikTok fads'; 'Sunscreen contouring', 'freckling' and DIY chemical peels are among the concerning trends people are absorbing online
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 1443 words
Body


Consultant dermatologist Nicola Ralph estimates that she spends at least 50 per cent of her working day  diagnosing skin cancers and then taking them off .
In an era when many experts worry that frequent social media use is leading to unrealistic body image ideals, she and her colleague Prof Caitriona Ryan, have reason to be worried about what their patients are absorbing online.
With skin cancer, the most common cancer in Ireland with more than 13,000 cases a year, they are very exercised about widely viewed TikTok videos, promoting a beauty trend known as  sunscreen contouring .
 It is highly concerning,  said Prof Ralph of the advice to only apply sunscreen to certain parts of the face, leaving other parts unprotected in order to achieve that sought after  sun-kissed  glow.
 But really it is causing intentional sunburn and sun damage which is just going to lead to skin cancer,  said the clinical assistant professor at University College Dublin.
Online platforms are providing a dizzying amount of information about everything from the ability of snail secretions to hydrate the skin, to the reasons some people are injecting DNA derived from salmon sperm beneath their eyes.
The two medics, who founded the Institute of Dermatologists and are also based at the Blackrock Clinic, find some of the trends more worrying than others.
Zoom boom
Prof Ralph became aware of sunscreen contouring during the 2020 lockdowns   a time when unhappiness at how people looked on Zoom prompted some to investigate a range of cosmetic interventions, including dermal fillers and Botox, a development known in the beauty industry as  the zoom boom .
 The biggest source of skincare and beauty education now is TikTok especially in our younger generation,  said Prof Ryan.  But I have women in their 60s and 70s watching TikTok and coming in talking about all of these new fads. So it is something we cannot ignore as dermatologists. There are lots of strange things that they are doing.
None stranger than  freckling  whereby, according to Prof Ralph, a sharp instrument, usually a home sewing needle,  sterilised or unsterilised , is used to apply a semi-permanent pigment tattoo across the cheeks and nose to mimic the effect of freckles.
 It has resulted in scars and infection. People usually buy the dye on eBay so they have no idea what exactly it is or where it has come from,  she said.
Although she has not come across any patient in her clinic who has tried this, TikTok features a number of freckling videos that have generated some bemusement from young people whose natural freckles caused them severe angst in the past.
 The same people who bullied me for having freckles are now getting them tattooed for an aesthetic,  wrote one.
Another online fad, which Prof Ryan despairs of, are DIY chemical peels where viewers are shown how to  make up their own concoctions, and peel their skin, using high concentration of acid and other things . The capacity for this to go horribly wrong cannot be overstated, she said, with a real risk that these home-administered peels could cause burns and scarring.
Other influencers  videos promote the use of ice on the face to banish puffiness and reduce inflammation.  But you can cause an ice cube burn because ice can numb the skin and then they don t feel the pain of the burn,  said Prof Ryan.  We tell people not to use direct ice, to wrap it in a cloth.
Selene Daly, a Sligo-based advanced nurse practitioner and life coach, describes TikTok and other online platforms as  the wild west  and said the voices there  are louder than any nurse s voice, or any parent s voice .
Having spent most of her career focused on dermatology, she too is horrified at the impact online platforms and influencers are having especially on young people when it comes to beauty treatments and cosmetic procedures.
Last Christmas she knows of parents who bought a very expensive brand of  non-age appropriate  creams for their children which had been heavily promoted online and which contain retinol.  Retinol gets rid of dead skin cells. I use it because I am 45. The irony is these young people are being sold an anti-ageing product, when they are under the age of 18 which is absolutely ridiculous, especially as they need that layer of skin for sun protection.
 But the other aspect of this is about self-esteem and the emotional intelligence of young people when it comes to how they look. Their body image is completely skewed and nobody is doing anything to protect these young girls.
Urgent action
It is six years since Prof Ryan wrote a letter to the then minister for health Simon Harris appealing to him to take urgent action to prevent non-medically trained individuals from injecting dermal fillers, into the faces of their clients, a practice that is still widespread in beauty salons around the country. Dermal fillers that contain injectable hyaluronic acid, are used to plump up the face, targeting cheekbones, jawline and lips as well as  fine lines .
 This practice is alarming, as inadvertent injection of a dermal filler into an artery of the face can result in blindness or necrosis of tissue of the face,  Prof Ryan and colleague Rosemary Coleman, warned the Minister.
They pointed out that when things go wrong the only remedy is an immediate jab of hyaluronidase, a regulated prescription injection (which can cause anaphylaxis in those allergic to bee stings), and which can only be injected by physicians. Although only doctors and dentists can administer Botox which is classed as a  medicine , fillers are considered a device and, according to Prof Ryan, not just in Ireland but across the EU it is still legal for anyone to administer them.
 You could go on eBay, order fillers and inject them into your friends  faces and you will be doing nothing illegal,  she said.  I worry for the more impressionable girls and young women who I regard as most vulnerable. Maybe they cannot afford to go to the more reputable clinics so they go to beauty salons or maybe even get someone to come to their homes. They are injecting fillers in people s bedrooms and kitchens.
Prof Ryan, an associate clinical professor at University College Dublin, believes  filler face  became endemic in Ireland in recent years.
 I have seen a dramatic increase in this overfilled appearance, particularly in women in their 40s to 60s over the past four to five years in Ireland. This often distorts natural beauty, and in my opinion, ages a lot of women.
But in the past year or so she said that  thankfully the pendulum has begun to swing back  as people opt for a more natural look and are choosing tightening procedures that stimulate their own collagen, rather than fillers.
Meanwhile, Daly believes that both young men and women are being targeted by the so-called influencers.  With boys it is all about their muscle mass, looking a certain way, teeth whitening and so,  she said.
Figures released by the Health Products Regulatory Authority (HPRA) recently confirmed that almost 30 per cent of the illegal medicines it seized in 2023 were anabolic steroids, with over a quarter of a million units detained.
Grainne Power, director of compliance with the HPRA, said there appeared to be a willingness among some consumers to take risks in sourcing falsified medicines and unauthorised substances  for aesthetic and body image purposes  and she noted the 20 per cent rise in seizures of illegal anabolic steroids.  We believe young men in particular may be sourcing anabolic steroids for body enhancement while being unaware of the serious health complications posed by these products , citing potential side effects including heart failure, liver issues, kidney damage and infertility.
In a statement on the regulation of dermal fillers, the HPRA said it had no role in regulating the administration or the users of the fillers. It pointed out that under regulations introduced last June governing medical devices, dermal fillers had to be labelled as not to be used by under-18s and to be administered by  appropriately trained healthcare professionals .
The HPRA said it was continuing to engage with the Department of Health on regulation and had submitted a policy document to the department.
A department spokesman said it was currently considering the regulation of dermal fillers in Ireland and  has discussed the matter with stakeholders, including the HPRA .
According to TikTok it does not allow content showing or promoting dangerous activities and challenges, and it does not allow misinformation,  including medical misinformation , that can be harmful to health.
Young men compete in a game of beauty ideals,      Magazine

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



'Japandi' makeover in Raheny
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: NO SECTION; Pg. 1
Length: 851 words
Body


When you stand outside this 1940s semidetached house in Raheny, it s clear that refurbishment work has been done, but that doesn t prepare you for the dramatic transformation that lies behind the front door.
The eye is immediately drawn to the garden that lies at the end of the light- filled, spacious kitchen and living area. Previously, there was a modest kitchen and separate livingroom, but now the living area is a large and welcoming space, capable of comfortably hosting up to 40 people for family get-togethers.
The house needed some love and attention when the couple with two young children bought it in 2017. They replaced windows and added insulation to make it habitable, and then took a deep breath while they planned the big refurbishment.
Their main priority was to create a warm and welcoming kitchen with an area for the children to play in, and a separate sittingroom and downstairs toilet. At that stage, it was a three-bedroom house and they wanted to add another bedroom which would include an office to facilitate working from home.
While flicking through a magazine, their eye was caught by a house designed by Jim Lawler of MeltedSnow Architects, and they decided to meet him. He specialises in residential projects in the Dublin area and says his emphasis is on contemporary and sensible energyefficient design.
 This project was all about creating a design that would transform the house for modern family life,  he says. As soon as he stepped into the home, he knew that the large south facing garden would be central to the plan. It was 25 metres long, and is still a substantial garden, even after losing seven metres to the new kitchen and living area.
 The existing house was in need of refurbishment and modernisation and the layout was inadequate and undersized for the family s requirements,  he says. Together they decided on a broken-plan kitchen and dining area, with the living area on a lower level overlooking the garden.
 This broken plan arrangement offers different experiences in the one space,  he explains.
 The location of the lounge area set slightly away from the kitchen means it is quieter and also capitalises on the peaceful view of the garden. Someone cooking in the kitchen will not impinge on someone relaxing in the lounge.
The large, black-framed sliding doors in the kitchen and living area give access to the two patio levels and the split-level design continues into the garden with a sunken lounge.
Open-plan area
The overall feel of the kitchen and living area, with its clean lines and a neutral palette of materials, was described by one visitor as Japandi   a blend of Japanese and Scandinavian design styles. And while the homeowners liked the idea of an open-plan area for all the family to enjoy, they also saw the need for a separate livingroom at the front of the house. The dark chestnut pink walls give it a snug and cosy feel, ideal for relaxing in the evening.
The single-storey garage made way for a new utility room and bathroom.
Upstairs, a dormer roof extension provides a spare bedroom and bathroom and doubles as a home office.
One of the homeowners  favourite elements of the renovation is the comfortable living environment, thanks to the deep retrofit completed by Churchfield Home Services. Underfloor heating, a heat pump, added insulation and some triple glazing all combine to give the house its A2 BER rating.
Modernising a semidetached house for a growing family is a common renovation project and it comes with a familiar challenge, according to Jim Lawler. As anyone who has ever watched RTÉ s Room to Improve will know, it s all about the budget. He says the challenge lies in delivering the design vision while keeping within the budget. Those sudden shocks that occur when an additional EUR 10,000 needs to be found might provide good television, but it is something he goes to great pains to avoid.
 This is achieved by advance planning along with very regular meetings and communication regarding agreed and ongoing cost items,  he says.  It is crucial that all parties are aware of any cost variations or extras that may occur during the project works. Working with your architect and possibly a QS [quantity surveyor], depending on the scope of the works, ensures that any budget issues are avoided.
Budget
True to his word, this project, which involved local builders Ballyfarna Construction, did not go over budget. And luckily for the owners, no nasty surprises ambushed them mid-build.
 The project was a great success and a lot of this was down to the synergy between the homeowner, builder and architect,  he says.  We knew from the start what we wanted to achieve and we kept focused on this throughout the project.
The homeowners are now looking forward to sliding those patio doors open and spending as much time as possible in the garden with their children this summer.
 I m delighted my clients now have the home that they wanted   large enough to fulfil the requirements of their growing family along with being a bright, contemporary space that maximises the potential of their south-facing garden,  he says.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



'My boyfriend and I get into horrible fights, can we learn to argue better?'
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 32
Length: 1256 words
Body


Dear Roe, I m a woman and have been with my boyfriend for four years. He is kind, thoughtful, funny and shares the same values as I do. We want to get married and have children and I think he ll be an amazing father, but there is one thing holding me back. We don t argue too often, but when we do, it s horrible. Nothing abusive or physical or anything, but small things seem to escalate until he becomes completely defensive and blaming before shutting down on me, while I m emotional and feeling completely panicked that this is a sign we shouldn t be together. Fights can go on for days because neither of us can manage to find the right way to start a conversation that doesn t make it worse. Neither of us grew up with great role models for relationships. My Dad was never in my life and his parents split up when he was in his teens after years of fighting, and he agrees that he doesn t want us having kids if we re going to inflict this type of arguing on them. I want to be with him but need us to get better at fighting and communicating but don t know where to start.
 First things first: each of you get yourself a therapist. It sounds like both of you had different difficult situations growing up where there wasn t a parent around or there weren t healthy dynamics being displayed by parents, and both of these situations could be affecting you both as individuals and as a couple. It may be too simplistic to presume that not having a father around may have left you with some abandonment issues that cause you to panic at the first sign that someone is unhappy with you and that seeing his parents fight so much causes him to shut down around conflict as a defence mechanism, but there are possibilities there worth exploring. Even for you as individuals, it would be worth exploring how you both feel during conflicts so you understand what you need to feel safe and to look at how you can begin to work on feeling connected and able to communicate even when upset   and these are skills that will help you in all facets of your life, not just your relationship conflicts. Examining things like attachment theory may also help (though please only use it as a tool with which to understand yourself a little more and examine tools that might be helpful, not as a be-all-and-end-all diagnosis for your life, as social media might encourage you to do.)
Then, attending some couples counselling might help explore what patterns you and your boyfriend are getting stuck in. From the limited information you ve given, it sounds like three things, in particular, might be helpful for you to explore while arguing: more generous communication; taking breaks; and scheduling time to repair.
More generous communication looks like communicating more than you are now, and making your communication open-hearted, curious and generous in its assumptions about the other person, which can help diffuse blame and panic. One technique that vulnerability researcher Brené Brown often speaks about is being clear and honest about the narratives we are constructing in our heads when we are feeling anxious, insecure or underappreciated. Stating these narratives aloud can help us not only recognise what is going on inside ourselves, but help our partner understand the source of our feelings and correct our assumptions before we spiral. For example, you could say,  We ve felt a bit disconnected and the story I m telling myself is that you are angry at me/bored with me/aren t attracted to me and that s making me anxious.  This is a communication technique that not only requires us to slow down and recognise what situations we are escalating in our minds but requires a generous vulnerability   it s a vulnerability that allows the other person to understand what s going on and bring their perspective to the table, instead of assuming ill intent.
Other ways of using generous communication involve entering interactions by giving your partner the benefit of the doubt, assuming good intentions, and communicating from there. Helpful statements might include,  I might be misinterpreting this. What was your thought process when you said/did that? ;  I know you would never intentionally try and hurt my feelings. Can you help me understand where you were coming from? ; or  I believe you weren t trying to say/do something that would create distance but my feelings are hurt. Can we talk about this calmly and figure out what happened?  These types of phrases are ways of reminding you and your partner that it is you two against the problem, rather than you two against each other. (An unfortunate caveat: these phrases only work when both people are genuinely trying to be good to one another and do not apply to repeatedly manipulative, cruel or abusive people.)
Another thing to think about is taking breaks when conflicts escalate or seem to be stalling. It sounds like you and your boyfriend have very different ways of reacting to conflict, and taking a break so that you can both gather your thoughts, take a walk, journal, or even push yourself to get into a more generous mindset might be helpful. If you get very anxious and panicked during conflicts, this may feel difficult for you, so setting a concrete time and place to reconnect and restart the conversation will be important   you can t just both leave the situation without a plan to return. Could you both practise saying,  I think we need to take a break and calm down. Can we come back to the couch in an hour/talk in the kitchen this evening at 6pm before dinner?  Agreeing on a specific time and a specific place will help remove any potential confusion or power plays of,  Well I was in the sittingroom all evening, you could have come in at any time!
During your break, consciously do something that will help you regulate your emotions and get clear on your aims for the ensuing conversation which, again, should not be to compete with each other, but to understand each other.
After you have a hopefully healing conversation, try to schedule some quality reconnection time, like taking a walk together, cuddling, dancing, or asking each other a question that makes you feel connected again. Apps like Agape or question card desks like those designed by The School Of Life or Esther Perel can be nice to have on hand for these types of reconnecting conversations. This type of repair ritual can be really important, as you re not just overcoming the conflict, but marking a mini recommitment to each other in the moment. One thing I wonder is, given your respective childhood situations, whether either of you ever saw adults reconnecting and repairing after a rupture. Often, parents will fight in front of children but apologise and make up in private, which can leave children without a sense of stability or without a script for what a repair can look like. It might be very healing to consider how you want to repair fights with each other, and in the future, what kind of repair rituals you want to model for your children.
There s obviously a lot of love and desire for shared care and development between you. I think you ll be fine. l
Relationships
It would be worth exploring how you both feel during conflicts so you understand what you need to feel safe
Have a question for Roe McDermott? Submit it anonymously at  irishtimes.com/dearroe
After you have a hopefully healing conversation, try to schedule some quality reconnection time, like taking a walk together, cuddling, dancing, or asking each other a question that makes you feel connected again

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



'Time is so precious. It's terrifying'; Maggie Armstrong, a former journalist, was always a 'bit envious' of the people she interviewed. As she prepares to publish her debut short story collection, Armstrong reflects on her decision to take her writing seriously, the changes wrought in Irish society and what it means to be a single parent
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 14
Length: 2322 words
Body


Art can reflect life, but it can also be a beast of its own making. And so for authors of fiction, talking about their work can mean trying to put words on to their creation in a way that feels awkward. They might have sat down with themes or ideas to hash out on the page, but how to explain the certain sort of magic that happens once the writing begins?
When The Irish Times Magazine meets debut author Maggie Armstrong, the 39-year-old Dubliner is still trying to figure out how to talk about her work. It s her first interview about her book, a collection of short stories called Old Romantics, which is published by Tramp Press. Its cover, designed by Fiachra McCarthy, is all pretty pastel colours, but prettiness can conceal something more complicated. Indeed, Old Romantics is anything but light and fluffy, and Armstrong is negotiating exactly how to describe what it is about and what it means to her.
The linked collection features stories about a protagonist named Margaret, who at times deludes herself about what she wants, who she is, and who others are. Armstrong s publishers compare her writing in part to Kristen Roupenian, author of the 2017 viral New Yorker short story Cat Person, and reading the accounts of the awkward relationships in Old Romantics, you can see why.
We follow Margaret s stumbles as she meets unsuitable men and gets involved in relationships even though she suspects something is  up  from the get-go. She has encounters that threaten to damage her, but aims to escape with her sense of self intact.
Throughout, Armstrong s prose matches her protagonist s state of mind. It s clear in its aim but maintains a feeling of propulsive fluidity. For Margaret, relationships are not easy, jobs are not easy, motherhood is not easy. What sustains her throughout is writing, and though that s not easy either, together with classic novels it creates a form of refuge to which she can retreat. The stories are written alternately in the first and third person, bringing the reader both close to and slightly at a remove from the protagonist.
Armstrong, a former journalist, sent some stories to Tramp Press in 2018, believing the independent Irish publisher the best home for her work. Tramp s founders, Sarah Davis-Goff and Lisa Coen, have published books hugely important to the landscape of postmillennial Irish literature, such as Doireann Ní Ghríofa s stunning A Ghost in the Throat, and Emilie Pine s fierce essay collection Notes to Self. Davis-Goff and Coen are adept at finding female authors in particular who use language to unpick Ireland s gender booby traps.
But Armstrong s 2018 stories weren t ready.  They were juvenile stories. I m glad they were rejected and they weren t published anywhere,  says Armstrong. As the years moved on, she began to be published in journals such as the Stinging Fly and the Dublin Review. Then Coen got in touch in 2023, asking if she had any work that hadn t been published. She sent some stories on. A few months later, Armstrong, Coen and Davis-Goff met in a coffee shop. Tramp had a proposal to make.
 It was just so bizarre and strange and amazing,  says Armstrong, her wide eyes widening further as we talk in a city-centre hotel bar.  They made me an offer there. We had coffee, and [Lisa Coen] came in with an offer for a contract, and I didn t even drink my coffee   it was completely cold at the end of the meeting.  Even now she seems surprised that  these two publishers who I really admired  wanted to publish her. This is in large part because, until she was published by the Dublin Review just three years earlier, she was beginning to feel in despair about her writing s trajectory.
There s always the question in fiction of how close a story is to the author s real life. It can be a pointless and even invasive question, and women authors in particular tend to suffer from the presumption that they couldn t possibly not be mining from real life. But it naturally comes up with Armstrong because her own biographical details are close at times to her protagonist s. Like Margaret, she is also a single mother of two young children who lost her father during the Covid pandemic period. But as she outlines, there are many ways in which they differ.
So how would she describe Margaret?  She s a young journalist from quite a privileged background, who has maybe no moral guidance and very little sense, and is inclined to trust people who she shouldn t trust, and get into trouble. God love her. I wish I could sit down with her and give her a good bit of advice. Like panto    look behind you! ,  says Armstrong.  Some of the scrapes this alter-ego gets herself into are so disturbing that I couldn t possibly write it in the first person. I needed to achieve a critical distance from such a deranged girl.
Initially Armstrong wrote stories to amuse herself. Then she became a  slightly disillusioned  journalist reading at small literary events and being published by literary journals. This book will see her reach her biggest audience yet and she says it s  terrifying  to know strangers will be reading her work.
 What a bizarre project, to write a whole collection of short stories about a person with the same name as you,  laughs Armstrong.  I cannot believe I wrote that book and I cannot believe people are going to read it.  But while she laughs at this in a slightly tongue-in-cheek way, she s very serious about her stories and creating a fictional world for readers.
After working in publishing following an English degree at Trinity College Dublin, she entered journalism during the recession. Some of the first pieces she wrote were for this very newspaper.  They were completely florid pieces, they were completely overwritten,  she says self-deprecatingly of her early work.  I wanted to interview people. I was very, very curious about people and about uncovering scandals. I wanted juicy gossip. Obviously I wanted to tell a good yarn, but generally speaking I suppose I got caught in a cycle of late-night deadlines. I was burning the candle [at both ends], working all the time not necessarily knowing why, and writing about showbiz.
She didn t want to do this forever, and found that while doing interviews she was  the tiniest bit envious of anybody doing something that they really wanted to be doing .  I always envied actors, particularly male actors for some reason,  she goes on.  I always felt they had the charisma monopoly. There was something about a male actor in their prime, I thought,  f*** you   so many brilliant women are in your shadow . I was very drawn to these characters, but I didn t really belong anywhere either.
It wasn t until the pandemic hit in March 2020 that she decided to make a proper go of fiction, and exit journalism.  The morning all the children were sent home from school, my editor was giving me my next feature to do, and I said  I can t do it, I m really sorry   I have to be home . There were children that I had to take care of. So that decided that for me.
Today she works (as she has for many years) part-time in copy-editing and proofreading mostly academic books, which she enjoys as she is a  magpie  on the lookout for interesting words and phrases.  I want to write fiction,  she says.  I want to write books. I have so much that I want to do, and time is so precious. It s terrifying really, isn t it?  Life is short.  So short.
How short life is was made clear to her when she lost her mother before and her father during the Covid lockdown period.  When my mother died, it was 2018 ... that was just bizarre ... but my father s death, everything seemed to fall apart when he died,  she says. She adds at a later point in the interview that her siblings are a great support to her, and her children have a loving father.
She describes her parents, Fergus and Jacqueline, as voracious readers and very intelligent, literary people.  My father really loved anything written or done by his [four] children but he also had very careful notes and criticism. My brother writes as well. They were both bibliophiles, they both introduced me to basically all the writers that are important to me. My mum gave me Anne Enright when I was 17, and Muriel Spark, and Edna O Brien, Anita Brookner, Elizabeth Bowen. I remember her giving me Bowen s The Death of the Heart when I was in school. She would present these books to us as talismans, and the books would go viral in the house. We d all be reading Patrick Hamilton or something about Russia.
Armstrong s family contains many lawyers and politicians, and her great-grandfather was Fine Gael TD and twice-taoiseach John A Costello.  He was an important figure in the founding of the Republic. He announced to a press conference in Canada [in 1948] that we were going to declare ourselves a republic, and that began the disentanglement from the Commonwealth. He was also a barrister, he was quite a brilliant barrister   he was the defence [for The Leader publication] during Patrick Kavanagh s libel case,  says Armstrong.  An unflattering profile had been written of [the poet] and he basically ran rings around Patrick Kavanagh and they had this hilarious cross-examination where Kavanagh lost the libel case.
Did the young Armstrong ever feel called towards the cut-and-thrust of political life?  Oh God, no,  she recoils.  I wanted to be a wastrel. I had no ambitions ever, for anything. I don t know, is that a symptom of the age?  Her ambition as a writer came later.  If you hang on, it can occur to you even in your late 30s or your 40s, any age, that there s something you can get your claws into, and then you have to find a way of doing it.
In Old Romantics, her protagonist suffers several indignities, but she s also propelled forward by believing there is something better out there waiting for her. Even when her romantic partners are clearly unsuitable, Margaret persists.  There are very unhealthy traits in some of the relationships in this book that I did very much want to write about,  says Armstrong. She adds:  When things go wrong for a woman from a south Dublin postcode, let s say, it s going to be a lot easier to find your way to safety. That s not saying that things aren t perilous for everyone in intimate relationships, in marriages that are unhappy.
There s a blended family in the book, with Margaret caring for the children of her fiance. This prompts Armstrong to discuss how Ireland treats carers.  There are a lot of people caring for young people in this country. A lot of people caring full stop, realising that they didn t really sign up to do it,  she says.  But I think this [recent] referendum really showed that the care   it may lie in the family but that isn t fair, and it s not fair on either person in the caring relationship and it can be bewildering, difficult and very rewarding, but it can also be just very disenchanting. And it falls to women mostly, so I wanted to write about that.
She also wanted to get into the room of a couple s counsellor and explore that space in fiction.  Because it is such a tremendously draining and sometimes frustrating experience which costs so much money and resources. There s so much hope involved and so much at stake when it comes to saving relationships,  she says.
In Old Romantics, a couple go through protracted counselling sessions, and visit several therapists, but there s the sense they re dragging out the inevitable.  You put so much trust in this professional, you invest so much money and sometimes the outcome is so much less than you hoped for,  says Armstrong.
We turn to the challenges of single parenting two young children, and how single mothers have been treated in Ireland. It s  just terrible  what women went through in Irish history, she says.  This is a very enlightened time to be a single parent with two children, which I am. I think that there was a room in hell reserved for unmarried women with children  out of wedlock , as they were described,  she says.
Recently, she was looking at an old Home Economics textbook while researching a story, and found a list of  problems and threats facing society today . One was single parents.  This is what we were taught in school. We were basically [taught] this was an aberration in society,  she says.  And you re still a little bit the weirdo, you re a wallflower at the orgy of the nuclear family. Which is kind of amusing, really.
It must be hard.  Yeah. And you know what, it s fine. Even having a baby on your own, that s a privilege. I wouldn t swap it for anything. A little bit glamorous even. You re there, you have your little baby and everyone s taking care of you. But having a toddler as a single person, that is not glamorous, that is at times nightmarish.  She became single while pregnant with her second child, a period when she says she felt  cast adrift  for a time.
Despite the more positive societal changes, Armstrong also believes we are  back in the Dark Ages when it comes to accepting difference in our society , though there are  incredibly brave people who have made amazing strides towards trans rights in particular, disability rights, women s rights .
Through her fiction, Armstrong   who is currently working on a short novel, stories and essays   gets to explore circumstances that will feel familiar to many readers.
 This is a fictional book. If it was a memoir, it would be a very dull book,  she says.  It is a fictional ragbag of experiences, some are pilfered, some are closer to my heart. There are some things that happen to us that simply have no place in a conversation in a room. There s simply nowhere else for them to go. Therapy doesn t cut it.
Writing might not replace therapy,  but for Armstrong creative expression appears to help her find her way through the world, even when life is at its most difficult. l
I wanted to be a wastrel. I had no ambitions ever, for anything. I don t know, is that a symptom of the age?

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



'Turning its back on victims': Spain's right accused of whitewashing fascism; Activists fear some local governments are trying to rewrite the civil war history
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 11
Length: 1249 words
Body


A large cross mounted on a stone block greets visitors to Zaragoza s Torrero cemetery. This monument was built during the dictatorship of Francisco Franco and was one of many dedicated to those who died fighting for his side in the 1936-39 Spanish civil war.
In recent years, many such monuments across Spain have been removed from public display on the grounds that they glorify Franco s regime. This has been part of a drive by left-leaning national and local governments to prioritise historical memory and acknowledge the victims of Franco during the civil conflict and his ensuing four-decade dictatorship.
But historical memory activists in Aragón and elsewhere in Spain fear that new right-wing local governments are reversing the progress made over recent years and are attempting to rewrite the country s violent 20th-century history.
 The Aragón government is turning its back on the victims of Franco,  says Enrique Gómez Arnas, of the region s Association for the Recovery of Historical Memory. He is speaking in the cemetery, next to a small park dedicated to Franco s victims.  It s historical revisionism, putting the blame for what happened in this country on the left.
After taking office last summer as a coalition, the conservative Popular Party (PP) and the far-right Vox announced they were rolling back a local Democratic Memory Law introduced in the region by the previous, Socialist government in 2018. That legislation had sought to remove symbols of the Franco regime in public spaces   although the Torrero cemetery monument remains   and implement a protocol for the exhumation and identification of the remains of victims.
The announcement of the law s withdrawal was made on November 20th, the anniversary of Franco s death in 1975, a day still commemorated by right-wing extremists. Gómez Arnas said the choice of date was  a wink  to right-wing voters.
Mar Vaquero, second deputy president of Aragón, insists it was a coincidence and  defends the elimination of the region s existing law.  It was a sectarian, divisive and incomplete law because it continued to support the spirit of one side against the other,  Vaquero, of the PP, told The Irish Times.  And what we want to do is to leave that behind and recover the spirit of the democratic transition.
No law has been introduced to replace it, but her administration intends to present a  harmony plan  by the summer. Vaquero said it will broaden the scope of the region s historical memory to include acknowledging and exhuming victims of ideological violence during the 1931-1936 left-wing Second Republic.
 We are in favour of recovering any remains from any mass grave, whether it s from the era of the Republic, the era of the civil war or the era of the dictatorship,  she said.  We believe that ideology is not inherited.
However, critics say the harmony plan is no such thing. These apparent efforts to put the Franco regime and the democratically elected Republican government on an equal moral standing infuriate historical memory campaigners. They also appear to endorse far-right revisionist narratives that query the established mainstream theory that a coup d état by right-wing army officers against the Republican administration triggered the civil war.
The Hispanist Paul Preston, who has documented the violence of the civil war and the Franco regime in a number of acclaimed books, told The Irish Times that  the principle qualitative difference [between violence during the Republic and during the dictatorship] is that the Francoist repression was official policy whereas the Republican authorities were trying to prevent violence.
Inmaculada Rebla, from a local historical memory association in Aragón, pointed to the PP s foundation by Franco regime ministers and said the region s government had rolled back the law  because it makes them look bad in a historical context .
She added:  We are not going to allow them to lie about the history of Spain and what happened in this country.
Rebla and other campaigners fear that funding and support for the exhumation of the approximately 1,000 mass graves in Aragón will be cut under the new regional government plan. Vaquero counters such concerns by saying that exhumations will receive 10 per cent extra funding this year.
The Aragón government s approach to historical memory has been replicated in other regions where the PP and Vox are governing in coalition. Last month, the government of Castilla y León presented a  harmony law  to replace existing historical memory legislation.  There has never been a consensus about the Second Republic, the civil war and Francoism,  reads the text of that law, which asserts that younger generations have received a  distorted view  of the conflict.
Spain s most prominent historical memory organisation described the Castilla y León law as  a great example of whitewashing fascism .
National politics
Similar legislation has been introduced in Valencia, where the PP and Vox also govern in coalition, and plans are under way to replace existing laws approved by the left in the Balearic Islands and Cantabria.
The issue has also been played out in the national political arena. Socialist prime minister Pedro Sánchez, whose government introduced a nationwide historical memory law in 2022, has threatened to appeal to the Spanish constitutional court, the EU Parliament and the UN in a bid to stop regions from reversing existing local legislation.
 We haven t come this far to allow this wave of far-right revisionism which the most advanced democracies in the world are seeing, including Spain,  he said.
Pablo de Greiff, a former UN special rapporteur on truth, justice and reparation, described the PP and Vox initiatives as  denial .  I don t understand what kind of concept of  harmony  can be based on false equivalence and the refusal to acknowledge victims who still have legitimate grievances,  he said.
The PP has long opposed efforts by Socialist governments to tackle historical memory and the last time it governed Spain, between 2011 and 2018, it eliminated funding for organisations carrying out exhumations.
However, many believe the catalyst for the recent wave of revisionist laws is Vox, which takes a particularly belligerent stance on the issue.
 Necrophilia, division and rancour have returned,  tweeted the far-right party s leader Santiago Abascal, in response to images of Sánchez visiting the Valley of Cuelgamuros, Franco s former mausoleum where scientists are identifying remains civil war victims from both sides.
Abascal added that Sánchez was using the issue  to cover up the corruption of his coup-mongering government, propped up by criminal forces .
Vox s influence on the PP has been evident in many town and city halls and regional governments where the two have been in coalition since last summer, with, for example, a number of gender equality departments being eliminated and LGBTQ flags being removed from public buildings. Although Vox does not explicitly express admiration for Franco or his regime, some of its politicians have hinted they sympathise with the dictator and his ideas. The Facebook profile photo of the head of justice in Aragón, Esmeralda Pastor, showed her posing in front of a Franco-era flag.
Gómez Arnas says  Spain s history has become  another part of the culture war .
 We lost the civil war,  he says.  But all the suffering that came afterwards, society needs to know about it because otherwise there s no guarantee that it won t happen again.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



'You should be ashamed of yourselves! We're old enough to be your parents'
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 6
Length: 948 words
Body


I had my nightmare again last night, the one where I have a one-night stand with Taylor Swift and then I ghost the girl and she ends up writing 15 or 16 songs about me and they re on the radio constantly. And   yeah, no   I woke up screaming.
I ask Réaltín   and not for the first time either   what s in those famous energy drinks she s been giving me and she goes,  You don t need to know what s in them. You just need to know that they work.
 At the same time,  I go,  I would like to know?
But she s like,  Just get your head in the focking game, will you?
We re about to play Deng Chao and Yang Lina in the final of the Leinster Padel Championships and the girl is no mood for conversation. Not that sheever is?
She goes,  Do your focking job.
There s a surprise waiting for me when we reach the court. Sorcha has turned up to watch. And not only Sorcha, but also Honor and my old man and the goys   we re talking JP, Oisinn, Fionn and Christian. They give me a humungous cheer, then the goys launch into a rendition of our old school anthem, Castlerock Uber Alles, followed by a chorus of,  If I had the wings of a sparrow, if I had the orse of a crow, I d fly over Terenure College   and, well, you can probably guess the rest.
It s a genuine goosebumps moment and Réaltín ends up having to tell me again to focus    cop the fock onto yourself    because it s the kind of thing that could end up going to my head if I let it.
That s when Deng Chao and Yang Lina walk out and my jaw hits the floor.
I m there,  They must be, like, twenty years younger than us.
Réaltín goes,  Forget about them and concentrate on your own game,  which turns out to be good advice because we re under the cosh from the very stort.
They break our serve in the first game and it s only Réaltín who keeps us in the match by breaking them back and taking the first set to a tie-break.
 Who s that dickhead performing the running commentary?  she goes.
I m there,  That s my old man.
Yeah, no, he s going,  Ross O Carroll-Kelly!  in his big foghorn voice.  AKA Kicker! The king of Leinster rugby and now the king of Leinster . What s this game called again, Honor?
She s like,  God, he s annoying.
I m there,  You re preaching to the choir, Réaltín.
We win the first set thanks to an unbelievable backhand shot from her, but we re both wiped from the effort and Deng Chao and Yang Lina s youth storts to tell in the second set, which they win 6-2.
Sorcha shouts,  Come on, Ross! Try and win it!  which is what she used to shout when I was playing rugby. The goys are chanting,  Ledge-und! Ledge-und! Ledge-und!  while Honor is going,  This is, like, seriously boring? When is it going to be over?
The answer, I suspect, is soon enough, because at 3-3 in the final set, I stort to feel seriously ropey   we re talking shallow breath and palpitations in my chest   and I end up asking for a time-out.
 A time-out?  Réaltín goes, as we go into a little huddle.  You re making us look weak.
I m there,  Réaltín, I think I m having a hort attack. I need to know what s in those drinks you ve been giving me.
She s like,  You don t need to know.
I m there,  Réaltín, I m about ten seconds away from walking off this court to ask my wife to phone an ambulance for me
She goes,  It s cold consommé.
I m like,  Excuse me?
 That s what you ve been drinking.
 Cold consommé with what? I m guessing cocaine or something.
She goes,  Ross, it s just a placebo. Look, I heard you banging on about your exploits on the rugby pitch and how your coach had you on a doping programme and I thought,  He thinks he can t win unless he s on something.
 So it s just, like ?
 Thin soup. Cold.
 But what about my hort? The thing is beating like a focking snare drum here.
 Is it really that long since you won something that you ve forgotten what adrenaline feels like?
I m like,  Adrenaline?  and the penny finally drops.  I m pumped. That s all this is.
She s there,  Now can we beat these two saps and go home?
We go back to work. Réaltín storts with the sledging    You should be ashamed of yourselves! We re old enough to be your parents and we ve taken you to three sets!    and that s when the mistakes stort to creep into their game.
Twice, Deng swings his racquet and hits thin air, while I m suddenly re-energised, buzzing around the court, high on the   like she said   adrenaline of knowing that victory is, like, this close.
 You suck!  Réaltín shouts at them across the net when I m serving for the match   she really is the most terrifying person I ve ever met   and I can see in Deng s eyes that he s beaten.
I hit the ball and it comes at him like a bullet. He manages to send it back to me, but I ve chorged the net, and my return volley hits him full-force, right in the unpublishables, and he hits the deck like a Welsh scrum.
There s, like, cheers from my family and friends and more chants of  Ledge-und!
I go to hug Réaltín but she holds up a staying hand and goes,  We don t have that kind of relationship,  which is fair enough.
We re presented with the trophy, which Réaltín says I can keep. She goes,  I get no pleasure out of winning. The most I ever feel is relief that I haven t lost.
We look at each other and she sort of, like, smiles. And I know I ll never see her again. There s no need.
Sorcha throws her orms around me and goes,  Oh my God! You were amazing!
By that stage, Réaltín is already walking away with her husband, Bradan, and beneath the chants of,  Ledge-und! Ledge-und! Ledge-und!  I m almost sure I hear her go,  Yeah, I told him it was just cold consommé   and he seemed to believe me.  l
Réaltín, I m about ten seconds away from walking off this court to ask my wife to phone an ambulance for me

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



A CREATIVE CATHARSIS; When Hilary Fannin began to write her new play, an adaptation of Gorky's Children of the Sun for Rough Magic and the Abbey, she didn't anticipate her work being interrupted by a double cancer diagnosis
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 4
Length: 2516 words
Body


Hilary Fannin and I are sitting  in the cafe in the lobby of  the Abbey Theatre, where rehearsals are under way for her radical adaptation of Maxim Gorky s Children of the Sun. Once, when she was a young woman with no qualifications, she asked at the box office here how she could become an actor.  They suggested she write a letter to the management.  All of these institutions seemed reserved for another kind of person,  she says.
Fannin is now a well-established  playwright, as well as the author of a moving memoir, Hopscotch, and a beautiful novel, The Weight of Love. She is a warm, insightful and funny person whose approach to creativity and life is generous and empowering. This is all the more remarkable if you consider the unhappy role art played in her childhood.
 There was a big disconnect between  my parents  domestic lives and the lives  that they wanted to be living,  says Fannin.  My mother left art college to be a singer, and my dad wanted to be a painter, but he couldn t make a living as a painter. He ended up in advertising in the 1960s . . . Myself and my three siblings fell somewhere in that ditch between their ambition and their reality. Money was this dog that lived under the stairs; you could just never feed it.
 There was a lot of infidelity on my father s side and huge frustration in his life . . . And I saw, more specifically with my mother, how incredibly hurtful it was for her to have this imagined life, a continuation of the life that she thought she was going to have, and then the real life where she was living in Raheny in this semi-D.
Fannin had a particularly close relationship with her father, who had a drink problem. ( When art didn t get its way, my father drank. ) He would take her into central Dublin to wander around the National Gallery of Ireland, but he would also bring her along to meet the woman with whom he was having an affair. He would say,  Who did we not see today?  Later Fannin says,  I still love my father. In fact, today is his birthday. He would have been 99 today. But I worked so hard to create the person that he wanted, and there were all these other selves in a drawer that I couldn t use when I was with him.
The Fannin children had to deal with poverty, neglect and, eventually, eviction.   I had a lovely aunt who used to say we grew  like weeds ,  she says. All of the Fannin children fell out of education. Hilary was the only one who did the Leaving Cert,  after which she waitressed and worked in childcare  for years and years . While working as a classroom assistant in Cork she applied for a Fás course.  They put me on a graduate development course, because I did very well at some spatial-reasoning test . . . You had to develop and design your own business, so I developed, in my head, a theatre company called Wet Paint.
Why theatre?  There was a familiarity with it, because my mother had done some amateur theatre.  Also, Fannin says,  I wanted somebody to recognise my spirit in some way.
Once back in Dublin she began attending acting classes at the Oscar theatre school, after seeing an ad in a paper. She loved it. Eventually, she, David Byrne, Owen Roe and Michèle Forbes officially established Wet Paint. She went on to act in numerous plays. She loved the process of being in a rehearsal room, deconstructing and reconstructing plays by writers such as Dermot Bolger, Michael Harding and Tom McIntyre. But it still hadn t occurred to her to write.  It took a long time to free myself from the kind of person that [my father] would have liked me to have been . . . The idea was, you should be entertaining, very funny, very amusing, but that was it. I wanted to marry a writer. That was what was in my head:  I ll marry a writer.  What was I thinking?
What changed her mind about writing?
 I went to see a play that Pom Boyd wrote, I think in the late 1980s or early 1990s,  she says.  I d known Pom for years. If you see someone else of your age and stage and they ve actually done it, you think, I can do that. It s like little bits of bread being dropped in the forest leading you to somewhere that you need to be. And then I start writing and thank Christ. I ve somewhere to be in my mind and my body now, somewhere to anchor myself.
Fannin began studying writing with Bernard Kops,  an amazing elderly writer , at City Lit, an adult-education college in London, where she was then living with her now husband, Giles Newington, a fellow writer (and for many years an Irish Times journalist).  I was waitressing in Brixton at the time, and I was in a sitcom [in Ireland] as well.
What sitcom? She laughs.  Upwardly Mobile. I was Pamela. Then, just before Peter    her first son    was born I managed to finish the play, Mackerel Sky, and the Bush Theatre produced it.
There were autobiographical elements to that play.  Bob was very confused by it,  she says, referring to her father.  He was in London [to see it], and he was pissed. There s a big character, Steph, who has a huge big cardboard cut-out of her father because he s absent. That night Bob didn t even make it into his hotel room. He fell asleep in the corridor. And the next day in Dublin he said to my brother,  What the f**k was that about?
There are a lot of stories about artists who fail to make the grade as parents. Nuala O Faolain was Fannin s father s cousin; her memoir Are You Somebody? documents a similar story of parental neglect. Anne Enright s recent novel The Wren, the Wren also depicts a family sacrificed to artistic ambition.  I knew so many of those f**kers,  says Fannin.   They littered my childhood, those kinds of men . . . That toxic seepage from the male artists, that whole thing of  The pram in the hall is the end of ambition , it was all around us . . . This was what art was in our house: no education; no money. We lost the house. The bailiffs came, knocked down the doors, took the furniture. That was the art I knew.
So at the outset of her writing career, with a young family, Fannin was,  understandably,  terrified of hurting my children with my work .
She soon learned that it was possible to create art and have a family without a byproduct of cruelty and neglect.  It s a relief to hear Marina Carr talking about this, and Anne Enright talks about this too, about pushing back the jam pot on the kitchen table and just writing . . . I was always writing while I was living and looking after my kids or trying to be part  of the community I lived in . . . My  concentration is quite jigsaw-like. I don t  sit down quietly for eight hours and write. When I was very low in London, at one point, my brother, who has published two books as well, said,  Just write an hour a day. One hour a day, for 365 days   you re going to have 365 hours of writing under your belt.
She doesn t need Virginia Woolf s  room of her own , she says.  I have a room, it s just it s in here.  She taps her head.  I ll write anywhere.
So no ivory tower? She laughs.  I live in Bayside. There are no ivory towers.
She developed a reputation as a fine playwright. She has written many plays. After Mackerel Sky she wrote Sleeping Around with Mark Ravenhill, Stephen Greenhorn and Abi Morgan. Later she wrote a  state of the nation  play, Doldrum Bay, about two men in an advertising agency,  a world I knew because of my dad . That was seen by Gerry Smyth, a former Irish Times managing editor, who asked her to fill in on the paper s TV column. She ended up doing this for years. More recently she wrote a personal column for the paper.  I m not afraid of talking about anything, really,  she says.  I don t feel like I have anything to hide. I was clear that I wasn t going to write about my kids   but writing about the past, writing about Bob and Marie    her mother    and writing about my siblings, I was absolutely fine with that.
By the time Hopscotch, her childhood memoir, was published, in 2015, her father had died. Her brother, Robert, sat with her mother while she read the manuscript in case she had questions. It must have been a difficult read, but she didn t ask for any changes.  She just said,  No, this is Hilary s story.
The process was liberating, Fannin says.  It is cathartic to tell your story. For me it has to be. I m investing in finding out for myself what happened.
She went on to write The Weight of Love, which won the John McGahern Book Prize. Though centred on a fictional love triangle, the novel is rooted in real memories.  Places and spaces I lived in,  Fannin says.  I can remember the washing lines in flats in King s Cross and the sound of someone playing the piano in the basement flat . . .  I knew I needed to move Ruth through a certain series of places, and I went back to London and walked all the routes she would have done . . . And I walked around to the cafe, and I watched the people and took notes. It was such a joyful thing to do.
This production of Children of the Sun marks the theatre company Rough Magic s 40th year. Fannin remembers being in awe of the company back in the 1980s ( they were quite an intimidating bunch ). The project was initially commissioned by Lynne Parker, its creative director, as part of its Compass new writing programme, based on a translation by Olga Taranova.
 At its heart Children of the Sun is about a group of people living their lives unable to see that the territory that they know is imploding and that forces outside of their lives are going to take over. Gorky wrote
it in nine days while he was in prison in  St Petersburg [in 1905].  Fannin significantly rewrote the dialogue, characters and plot.  It s like playing dollies. It s playing dressing-up with dollies.
There was a lot of homework to do.  One of the main characters is a scientist. I had to figure out: what branch of science? So then I got interested in  time . Lynne and I went to see Iggy McGovern, a professor up in Trinity, an amazing man. And he said,  You know, there is no agreement on what time is.  And I thought, Oh, that s brilliant . . . I said,  Iggy, if there s one thing you fear, what would it be?  He s a terribly nice man, and he said,  Black holes.  I thought, I fear one of my kids driving into a wall, or I worry about the cat, and this man is worrying about black holes.
Last September, while working on the play, Fannin was diagnosed with two types of cancer, ovarian cancer and lymphoma. The initial prognosis was not good.  You re faced with something so mad: maybe you re going to die. How do you manage that feeling? I had major surgery in November. I had a radical hysterectomy, a splenectomy. They really took out everything that they could. And then I got really good news: they downgraded my ovarian-cancer diagnosis from [stage] 3 to 1C, because they got it before it spread.
All of the Fanning siblings have had cancer now.  All four of us,  she says.   We have this cancer cluster. It s another bond. It feels like an externalisation of generational trauma. What is this illness? I mean, I know it s physical illness. I m now doing some genetic testing to see if there might be something that s been passed down through Bob s line, and that really interests me.
She s still undergoing chemotherapy. Throughout her treatment, she kept working on the play. Somehow, in December, she finished it.  The support  I got from Rough Magic and the Abbey  was unbelievable,  she says.  They were incredible . . . Right now I feel such  gratitude. When I go into a rehearsal  room this afternoon there ll be 11 people  in there working, and it will be about the work, and I won t think about cancer until  I self-inject this evening,  Fannin says, referring to part of her treatment.
Has she processed any of this experience emotionally?  Somebody said to me that recovery won t start until the chemotherapy ends,  she says.  So I don t think I ve really begun to process it yet.
Did she write about it?  I know I ll end  up writing about it in one form or another, but I think it s going to take time,  she says.  I kept notes all the way through. The bottom line about writing is, it s about control. It s about having some control over your past and managing your past. It s about being able to think forwards with some clarity . . . It s like that internal room that I talked about earlier. I rooted myself internally . . . So with the cancer I have a notebook. I have voice notes.
Fannin says that having the freedom to write is a privilege and that everyone should have the opportunity. That s why she likes working with young people with the creative-writing charity Fighting Words. ( They re so vulnerable, and their ideas are so beautiful. ) She hopes to do more coaching work with refugees or other marginalised adults. (She tells me a story she heard from a young Syrian doctor.)
It s personal for Fannin. She first went to college, to pursue Trinity College Dublin s MPhil in creative writing, in her 50s. Her brother also went to college in later life.  It took us decades and decades and decades to feel that we could access [that world]. I walked into Trinity at 54/55 and saw what was available. I was so overwhelmed by it   and angry as well . . . I d been feeling that this is not my world    That s somebody s else s world.  It doesn t have to be that way.
She gets annoyed by novels where there s no mention of money, no mention of how people pay for things. The availability of money affects who gets to tell their stories, she says.  I was talking to a friend of mine who teaches abroad on a creative-writing programme, and she was saying that it s such a narrow type coming into the class. Where are the new voices going to come from?
Fannin has a second novel under way.   I want to make clear, honest work,  she says. She finds that autobiographical details keep bleeding into her fiction. In Children of the Sun she found herself writing about characters facing eviction.  You think, Oh Christ, have I done it again? There is a line in Hopscotch where my father says to my brother,  You are a wart on my palm . . .  There s a bit in Children of the Sun where someone says   I m paraphrasing    Your father called. He said you were a wart on his palm.  And Protasov, who s a nice man, says,  I think you ll find he meant that term affectionately.  How many times do I have to write that line until it stops being something that makes me feel sad? It must bother me [still], because I write something new and it pops up.
Did her experience of illness come out in the writing of the play? She thinks for a moment.  There s a line [where] Protasov the scientist says he used to believe that there were alternative existences that you could access   the eighth dimension, the 10th dimension   and near the end of the play he says,  There s just the beautiful  now to cradle our failures.  I wrote that line and I thought, Oh f**k. Yeah. There is just the beautiful now to cradle our failures.  That s all there is.  l
Children of the Sun opens at the Abbey  Theatre, Dublin, as part of Rough Magic s 40th-anniversary celebrations, on Thursday, with previews from today. It runs until Saturday, May 11th

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



A portrait of Paris behind the scenes; Simon Kuper offers an absorbing, affectionate and cliche-free study of the French capital
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 22
Length: 860 words
Body


Simon Kuper has what he  describes as his dream job, writing a weekly column for  the Financial Times on the topic of his choosing while living in Paris with his wife and three children.  In the run-up to next summer s Paris Olympics, he has published a charming book about his first 20 years in the French capital. Impossible City is an absorbing, affectionate, astutely observed, cliche-free study of contemporary France.
It is also funny.  Parisians have many qualities,  begins a chapter on traffic in the city,  but they should never have been allowed to drive .
This reviewer has lived in Paris more than twice as long as Kuper, but our experiences have been very similar: stroppy waiters and salespeople; obnoxious neighbours; sadistic bureaucrats at the préfecture who keep inventing n ew requirements for one s citizenship application; interrogation by agents of the interior ministry to ensure you are not a spy. Balzac s title Lost Illusions would be an apt summary of our mutual assessment of corruption and cronyism in French politics.
And yet, the pleasure of living in Paris never fades. Kuper analyses the French art of conversation and the ritual of Parisian dinner parties, which can be  genuinely joyous . . . the conversation, food, beauty, friendships and flirtations could transport you to a higher realm . His house guests from New York don t get it.  After an hour they thought:  really? You re just going to sit here all evening, with the same group of people?
Taking his children to football practice beyond the Périphérique ring road was Kuper s  bridge to the banlieues  where,  in the words of the French footballer Paul Pogba,  there is only football . The success of Zinedine Zidane and Kylian Mbappé has been transformative for two generations of French Africans and Arabs. The 1998 World Cup victory was doubtless  the happiest French communal moment  since the Liberation of 1944 .
Kuper makes a convincing argument that France invented international sporting events. He is (over?) optimistic that the 20-year, EUR 42 billion Grand Paris project will reconcile two million inhabitants of Paris intra muros with  10 million others on the far side of the Périphérique.
Kuper captures the theatricality of Paris, the way the cafe terraces  turn Paris into a stage set, where the waiters, customers and pedestrians became the actors. That s why the cafe chairs faced outward, so  that the diners could inspect passersby. Since everyone was a part of the decor, you were expected to dress for your role.
Because Paris is the most densely populated city in Europe, Parisians are afflicted with permanent cabin fever,  trying to have private conversations in cafes while sitting six inches from the  next table, trying to keep their toilet visits and orgasms silent, and managing the neighbours .
As Jean-Paul Sartre observed, hell is other people. One of Kuper s neighbours in the Marais district turns the family s pram upside down to show his annoyance at its presence in the stairwell. Another neighbour spoils a child s birthday party  by bursting in to complain about the noise. When Kuper and his wife, the American journalist Pamela Druckerman, propose that children be allowed to play in the courtyard for an hour every Saturday,  the building manager tells her,  You re American, so you do not understand,  but what you want is unthinkable .
In France s endless re-enactment of  the 1789 revolution, the inhabitants  of rural France ransacked the heart of Paris during the gilets jaunes revolt.   The Parisian court runs France beyond the Périph almost as if it were a colony,  or at best a holiday resort, inhabited by smelly ploucs [culchies] who hadn t  absorbed any of the Parisian culture they were taught at school, and who vote far right or far left,  writes Kuper.
European and US observers often perceive French president Emmanuel Macron as an intelligent, dynamic leader and eloquent proponent of European integration. Kuper explains why many of Macron s compatriots see him as  a jumped-up little banker dressed up  as king .
La séduction is an integral part of French social interaction, contrary to  the US, where people are uneasy with any hint of sexuality.  It is forbidden to forbid,  was a rallying cry of the May 1968 cultural revolution. The French long derided American  puritanism  and were willing  to indulge serial predators including the television presenter Patrick Poivre d Arvor and the former IMF director Dominique Strauss-Kahn. Film star Catherine  Deneuve led the backlash to the #MeToo movement in France. It took searing  books about the paedophilia of the writer Gabriel Matzneff and political science professor Olivier Duhamel to finally dent the belief that, in the words of Duhamel s wife,  f**king is our liberty .
Unlike Americans, the French are endlessly curious about how people  in other countries see them. Kuper s readers have sometimes accused him  of  frenchbashing . But as he notes,  we foreign journalists will never   frenchbash  half as well as the  French do themselves.
Lara Marlowe is a Paris-based author  and journalist who was for 23 years  The Irish Times  Paris correspondent

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



A ruling that will focus minds; Climate change
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 469 words
Body


The European Court of Human Rights decision  that the Swiss government violated its citizens  human rights by not doing enough to stop climate change will have ramifications for many EU countries, but particularly for Ireland.
The landmark decision this week was in a case brought by older women in Switzerland, who claimed their health problems were exacerbated by climate-induced heatwaves. Two other related cases were deemed inadmissible, including one brought by six young Portuguese people and led by Irish lawyers who are part of the Global Legal Action Network. As young people, they claimed that they were especially vulnerable to extreme climate events. It is a position which could be upheld if the case is reframed and goes through a domestic court in the first instance.
Ireland s vulnerability to such actions is because of measurable indications that climate policies are inadequate given the scale of the threat to citizens. And because of the failure to curb the country s stubbornly high level of carbon emissions   despite the Government s big ambitions and demanding carbon budgets.
The verdict requires states to use the best available scientific evidence in addressing the crisis, while highlighting the important role of domestic courts in protecting children s rights. To protect human rights, it found there is a need  to take into account the existing and constantly developing scientific evidence on the necessity of combating climate change and the urgency of addressing its adverse effects, including the grave risk of their inevitability and their irreversibility . Essentially, there must be  scientific, political and judicial recognition of a link between the adverse effects of climate change and the enjoyment of (various aspects of) human rights .
While the court cannot impose sanctions, its rulings can be used in cases brought at national level to hold governments accountable for failure to comply with them. It is therefore expected that it will bring about a new wave of climate cases in domestic courts in Europe.
The Government is also vulnerable to litigation for failure to recognise in law a right to  a clean, healthy and sustainable environment , despite recent indications it would do so. It co-sponsored a resolution at the United Nations Human Rights Council to this effect and has examined incorporating the right into the Constitution.
After months of record global temperatures, and growing concern about the speed of warming and resulting extreme weather events, countries do not need reminding of the need for greater urgency. However, this ruling will focus minds on what is an adequate response, and it will mean more citizens will seek to ensure governments are held legally and politically accountable for repeated failures to take meaningful climate action.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



A Wild Atlantic Way to churn EUR 3bn annual tourist revenue
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 19
Length: 307 words
Body


When Fáilte Ireland launched its latest, hopeful tourist product at a trade event ten years ago, who knew it was on the road to such a success story?
The Wild Atlantic Way  a tantalising banner for 2,600km of rugged road covering the length of the west coast   came in response to the economic crash; borne amid fears Ireland s lucrative tourism cash might be among the many things to dry up.
Miriam Kennedy, head of the Wild Atlantic Way, later recalled how the crisis had  decimated  tourism in the west.
So why ask people to visit one place, when they might reach it all (or at least a lot of it)? Ten years on, this overwhelmingly successful branding brainwave is  said to drive about EUR 3 billion in related revenue annually.
There were early detractors, but money talks.
These are dizzying numbers considering the initial Fáilte Ireland investment of just EUR 10 million, announced in February 2014. Its  vision for the future of tourism , as it was described this week by Minister for Tourism Catherine Martin, would cast a wide net for the industry, initially capturing 500 visitor attractions, 580 festivals, 17 trails and 50 looped walks. Around the world, potential visitors were tempted by vivid photographs of the Cliffs of Moher and rolling green pastures.
Whatever it incorporates today, the moth-to-light bulb success of the tourist initiative has helped create about 35,000 jobs, according to a Fáilte Ireland analysis released on its anniversary this week. Last year, two million more people visited the route than when it was first offered up.
 From the outset, it felt positive and like something good was happening and that we were part of something much bigger,  said Karen Coakley of Kerry Food Tours recently.  From the tip of Donegal to the furthest point of west Cork. It gave a feeling of connectivity and of being included.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Admissions that go deep
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 24
Length: 1179 words
Body


 I don t belong here,  13-year-old Jake repeats when he finds himself admitted to the adolescent unit at Whispering Pines Hospital. Despite being so ill he needs to use a wheelchair, he refuses to admit he has an eating disorder, or to share his feelings in either group or one-to-one therapy. Inside, the toxic and ever-present Voice screams at him, insisting he can t trust anyone.
John Schu s verse novel Louder Than Hunger (Walker Books, £9.99) captures the insidious nature of mental illness, allowing us into Jake s panicked head as he tries to cope with his hospitalisation   or imprisonment, as he views it.  I want to be the sickest, / but I also want to go home,  he thinks, willing to pretend to be  good  if it will get him out of there and able to return to his familiar patterns of starvation.
Being  the best  at not eating is the one thing he s able to do, in a world where horrendous bullying at school goes  ignored by teachers and where he can t do anything to prevent his beloved grandmother s death. It has its own strange logic, as frustrating as that is to those on the outside, including Jake s parents. His winding road to recovery is realistically complex, as he battles both his maladaptive behaviours and the  underlying issues . It s a welcome addition to  eating-disorder literature for young  people   accessible but not simplistic, hopeful without being saccharine.
 I know I m supposed to be grateful that I m alive. But I m finding it really hard to be grateful for a life that doesn t feel like mine.  Eighteen-year-old Molly has spent years trying to be perfect and beautiful, but life throws her a curveball in the form of a sudden brain injury, leaving her in hospital for weeks and prone to exhaustion and headaches even when she gets out. Not to mention the physical side effects.  How shallow was I that I cared about my shaved head and my repulsive scars? But I did care.
Astute readers will quickly realise that Molly s concern about her appearance is not just  regular  teenage-girl angst, although society s expectations of women certainly play a role (sorry, patriarchy, you re not entirely off the hook). Among her mother s many terrible utterances in this novel, this one said as Molly lies in a hospital bed:  You d think being on your feet all day would mean the nurses would be slimmer.  Toxic feels like too mild a label for this woman.
Jenny Ireland s second book, The Boy Next Door (Penguin, £8.99), follows the pattern of her first in some ways: a sick girl and an emotionally wounded boy fall in love. In this case, the titular boy next door is Finbar, who used to be friends with Molly when they were younger, and who awkwardly finds himself back in her life and reminding her of their shared childhood as she recovers.
He s the only one who thought to call an ambulance when Molly collapsed   he s all too aware of how fragile people are. His mother died of a brain haemorrhage, and researching Molly s surgery drags up a lot of feelings for him.  There was nothing anybody could do. That s what I was told.  But he now discovers aneurysms can sometimes be spotted in time.  Maybe if Dad had got home earlier, he would have noticed the signs. Maybe there were signs long before that day. Dad was a doctor; he was supposed to know these things. And he d missed it.
Is it perhaps a little too convenient that Finbar s mother s experience echoes Molly s, or that something as horrific as a traumatic brain injury can lead to two old friends falling in love? Maybe, but Ireland s writing is strong enough to distract the inner cynic; the best romances work not because they re unpredictable but because the characters feel authentic and we want for them what we want for anyone we care about   happiness and love in an imperfect, ugly world.
Jamie Costello, the YA alter-ego of crime writer Laura Wilson, delves into time travel in her second book for teens, The Midnight Clock (Atom, £9.99), in which Millie discovers that her father s new flat is on the site of a former women s prison. In 1955, 19-year-old Annie was put to death here, one of the last executions in Britain. Able to slip back to the days before Annie s death, Millie meets her brother, Joe, who s convinced of Annie s innocence.
Millie s response is pitch-perfect:  surely if Annie was   is   innocent, someone would have proved it already, and there d be a podcast or a series or something?  Similarly, her scepticism about ghosts existing makes space for having a go at her dad s irritating new girlfriend:  if this place is properly haunted, wouldn t Skye have picked up on it, seeing as she s always banging on about how she s such a  spiritual person  and sensitive or whatever?  Asides like this make the time-slip mystery feel completely believable, and keep us eagerly turning the pages.
 Where are you really from?  is a question Lucie s sick of being asked, knowing her dark skin sets her aside from the rest of her family and her predominantly white neighbourhood. Determined to find out something about her birth father, who her mother refuses to talk about, she takes a DNA test, and then   in an excellent example of how technology can be used to complicate plots, rather than resolve them too quickly   gets locked out of the app when her phone breaks. Turning to her new friend Nav for help is also a way for her to learn more about her south Asian heritage.
Amanda Addison s Looking For Lucie (Neem Tree Press, £8.99) is occasionally a little clunky   there s a tendency to over-use exclamation points, and a few more points of view offered than are strictly needed   but heartfelt in its exploration of family and identity. There s a gorgeous sequence at the end involving an art exhibition, drawing on Addison s own artistic background; it s impossible not to be moved.
Eighteen-year-old Bel doesn t need the reminder, but the director of the true crime documentary provides it anyway:  You weren t even two years old when Rachel went missing ... You were with your mum when she disappeared ... if someone did take Rachel, abduct her from the car where it was found abandoned with you inside, that means you must have seen exactly who it was. You saw them. At one point in time, you must have known, however briefly, the answer to the mystery.
Holly Jackson is back with another addictively twisty mystery in The Reappearance of Rachel Price (Electric Monkey, £14.99), following Bel s shock and uncertainty when her mother reappears, older and traumatised and possibly (well, certainly; we understand how this genre works) lying to her husband and daughter about what really happened. One to gobble up.
Finally, Aimee Carter s Royal Scandal (Usborne, £8.99) is a satisfying and gossipy read about an alternate-history British royal family, narrated once more by Evangeline Bright, the king s newly revealed illegitimate American daughter, or  Bright blight  as the tabloids would have it:  it s becoming painfully clear that no amount of media and etiquette can turn this American frog into a princess.  Tightly paced; tremendously enjoyable.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



AI skills critical to workforce, says IDA
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 18
Length: 298 words
Byline: COLIN GLEESON
Body


COLIN GLEESON
 A workforce that is equipped to use artificial intelligence (AI) is now  critical  to transforming Ireland s enterprise base and supporting future investment, IDA chief executive Michael Lohan has said.
IDA Ireland, in collaboration with Microsoft and LinkedIn, has published its latest report on the labour market, which is focused on  generative AI . It is based on data from more than two million LinkedIn members in Ireland.
The Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) defines generative AI as  a machine-learning model that is trained to create new data, rather than making a prediction about a specific data set . Examples of the technology include ChatGPT.
The report said 60 per cent of  Generation X  workers   those born between 1965 and 1980   have occupations where generative AI can  complement or transform the work they do, freeing up their time for more value-added and creative work .
Millennials (1981-1996) were also identified as having a  significant opportunity  to leverage generative AI, with 56 per cent in jobs where generative AI can  complement or transform  their role.
For  Generation Z  (born 1997-2012), this number drops to 52 per cent, with the remaining 48 per cent working in roles whose core skills are  less able  to leverage generative AI.
According to the report, technology, information and media is the sector with the  greatest potential  to harness generative AI tools and technologies.
 An AI-enabled workforce is now critical to transforming our enterprise base and supporting future investment to Ireland,  said Mr Lohan.  With AI set to transform a wide range of industries and occupations, leaders will need to be proactive in upskilling their workforce to develop the AI skills and knowledge necessary to leverage the technology.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



An 'off-piste writer' who broke several glass ceilings
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OBITUARIES; Pg. 13
Length: 895 words
Body


Lynne Reid Banks, a versatile British author who began her writing career with the bestselling feminist novel The L-Shaped Room, but found her biggest success with the popular children s book The Indian in the Cupboard, has died aged 94.
Banks   the daughter of an Irish mother and Scottish father   was part of a generation of writers, including Shelagh Delaney and Margaret Drabble, that emerged in postwar Britain and whose books explored the struggles of young women seeking personal and financial independence, in sharp contrast to the contemporaneous  angry young men  literary movement defined by John Osborne and Kingsley Amis.
The L-Shaped Room (1960), lauded by critics as a second-wave feminist novel, tells the story of an unmarried secretary whose conservative, middle-class father throws her out of their home when she tells him she s pregnant. Rather than reach out to the father of the child, she rents a small, L-shaped room at the top of a house in London and becomes part of an improvised family of fellow boarders, including a Caribbean-born jazz musician. Class, race, sexism and the danger of illegal abortions are all central to the plot.
Banks didn t consider herself a feminist when she wrote the book; as a young woman coming of age in the 1950s, she said, she thought that men were superior. But she soon changed her mind.  What a joke,  she told the BBC programme Bookclub in 2010.  I mean, I don t believe that any more. I think women are infinitely the superior sex and that men are probably the most dangerous creatures on the planet.
Banks came to regret the racial tropes used in her portrayal of the Caribbean housemate in The L-Shaped Room, acknowledging that racism had permeated her narrative.  The prejudices existed, and they came out in this book, and it s shame-making,  she told the BBC.
Bestseller
The novel became an immediate bestseller in Britain and was made into a film starring Leslie Caron, who was nominated for an Oscar for best actress.
The Indian in the Cupboard was published in 1980, and followed by four sequels.
By the fourth book, The Mystery of the Cupboard (1993), critics had grown impatient with the cliched characters that would step out of the magic cupboard.  Through its innocent-looking mirrored door march a succession of plucky, albeit creaky cultural stereotypes, ever predictable and true to the dictates of their sex, ethnic group or time,  fiction writer Michael Dorris wrote in the New York Times Book Review.
Lynne Reid Banks was born in London, the only child of James and Muriel Reid Banks. Her father was a Scottish doctor; her mother was an Irish actor (nee Marsh, but she went by the stage name Muriel Alexander).
As a child during the second World War, Lynne was evacuated with her mother to Canada, where they settled in Saskatchewan. It was a mostly happy time, and the human cost of the war became clear only when she returned to London at 15.
She first pursued a career as an actress, studying at the Royal Academy of Dramatic Art and working in repertory theatre. She also began writing plays.
In 1955, she became one of the first female television reporters in England, working for Independent Television News (later ITV). One day she was asked to try out a new kind of typewriter in the newsroom. One sentence led to another, and she realised that she was writing in the voice of a woman who was pregnant, unmarried and on her own. These random first sentences became the seeds of The L-shaped Room.  I didn t know I had a book,  she later told the BBC.  I knew I had a situation.
The success of the novel gave her the freedom to write full time, and she quit her television job. But her life took another turn when she met and married Chaim Stephenson, a sculptor, and moved to Israel to join him on a kibbutz.
The move led her mother to accuse her of wasting her talent and placing herself in a dangerous and  soul-stunting  situation, Banks wrote in the Guardian in 2017. But she loved her adopted country, and she taught English and continued to write while raising three sons, until the family moved back to England in 1971.
Banks wrote two sequels to The L-Shaped Room   The Backward Shadow (1970) and Two is Lonely (1974)   as well as two books on the Brontë sisters: Dark Quartet: The Story of the Brontës (1976) and Path to the Silent Country: Charlotte Brontë s Years of Fame (1977). She began writing books for children and young adults in the 1970s. She wrote more than 45 books for adults and children altogether, many with Jewish themes, as well as 13 plays.
 She was a wonderful off-piste writer, and a wonderful off-piste person as well. She broke the glass ceiling in all sorts of different ways,  said her friend, the writer Michael Morpurgo.
Aged 85, she touched off a literary furore when she wrote a letter objecting to the Guardian s decision to award its children s fiction prize to David Almond for his book A Song for Ella Grey (2015), writing that a book with  lesbian sex , as well as swearing and drinking, was not appropriate for children.
A predictable outcry in response to her letter followed.  Although I m still on the outs with modern life,  she wrote,  being old means I ve stopped minding what people think of my opinions.
She is survived by three sons, Adiel, Gillon and Omri Stephenson, and three grandchildren. Her husband died in 2016.    New York Times

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



An extremely online Taoiseach is problematic
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 14
Length: 922 words
Body


Simon Harris is, to use the internet parlance, extremely online.
On his TikTok, where he has 98,200 followers and 1.9 million likes, he has posted 290 videos, including 32 so far this year   ramping up to about two a day since securing the nomination for Fine Gael party leader.
He has 181,000 followers on Instagram and 1,721 permanent posts and reels, not including any stories that disappear after 24 hours. On X, he has almost a quarter of a million followers.
And yet, for all that presence, all that posting and engaging, it s not easy to discern where he stands on the big issues.
His TikTok output mostly involves video selfies, although he occasionally departs from the template   his 2021 Christmas butternut squash soup recipe (58,500 plays) being a memorable example.
Recently, as his backroom team swelled, his videos have become more ambitious: slick compilations of him out and about, pressing the flesh.
But Harris knows what his audience likes, and what they seem to like is a lot of Harris, the fewer production flourishes the better.
Here s Simon in a white shirt and red tie, against flocked wallpaper. Simon in a navy sweatshirt, talking earnestly about . . . something. Simon  just arriving here in work in what they call the ministerial corridor  he says, in a charming manner that lets you know he can t quite believe it either. Simon doing a TikTok dance with schoolchildren. Simon s completed Wordle. Simon promising  no bull, no spin, just follow me, come here, get the info, be kept up to date, ask me your questions .
On Instagram, the platform where he first emerged as a surprise social media star during the early days of the pandemic, the video selfies and days-in-the-life are interspersed with the odd photo of his dog or his children   and a feel-good aphorism or two.
Prodigious output
As to what he actually stands for, other than boundless self-belief and #positivevibes, his prodigious social media output offers few clues. Like the most successful social media influencers, Harris has a Rorschach quality. His followers can project on to him whatever persona they choose. He expertly conveys the sense that while he doesn t take himself too seriously, you and your concerns are matters of grave importance. He signs off with a familiar  Night  or  I ll talk to you soon .
During Covid, he posted nightly live videos that simultaneously conveyed both a leader in control (even after he was no longer actually in control of the Health brief) and a guy just muddling through like the rest of us.  Miss random catchups. Miss spontaneity. Miss closeness. But I also know this   those times will come again,  he said in January 2021. His followers couldn t seem to get enough.  Thank you Simon. You keep me sane in this very eerie lonely time,  wrote one that month.  I think you need to swap places with Leo [smiley face],  said another, presciently.
There is a lot to be said for the leader of a country making the effort to meet voters where they are   whether that s at a mart in Ennis, on TikTok, or adrift in a sea of loneliness and rolling lockdowns. Being hailed as the  TikTok Taoiseach  at a moment the New York Times has declared this the year of the first US  TikTok election  can hardly be said to be a bad thing.
But just how online should a politician be? Broadcasting to your followers on social media is a relatively low-risk enterprise. The risk comes if you start focusing your attention on what comes back. If most of your life was spent online, you might conclude the latest so-called culture war issues are the things keeping voters up at night: hate speech laws, immigration, puberty blockers for children, the liberal agenda. But out in the real world people are still worried about the things they ve been worried about since the last election. Housing, healthcare and the cost of living, according to last weekend s Ireland Thinks poll for the Sunday Independent. Immigration is a concern for one in four; 8 per cent are worried about the rise of the far right; one in 20 are bothered about  Government corruption . There was no consensus either on whether the Government was too liberal or too conservative, nor on hate speech or trans rights issues: a lot disagreed, a lot agreed, a lot were unsure. Voters, in other words, are just as mercurial and divided as you d expect them to be in a healthy democracy.
A very online Taoiseach has to be careful not to see the world through a social media filter or to run the country as a series of viral moments. Promising to build 50,000 houses a year will get you likes on TikTok   but at some point you ll have to say how, beyond  moving mountains  or  hitting the ground running .
Harris is a canny politician, an empathetic communicator who is, so far, much better at social media than he is at big podium set pieces. His social media skills have conferred on him an air of mystique among an older generation of politicians, who see the online world as a realm between nuclear physics and witchcraft. But voters are less likely to be wowed.
 Forever elsewhere
It was telling this week that on his first day as Taoiseach, he didn t have time for Leaders  Questions, leaving him open to the inevitable flaying from the Opposition. But there he was posting a video on TikTok, and two on Instagram, and busily retweeting on X. Whatever about the Opposition, will the public tolerate a leader who always seems to have one eye on his follower count, who has the air of being, as the sociologist Sherry Turkle puts it,  forever elsewhere ?

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



An Irishman's Diary
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 814 words
Body


The abuse of Dublin s Father Mathew statue, mentioned here Thursday, did not begin when it was placed on a pedestal in what is now O Connell Street.  As I ve been reminded by reader Rita Larkin, it was also the subject of an assault even before it left the sculptor Mary Redmond s studio.
One of the few women in her field back then, Redmond (1863-1930) had chosen as her model for the Apostle of Temperance an unemployed footman from Naas, Co Kildare.  Unfortunately, as if to illustrate the challenges Father Mathew was up against in his life s work, the man was an alcoholic.  Difficult and unpunctual, he arrived at the studio one day in 1891, more plastered than the cast. And perhaps in part because her preliminary work was almost complete, Redmond saw fit to sack him.
But the  malicious wretch , as a newspaper report of the time called him, later broke back into the studio, badly damaging his own likeness and attacking the artist too.
None of which turmoil was reflected in the finished piece. As one commentator said, its right hand  seems to beckon penitents, while the other is outstretched in a calming, arresting gesture . Whether the model was the subject of arresting gestures, then or later, is unclear.
    ***
As for the near-total destruction of the sculpture s fingers in the decades since, a person of possible interest to the investigation has emerged in the form of Myles na gCopaleen, late of this newspaper. Here he is, writing about the statue in a Cruiskeen Lawn column of 1953:  Some years ago a group of irreverent students, in the days when  rags  were tolerated, took note of the size and position of the outstretched declaiming hand and tried to put a pint tumbler in it.
He declined to give any more detail of the prank. But he did add, cryptically, with the air of a man who might have been in the vicinity at the time:  And they very nearly succeeded.
    ***
Not being a regular of the establishment, I didn t know Seán Kearney, a barman for 53 years at Grogan s in South William Street, who died this week. But many of my readers did and remember him with great affection.
The combination of longevity and the respect of his customers earned him a distinction more normally reserved for saints: commemoration in a stained-glass window, thanks to an installation at the pub by artist Katherine Lamb.
Among those lamenting his demise on Twitter/X, meanwhile, was Dublin historian and podcaster Donal Fallon, who suggested Kearney must have been a contender for the city s longest-serving barman.
Fallon added:  Like Paddy O Brien before him, he was part of a tradition of skilled barmen who became synonymous with the institutions in which they worked.
I didn t know Paddy O Brien either, of course. But as noted here before (Diary, April 2nd,  2020), in a column on Dublin pub mythology, he seems to have passed into legend in every sense.
Now as then, Grogan s website still dates the pub s history as a meeting place for Dublin s  artistic avant-garde  to 1972.
That, it says, was the year  renowned barman Paddy O Brien, formerly of McDaid s pub, began working in Grogan s bringing with him [...] the likes of poet Patrick Kavanagh, Flann O Brien, JP Donleavy, Liam O Flaherty.
And I m sure they were there in spirit, all right. But whatever about being part of Dublin s artistic avant garde in 1972, alas, Flann and Kavanagh were also members of the literary underground, having died in 1966 and   67 respectively.
    ***
Another Dublin writing pub will also be the scene of a wake next week, albeit a fictional one, as it has been for a hundred years now. Yes, just when you thought the James Joyce centenaries were over for a while, a whole new cycle is upon us.
It is 100 years ago this month since the  Mamalujo  section of Finnegans Wake became the first part of that novel (then headlined  From Work in Progress ) to be published. Many other serialisations followed before the final work appeared.  Mamalujo  is a portmanteau of the names of the evangelists, hibernicised by Joyce as Matt Gregory, Marcus Lyons, Luke Tarpey, and Johnny MacDougall, who feature throughout.
And to mark the milestone on Tuesday, Joyceans will read that and other parts of the book in The Mullingar House, Chapelizod, scene of the Wake protagonists  dream-filled sleep.
The invitation there reminds me again that my long-held ambition to read this famously difficult novel, although well advanced, has run into the sort of delays associated with underground rail projects.
My copy of the novel and of its mirror accompaniment, Roland McHugh s Annotations, both lie open, face downwards, at page 476, and there has been no progress for a year now.
Finishing the project in time for next week s event is clearly no longer feasible.
Still, with another big push soon, I m confident I ll have it polished off, finally, by the time this new series of centenaries ends in 2039.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Andrew Hughes 'In crime fiction the villain drives the plot'
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 22
Length: 895 words
Body


Tell us about your new novel, Emma, Disappeared.
Emma Harte, a high-achieving university graduate, has disappeared without trace. While a national debate about women s safety rages, archivist James Lyster seems to be following her story with undue interest. When a sympathetic tweet he makes about Emma goes viral, he finds himself drawn into the world of idealistic university students involved in the search   and attracting the attention of a police detective.   As the net tightens, James s comfortable middle-class life begins to unravel. Is he a victim or murderer? Feminist ally or callous liar? For James isn t the only one with secrets.
You made your name writing historical fiction, so how big a challenge was it setting a book in the present day?
It required a shift in mindset more than anything. I tend to write in the first-person, so once you find the voice of the character there s little difference between writing historical and contemporary fiction.
Your first book, Lives Less Ordinary: Dublin s Fitzwilliam Square, 1798-1922, was recently reissued. Who is your favourite former resident?
Margaret McGarry, a Sinn Féin councillor who kept a safe house in No 5 for ministers of the First Dáil on the run during the War of Independence.
Your second novel, The Coroner s Daughter, was last year s One Dublin One Book title. What was the highlight of the month for you?
The Anatomy of Crime with state pathologists Heidi Okkers and Jill Roman, moderated by Conor Brady and held in the wonderful rooms of the Royal Irish Academy, was something special.
Your heroine Abigail Lawless, the 18-year-old daughter of Dublin s coroner in 1816, proves herself an able sleuth. The novel s first line captures her personality well:  For my 18th birthday, Father promised me the hand of a handsome young man, which he duly delivered mounted in a glass bell-jar.  Will we see her again?
A sequel is in the works, but first I m writing a follow-up to Emma, Disappeared. I d love for Abigail to be a recurring character in a series of books.
The protagonist of your debut novel, The Convictions of John Delahunt,  is a much less attractive individual, a real-life child-killer and informer.  Tell us more.
When Daniel O Connell was tried in 1844 he complained that his jury would have convicted him of the murder of the Italian boy, referring to an unsolved case of 1841. When I went digging I found references  to the crown witness John Delahunt, a  spy in Dublin Castle who later turned his hand to murder.
What was more challenging to write, the mind of a murderer or an 18-year-old young woman?
Abigail was more challenging, but only in the sense that in crime fiction the villain drives the plot. Abigail always had to react to things that occurred off the page.
You ve also written a history of Killua Castle?
Killua Castle in Westmeath was rescued from ruin some 20 years ago and has been completely restored by its current owners.
They asked me to write a full history of the castle and its erstwhile owners, the Chapmans. Lawrence of Arabia was the illegitimate son of the final Baronet Chapman.
John Givens, author of A Friend in  the Police and Living Alone, and  brother of Liffey Press publisher David, ran a historical fiction workshop you attended in the Irish Writers Centre. How big an influence was he?
John is a fantastic mentor and I ve hugely relied on his insight and encouragement. The workshop is ongoing, and several members have gone on to publish novels.
Your native Enniscorthy is rich in history.
Might you set a work there one day?
It s very possible, though it would be difficult to go toe to toe with [Colm] Tóibín!
Have you ever made a literary pilgrimage?
Recently my family found roots in Co Monaghan quite close to Inniskeen.  While exploring we visited [Patrick] Kavanagh s grave.
What is the best writing advice you have heard?
From Dermot Bolger:  Always remove unnecessary words from a sentence.
Which current book, film and podcast would you recommend?
Juliana Adelman s debut The Grateful Water coming out in May is a wonderful historical detective novel. I hugely enjoyed Dune: Part Two. I don t really listen to podcasts.
Which public event affected you most?
I was in the front row of a packed pub in Enniscorthy when David O Leary slotted that penalty in Italia  90. A lifelong love of football has ensued.
The most remarkable place you have visited?
São Paulo.
Your most treasured possession?
My guitar.
What is the most beautiful book you own?
The hardback edition of the Killua book is gorgeous. Dark green cloth, gold lettering, with its own slipcase. They were produced by Duffy Bookbinders.
Which writers, living or dead, would you invite to your dream dinner party?
Margaret Atwood, Seamus Heaney, Agatha Christie and Blindboy Boatclub.
What is your favourite quotation?
There s a line at the start of a Magnetic Fields song that I like:  Billie, you re a miracle, and God knows I need one.
Who is your favourite fictional character?
William of Baskerville.
A book to make me laugh?
[Terry] Pratchett has made me laugh the most. Probably Guards! Guards!
A book that might move me to tears?
Serena Molloy is a member of the Givens workshop. The closing stanzas of both her verse novels Wider Than The Sea and The Tree That Sang To Me have made me tear up. I think she does it on purpose.
Emma, Disappeared by Andrew Hughes is published by Hachette Books Ireland

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Answers
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 8
Length: 463 words
Body


1. One of these news stories is fake. Which one?
(a) Reports of an armed man at a Scottish train station turned turned out to be a Star Wars  stormtrooper  on his way to a comic book convention.
(b) A Dublin man appeared in court nude, refusing to dress after his  emotional support  cat went missing during a traffic stop arrest.
(c) A Polish priest was jailed for hosting an orgy at which a prostitute overdosed on erectile dysfunction pills.
(d) A Wyoming man who ran over a wolf with a snowmobile, taped its mouth closed and took it to a nearby bar where patrons took photos with it, has been elected state governor.
2. Tánaiste Micheál Martin announced this week that Ireland will soon formally do what?
(a) Join South Africa s genocide case against Israel at the UN.
(b) Recognise the State of Palestine.
(c) Nominate the chicken fillet roll as our EU-protected national dish.
(d) Officially change the last two words of our national anthem to  C mon Mayo .
3. Who is this?
 4. Besides Simon Harris, who else was nominated to be elected Taoiseach in the Dail this week?
(a) Mary Lou McDonald.
(b) Ivana Bacik.
(c) Holly Cairns.
(d) Michael Healy-Rae.
 5. Due to a decline in letters posted, the head of France s post office says the company is looking to evolve into what kind of business?
(a) An ambulance service.
(b) A detective agency.
(c) A chain of legal weed stores.
(d) A meals-on-wheels service.
 6. On Monday, how did some Fox News anchors prepare their viewers for the solar eclipse in North America?
(a) Claiming the eclipse proves solar energy is less reliable than fossil fuels.
(b) Speculating that illegal migrants would use the four minutes of darkness to sneak across the Southern border.
(c) Claiming that the eclipse was a false flag designed to divert attention from workings of the Biden crime family.
(d) Airing theories that China was syphoning off the sun s energy to build a research facility on the dark side of the moon.
 7. Stonehenge is at risk of losing its Unesco World Heritage status if plans go ahead to do what?
(a) Build a McDonald s at the site.
(b) Build a monorail around the site.
(c) Build a motorway tunnel under the site.
(d) Build an all-weather roof over the site.
 8. Following the huge success of Barbie, Margot Robbie has announced she will be making a movie about which popular board game?
(a) Monopoly.
(b) 21.
(c) Checkers.
(d) Chess.
 9. Dublin City Council this week investigated reports of what unusual phenomenon being observed in the Sandymount area?
(a) A wormhole.
(b) A sinkhole.
(c) A blackhole.
(d) A quasar.
 10. Finally, Israel s foreign ministry has criticised Simon Harris for neglecting to mention what in his first speech as Taoiseach?
(a) The World Central Hunger airstrike.
(b) The hostages being held in Gaza.
(c) AI.
(d) Italia  90.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Ardagh's debt nears $11.2bn; Debt ratings agency warns group's balance sheet may become 'unsustainable'
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 18
Length: 431 words
Byline: JOE BRENNAN
Body


JOE BRENNAN
 The parent company of businessman Paul Coulson s Ardagh Group saw its total borrowings near $12 billion (EUR 11.2 billion) last year, according to its latest annual report, published after a leading debt ratings agency warned its balance sheet may become  unsustainable  if it continues to burn cash.
ARD Finance, which lies at the top of the glass and metal containers group s corporate tree, revealed that its gross borrowings had risen from $11.6 billion a year earlier.
Its net debt rose almost 9 per cent to $11.3 billion, leaving it at 8.7 times earnings before interest, tax, depreciation and amortisation (ebitda), up from a ratio of 8.2 at the end of 2022.
The group s riskiest bonds, almost $1.8 billion of so-called toggle notes, which allow the company to defer interest payments if it needs to, are trading at between 27 cents and 31 cents on the dollar.
They are due to be repaid in 2027, but have fallen in value from about 80c on the dollar last autumn, reflecting concerns about the effect of the group s rising debt burden, following a drop in earnings.
Still, higher-ranking debt that matures over the next two years is currently trading between 85c and 96c.
S&P downgraded Ardagh s debt rating late last week to B, which is six rungs deep into  junk  status and 15 levels below its top AAA rating, saying its  negative outlook reflects the risk the capital structure could become unsustainable if the group continues to burn cash, struggles to refinance its very high debt stock, or considers restructuring options such as a distressed debt exchange . A spokesman declined to comment on the report.
Bloomberg reported last month that Ardagh Group has hired US law firm Kirkland & Ellis and investment bank Houlihan Lokey to advise on options regarding its debt pile. Meanwhile, financial firms Gibson Dunne & Crutcher and Milbank have been retained by certain creditor groups.
Glass bottle factory
Ardagh, which traces its roots to the long-since closed glass bottle factory in Dublin s Ringsend, has been turned by Mr Coulson over the past 25 years into one of the world s largest glass and metal container makers, through a series of debt-fuelled acquisitions.
Ardagh executives told bondholders in February that it was  very conscious  of debt maturities and had been reviewing its capital structure. They declined to comment on potential levers that could be pulled to ease its debt burden, though they noted the company has about $800 million of cash and that that financial market conditions have improved this year, amid expectations of central bank rate cuts.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Artificial intelligence can already kill people
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 14
Length: 1060 words
Body


Among the technological faithful of Silicon Valley, there is an ongoing debate about the risks inherent in the development of artificial intelligence. On one side are the so-called  doomers , who believe AI presents an urgent existential threat to humanity; without rigorous ethical, technological, and legal strictures in place, they argue, we face a non-trivial possibility of machine intelligence wiping humanity from the face of the earth. This Terminator-esque scenario is palpably absurd, but that doesn t prevent people who identify as rationalists giving it a great deal of serious thought.
There are multidisciplinary research units at Oxford and Cambridge devoted to thinking through these prospects. Last year, a Bay Area non-profit called the Center for AI Safety released a statement on AI risk; the statement, signed by the likes of Bill Gates and OpenAI chief executive Sam Altman, announced that  Mitigating the risk of extinction from AI should be a global priority alongside other societal-scale risks such as pandemics and nuclear war.
On the other side of the debate are  AI accelerationists , who believe that such fears are hysterical, and that the great benefits this technology will bring to society are worth whatever trivial risk might be inherent in developing it. Fortune favours the brave, they say, and a technological utopia of endless ease and abundance will be our reward.
I m neither a technologist nor a futurist, but both of these prospects seem wilfully simplistic and implausible. What strikes me as strange is that each of them, and the debate between their respective proponents, get so much attention at a time when artificial intelligence is already being put to nightmarish and destructive uses, about which Silicon Valley s prophets of AI doom apparently have very little to say.
Earlier this month, the left-wing Israeli magazine +972 published a detailed report about the Israel Defence Forces s use of AI systems to generate targets among the Gazan population. Drawing on data gathered from automated mass surveillance of the area s 2.3 million residents, Israel s  Lavender  AI uses its internal algorithms to assess the likelihood of each person being a member of Hamas s military wing, or of the militant group Palestinian Islamic Jihad.
Subjects who rank highly enough on the system s scale of 1 to 100 are deemed targets for assassination, a process which is itself automated. In this way, according to the report, the system identified some 37,000 potential targets.
As with all AI systems, the value to its owner is largely in its minimisation of human labour. The report quotes IDF intelligence officers on the frictionless ease with which such a software facilitates mass killing. It is easier to have faith in a statistical mechanism, said one officer, than in a grieving soldier whose loved ones had been murdered in the massacres of October 7th:  The machine did it coldly. And that made it easier.
Another spoke of the essentially negligible role played by humans in the process of selecting and killing suspected enemy combatants:  I would invest 20 seconds for each target at this stage, and do dozens of them every day. I had zero added-value as a human, apart from being a stamp of approval. It saved a lot of time.
(The Israel Defence Force denies many of the claims in the report. It has said it  does not use an artificial intelligence system that identifies terrorist operatives  and that Lavender is not an AI system but  simply a database whose purpose is to cross-reference intelligence sources . It also said  the IDF reviews tar- gets before strikes and chooses the proper munition in accordance with operational and humanitarian considerations. )
Collateral damage
The most horrifying aspect of the report is its detailing of the guidelines on collateral damage; these inhuman calculations were made not by an AI system, but by the men and women of the IDF. During the early weeks of Israel s slaughter in Gaza, for every low-ranking militant, it was permissible to kill 15 to 20 civilians; in attacks on high-ranking Hamas targets, the number was more than 100.
It should be noted here that, even at the lower end of this scale, if 20 civilians were to be killed for each of the 37,000 military targets identified by the AI, the number of civilian deaths would be close to three-quarters of a million people, or about one-third of Gaza s population. In any attempt to reckon with the question of whether Israel is in the process of carrying out a genocide, it is worth bearing this calculation in mind.
Attacks on low-ranking targets were made using  dumb bombs    unguided missiles whose lack of precision inevitably meant the killing and maiming of civilians, most often women and children.  You don t want to waste expensive bombs on unimportant people,  as one intelligence source put it.  It s very expensive for the country and there s a shortage [of those bombs].
The manner in which the IDF s AI systems calculate the value of Palestinian lives is mirrored, in this way, by the language of Israeli officials. The machine does it coldly, as the intelligence officer quoted in +972 s report put it, but it acts in service of a machinery of state that is no less chillingly inhuman. The AI doomers of the tech world, whose worldview is formed of equal parts narrow rationalism and magical thinking, seem interested only in abstractions. They have nothing to say about the actually existing AI-assisted apocalypse being unleashed by Israel on the people of Gaza; they are incapable of thinking about AI as anything other than a kind of divine force unleashed upon the world by Promethean computer scientists.
But AI is a tool, like any technology, wielded by the powerful to serve their interests. If it obliterates entire sections of the employment economy, that is because the powerful are using it to reduce their labour costs. And if it facilitates the automation of death, it is because the powerful are using it to advance a project of colonial subjugation and extermination. It represents not a radical break with human history, in other words, but a radical intensification of historical business as usual: the rich getting richer, the poor getting poorer, and the powerless getting crushed by a machinery of power that is increasingly sophisticated, and enduringly barbaric.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Avoiding a banana skin; United Patent Court referendum
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 351 words
Body


Bruised by the most resounding rejection of a referendum in the history of the State, the Government is now reconsidering whether the time is right to proceed with its next proposal to amend the Constitution.
The ratification of the Unified Patent Court (UPC) was scheduled to take place alongside the European and local elections on June 7th. A referendum is required because some judicial sovereignty would be transferred from Irish courts to the UPC. The issue has yet to impress itself on the public consciousness. Until recently it seemed the main challenge for the Government, as well as for the Electoral Commission, which is tasked with informing the electorate, would simply be to alert voters to the referendum s existence.
There was less concern that the proposition itself might be contentious or that it would not pass. However, that calculation has clearly changed following the results of the referendums on care and the family in March. There are a range of reasons why these were so decisively defeated, not all of which would be relevant to the patent vote. The strong opposition from different political perspectives which the last referendums inspired are unlikely to be repeated in this case. But there is no doubt that some of the same factors    a lack of preparation, confused messaging, a lacklustre campaign   could well be repeated in June. And with the political parties focused on getting their candidates elected, there is every chance that their commitment to a referendum campaign would be half-hearted. If voters sense that lack of enthusiasm, history suggests they are likely to respond in kind.
It is unfortunate that Ireland s entry into the UPC may be delayed as a result. The consolidation of European patent law has merit and offers opportunities for local enterprise. But a defeat could take the issue off the political agenda for a generation and discretion may be the better part of valour. In fact, deferring the referendum could be the first of several decisions a risk-averse Government takes to remove potential banana skins on its path towards a general election.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Bats alter hibernation habits as climate warms; Plans are under way to convert a bat refuge in a disused school into a digital hub and exhibition space
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 7
Length: 953 words
Body


The bats are out in the evening again. Their chaotic flight pattern appears uniquely distinct from birds; every flap seems frantic, as if the bats could drop out of the sky at any moment. Their frenzied style is almost comical when those supreme aerial performers, the swifts, arrive in the first week of May.
I recall one evening last year watching four swifts effortlessly swoop and loop across the evening sky in pursuit of prey. And then, occupying an aerial space just below them, two bats frenetically twisted left and right in an utterly nonsensical pattern. It was like watching a performance of the Bolshoi Ballet interrupted by two large drunken revellers stumbling around on stage.
Comparing the flight of bats with swifts is unfair, though; their unpredictable zigzag flight pattern frequently follows the exact same movements of the airborne insects they are chasing. It s also impressive to think that one of the bats I saw that evening was likely a pregnant female who would have been weeks away from giving birth   upside down   to a blind and bare pup.
Maternal bats will find warm spaces to roost while nursing their young. They suckle their babies with milk for about a month in the summer before the juveniles are old enough to take to the air and find their food. The females mate in autumn and store the sperm in their uterine tract until the following spring, when they release it to fertilise their eggs. As the temperatures drop and days shorten, having spent weeks feeding and fattening up, bats begin hibernating in late October before emerging in March.
At least that s how it s supposed to go. But with our milder and shorter winters arising from climate warming some bat species are being forced to change their ways. Many now don t need to fatten up in autumn because the hibernation period has shortened.
In a recent study published in Scientific Reports, biologists from the University of Barcelona examined a colony of 17,000 common bent-wing bats in Catalonia. They discovered that fat reserves accumulated at the start of hibernation have decreased significantly over the past two decades, which suggests that bats are rapidly adapting to a warmer climate. The concern is whether thinner female bats can reproduce successfully in spring and whether there will be enough insects to eat simultaneously.
Twenty years ago in southwest Cork I witnessed the impact of warming temperatures on hibernating bats. One warm afternoon in late October I met ecologist and bat expert Conor Kelleher in a rocky field. Standing over a small hole in the rocks, he convinced me   a claustrophobe at the best of times   to follow him through the gap and down underground.
I squeezed between the rocks, which opened into a large cave. It felt like a different world: dark, quiet and cool. Kelleher  shone his torch on the cave roof, where we expected to see a roost of hibernating bats. Instead a small number were hanging upside down, some of them still awake. Kelleher  said the higher temperatures were confusing them; they were either still outside hunting insects or had moved into the cave to begin hibernation but the temperatures were not low enough for them to sink into complete torpor.
Biodiversity dataset
Kelleher  has spent his life observing bats. He saw his first bat when he was nine years old, staying overnight at his granny s house in Ballyvourney, Cork; she let him stay up late enough to see them flying around the yard. He was hooked. As a young adult he moved to England and trained as an ecologist with one of the UK s foremost bat experts. Returning to Ireland a few years later, he was pivotal in setting up Bat Conservation Ireland in 2004, a group of more than 700 volunteers trained to undertake bat surveys and monitor nationwide. All their results are added to a dataset held by the National Biodiversity Data Centre.
In his home village of Ballyvourney, Kelleher  was instrumental in saving Cascade Wood from destruction when in 2006 a bypass was planned through it. It s a semi-native woodland with a range of uniquely Irish species. It is home to the Bohill river, a tributary of the Sullane, An Sulán, which still hosts a small population of the critically endangered freshwater pearl mussel.
Cascade Wood is now a valued space used by locals and tourists; notably for Kelleher  seven bat species use the area as their feeding ground.
Although bats will roost in all kinds of spaces   from rocks, scree slopes and exposed limestone to holes in old oaks and even young birch trees just six inches wide   they tend to favour buildings. Beside Cascade Wood is a former 1930s boarding school, Coláiste Íosagáin, which has been derelict for decades. Given its proximity to the woodland it s not surprising that bats made the building their home, and it is now the site of Ireland s largest maternity roost of lesser horseshoe bats.
A major regeneration project is under way to turn the school into a digital hub and exhibition space. Luckily for the bats Kelleher  is an ecological consultant on the project. When it was derelict the bats used all parts of the building, including the lower rooms and the underground tunnels. Under Kelleher  s guidance they are now corralled into the attic; bats are happy there as long as they have access   a centimetre gap is enough   and the insulation and damp-proof membranes used are bat-friendly.
The hope is that this renovated building will be a shared space for humans and bats, located beside a rescued and much-loved woodland. If this comes to pass it will prove what  Kelleher has long said: that nature and infrastructure development are not mutually exclusive. With some thought we can always make better choices for everyone s benefit.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Belgium opens case into Russian payments to MEPs
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 320 words
Byline: JACK POWER
Body


JACK POWER in Brussels
 Federal investigators in Belgium have opened a prosecution into payments Russian operatives made to members of the European Parliament, in an attempt to influence the upcoming elections.
In recent weeks, it emerged security services in the Czech Republic and Belgium had uncovered a Russian misinformation network spreading propaganda that implicated sitting MEPs.
In a press conference yesterday, Belgian prime minister Alexander De Croo said federal prosecutors had, in recent days, started proceedings against individuals suspected of being involved.
 The investigation shows that Moscow has approached European members of parliament, has also paid European members of parliament, in order to promote a Russian agenda here,  he said.
Cash payments had been made to MEPs to interfere and push pro-Russian narratives, with security services in Belgium also examining the  bribery , Mr De Croo said.
He said he could not provide details of the names of any MEPs implicated, their nationalities or political groupings in parliament as the information was classified. The revelations come less than two months before European Parliament elections being held on June 7th.
 According to our intelligence service, the objectives of Moscow are very clear ...  to help elect more pro-Russia candidates to the European Parliament and to reinforce a certain pro-Russian narrative in that institution,  Mr De Croo said.
The Belgian prime minister said the goal of the Russian operation was to weaken public support for Ukraine in the war.
 We cannot allow this type of Russian menace in our midst; we need to act and we need to act both on the national level and we also need to act on the EU level,  he said.
 On the national level, our judicial authorities have now confirmed that this interference is subject to a prosecution ... The cash payment did not take place in Belgium, but the interference does,  he said.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



BETWEEN HISTORY AND EXPERIENCE; Niamh Mulvey's hallmark is her control. She writes with an ice-cool tone, slicing through the status quo to reveal the complexity beneath
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 12
Length: 1434 words
Body


In 2019, Niamh Mulvey found herself at a crossroads. After more than a decade in publishing she had built  an impressive career, editing the  likes of Louise O Neill early on and progressing through the ranks to become  a senior commissioning editor at Quercus, the UK publisher. But she had recently been turned down for a role for which she thought was a shoo-in.
 You know one of those really mortifying career disappointments, where you think you re going to get something, and then you don t?  she says.  And you feel like all the worst insecurities that you ever entertain about yourself are actually true.
In the flesh, Mulvey looks like someone who d have little time for insecurities. With twinkling eyes and smiling freckled face, she s easy, relaxed company. This morning she got the train to Dublin from Kilkenny, where she lives with her husband, Thomas, and two young children, Seán and Rosanna. But five years ago she and her family were living in London, she d spent a number of years writing novels that weren t good enough to publish and suddenly she d  had enough.
 I had been working so hard to get ahead in the industry, and also to write a book, and I felt like I had run into a brick wall with both things,  she says.  I was, like:  Maybe this isn t for me. Maybe I don t want to be in the literary world at all.
So she decided to leave her job, reasoning she could tide herself over with freelance work.  I remember thinking:  Well, who cares? The only thing that really matters is that I look after these children. And pay my rent.  And luckily    she gives a wry laugh    publishing is so badly paid that their childcare was the same as my salary. So it didn t really make much difference at that point whether I worked or not.
Her identity had become wrapped up  in her career, and now she wanted that identity back.  I was, like:  F**k it. I m not  a writer. I m not a publisher. I m not an editor. Who cares? I m still a human.   And that was a big moment. I know it sounds a bit cheesy, but it really was very clarifying.
Of course, the moment she let go was the moment her writing began to fall into place. She had launched a start-up, called In the History Books, with a friend in tech, but in the background she found herself tapping away at short stories. Lockdown fell, the business venture fizzled, but the writing continued. By the end of 2020 she had enough for a collection. She signed with  an agent   her friend Sallyanne Sweeney   and by 2021 her collection Hearts & Bones: Love Stories for Late Youth had sold to Picador.  It all happened quite quickly,  she says.  But it was this real flush of creativity. It was amazing, to be honest. It was quite transformational.
Mulvey had published bits and pieces before then, including a short story, in 2011, in the notoriously hard-to-crack journal the Stinging Fly.  I used to always think about that story as just a momentary lack of judgment on Declan s part,  she says, referring to Declan Meade, Stinging Fly s publisher.  I just kept trying to write other stories, and they were just terrible. Nothing was working. I was, like:  Oh, it was just a fluke. I will never write anything good.
Thirteen years on, a dog-eared and underlined proof copy of her debut novel, The Amendments, sits between us.  I still can t really believe that I ve written that book,  she says.  I just thought people who wrote books were in a different category of brain. I thought it was something that set you apart from everybody else, and I didn t think I had that.
The Amendments is a brilliant book that s hard to describe if only because it s different, at every turn, from what you might expect. In brief, it tells the story of a woman named Nell, who hopes to start  a family in London with her partner, Adrienne. But past ghosts are haunting  her, and the narrative jumps back to her teenage years in 2000s Ireland, when she was involved with a Catholic youth group.  It jumps back further, too, to her mother s youth in 1980s Ireland and her involvement with the women s-rights movement.
Mulvey drew on her own experiences when writing, although it took her a while to understand there was anything there to write about.
Born in 1983, she grew up in Carlow, then Kilkenny, the eldest of five   two girls, three boys. Her mother was a psychiatric nurse, her father a public-sector worker. Her primary education was through Irish   she attended Gaelscoil Osraí, in Kilkenny; her secondary education was at Presentation convent school. At university, in Galway, she studied English and history   all of which she thought of as fairly regular, and  not good enough material to draw on to write .
 I just felt it was very ordinary. Not particularly difficult. Not particularly privileged. But actually, when I started to permit myself to think about various things that I used to think about as a young person, I realised actually there was quite a lot of richness and interesting stuff there.
For example, as a teenager she had been involved with a Catholic youth group.
 It was similar in spirit to the one in the book, and it was a really lovely experience   I made some really great friendships through it. But I kind of left all that  behind as I grew up, and I think I was really embarrassed, then, at having been drawn  to Catholicism,  she says.  Ireland was all about liberal, let s forget about all that, we re cool now. And I was like, yeah, I m cool, too   I definitely never went to Mass willingly. I just didn t really want to think about it. And then when I did think about it  I realised it s interesting to be drawn to something that most people aren t.
When she allowed herself to write, the floodgates opened. First came the title story in Hearts & Bones, a sort of warm-up act for The Amendments, in that both are set in the same world, among the same characters. But when she shared this story with a friend, the friend was curious to know the bigger picture. Suddenly, Mulvey realised she had a novel on her hands.
 And I know, again, it sounds really cheesy, but I went home and wrote 10,000 words in a week. It just kind of came. The first draft was too much; there was too much emotion in it. A lot of the work I had to do in terms of getting it to where it is now was pulling back a bit. It was very intense.
The finished product is engrossing, heartbreaking but never too much. In fact, Mulvey s hallmark is her control. She writes with an ice-cool tone, slices through the status quo, reveals the complexity beneath.
In the background the 1983 and 2018 referendums   introduced and then lifted the abortion ban   are simmering, but this  is decidedly not a  repeal novel .
 One of the things I m really interested  in is the gap between top-line history and actual experience,  she says.  I kind of feel sorry for politicians, because they re trying to simplify things that are hard to simplify. Because life is so messy and complex. And I think yes/no questions don t often do a good job of capturing reality.
Mulvey describes herself as a contrary person.  I really have to watch it in myself,  she says.  I won t read the book everyone s reading out of stubbornness.
In fact, at the moment, her reading is consigned to spy novels and second World War books (in her words,  the reading habits of a grandad ).  I don t read any contemporary literature, not because I don t think it s any good but because I m scared of being too influenced by it, and of my own instincts being crowded out,  she says.  I want to be brave enough to write as I see it.
When she was writing Hearts & Bones,  in trying to inhabit the consciousness of  her characters, she became interested in meditation.  The minute you ask [what consciousness is] you re straight into meditation, Buddhism, mindfulness, all that malarkey,  she says.  I was learning to write in this much more in-the-body kind of way. Sometimes I d write in the dark, with a sleep mask on.
She brings this approach to her creative- writing classes, which merge writing and meditation.  I think writers have a lot of shame and tension and fear, and [the meditation] is a way of trying to sidestep that.
This sounds quite out there for someone with a very practical, editorial background.  I know,  she says.  I agree. And I am a  very sceptical person. I m kind of allergic  to woo-woo. However, I think there s something a bit mysterious about writing. I thought that you would probably ask  me about religion, and I ve never come  so close to believing in God than I have when writing fiction.  l
The Amendments, by Niamh Mulvey, is published by Picador on Thursday

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Biden's climate agenda faces legal challenges; New rules to curb pollution set to face a barrage of claims in the courts
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 12
Length: 889 words
Byline: AIME WILLIAMS
Body


AIME WILLIAMS
in Washington
 The US s top environmental regulator is expected to face a barrage of legal challenges from fossil fuel groups and Republican states after it unveiled a new crackdown this week on pollution.
The Environmental Protection Agency issued two new rules that aim to limit toxic emissions from chemical plants and remove cancer-causing chemicals from tap water, as the Biden administration tries to advance its climate agenda before November s presidential election.
Lawyers say both rules are likely to trigger imminent challenges from corporations and Republican states that will argue the rule making exceeds the federal government s constitutional powers   and expect a conservative supreme court could be sympathetic to their claims.
 This is the most right-wing court we ve seen in almost a century, and that s emboldening conservative legal activists to swing for the fences with legal claims that would have been laughable just a few years ago,  said Sam Sankar, a lawyer at Earthjustice, an environmental law organisation.  The legal landscape has shifted, and it s profound.
The lawsuits are stacking up as Republican states rush to launch challenges ahead of the election.
Republican attorneys general in 24 states including Alabama, Kentucky and West Virginia sued the EPA last month in an effort to roll back rules curbing air pollution and capping methane leaks from the oil and gas sector.
Sixteen red states including Texas, Louisiana and Florida also last month sued the federal government over its decision to freeze approvals for new export terminals for liquefied natural gas along the US coastline.
In December, 11 states also sued the EPA over handing tribes veto power over new energy projects, although last month a federal judge denied their request for a preliminary injunction.
Meanwhile, West Virginia is co-leading 10 red states in litigation against the Securities and Exchange Commission, the US s securities regulator, over rules that would require companies to disclose some of their greenhouse gas emissions.
 This is a trend that has been around for a long time, but it s getting more intense,  said David Doniger, a former EPA official, referring to lawsuits.  Now they seem to sue over everything.
Broader battle
The legal attacks are part of a broader battle between US government agencies, which set and enforce regulations for business and industry, and the judiciary branch.
The legal activists have been encouraged by a landmark case in 2022, West Virginia v EPA, in which the supreme court curtailed the agency s ability to limit greenhouse gas emissions from power plants. The court ruled the EPA had not been explicitly authorised by Congress to exercise its powers in the way it proposed.
The court is deliberating on another case, Relentless Inc v Department of Commerce, that seeks to overturn a 40-year-old legal doctrine that says courts should generally defer to agencies  interpretation of laws written by Congress.
Jonathan Adler, professor of environmental law at Case Western Reserve University School of Law, said the legal onslaught was partly a result of the Biden administration issuing more climate rules than previous administrations.
The administration s use of rules to advance its agenda had opened up a  legal vulnerability , he said, because the rules lacked specific Congressional statutes authorising  meaningful climate regulation .
Adler said:  What that means is that the climate regulation we get is based on using laws that were written for other purposes, being applied to greenhouse gases.
 The supreme court has made clear that it s sceptical of agencies trying to pour new wine out of old bottles   and in environmental law, most of our bottles are really old,  he said.
State attorneys general, who are elected officials in most US states, have pounced on this vulnerability.
 Federal agencies, and very specifically the SEC . . . need to stick to the statutory mandate that Congress gave them and avoid manipulating private actors for the sake of progressive policy,  Patrick Morrisey, West Virginia s attorney general, said after his state and others including Alabama and Georgia filed their case last month.
But analysts say the reactions from some attorneys general smack of political opportunism. Morrisey, a Republican, is campaigning to be West Virginia s next governor. Others are also using the actions against President Joe Biden s climate agenda to raise their local profile.
Cynthia Hanawalt, director at the Sabin Center for Climate Change Law at Columbia Law School, said the latest slew of legal challenges against climate rules should be viewed  partly through a political lens .
 There is a sophisticated communications strategy around it   several states said they would sue even before they saw the SEC s proposal on climate disclosures,  Hanawalt said.
The SEC has now put a hold on its own rule making pending a review from a US appellate court weighing the legal challenges from the Republican state attorneys general, among others.
Doniger said that although the Republican attorneys general would not  always win , more  speculative  cases were being lodged.  The next couple of years are going to tell whether these far-fetched and extreme case are going to prosper or fail,  he said.   Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Brilliant value in the land of the yews; A fantastic neighbourhood restaurant, deliciously under the radar in south Dublin
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 34
Length: 752 words
Body


It was tempting to go to Yew Tree for Sunday lunch, because a restaurant that does roast free-range chicken or roast Black Angus beef with all the trimmings for EUR 26 sounds like my sort of place. And if you want to have a starter, it is just EUR 33 for two courses, with some lovely options on the line-up of starters.
But, in the interest of research, I decide to explore the more extensive small plates menu that runs from Wednesday to Saturday, and in case you prefer to order your own grub and tell everyone, mitts off, this is doable here too. Sirloin steak and moules marinieres can easily be ring-fenced as main courses if that is how you prefer to dine.
As my darling husband knows, he gets little say in things when I am reviewing, so it is the usual strategy of taking an optimum line through the menu without getting too stuffed. Everything shared, of course, and we are both happy with that. At least, he says he is.
There are a few snacks   almonds, olives and vegetable crisps   but mostly it is small plates priced EUR 7-EUR 18, with a sharing sirloin steak for EUR 48.
Yew Tree is run by Máire Ní Mhaolie and Geoff Carty, seasoned operators who spent considerable time in the FX Buckley restaurant group before taking over The Headline Bar at Leonard s Corner, which they ran for 10 years. It was one of Dublin s great pubs, with an emphasis on craft beer and a tantalising range of gins; hipster, but not too intimidating. Before Covid hit, they had steadily been building a name for themselves as a destination for good quality food cooked by Mahmidul Hassan.
They are now serving some of the popular dishes from their menu there in the comfortable room that was once home to Circa. They found that their regulars loved the idea of sharing plates and just popping in for a casual bite and a glass of wine, so that is exactly what they have continued to do.
The vegetable fritters (EUR 8.50) are quite similar to an onion bhaji, with grated carrot, onion and red pepper dipped in turmeric tinted batter that has laced into a crunchy bite, with nicely frazzled bits of onion adding caramelised flavour. They are light and tasty, dipped in curry mayo.
The calamari (EUR 14) is a substantial portion with rectangular curls of fresh squid that have been scored and dipped in batter, then cooked to a golden crunch. The lemon aioli goes nicely with it, as does our bottle of Maias (EUR 41) a crisp white wine from the Dao region of Portugal.
The wine list is concise, with a handful of bottles under EUR 40. There are a number of wines by the glass, and it is particularly good to see that the sparkling option is Mas Candi Brut Nature Corpinnat (EUR 10.50) from a small Cava producer rather than a run of the mill Prosecco that is so common. You will also find spritzs, sherries, port and craft beer on the drinks list.
For our larger plates, it is sirloin steak (EUR 18) which comes with a fondant potato. It s charred and deliciously rare inside, drizzled with a tasty jus. The haddock (EUR 15) is equally good, a beautifully cooked piece of fish, served with a beurre blanc and green beans. This really is all we want for dinner, but if you were feeling a bit hungrier, you could add on rosemary potatoes which would make these small plates a proper main course.
There are three desserts, so we ask the advice of our waiter who resolutely recommends the opera cake (EUR 8), with coffee-soaked layers of sponge and butter cream, and the roulade which has a nice crunch and marshmallowy interior which just needs a tiny bit more fruit in the middle.
Terenure, or Tír an Iuir (the land of the yews), can be quite fickle when it comes to restaurants. I used to wonder when I saw an Italian restaurant (since closed) that was jammed to the gills. It was perhaps that it managed to cater well to families. What they are doing in Yew Tree goes against everything you hear about the vagaries of the restaurant industry, and I m not quite sure how they pull it off. But I am glad it is in my neighbourhood because it is so well priced for such good food. I will be back for dinner, the Sunday roast lunch, and indeed a Rueben sandwich from their weekday lunch menu.
Dinner for two with a bottle of wine was EUR 112.50. l
Yew Tree:  90 Terenure Rd N, Terenure, Dublin 6W
Music:  L Impératrice, Khruangbin and chilled sounds.
Food provenance: Kish Fish, JJ Young, and Caterway.
Vegetarian options:  Goat s cheese, vegetarian fritters and vegetarian roast on Sunday.
Wheelchair access: Fully accessible with accessible toilet.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Campaigner for the most marginalised in Irish society
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OBITUARIES; Pg. 13
Length: 769 words
Body


Justin O Brien, who died two days short of his 73rd birthday, was a lifelong campaigner for the most marginalised people in society, especially homeless people and at-risk children.
Among the many organisations he worked with were the Simon Community, Focus Ireland, Circle Housing Association and, in the last years of his life, the recently formed Children s Residential and Aftercare Voluntary Association (CRAVA).
He was born on April 1st, 1951, the youngest of three children, to Michael and Lillie O Brien, in Arklow, Co Wicklow. He never knew his father, who died four months before his birth.
He attended CBS Ardscoil Chaoimhín in Arklow, from where he won a scholarship to study in UCD but left before completing his degree. He went to work as a residential childcare worker at Scoil Ard Mhuire, now Oberstown Detention Campus for young offenders in Lusk, north Dublin.
At the same time he volunteered with the Simon Community in 1971-1977, serving on its board in 1972-1973.
As its chairman for two years, he developed a range of new services to meet the needs of homeless adults. In 1977, he undertook the new residential childcare course organised by Sr Stanislaus Kennedy (Sr Stan), who became a life-long friend, at the Kilkenny School of Social Education she had co-founded. He then returned to Scoil Ard Mhuire and subsequently to UCD to complete his degree, graduating with a BA in history and geography.
He moved to the University of Glasgow to study for a diploma in social work. From 1981 until 1984, he worked as a community care social worker with Strathclyde Regional Council in Greenock, Scotland. On his return to Ireland in 1984, he was appointed project leader with the Eastern Health Board, with the task of establishing a family resource centre in Ballymun.
In 1985, Sr Stan had founded Focus Point and he joined it in 1986, working there for 17 years as it evolved into Focus Ireland.
It was there he met the woman who would become his wife, Rachel Collier, who had been involved with Sr Stan in setting up Focus Point. She told his funeral that it was when she saw his sensitive and attentive engagement with a vulnerable young homeless teenager that she realised she was in love with him.
History
Aware of the urgent need for stable housing for the clients using the services of organisations such as Focus Point, he became the director of Focus Housing Association. In 2004, he established Circle Voluntary Housing Association in Ireland, an approved housing body (AHB), and worked as its chief executive until his retirement. By this time it had developed more than 1,000 housing units for single homeless people and families, with plans for hundreds more in the pipeline.
However, he had not lost his interest in history and politics, and on his retirement he completed a master s in public history and cultural heritage at Trinity College Dublin. His dissertation was titled The Institutional Childcare Past of Ireland: How Might it Be Remembered? It examined the State s response to the legacy of institutional childcare abuse, and specifically looked at three of the uncompleted recommendations of the 2009 Commission to Inquire into Child Abuse Report (the Ryan Report).
This marked a new phase in his life, when he became preoccupied with the provision of residential childcare in Ireland. He began research into what he found to be the transformation and privatisation of this care, and was concerned that this big shift in public policy was receiving very little public scrutiny.
He became involved in campaigning for appropriate services for exceptionally vulnerable children and young people, whose needs meant they could not access regular foster care, and was instrumental in setting up the Children s Residential and Aftercare Voluntary Association, which brings together non-profit providers of residential care for children and young people.
Despite the intense demands of his work with vulnerable people, he took time to enjoy the company of his family and friends, meeting up on culture nights in Dublin, walking in the mountains of Dublin and Kerry, holidaying in various European countries, where he always took a keen interest in local culture and politics.
He was remembered by his daughter Elisha as the  best ever pub quiz team-mate  due to his extensive knowledge of history, culture and politics, though, she added,  with us dead weights on his team, he never came first .
He is survived by his wife Rachel, children Elisha, Emma, Kevin and Joshua, brothers Brian and Michael, and niece and nephew Kiara and David. He was predeceased by his parents Michael and Lillie.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Centrists back EU asylum policy amid concerns over drift right in next parliament; Legislation will be drawn up for Dáil to adopt reforms into law in the Republic over next two years
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 2
Length: 770 words
Body


The imagery of what are known as  closed controlled  detention facilities for asylum seekers in Greece is striking, with fences topped by barbed wire keeping people in, all overseen by police.
The centres set up on islands such as Samos and elsewhere in recent years are what some human rights organisations say are  pilots  of prison-like infrastructure that may become the norm under a new European Union pact on asylum.
Earlier this week the European Parliament approved a major overhaul of asylum policy across the union, which will result in sweeping changes to the current system in Ireland and elsewhere.
In some cases under the pact, asylum seekers who arrive in Europe irregularly could be detained at borders, with a decision to be made on their case within 12 weeks. If their claim is rejected, that would be followed by a fast-tracked deportation.
The Government has committed Ireland to opt-in to all elements of the reforms, due to come into force by 2026. The reform of asylum policy in the EU had been debated since 2016, following the start of the surge in migrants fleeing to Europe the year before.
The pact approved this week was the product of a number of false starts, backed by the three largest groups in the parliament, the centre-right European People s Party (EPP), the centrist Renew group, and the centre-left Socialists and Democrats (S&D).
Before the tense vote on Wednesday, some MEPs involved in brokering the deal were concerned it could fall at the last hurdle. It had been opposed by the Left grouping and the Greens, who felt it was a regressive step, as well as far-right politicians who said it did not go far enough to stem the flow of asylum seekers to Europe.
Fine Gael and Fianna Fáil MEPs voted for the agreement, while those in the Left group, Clare Daly, Mick Wallace, Luke  Ming  Flanagan and Sinn Féin MEP Chris MacManus voted against most of the measures, as did Grace O Sullivan, Green MEP.
The voting session was disrupted for several minutes by protesters appealing for MEPs to reject the proposals. In the end, after a series of votes, the controversial overhaul of European asylum policy was voted through.
There had been concerns that if the reform was not passed it would fall to the next parliament to pick it up again after European elections in June. With polls currently predicting the far right to make up a much larger force, many centrist and centre-left MEPs backed the pact, over fears migration reform would be even harder in the next parliament.
At national government level, aspects of the reforms have been opposed by Poland and Hungary. The two eastern countries have hit out at burden-sharing measures to get other member states to help counterparts in southern countries, who are often the point of arrival for asylum seekers coming to Europe by sea. Under this part of the deal, EU countries can accept asylum seekers under a relocation scheme, pay EUR 20,000 for each person they refuse to take, or contribute by assisting border operations.
Legislation
 Civil servants will now start to draw up legislation for the Dáil to adopt the reforms into law in the Republic over the next two years.
The big question will be whether the changes will see the introduction of detention facilities like those seen on Greek islands such as Samos. One Government source said any new infrastructure would likely look more like the current reception centre for refugees and asylum seekers in the Citywest campus in Dublin.
Facilities that include security detaining asylum seekers subject to fast-tracked screening and checks would likely be very politically contentious.
At present, applications for asylum from those coming from countries deemed  safe  can be processed in about nine weeks, whereas other cases take upwards of a year, according to a Department of Justice source.
Speaking about the pact in Brussels this week, Taoiseach Simon Harris said it would give Ireland a  firmer  asylum system.  It will involve faster processing times, it will involve faster return processes and it will also involve providing more facilities,  Mr Harris said.
Eve Geddie, director of Amnesty International s EU office, said the new policy would increase the number of people held in  detention  at Europe s borders.
Separate side deals the EU had struck with countries in northern Africa to provide funding in exchange for help curbing migration were also  hugely concerning . she said.
 They become allies on migration and therefore Europe becomes a lot more muted in its criticism on the human rights situation, we ve seen that in Egypt, we ve seen that in Tunisia,  Ms Geddie said.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Chipping away at exactly that which makes us most human; From the algorithms powering modern life to the AI taking over the task, technology is rewiring culture and the wider world in alarming ways
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 20
Length: 1595 words
Body


At first, two new books by journalists looking at the effects of technology on modern life seem unrelated.
In Filterworld, New Yorker tech and culture writer Kyle Chayka uncovers the pervasive, often unexpected ways in which social media and big platform recommender algorithms   the formulas that drive what we see on Instagram, TikTok or Amazon   have begun to shape not just our consumption of culture, but its actual production. In the snappily named Code Dependent, Wired and Financial Times writer Madhumita Murgia tackles tech s topic du jour, artificial intelligence, the deeply concerning processes by which its algorithms are trained, and its unevenly distributed, frequently exploitative impacts.
But culture and AI turn out to be  illuminating, merging paths for understanding one of the most important issues of our anxious times: how we are all now slaves to the algorithm. So does the similar approach both writers take in pursuing their theme. Rather than opting for a standard, distanced, third-person journalist voice, Chayka and Murgia each take a highly personal and deepfelt approach to their subject, weaving first-person ruminations and personal history into their narratives. Both also very effectively allow a handful of individuals telling their own stories to confront the reader with the human consequences of creating and deploying technologies that are secretive by design and poorly understood even by their creators.
Chayka starts with a helpful background on the rise of algorithmic recommendation systems, then dives into how promoting what is most  popular  has become a self-fulfilling designation. Culture by definition is   or maybe sadly now, has been   spiky, unique, complex, provocative, challenging, embodying the discernible voices of diverse artists and creators. Do we actually like what we see, and see what we like online, and by extension, into real-life cultural spaces? Chayka argues our desires and interests are now methodically flattened into a bland sameness   the Filterworld   that we are algorithmically engineered to like and want:  We now live in an era of algorithmic culture.
He offers the deceptively inoffensive example of coffee shops, now similarly hip globally in exactly the same way: the cloned muted colours, clean lines, minimalist furniture, groovy lo-fi music, deftly placed plants and Instagrammable flat white. Like so much of cultural life, the coffee shop, he says, has been architected into an unexciting format designed to encourage shareable tweets, jpegs and videos.
Or consider the recommender systems on Netflix (or any other platform, really) which push  the user to coast along algorithmic lines of consumption . Watch a film full of evil aliens or a Jane Austen adaptation and the algorithm relentlessly pushes ever more of the same.  Variety is a difficult concept for recommendation algorithms,  Chayka wryly notes.
His discussion of Amazon s role in reshaping publishing in the most disheartening ways is another striking and convincing example of Filterworld s workings, in part because it s bolstered with facts and figures, forming a personal, though well-informed, hot-take. However, in one of the book s weaker moments, Chayka uses Sally Rooney ( currently upheld as a peak of western millennial fiction ) as a confusing example of  well, it s hard to tell quite what. He seems to be arguing that she s written books to fit the demands of what people want to tweet and post about and to suit online streaming (even though they were BBC TV, not streaming studio, adaptations).
 [H]er novels are inextricable from their parallel existence online,  he postulates, though many of us, perhaps less entangled with social media than Chayka, likely never noticed that aspect. And ironically, his catty Rooney detour seems a somewhat forced construct for enabling one knowing, bitchily funny sentence, so tailor-made for retweeting:  The 2020 TV iteration of Normal People might be best interpreted as a series of soft-core-pornographic GIF sets that would have been extremely popular on Tumblr had the platform not banned adult material in 2018.  Might it? Oh, miaow.
Chayka s concluding documentation of how he goes cold turkey off social media is by now a well-worn journalistic book and article construct for Discovering How Addictive Social Media Really Is, with the usual, totally predictable sequence of 1. withdrawal, followed by 2. growing, angsty self-knowledge culminating in 3. returning to use it (oh no) but with, at least for now, greater restraint and insight. That bit and the Rooney-bashing might productively have been left out of this excellent delve into the surprisingly overlooked specifics of how algorithms are eating away at exactly what makes us most human: arts and culture.
Like Filterworld, Murgia s take on AI is richly considered, but also meticulously supported with footnotes and a good index (both would benefit Filterworld). It s simultaneously a thoughtful introduction to AI, because potentially forbidding technical details are unobtrusive and serve the very human individual stories; and a deep dive for anyone who already knows quite a lot about AI, or thinks they do   for exactly the same reason.
Every chapter in Code Dependent shocks, even though Murgia, a self-described  innate optimist  about technology, also puts a gentle case for AI s potential benefits. The difficulty is in reconciling the potential with the current human costs and negative impacts. Despite AI s many possible positives, Murgia exposes how most AI software and uses are based on a significant degree of data colonialism and exploiting the  precariat , a portmanteau term that increasingly has been used to describe people such as gig workers struggling with job insecurity and financial and social instability. These people and their communities are profoundly vulnerable, and thus the easiest to exploit for personal data-gathering, for the ugly, mindless, repetitive work required to train AI systems, and for sometimes ill-conceived and poorly deployed AI community trials   all to produce or fulfil AI products and services the precariat will neither be able to afford nor benefit from. They are, among so many other examples, the delivery cyclists and ride-share drivers, the social media content moderators and self-driving car software program trainers, the healthcare app triallers and the AI revenge porn victims.
Seeking to better understand AI s impacts, Murgia travels to both nearby and far-flung places to find those affected and asks  the small, human questions . She talks to the heartbreakingly real people whose wellbeing and dignity is being sacrificed on the altar of ChatGPT, facial recognition technologies and monetisable AI apps and programs designed for the world s better-off individuals and societies. She uncovers the ethically ambiguous ways in which these jobs or AI trials in these communities can also bring new earning opportunities, possibilities of advancement, even save lives. Yet most of the time, benefits are counterweighted by job insecurity, inequalities across global workforces, and exploitation of those too powerless to protest. It s utterly riveting reporting.
Murgia also notes a salient fact: the majority of key research studies exposing AI s inequalities and exploitations come from  women of colour outside the English-speaking West . We owe these women an enormous debt of gratitude for this valuable professional work but also, for enduring   as I ve observed them do   a particularly obnoxious and distressing level of online and professional harassment from indignant Tech Bro types and the inevitable mansplainers. Among others, Murgia namechecks Irish academic and researcher Abeba Birhane who is now, to our immense national good fortune, an appointee to the Irish Government s AI Advisory Council.
What Murgia and these researchers show us is that when it comes to AI, we are all, ultimately, the precariat, at the questionable mercies of large tech companies and AI algorithms.  Each of these stories could be yours. AI systems will impact your health, your work, your finances, your kids, your parents, your public services and your human rights, if they haven t already,  she warns.
Unexpectedly, the book closes with a 2023 visit to the Vatican for an interfaith discussion on AI between Muslim, Jewish and Christian leaders, an unprecedented occasion upon which religious figureheads of these three major faiths signed a joint statement calling for AI designers to develop technologies using six ethical principles. Murgia chats to Rabbi David Rosen, Ireland s former chief rabbi, who thinks today s giant tech companies, operating across borders  with their billions of users, hold immense power  and have an outsize impact on the world, reminiscent of the ancient role of religions in society . While recognising the ironic parallels, Rosen says the event enabled these religious leaders to  remind the tech companies of the follies of power . But it may not be a message industry leaders will hear or hear loudly enough, even though major figures in the AI and tech sector were at the discussions.
Both these important books dovetail well to allow a reader to see the potentially devastating outcomes ahead for humanity   some, already happening   if the development and use of these two algorithmic technologies are left unchallenged, to primarily benefit large corporations or the already-privileged markets able to pay for new services. One can only hope these authors will be widely read and propel change.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Christians cannot identify with anti-Jewish bigotry
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 20
Length: 638 words
Byline: GORDON LINNEY
Body


It comes as no surprise perhaps that anti-Semitism has raised its ugly head given the current Israeli-Palestinian conflict. Anti-Semitism has been described as the world s oldest hatred. The Holocaust is the most extreme example, but it did not begin with Adolf Hitler. Anti-Semitic attitudes date back to the ancient empires of Babylonia, Greece and Rome, where Jews were criticised and persecuted possibly for their efforts to remain a separate cultural group rather than taking on the religious and social customs of their conquerors. They saw this as essential to their historic understanding of being a divinely chosen people. It should be noted that being separate in that way did not prevent them making remarkable contributions to the world in many areas of endeavour including science, art, music and literature.
Despite this, across Europe through the Middle Ages, Jew- ish people were denied citizenship, forced to live in ghettos, and persecuted. It is uncomfortable to acknowledge the Christian church was a party to this obscenity, providing moral cover for attitudes and actions contrary to everything the gospel stands for.
We perhaps see something of the origins of this in texts such as tomorrow s reading from the Book of Acts, where the apostle Peter accuses the Jews of being responsible for the death of Jesus:  But you rejected the Holy and Righteous One and asked to have a murderer given to you, and you killed the Author of life, whom God raised from the dead.
One commentator sees in these words a  transformed  Peter, where the onetime coward becomes a fearless leader, the denier a stout defender. But it was only a partial transformation. Peter had yet to fully realise the significance beyond Judaism of the mission of Jesus Christ and his followers, and was reluctant to support the Gentile mission proposed by Paul. The Book of Acts makes clear that Peter had some way to go before he could contemplate a future imagined by Paul in his letter to the Galatians where  there is neither Jew nor Gentile, neither slave nor free, nor is there male and female, for you are all one in Christ Jesus.
Anti-Semitism persisted officially in church life up until the 20th century when in 1959 Pope John XXIII ordered the removal of the Latin word  perfidis  from the prayer for the conversion of the Jews in the Roman Catholic Good Friday liturgy. The word had  been an object of complaint as it was commonly translated  perfidious , expressing contempt for  Jews. Yet even now anti-Semitism is alive and well in some Christian circles as was seen in a far-right rally in Charlottesville, US, in 2017 where torch- bearing marchers, among them white evangelical Christians, chanted  Jews will not replace us , a sentiment shared by right- wing political movements in many countries. These expressions of hateful bigotry are dangerous, but sadly they have been given a new impetus.
Christians cannot be identified with such attitudes. One may be distressed by and even critical of what the Israeli state is doing in Gaza and the West Bank without being anti-Semitic. Such concerns unite us with Jews. The Jewish Voice for Peace Movement and its Rabbinical Council has declared:  We are rabbis representing hundreds of thousands of Jews affiliated with Jewish Voice for Peace Action imploring our leaders to end their complicity in the Israeli military s genocidal campaign in the name of tzedek (justice) and real safety for all people . These are Jews who like decent people everywhere acknowledge the pain and grief of those whose lives were shattered by the brutal attack by Hamas on civilians in Israel last October and who seek peace and justice for all.
We are told Jesus wept as he approached Jerusalem 2,000 years ago because people did not recognise things that make peace. Little has changed.
GORDON LINNEY

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Church of Ireland notes
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 20
Length: 573 words
Body


The Spring meeting of the Church of Ireland Historical Society will be held in the Armagh Robinson Library on Saturday, April 27th, beginning with tea and coffee in 9 Vicars  Hill and registration in the Library at 10.30am.
In the morning session at 11am Dr Brendan Twomey, whose current research interests are centred on the financial and legal affairs of Dean Johnathan Swift will speak about Printing for power: Irish Protestant and Catholic controversies in the world of print, 1690- 1732. At noon Prof Peter Grey, of the history department at Queen s University Belfast will give a paper on Sharman Crawford and Disestablishment.
At 2pm the former Archbishop of Armagh Dr Richard Clarke will talk about the Enigmatic Lord Plunket  and the conference will conclude with a paper by Dr David Hayton, emeritus prof of history at QUB, on The Leeper family: from Dublin to Australia, and back, at 3pm.
Attendance is free to all paid-up members. Non-members can purchase a one-day membership for £10/EUR 10. Lunch will cost £10/EUR 10.
The annual subscription is EUR 40/£40 (student rate £15/EUR 15). This includes admission to the bi-annual conferences, book discounts, and exclusive access to the Society s recordings of papers delivered at previous conferences. See churchofirelandhist.org, or contact the honorary secretaries, Prof Alan Ford and Dr Miriam Moffitt, by emailing secretary.coihs@gmail.com
Silver jubilee
Tomorrow, on the occasion of his silver jubilee, the Bishop of Cork, Cloyne & Ross, Dr Paul Colton, has invited all parishes, chaplaincies and organisations in the diocese to join him in 7pm in St FinBarre s Cathedral for an easter celebration of faith and our life together in Cork, Cloyne and Ross.
From tomorrow until Tuesday the Archbishop of Dublin, Dr Michael Jackson, will lead a retreat for the Glendalough Clergy in Ballyvaloo Retreat Centre, Co Wexford.
On Thursday the Friends of Christ Church Cathedral, Dublin, will have an outing to the National Gallery of Ireland, meeting at 10.45am in the Clare Street foyer. Intending participants should reply to the Assistant Secretary of the Friends by Monday, April 15th.
The Bishop of Meath & Kildare, the Most Revd Pat Storey, has appointed the Revd William Steacy, Rector of Athlone, as the new canon of the two cathedrals in Meath and Kildare.
The first installation will take place on Wednesday, May 8th, at 7.30pm in St Patrick s cathedral, Trim. The Dean of Kildare, the Very Rev Isobel Jackson, will also be installed to St Patrick s Cathedral Chapter on that evening. The second installation will take place on Wednesday, May 22nd, at 7.30pm in St Brigid s cathedral, Kildare.
Oral history project
St Patrick s cathedral, Dublin, is currently carrying out an oral history research project and is inviting potential interviewees, particularly those who have a substantial connection with the cathedral community, through volunteering, the Grammar or Choir School, music, the clergy, service provision or family connections of long standing, to take part.
The research, which will become part of the Unesco-recognised National Folklore Collection at UCD, will assist with a better understanding of the cathedral community in the past as well as its role in wider Irish society and in the local area.
More information may be had by contacting the St Patrick s Education & Safeguarding Officer, Clark Bryson, at education@stpatrickscathedral.ie or at 01- 4539472, ext. 2.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Concern over fairness of TikTok's 'callous' redundancy process as more than 250 jobs cut; Interviews with multiple TikTok employees based in Dublin have revealed concern over the transparency of the redundancy process at the social media giant
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 9
Length: 1731 words
Body


For some months, there were rumblings at the Sorting Office, TikTok s 200,000sq ft Grand Canal Dock office, that something was amiss. Still, the company s announcement on February 19th was met with collective shock.
That day, plans for a large restructuring of the company s training and quality team were unveiled. As a result of the global plan, almost 900 Irish jobs at the social media giant, owned by Chinese company ByteDance, were placed at risk of redundancy.
The exact number of employees set to be made redundant at the company is not known, although it is believed to be between 250 and 300. Affected employees this week were signing off on severance packages, and on Friday, they were expected to report for work at the company for the final time.
Interviews with multiple TikTok employees based in Dublin have revealed concern over the fairness and transparency of the redundancy process at the social media giant. Some suggest that aggressive hiring during the pandemic laid the groundwork for February s announcement.
TikTok said that restructuring would allow the company to  further enhance our quality assurance processes , and that supporting affected employees was a priority.
 Ireland remains a hugely important base for us, and we re continuing to hire for roles across our business here,  a spokesman said.
Employees who spoke with The Irish Times did so on the condition of anonymity, as they were not authorised to speak publicly about the company.
 The way it was carried out, they re losing a lot of valuable, good people , one senior staff member said this week, days before he was due to be made redundant.  The whole [redundancy] process has been a joke, if you ask me.
In early 2020, as the video-sharing platform approached two billion mobile downloads worldwide, TikTok established its EMEA trust and safety hub in Dublin.
Scores were hired from firms such as Accenture and Covalen to fill the hub, with most employed as quality analysts, a content moderation role. People were enticed by the promise of opportunity, good benefits and better pay.
Within a year of establishing the hub, the headcount at TikTok s Dublin operation had grown to more than 1,100 employees, according to a blog post published by Cormac Keenan, then head of trust and safety at TikTok.
 They were hiring like crazy, 2020, 2021 , says a senior staff member in the trust and safety department. Employees worked remotely at first, and as coronavirus restrictions eased, moved into WeWork spaces based in the south inner city.
The company was in a rush to get people in the door, but according to a number of employees, the recruitment process s quality controls were severely lacking.
 I don t think they were very selective, which created a lot of chaos, and which led to a lot of conflict between different employees, different departments , says one trust and safety team leader, who had knowledge of the company s interview process.  They just hired people and they didn t invest in learning and development.
 Rampant recruitment Some employees are highly critical of the environment created by rampant recruitment during the pandemic.
 No one knew what we were doing,  says the trust and safety employee.
 Communication [from management] was very poor , another senior trust and safety staff member says.  They don t actually tell you anything. And if you reach out, for aid or for help, no one s actually able to do anything.
Despite all this, there were employees who found a way to enjoy the workplace.
 [There were] very good benefits for us, very flexible working hours , the team leader says, who initially worked as a quality analyst.
Last year, as TikTok s competitors were laying off staff in Ireland and across the globe, management in Dublin were reassuring staff that their jobs were safe. Staff numbers in Dublin last year climbed to about 3,000.
 We had a meeting last year, around February, that everything [was] fine with us ... [that] we shouldn t worry,  one employee says. With the benefit of hindsight, the employee  adds, the warning signs were apparent.
Twice-yearly performances reviews became the subject of controversy within the company last year following allegations that managers were being pressurised by TikTok to assign low grades to employees.
There is  a lot of pressure  on team leaders to fulfil a quota of low-performance grades, the team leader says.  They don t care who. They want to fulfil their quota. They want to find somebody.
A TikTok spokesman said that the company provided guidelines to ensure  consistency and objectivity  throughout the performance review process, but that ultimately, managers were responsible for their team s performance grades.
Several employees state that from last year, underperformers   generally defined as employees who received two low-performance review grades in a row   were offered payouts to leave the company, the alternative to undertake a performance improvement programme.
Separately, in November 2023, employees in the training and quality team were asked to complete a policy proficiency test. In a moderation task, employees were asked to label a queue of 100 videos according to a specific policy employed by the company to moderate material posted to the app.
Employees had to undertake the test whether they worked directly as a moderator or not, whether they worked with policy day-to-day or not, according to multiple employees. Some employees were asked to complete the test in a language they did not normally work in. Other employees said they experienced glitches during their test, with videos failing to load.
Employees were not provided with a breakdown of where they went wrong in the test, according to sources, although the company did provide employees with a final score.
 The way that they sold it was that they re just trying to see how people s levels of quality and policy knowledge,  one senior staff member says.  Everyone was told that it doesn t matter how you do, you can t fail, there ll be no repercussions, nothing will happen to you.
The company said that  standard  proficiency tests are often carried out at TikTok, and that when the November tests were conducted, it was not linked to the restructuring plan. It also said that the job role of all employees who took the test in November was, in some way, linked to policy, and that employees were expected to have a high level of policy knowledge.
Contrary to what was initially communicated to employees, the proficiency test would have consequences, some months down the line.
On February 19th, an invitation to an online meeting before lunch prompted alarm among TikTok s Dublin workforce.
At the town hall meeting, TikTok s plans for restructuring were unveiled by the company. A letter sent to training and quality employees after the meeting, seen by The Irish Times, confirmed that their jobs were at risk of redundancy.
TikTok said that the restructuring would be informed by new mechanisms piloted by the company to measure the quality of its moderation efforts. Morale at the company took a nosedive following the announcement. A special accommodation allowed employees affected to work from home, and some elected to stop attending the office. People were stressed.
With a limited number of alternative roles within the company available for at-risk employees, selection criteria was decided on to determine who would be retained at TikTok, following consultations between the company and 20 elected employee representatives.
To much internal ire, eligibility for retention hinged, in part, on the November policy proficiency test and performance review cycle results.
Selection criteria It is understood that some employees considered taking legal action against the company, alleging that the inclusion of these factors in the selection criteria amounted to unfair dismissal.
On March 14th, those at risk of redundancy were informed of their fate. In the region of 300 employees were told that their employment was  potentially  the subject of termination  by reason of redundancy , according to a letter seen by The Irish Times.
 If you got that email, you were pretty much done , says one senior staff member, who was facing redundancy.
Those told that they were not eligible for retention were facilitated in applying internally to other positions, in line with the company s stated aspiration of avoiding redundancies.
However, two such employees say that they were rejected from multiple postings. It s understood that employees were often unsuccessful in applying to internal positions, despite similarities between their previous job and the new opportunity.
One employee, who was directly involved in discussions with the company during the redundancy consultation process, says that the company was not receptive to many of the suggested amendments to the selection criteria, or the proposed severance package.
In response to suggestions to remove the November test from the criteria, the company maintained that it was a  fair, objective and uniform  assessment, according to internal documents seen by The Irish Times.
Following consultation, the severance package available to affected employees offers four weeks of pay per year of service, plus an extra month s gross salary and their notice period.
This week, many of those who were not selected for retention in the new restructure were signing off on the package. In excess of 250 employees, but less than 300, will be made redundant.
One senior-level employee said that he doesn t mind getting let go if there are more qualified employees available to the company   but the way that employees were treated during the process has left a sour taste.
 I m sad because, the market here is different, it s more challenging to find jobs nowadays , he says, days before being made redundant.
 These kinds of jobs are not as well paid as they used to be, and they are not as stable as they used to be.
Another senior employee  reasons that, following the intensive hiring that occurred during pandemic times at TikTok, the company needed to shed extra weight within the trust and safety department to improve efficiency.
Unfortunately, some workers are losing out because of a  callous  redundancy process, she says.
The process has left her feeling undervalued, she says.  [It] just shows how the company does not value any of their workers ... there was no compassion.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Connacht need to bring an extra intensity if they are to beat Benetton
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 424 words
Body


LINLEY MacKENZIE  Connacht are facing familiar URC foes Benetton in a crunch Challenge Cup quarter-final tomorrow. The hosts, with home advantage, will be favourites   backed also by a strong record in this competition.
Simply put, Benetton have never lost a knock-out fixture in the European competition at home, and will want to replicate their stunning victory over the Bulls in the 2021 Rainbow Cup when they delivered a 35-8 thumping.
Last season the Italians delivered a 41-19 win over Connacht at home in the URC, and this year the stats back up their cup credentials. After their 27-17 win over the Lions they are currently second in clean breaks, turnovers won, tries and points scored in the European competition.
This will be no walkover for Pete Wilkins  men, whose season has been somewhat erratic, but there is hope. Last weekend they delivered one of their strongest performances to prevail over Pau in France, but have lost Shayne Bolton, Jack Carty, and Jarrad Butler to injury. Andrew Smith, JJ Hanrahan and Paul Boyle are named in their stead.
Supporters
Benetton have made six personnel and a host of positional changes, with Italy captain Michele Lamaro returning to lead the side, and Argentians Ignacio Mendy and Tomas Alboroz coming into the backs.
Wilkins is heartened by Connacht s recent result against the Italians which they lost by four points, 18-14, in the last round of the URC, also played in Studio Monigo. And again this week Connacht fans are travelling in numbers, having played a vociferous role last weekend.
 We are all aware of the significance of this game and what a positive result would mean to the province, not to mention our incredible supporters. It will be another great challenge this weekend, and as ever their support will play a massive part as we strive to reach the last four of the Challenge Cup.
To do so, Connacht will need to apply the same, if not more intensity, that they took to Pau.
BENETTON: R Smith, I Mendy, T Menoncello, N Brex, O Ratave, T Albornoz, A Garbisi, T Gallo, G Lucchesi, S Ferrari, N Cannone, F Ruzza, S Negri da Ollegio, M Lamaro (capt), T Halafihi. Replacements: B Bernasconi, M Spagnolo, G Zilocchi, E Snyman, A Izekor, L Cannone, A Uren, J Umaga. CONNACHT: T O Halloran, A Smith, D Hawkshaw, B Aki, S Jennings, JJ Hanrahan, C Blade (capt), D Buckley, D Heffernan, F Bealham, J Joyce, D Murray, C Prendergast, S Hurley-Langton, P Boyle. Replacements: E de Buitlear, P Dooley, S Illo, N Murray, C Oliver, M Devine, C Forde, T Farrell. Referee: Mike Adamson (Scotland).

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Donald Clarke The last goodbye   why TV finales so rarely get it right
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 4
Length: 788 words
Body


 You never get a second chance to say a last goodbye.
Is that a saying?
Probably not. Anyway,  it wouldn t apply to TV finales. They  have a habit of coming back. Nearly 20 years after Frasier Crane fled Seattle for Chicago   and a full 30 after we last saw him in Cheers   the pop psychiatrist last year returned to Boston for another batch of sessions. What Larry David did with  the final Curb Your Enthusiasm does, however, feel unique in the troubled history of televisual valedictions. The irascible genius this week fixed the botched closing episode of Seinfeld.
We should have seen it coming. The final season of Curb began with Larry, on  a road trip to Atlanta, being arrested for offering water to a woman queuing to vote (apparently plausible under Georgia s election regulations). From early on it  was apparent that, like Seinfeld, the show would end with its protagonist on trial in an unfamiliar part of the country.
The earlier show, created by David and its star Jerry Seinfeld, was still in rude health as it rumbled into its closing months, but that farewell worked too hard to pack in references to the preceding 179 episodes. The penultimate moments of Curb find Larry and Jerry, in a happier place to the Seinfeld characters at a similar point, agreeing that this was how they should have said goodbye the last time. That s to say the heightened variation of David in Curb Your Enthusiasm is saying these things to the almost  real  Seinfeld as opposed to the almost wholly fictionalised Seinfeld in Seinfeld. Still with me?
The point is that David managed a remarkable save and, where many others (including him) have failed, ended a beloved series on a notable high. This was a Sopranos moment, not a Game of Thrones moment.
The habit of fretting over finales has a long history, but it has only become an obsession over the past decade or two. Who remembers  the final episode of classic-era Columbo? Well, me obviously. It was the notorious stage-Irish shenanigans of The Conspirators, the one where our hero learned the meaning of  sinn féin . It s just as well they didn t make a big deal of that 1978 story, as the rumpled gumshoe was back for an inferior (though not awful) revival a little over a decade later.
There were some high-profile farewells in that era. The last episode of The Mary Tyler Moore Show, in 1978   a model for the event finale   drew huge figures and, nearly 30 years later, influenced the writers of Friends when they shut down that behemoth. There is at least one celebrated fadeout in British TV of the era. In 1977, at the end of the 80th extant episode of Dad s Army, our  heroes break the fourth wall and offer a toast to the  real Home Guard. The mawkish finale of Mash broke viewership figures in 1983.
It was, however, the more recent  addiction to serial TV that really got the enthusiasm for big goodbyes going. Everything now unfurls in a continuous plot that entwines all episodes. Everything is a soap. The phrase  season finale , once common only to US TV executives, is bandied promiscuously by amateurs on this side of the Atlantic. Each helps build  a crescendo towards the much-trailed finale. When almost all TV shows comprised self-contained episodes, that closing chapter was less of a big deal. Maybe a much-missed character came to visit. The taxi company suddenly shut. The bar was demolished. Or, as with Columbo 1.0, nothing at all special occurred. If you ve ever wondered, the closing episode of Fawlty Towers was Basil the Rat. The eponymous hotelier is last seen being dragged unconscious from the dining room. Fair enough.
Now we require all narratives to come together in a satisfying final flourish that nods to remembered pleasures and dilemmas. Succession did that reasonably satisfactorily, answering the title s implicit question along the way. Derry Girls  (closer to an old-school episodic comedy) referenced the traumas through which  the characters progressed as it permitted  a stirring outburst of hope. Sometimes, a finale is all about the last moment. Season seven, episode 14 of Mad Men is merely an above-average entry, but it gains transcendence for a final shot in which, referencing a famous Coke commercial, we are reminded how the advertising business monetised the idealism of the hippie movement. Just perfect. The ambiguity of The Sopranos  final shot still stirs debate.
One thing we do know. No ending, however well considered, can compensate for a show outstaying its welcome. Curb Your Enthusiasm, Derry Girls, Mad Men and The Sopranos got out just before the narrative turned stale. It is probably best if The Simpsons just ends inconsequentially with another routine, largely unnoticed episode. Yes, it is still going. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Elon Musk is now part of a US-China industrial cold war
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 3
Length: 966 words
Body


In 1943, Alice O Connor created Howard Roark, the hero-protagonist of her best-selling and controversial book The Fountainhead. Alice O Connor was the married name, which she insisted going by, of the writer better known as Ayn Rand, born in St Petersburg as Alina Rosenbaum. The book has sold more than 43 million copies and, together with her subsequent novel, Atlas Shrugged, became the handbook of Rand s own ideology, objectivism.
Objectivism maintains that individualism and devotion to personal productive achievement should be our only driving forces. Today, Elon Musk exemplifies the virtues that Rand eulogised in The Fountainhead.
Roark, the embodiment of objectivism, was a single-minded purist, driven exclusively by the pursuit of brilliance. His ego dominated his world and for devotees of the book, the human ego is a unique force that propels gifted people to create a new future. Without them there is no progress, and these creative types should not be hampered by notions of unfairness or compassion. They are one-offs, maybe not the most humanitarian folk on Earth, but people of consequence.
Few could argue that Musk is not globally consequential. He is the American Dream incarnate, through his relentless pursuit of innovation and entrepreneurship. Musk has co-founded dozens of innovative, game-changing companies, from Tesla to SpaceX and Neuralink, even OpenAI, though he now runs a competitive company called Grok.AI. There is no doubting the man s vision and transformative impact, which is why is may be surprising that his flagship company, Tesla, has come unstuck.
Tesla s share price has been under pressure all year and this week has experienced yet another fall; it s down 30 per cent this year alone, making it the second-worst performer on the S&P 500. In a year where everything has been going up, Tesla s stock is down nearly 60 per cent from its late-2021 high point, while the group s market capitalisation has more than halved from $1.2 trillion (EUR 1.12 trillion) over this period.
Tesla s headaches stem from China, where the company has lost market share to the local rival BYD, which recorded a 13 per cent annual uplift in sales. BYD sold about 130,0000 cars a few years ago and is now selling more than 1.5 million cars every year.
For Tesla, in terms of market capitalisation, half of $1.2 trillion is still lots of money, and the hype around the company means that at a valuation of $700 billion,  it s at almost 10 times BYD s market capitialisation of under $80 billion, despite the Chinese carmaker selling far more EVs. Indeed, propelled by the  Musk Factor , Tesla still trades at a premium to most other carmakers, all of which are valued at far less than Tesla s $700 billion   Toyota ($330 billion), GM ($52 billion) and Ford ($54 billion)   despite selling far more cars.
However, quite apart from his marketing cachet, the travails of Musk and Tesla tell us something far bigger than the story of an evangelical entrepreneur; they tell us about the present state of relations between America and its rival, China, and how Chinese manufacturing is gobbling up the world by stealing intellectual property (IP) and making it better. Economic history is the history of theft, so there s nothing new here except that the Tesla story might be a cautionary lesson for other companies that have taken or might take big bets on China.
Cheap parts
When Tesla in the United States was struggling to access cheap parts and skilled labour, not to mention work practices that would never be tolerated in the American car industry, Musk gambled on producing in China.
His factory in Shanghai accounts for more than half of Tesla s global output and profits. But, and here s the big but, Tesla spent hundreds of millions over the years on industrial techniques, research and development, investment and know-how   and now all of Tesla s IP has been stolen and customised by Chinese-controlled, domestic rivals.
Musk s own IP is being used against him. And trickier is the fact that he is now embedded within the domestic Chinese supply chain and so must stay onside with Beijing, parroting Chinese views on global affairs, putting him and at odds with Washington. All the while, the market for EVs is not expanding at the rate it was supposed to.
The US and China are involved in a trade and IP war with each other, a type of new industrial cold war, where the Americans suspect that China is stealing the fruits of its research and fear it is better at adapting this knowledge to commercial products. China is taking America on in the place where America used to consider itself pre-eminent, in the global multinational market.
Take BYD, the car company that is eating Elon s lunch. Based in Shenzhen, it started out in 1995 as a battery maker and only began to make cars in 2003. In January 2009, BYD introduced its first production battery electric vehicle to the US.
Today, in southeast Asia, BYD has a 43 per cent market share in electric vehicles and in America it is expanding rapidly. It is estimated that BYD received approximately $4.3 billion in state support between 2015 and 2020. Its recent growth has been phenomenal. Before the pandemic, BYD sold 130,970 pure battery electric vehicles. Last year, the company sold 1.57 million battery EVs.
The economic battle between the US and China, like the economic war between Germany and Britain before the first World War, will play out across a variety of platforms, technological, financial and industrial.
The US will continue to celebrate the unique genius-like Musk, while China will promote the notion of the great communal national effort, but when you strip it all away, it s a battle for global power. In this showdown, the trials of Musk may be chicken feed in comparison with what is to come.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Estate sales range from Minor to Milo; Upcoming auctions feature highly sought after solid silver tea sets and an 18th-century map of Cork
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: NO SECTION; Pg. 3
Length: 745 words
Body


Seasoned auctioneers love nothing more than house content auctions with lineage, as during their onsite valuations, they discover the predilections and personalities of past generations by viewing what families have accumulated over decades and sometimes centuries.
The estate of the late Roma Peare of Kinsale, Co Cork, and originally from the Tipperary-based Knox family, will be auctioned by Lynes & Lynes next Saturday. Denis Lynes says it has lots of interesting items, including Georgian furniture, paintings, engraving, children s books and antique toys. He is particularly excited about the collection of solid silver tea sets and cutlery.
 The silver section is very good and these items are always snapped up,  he says. One item of interest is a silver teapot, which has an estimate of EUR 200-EUR 300.
Lynes also expects that some Tipperary museums might be interested in portraits of the previous members of the Knox family, who owned Brittas Castle, a 19th-century  archaeological  castle near Thurles, and later Parkville, near Clonmel.
Map collectors may also be keen on a large 18th-century framed map of the city of Cork and its suburbs by John Rocque, which has an estimate of EUR 400-EUR 600. The French-born British surveyor was best known for his 1746 Map of London, which was then the most detailed map of that city. Rocque spent six years in Dublin in the mid 18th century, during which time he produced maps of Dublin, Armagh, Kilkenny and Cork. Engravings of Youghal and Cork by the Irish doctor and local historian Charles Smith are also for sale.
But perhaps the most exciting item in this auction of almost 500 lots is a Morris Minor car that was bought new by the Peare family in 1961. The car, which has an estimate of EUR 2,500-EUR 3,500, has not been driven in 15 years, so will need a bit of tender restoration from its new owner.
Lynes advises potential purchasers to come to the viewings to get a true sense of the items for sale.  There is a lot of old stuff in all different kinds of condition so it s very important to view it,  he says.
You might associate large stuffed dead animals with the Natural History Museum, or an old castellated hunting lodge deep in the Wicklow mountains, but Victor Mee Auctions in Cloverhill, Belturbet, Co Cavan, have a few rare taxidermy pieces for sale in their Decorative Interiors online auction on Wednesday and Thursday April 24th and 25th.
 Owners of period properties or hotel owners are potential buyers,  explains Brian Mee. The pieces in question are a full-sized taxidermy brown bear with an estimate of EUR 4,000-EUR 8,000, a life-size taxidermy gazelle (EUR 1,000-EUR 2,000), and the head and shoulders of an eland (African antelope) bull (EUR 1,000-EUR 2,000). The auction, which has about 950 lots in total, also includes a life sized cast of an Irish elk.
Mee is keeping schtum about the exact providence of some carved plaster statues and urns   only saying that they are from a period home in the midlands   which will also be on sale in their forthcoming Decorative Interiors auction.
White marble imitation
The 19th century French parian ware (porcelain imitating white marble from the Greek island of Paros) statue of Venus has the highest estimate (EUR 1,500-EUR 3,000). The plaster model of Sphinx, the mythical creature with the head of a human, the body of a lion and the wings of an eagle has an estimate of EUR 600-EUR 1,200, while a plaster model of the Venus de Milo has an estimate of EUR 400-EUR 800. The original ancient Greek marble statue, which was unearthed on the Greek island of Milos without its arms in 1820, has since become one of the most celebrated pieces of art in western culture. It was acquired by the Marquis de Rivière, the French ambassador to Greece at that time. He then presented it to King Lous XVIII, who donated it to the Louvre in 1821, where it remains to this day.
On a more prosaic note, the French copper bath (estimate EUR 600-EUR 1,200), may be of interest to gardeners as a planter.
Meanwhile in New York, Sotheby s has a number of items of Irish interest at its upcoming Classic Design: Furniture, Silver & Ceramics sale, which will take place on Tuesday. Lots include an assembled Irish silver old English pattern flatware service, from around 1735, which has an estimate of $3,000-$5,000 (EUR 2,766-EUR 4,611 )and an Irish George II side table from the 19th century (estimate $5,000-$8,000).  lynesandlynes.com; victormeeauctions.ie; sothebys.com

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Explorations of the unanswerable
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 26
Length: 875 words
Body


If you were hoping for Caroline Crampton s latest book on  hypochondria to provide some clarifying definition of the term, you may find yourself a little  disappointed. It is through the exploration of the unanswerable that Crampton invites us into her inner world, where she remains haunted by the duality of being sick and well in each waking moment.
In Crampton s view, hypochondria breeds on the  doubt inherent in modern medicine . Since certainty is a condition that has always been irreconcilable with science and medicine, hypochondria  has persisted, from its roots as a purely anatomical term in the fifth century BC   denoting the upper third of the abdomen    to the present day.
In one poetic attempt to encapsulate the essence of the condition, she describes it as  being homesick for the body that you are still in . This description feels all the more poignant when Crampton reveals the origins of her own hypochondria: a  diagnosis of Hodgkin s lymphoma at 17 which, despite going into remission after  a half-decade of invasive treatments, has left her hyper-conscious of  every twinge and scrape .
In tying her own experience, as if by an invisible thread, to numerous intellectual giants and fictional characters across  time, she offers us a rounder taste of her condition. She speaks of the magical thinking that permeated Joan Didion s  life in the wake of her husband s death;  the existential dread of Woody Allen s parodied neurotic characters  forever trapped between the two possibilities   of health and terminal illness; the despair of Elizabethan poet John Donne facing  his mortality during a relapsing fever; and the obsessiveness of Charles Darwin s daily rituals aimed at controlling his fears about his degenerating body.
Just as the condition itself is rife with contradictions, Crampton wastes no time exposing her own contradictory relationship with the condition. She oscillates between emphasising its utter absurdity   the reason it lends itself so effortlessly to cruel satire   and showing us her reverent appreciation of its deeper existential roots. At its core, she suggests that hypochondria is nothing more than the fear of death.  She questions whether we should all  fear death, suggesting that the blissful ignorance of health and a medically uninformed mind may derive from a comforting lie   that we will be alive tomorrow when such certainty is never guaranteed.
With the realisation that a tumour could grow silently for years, undetected, and the fact that she herself could have a solid mass in her neck without noticing, Crampton finds herself ruthlessly disenchanted with this illusion.
Her unflinching interrogation of hypochondria and its evolution leads to fascinating cultural observations, as when she highlights the striking similarities between the  quacks  of the past and those of contemporary society. Both exploit  what she regards as the hypochondriac s desperate yearning for certainty and explanatory narrative. This, in the eyes of Crampton, is precisely what modern quackery and the so-called wellness industry thrive on.
By implying that hypochondria is a driving force behind the modern wellness industry, Crampton risks stretching an already elusive concept to the brink of losing its meaning, potentially reducing it to a catch-all term for anxiety. However,  readers will probably be willing to forgive her tendency to blur the lines between hypochondria and poorly understood chronic illnesses, as well as her inadvertent reinforcement of the long-discredited divisions between  mind  and  body  given the depth and breadth of her thinking.
Her investigation reaches beyond her private experience and even beyond hypochondria as a shape-shifting, millenniums-old evolutionary phenomenon, delving into what hypochondria reveals about the evolution of scientific and medical thought at large.
Hypochondria has evolved throughout the millenniums from a purely physical, abdomen-rooted condition to a mental disorder. As research investigates the microbiota-gut-brain axis and seeks to identify and treat mental health conditions using biological markers, Crampton has the sense that  the body is returning , possibly heralding a  return to the very beginning of hypochondria .
 Haunted by the image of hypochondria as an enormous pendulum,  she questions our cultural understanding of scientific progress as a steady march towards some inevitable endpoint. In following the evolution of hypochondria through  the different minds that attempted to elucidate it, Crampton shows that our medical advancement can paradoxically land us back near our original starting position. Somehow, the introduction of a new diagnostic name    illness symptom disorder  or  illness anxiety disorder    along with the gravitas of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual Fifth Edition (DSM-5), appears to shield us from the cyclical nature of progress.
Crampton starts and finishes the book as a hypochondriac. She gifts the reader with a glimpse of just how much she has had to battle her perfectionism to end without a neat narrative resolution, without  a moment of absolute catharsis . In a manner that aptly captures the reality of hypochondria, she reveals that  a good ending . . . has yet to arrive .

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



FAI only reaping what they've sown with manager delay
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 4
Length: 875 words
Body


We are, it seems, just a few days away from the announcement of a new manager for the Ireland men s soccer team. The search has spanned two taoisigh, two GAA presidents, two lost referenda even. We were on Storm Debi when Stephen Kenny was let go   by now, Storm Lilian is next on the block. Any longer and Tamiko and Walid will get the shout.
This has all taken a while, is the point. Twenty weeks, officially   or 143 days and counting if you want to be precise about it. But of course, it would feel reasonable to assume that the search has been going on in some shape or form for a bit longer than that.
It s not like Kenny stunned the nation and left the FAI in the lurch in November. The defeat at home to Greece was on October 10th , the away loss in Athens was the previous June. The point is, for some or all of the past 10 months, the FAI has had a fair idea they would be filling the seat anew.
And yet here we are. At some stage next week, likely on Thursday, the association will announce their choice to guide the team for the next few years. It will be who it will be. Ole Gunnar Solskjaer is seemingly in the mix now. The groundswell of apathy towards the idea of it ending up being John O Shea tells you all you need to know about how tired everyone is of the whole thing now.
It barely needs pointing out that should not be the way of things. The Ireland men s soccer team is one of the very few entities in Irish life that people from all counties, all classes, all backgrounds hold dear. Even if it s only to bitch and moan about it, people everywhere in the country and beyond have a connection to it, one you need to be very careful about trifling with.
Niche and siloed
With the best will in the world, you can t say that about the Ireland men s rugby team or the representative women s teams or any of the GAA teams. Their core constituencies are more niche and siloed. There s very little you could do with any of them that would exercise more than a limited percentage of the sporting public. But the manager of the men s soccer team is different. Or at least it ought to be.
Which is why this has all become such a trial for the FAI. The one iron truth in a world of spoof is that you can t appoint an Ireland manager in secret. You can be secretive as you go about it, which is something else entirely. To their credit, Marc Canham and Jonathan Hill have let precious little leak out about the process. They pointedly haven t dropped names in front of the FAI board to guard against little birdies going fluttering off in the wind.
But there comes a certain point when they have to pull back the curtain and go,  Ta-da!  That s when everyone immediately works backwards and parses whatever you said throughout the process to try and match it up with what you ve ultimately produced.
Preliminary talks
Hill said back at the start of December that the FAI had held preliminary talks with all the candidates. Since his name is only bubbling up for the first time now, it s hard to imagine Solskjaer was one of those. By all accounts Roy Keane was. Throw in O Shea and we re nearly a third of the way to the whole Manchester United team circa 2003. Maybe Eric Djemba-Djemba got a DM somewhere along the way?
The point is, there s no way the FAI are going to be able to spin this next week that will give anyone confidence that they ve been in control of the process throughout. You re not in control if the whole thing takes five months. You re not in control if you end up with someone who was fourth/fifth/whatever choice.
You re not in control if you talk about having to wait on contractual obligations to end before you can confirm or deny any candidate and then appoint either (a) O Shea, who openly said a month ago that he d love the job or (b) Solskjaer, who has been out of work since November 2021. This is not being in control of the situation. This is the situation being in control of you.
And, in some way, that s understandable. Nobody should pretend the FAI had an easy task here. Managing the Ireland men s football team is not an attractive job, at the back of it all. The salary is about mid-Championship level   what ambitious young buck wouldn t prefer a job that is within touching distance of the Premier League over a nation that has missed two Euros in a row and hasn t been to a World Cup since 2002?
Relegated
On top of which, the playing staff is far from stellar. Our best goalkeeper is only keeping the seat warm until Liverpool s Number One returns. Anything up to four of our first-choice defence will be relegated in the coming weeks.
If Josh Cullen goes down with Burnley, it is likely that the new manager won t have a single Premier League midfielder to pick when the Nations League comes around in September. Evan Ferguson, the brightest spot on the horizon, hasn t scored a goal for Brighton in five months.
Whatever way you look at it, the job hasn t a lot to recommend it. Which is presumably why it has taken so long for them to fill it. Decades of mismanagement have led to a middling team with limited prospects and no way of generating the sort of salary that would attract a buzzy name.
It s been a tough gig for the FAI. But in this, as in so much else, they are only reaping what they ve sown.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



FBI identified man who sought false Irish passport
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 500 words
Byline: BARRY ROCHE
Body


BARRY ROCHE
 A 72-year-old US man, whom gardaí identified when they sent his fingerprints to the FBI, was living on a houseboat in Amsterdam when he applied for a false Irish passport in the name of a dead Irish child, a court has heard.
Randolph Parker appeared at Cork Circuit Criminal Court yesterday for a sentencing hearing after he pleaded guilty to four counts of providing false information to obtain Irish passports in the names of two dead infants and a fifth charge of possessing an Irish driving licence that he knew to be false.
Det Garda Padraig Hanley had previously testified that gardaí were only able to identify him when they contacted the US embassy and forwarded his fingerprints to the FBI. The agency confirmed that he was Randolph Parker who had been arrested in Michigan in 1970.
Det Garda Hanley outlined the background to the investigation which led to Parker s arrest when he went into the passport office in Cork on September 14th, 2023 to collect a passport that he had applied for in the name of Geoffrey Warbrook.
Det Garda Hanley said gardaí believed at the time that the accused s name was Philip Francis Morris and that he had only applied for a false passport in the name of Geoffery Warbrook, who died in 1952 while still an infant.
However, they subsequently learned that Philip Morris had also died in 1952 and when they questioned Parker, who had also obtained an Irish driving licence using the false name of Philip Morris, he refused to reveal his real identity.
 We had two identities and four false Irish passports   two in the name of Geoffrey Warbrook and two in the name of Philip Morris   we were then in the situation where we had no idea who this person was,  said Det Garda Hanley.
The court heard Parker had been remanded in Cork Prison after he was first charged. While he was willing to confirm that he was Randolph Parker, he did not co-operate further with Garda inquiries, though he was  affable and articulate .
Questioned by prosecution barrister Emmet Boyle, Det Garda Hanley said gardaí had established that the accused had a US passport in 1994 in the name of Randolph Parker and they believed that he entered Ireland in 1988 using that passport.
Gardaí established that he had travelled from Ireland all around Europe and had lived for a time on a houseboat in Amsterdam, which was where he was living when he applied for a false passport in the name of Geoffrey Warbrook on June 7th, 2022.
Det Garda Hanley said that Parker did not have any family in Ireland, but he had made friends all over the country. However, none of them knew him as either Randolph Parker, Philip Morris or Geoffrey Warbrook as he used yet another name in all his dealings with his friends.
Det Garda Hanley confirmed to defence barrister Brendan Kelly  that Parker had no previous convictions that gardaí could find and he also accepted that Parker was a model prisoner in Cork Prison.
Judge Jonathan Dunphy  remanded Parker in continuing custody for sentence on April 22nd.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Flores on the double settles the derby
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 434 words
Byline: GAVIN CUMMISKEY
Body


GAVIN CUMMISKEY at Tolka Park
 Thanks to Jordan Flores, Bohemians are alive and well.
Big picture: the Dublin clubs are putting the squeeze on, surrounding second placed Derry City in the top five as Shelbourne s lead at the top shrinks to five points.
Spring was in the Drumcondra air as 4,700 crammed into Tolka Park to see Shels versus Bohs.
The northside derby started like a train but descended into a cagey contest.
Damien Duff s men initially threatened to overwhelm the neighbours but Sean Boyd and Liam Burt were unable to capitalise. Bohs survived mainly through the bravery and nous of their centre-halves, Jevon Mills and Aboubacar Keita.
For 35 minutes, it was as engrossing as it was tight until Mills launched one towards James Akintunde.
Gavin Molloy had the Bohs striker covered until Conor Kearns rushed from his goal and bumped into Akintunde. Referee Paul McLaughlin had waved off two earlier penalty shouts but he instantly pointed to the spot.
Step up Flores, the skipper made it 1-0 by drilling his penalty into the bottom corner.
Not three minutes passed before Flores ghosted to the back post to head in Dayle Rooney s corner.
Two-nil at Tolka, Shels all at sea, Bohs reborn; Alan Reynolds and the visiting dugout congratulated each other for their  set-piece. Duff turned to stone. Shels poured forward through Burt only for Declan McDaid to swallow a yellow card by chopping down the former Bohs hero.
After half-time, again it was all Burt all the time, but he could not land a blow, his snap shot blocked by Keita. Boyd and John Martin, Shels imposing front men, were connected now and Will Jarvis was putting heat on Bohs right back Luke Matheson.
As chances came and went, the only voice heard through the silence was Reynolds, cajoling his defenders and rubbing Duff up the wrong way, whenever possible.
It needed another penalty to give the new PA system a spin. Rooney cut down Tyreke Wilson after Martin drew a fine save from Kacper Chorazka. Step up Jarvis, who lashed the ball down the middle. 2-1, Shels alive, Bohs hanging in.
With Mark Coyle snatching control of midfield, Shelbourne looked likely to fashion an equaliser but the skipper was not long for this game. Coyle limped off not long after the ref missed a handball by Mills in the box.
SHELBOURNE: Kearns; Gannon, Barrett (Farrell 76), Molloy, Wilson; Lunney (Hakiki 90), Coyle (O Sullivan 66); Burt, Martin (Williams 76), Jarvis; Boyd. BOHEMIANS: Chorazka; Matheson, Mills, Keita, Kirk; McDonnell, Flores; Rooney, McDonnell (McManus 77), Clarke, McDaid (Connolly 69); Akintunde (Grant 83). Referee: Paul McLaughlin.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



France, women, death and class
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 28
Length: 373 words
Body


A Woman s Story, first published in French in 1988, is Annie Ernaux s account of her mother s life. To her fans, it will be a joy, though it will be anathema to those heathens who remain unconvinced by her oeuvre, which consists of an accretion of memoirs, each focusing on different aspects of her life. Through this layering Ernaux has created a living art, one that exists both through and alongside her, almost like a written sister. By writing her mother, Ernaux inevitably touches on France, women, death, class. She recalls her mother bringing her to museums, not for herself, but  for the satisfaction of helping me acquire the knowledge and the tastes attributed to cultivated people .
This reminded me of a time when, driving to west Cork, my father quietly endured hours of a CD of Milton s Paradise Lost, so as not to hamper my attempts at self-education. Ernaux s genius, here as elsewhere, is in using her own experiences to bring into consciousness our painful unknown knowns, through a deeply relatable, hyper-personal objectivity.
She writes herself from the outside, and analyses her own methods while doing so:  Initially, I thought I would find it easy to write. In actual fact, I spend a lot of time reflecting on what I have to say and on the choice and sequence of words, as if there existed only one immutable order which would convey the truth about my mother (although what this truth involves I am unable to say).
Above all else, A Woman s Story is Ernaux s affecting attempt to honour a woman she loved deeply. As she writes of her mother:  She preferred giving to everybody, rather than taking from them. Isn t writing also a way of giving?
The book was undertaken in the immediate aftermath of her death and, in writing it, Ernaux mourns the intimacy they shared. It was a closeness hampered, but ultimately undamaged, by all the usual resentments and conformities that can come between mothers and daughters:
 We had gone back to addressing each other in that particular tone of speech   a cross between exasperation and mutual resentment   which led people to believe, wrongly, that we were always arguing. I would recognise that tone of conversation between a mother and her daughter anywhere in the world.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



FROM THE BEDROOM TO THE ARENA; Five years after her first overseas show, the Norwegian songwriter Marie Ulven, aka Girl in Red, is returning to Dublin on her first arena tour, and this time she's on the brink of stardom
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 16
Length: 1236 words
Body


Last June, Marie Ulven stepped on stage at Soldier Field, in Chicago, and took a moment to breathe. Gazing up at the 61,000-capacity amphitheatre and the clear blue sky above, she experienced a swirl of emotions: excitement, nerves and a  tingle of Swiftmania.
 I was at the soundcheck, and [the stadium] was massive,  says the Norwegian songwriter, who performs as Girl in Red and spent the summer of 2023 opening  for Taylor Swift.  When I played the first show there were so many people. Then, when I got to see Taylor play, it was so grand and huge and gigantic. It was  peak American pop culture.
Swift hand-picked Ulven   a lifelong fan   to open for her in Chicago, Detroit and Pittsburgh during the North American  leg of her Eras Tour last year. She would play eight dates with Swift, performing to a combined audience of more than 500,000 people.  It s, like, the coolest thing that  has happened to me,  Ulven says from her home in Oslo.  It feels like a very special and iconic time in my life.
The Eras Tour confirmed Swift s defining place in our culture. Yet those dates  last summer were equally significant  for Ulven, who a few years ago was a shy teenager who had barely toured outside Norway. (Her first overseas show was at the Academy in Dublin, in September 2018.) Fast-forward to today and she is on the brink of stardom, with the release this weekend of her second studio album, I m Doing It Again Baby! to be followed by a debut arena tour, including a return to Ireland.
Who better for Ulven to take pointers from than the once and future-queen of confessional pop?  She has set such a cool example for all the young girls out in the world. She has definitely inspired me  from when I was younger. She has been torn apart by the world, but she s always bouncing back and putting out new music,  says Ulven.  That s what it s about for her   it s about the music. And being able to be a musician for the rest of her life. I admire  her for all that. Most people who come that far and have such a great reputation, it s because they are great people.
Ulven s new album is a riotous love letter to songwriting. It marks the exciting latest chapter of her artistic life, which began when she was still at school in small-town Norway. In those early years, she was pigeonholed as a purveyor of  bedroom pop    a genre lazily caricatured as music made by introverted young women for whom laptops and duvets were a refuge from a cruel and uncaring world.
She has never been comfortable with that label. What artist wants to be defined, deep into adulthood, by their teenage rituals? In any case, she has left the bedroom behind and isn t looking back. Inspired in part by the happiness she has found with her girlfriend of three years, I m Doing It Again Baby! pings between loved-up synth-pop (A Night to Remember) and head-banging emo (Doing It Again).
 It s very energetic   I feel it s packed with the production. I went all-in,  she says, explaining that she wanted to expand on the joy and excitement she felt with the release of her first album, If I Could Make  It Go Quiet, from 2021.  It s trying to capture the feeling of doing it and doing it again. We have feelings of love and then feelings of heartbreak, feelings of not being accepted . . . It s packed with life.
Ulven was born in Horten, in southern Norway, in 1999. Her father was a policeman, her mother a technology worker. When she was 14 she was given a guitar. She taught herself to play and began to write songs, which she posted to SoundCloud on her mother s recommendation, initially as  LydiaX .  Girl in Red  came later   the name comes from a text she had sent a friend to identify herself in a crowd.
Changing her name worked wonders: within a few months of becoming Girl in Red she was clocking up thousands of hits  a month. Her early music had a hushed, vulnerable quality that singled her out as  a special talent. It was a sensibility she shared with other Gen Z songwriters who, like her, recorded from home, largely on their laptops   hence bedroom pop, a genre that also included Clairo (who later worked with Swift s producer Jack Antonoff) and Beatrice Laus, aka Beabadoobee.
 The reason I was making music like that was because that was the circumstances I was in. That was what I was able to do,  Ulven says.  Having had the opportunity for the past six years to pursue music and create songs and further my artistry, it makes sense I m not perceived that way  any more. Other people that started with smaller productions have all become these big artists. Clairo started with some beats and stuff, but now she has two albums. And Beabadoobee had some smaller songs. Now she is playing support for Taylor Swift and is supercool.
Ulven has always been frank about  her sexuality, and fans were quick to gravitate to her early tune I Wanna Be  Your Girlfriend and its beautifully raw lyrics ( I don t wanna be your friend, I wanna kiss your lips/ I wanna kiss you until  I lose my breath ). Her stage name was quickly adapted as online slang    do you listen to Girl in Red?  was a coded way of asking if someone was attracted to people of the same sex.
But if the internet was where Girl in Red found her voice and identity, it has been a sometimes torrid environment for her,  too. Like many, she is ambivalent about social media. Although it has given her opportunities, she is all too aware of its toxic side.  I ve probably been affected by it subconsciously,  she says.  People have tried to cancel me   for the craziest things that have no root in reality. You have to remember it s pointless and doesn t mean anything.
Emotional openness has always been her most powerful asset as a songwriter. In 2021 she released her biggest hit so far in Serotonin, a storming synth-pop number produced by Billie Eilish s brother and collaborator, Finneas O Connell.
If catchy, the single was also a bracingly frank meditation on her struggles with intrusive thoughts, which included visions of self-harm and suicide. She fretted about releasing it. Today she is proud of having done so   and appreciative of the special place it occupies in the hearts of many of her fans.
 The lyrics are quite graphic. I m talking about cutting my hands off. I was, like,  Maybe this is too much.  I feel people embraced that song and took it into their hearts. Which is cool. At the time I put it out, it was different to all my other stuff. It s very special to see the numbers   that sort of thing playing into real life when you play a show. When you play your songs live for people you get to see the results of the life that the song took on, and I think it s special.
She continues to share her innermost thoughts on I m Doing It Again Baby!  The album is also hugely playful in places, however, including on a collaboration with Sabrina Carpenter, the former Disney Channel star whose background could not be more different from that of Ulven (and who has become a person of interest in Ireland by dint of her relationship with Barry Keoghan).
 I m leaning into my cringiness. I m leaning into things that aren t cool but  are fun,  says Ulven.  I m being more theatrical, more dramatic. I m having fun with things   not being hung up on what s cool and what s going to perform well. It s about taking a chance on what I think is fun and cool. Hopefully, people like it.  l
I m Doing It Again Baby! is released by  Columbia Records

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Full steam ahead for IDA as it boards the AI hype train
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 19
Length: 392 words
Body


What a glowing assessment IDA Ireland has given to the potential offered by generative artificial intelligence (AI), which its new report on the labour market declares is poised to be  a catalyst for enhancing workforce productivity and Ireland s competitiveness .
It s most likely right, of course. To preserve the GDP-propelling success of our multinational-dependent economy, Irish policymakers should probably ensure that the correct conditions are in place to allow significant employers based here   or thinking about locating here   to accelerate their collective pivot to AI.
Those conditions include having a workforce equipped to use generative AI for their own means and ends, rather than simply succumbing to fears about being replaced by it.
Still, some sensible sceptics might baulk at the confident notion that 60 per cent of Generation X workers   that s the  middle-aged segment of the labour market   are in occupations where generative AI can  complement or transform the work they do, freeing up their time for more value-added and creative work . The transformation part, yes. The  more value-added and creative  part? We ll see.
The IDA Ireland finding is based on data from more than two million LinkedIn members, with the same source of data also concluding that technology, information and media is the sector  with the greatest potential to harness generative AI tools and technologies .
This bullish take would seem at odds with the stance of worker representative groups in the creative industries, who have warned that generative AI is already being exploited by employers to regurgitate their past collective endeavours, wrap them up in a shiny tech bow and save on the cost of human labour. Companies in these sectors, too, do have the odd concern about the use of AI by bad actors to effectively steal intellectual property.
There s no place for such negativity, however, in IDA Ireland s labour market report. This would be the same report that has been published in collaboration with Microsoft and Microsoft-owned LinkedIn. And that  would be the same Microsoft that has poured billions into ChatGPT developers OpenAI.
Sam Altman, co-founder and chief executive of OpenAI, has dubbed its relationship with Microsoft as  the best bromance in tech . It s a love-in that has clearly proven inspiring to strategists at IDA Ireland.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Funny, profound: Keyes has done it again
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 22
Length: 367 words
Body


Reading a great Marian Keyes novel is a bit like being at a really good Irish funeral   just as you re sobbing into your egg-mayonnaise sandwich someone cracks a joke and you re laughing again. Keyes s latest novel, My Favourite Mistake, returns to her serial characters, the Walsh family.
Forty-eight-year-old Anna Walsh is a high-flying beauty PR living and working in New York. When the pandemic hits and her relationship ends, she returns to Ireland to  her family, who are understandably alarmed that their lifetime supply of free beauty products is at an end. Meanwhile, two old friends Bridget and Colm, are building a luxury retreat in Connemara, but work has stalled due to local protests. Anna is dispatched to the West to deal with the PR crisis. The problem is Joey Armstrong, with whom Anna shares a complicated history, is involved in the deal.
Running alongside this main plot is Anna s personal experience as a woman in her forties. When her plight to get HRT is thwarted by a young male doctor who smugly tells her we over-medicalise this perfectly natural part of a woman s life, her sister Claire rages:  If a man came in with an itchy b*****k, he d be prescribed painkillers, antihistamines and a hot girl in a porn-y nurse s costume to scratch it for him. But if a woman shows up with a sinus infection or a verruca, they get antidepressants. Except if they re actually depressed, then they re told to get a dog.
This comedy is laced all the way through the book but the other reason Keyes s books continue to be so enjoyable and successful is that beneath the humour lies raw and recognisable human experience. What happens when we fall out of love with of our own life, or when our most important friendships fall apart or when the person we love the most is taken from us? What happens when our dreams are dashed or we are too afraid to take a chance on happiness? It s Keyes s humanity as much as her humour that keeps readers coming back.
With rich, and multilayered storytelling, My Favourite Mistakeis everything Marian Keyes fans could hope for   wise, charming, funny, poignant, profound and insightful, with an utterly satisfying ending. In other words, she s done it again.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Garda watchdog granted access to recordings of Burke hearing melee
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 517 words
Byline: EOIN REYNOLDS
Body


EOIN REYNOLDS  The Garda Ombudsman has been granted access to audio recordings of a court  melee  that broke out during a hearing related to Enoch Burke s dispute with Wilson s Hospital School.
Delivering the judgment of the three-judge Court of Appeal yesterday, Mr Justice John Edwards said that  disruptive and disrespectful conduct by some persons attending court  on March 7th, 2023 had caused the court to rise and abandon delivery of its judgment. He said that conduct continued after the court had risen and  represented an uninterrupted continuum of unacceptable behaviour .
Mr Justice Edwards said the expectation of respectful conduct  does not begin precisely with the arrival of a judge or judges onto the bench and end with a judge or judges  departure from the bench.  He said that the expectation extends  in the environs of the building where the court is sitting, both before and after the judge or judges arrive onto and leave the bench.
He said that the behaviour of those in court should be regarded as  part of the proceedings before the court on that day  and therefore the recording of that conduct  constitutes a contemporaneous record of those proceedings .
Enoch Burke, who was brought to court by prison officers from Mountjoy Prison, had stated that the recordings amounted to  covert surveillance  and to release them would be a breach of his privacy rights and legislation protecting personal data.
The court rejected Mr Burke s arguments, saying he had shown no evidence that he was engaged in any private or confidential conversation at the time. The court also pointed out that personal data may be used for the prevention, detection and prosecution of crimes.
The judge had also warned before delivering judgment that if there were  any interruption from any quarter , the court would rise and the judgment would be delivered electronically.
Mr Burke was a respondent before the Court of Appeal in an application by the Garda Síochána Ombudsman Commission (Gsoc), which sought access to digital audio recordings of a previous appeal court hearing involving Mr Burke on March 7th last year.
During those proceedings, a  melee  arose when members of the Burke family began shouting and were forcibly removed from the court by gardaí.
Arising from that, Enoch s brother Simeon Burke (24) was arrested and later convicted of an offence under the Public Order Act for engaging in threatening, insulting and abusive words and behaviour on or about the Four Courts at Inns Quay.
Both Simeon Burke and his sister Ammi Burke have made a complaint to Gsoc about their treatment by gardaí on that occasion and Gsoc is carrying out an investigation into alleged assault causing harm by members of the force.
As part of its investigation, Gsoc asked the Court of Appeal to release recordings of what happened after the court had risen. It has previously been explained that an  ambient  recording system remains on at all times, even when the court is not sitting.
Mr Burke  asked for access to the ambient recordings that are to be released to Gsoc, which was granted by Mr Justice Edwards.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Generations of oppression
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 28
Length: 385 words
Body


Anyone who was lucky enough to catch Tommy Orange s first title, There There (2018), will eagerly  anticipate this new book.  But how does an artist follow up on an almost perfect, near genius debut? Pretty brilliantly, as it turns out.
Orange, who is an enrolled member of the Cheyenne and Arapaho tribes of Oklahoma, has written a prequel/sequel  to his first novel that adds a relevant and utterly contemporary work to the North American fiction canon.
Wandering Stars begins with the  Sand Creek massacre of 1864, where 600 Cheyenne and Arapaho were slaughtered by the US army, among them Bird  Woman and Jude Star, two of the main protagonist s tribal ancestors. Through subsequent generations of their family,  we learn how US administrations went from the massacre of tribes to more devious genocidal policies, such as the establishment of sadistic Indian industrial schools in the 20th century.
Charlie Star undergoes this process but rejoins members of the  peyote church , which reclaimed native practices. The papers he leaves behind in the 1920s will inspire his granddaughters Opal and Jacquie to become politically active at the occupation of Alcatraz by the American Indian Movement in 1969-1972. They eventually become grandmothers to Orvil, Lony and Loother Red Feather.
The young brothers continue to struggle with their cultural identity and despite their attempts to redress this, one classic malady tragically gets in the way. Orange s heartbreaking and astute rendition of addiction and recovery in all their complex aspects is one of the book s strongest points.
While the book covers a variety of themes, from racism, cultural appropriation, trauma, poverty and more, to simply list these is to miss the essence of this complex and ambitious work. Its writing is luminescent in parts, searingly sad in others. There is no strict linear plot; it follows in the rich storytelling tradition of great Native American authors such as Louise Erdrich.
Its exposition of souls damaged by relentless suffering and social hardships and their fierce and inspiring fight to overcome these challenges is passionate and powerful.
Wandering Stars shines in so many  ways that the reader will want not only  to seek out his debut, but to read more from Orange, who has clearly established himself as a master.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Give Me a Crash Course in . . . the skorts controversy
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 8
Length: 594 words
Byline: MARY HANNIGAN
Body


What on Earth are skorts? They re not, as you might imagine, how south Dubliners pronounce  skirts . Think shorts and skirts, and then combine them. So what you end up with are, well, skirts with shorts underneath.
 Right. But why are we talking about them? Well, camogie players are obliged to wear skorts. Rule 6(b) of the sport s code ordains that playing gear must include a  skirt/skort/ divided skirt . The problem is that most players hate wearing them, arguing that they restrict their freedom, largely because the shorts are of the  compression  kind, and they would prefer to wear regular shorts.
 And this issue has been rumbling on a while? It has. It s a whole six years since Dublin player Eve O Brien, talking to The 42, said:  Jesus, I ll get killed for this. But the Camogie Association is just a very conservative organisation that does not like change.  We wear skorts just because we re women   it s feminine and we should be ladies and wear skorts. It s a small thing, but it s very symbolic of the organisation that is quite traditional.
And all of this has amped up of late? Yes. Last year London club Thomas McCurtains launched its Shorts Not Skorts campaign, and it all came to a head last weekend when two proposals were put to camogie s congress calling for the rule to be changed.
 And? Both proposals were defeated. And the issue can t be up for discussion again until 2027.
 Seriously? Seriously. Sixty-four per cent of the delegates voted against Tipperary and Kerry s motion that wanted the  skirt/skort/divided skirt  wording removed completely and replaced with  shorts , while 55 per cent said no thank you to Meath and Britain s proposal that shorts be offered as a choice alongside skorts.
 Was it all aul fellas who voted? No
. The majority of the delegates were women.
 Break this to me gently . . . is this all about, eh,  modesty ? A bit, yeah. As Kerry player Niamh Leen said to the Killarney Advertiser this week,  honestly, I think it s to keep the tradition, maybe they see the skorts as being more feminine, which is just mind-boggling for me. I just don t understand how that could be a reason to keep something that s making girls uncomfortable
.
 Was it always this way? No, it was worse
. There was a time when the rule stated that camogie players had to wear blouses and their skirts should be worn  not less than six inches from the ground . So imagine bearing in on goal in the last minute of an All-Ireland final, and ending up on your face when you tripped over your skirt?
So there s a bit of a history here? There is. When Archbishop John Charles McQuaid vented back in the 1930s about sporty women   for example, women sharing sports arenas with men were  un-Irish and un-Catholic    one of the first to support his contention was Seán O Duffy, then secretary of the Camogie Association. He would, he vowed,  do all in his power to ensure that no girl would appear on any sports ground in a costume to which any exception could be taken .
 Cripes. Can the players not just ignore the rule and wear whatever makes them comfortable? They can   and the Kerry County Board, for one, are backing their players if they want to do just that. But   and it s a big one   any player who turns up in shorts for a game will be booked by the referee. And if she refuses to swap them for skorts, she will be sent off. So, if all 15 players wear shorts and refuse to budge out of them, then all of them will be dismissed and you ll have a rather one-sided game.  What if both teams turned up in shorts? Now you re talkin .
MARY HANNIGAN

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Glanbia investors strongly oppose plan to give CFO EUR 750,000 retention bonus; Investor advisers ISS and Glass Lewis query proposed payout to Mark Garvey
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 19
Length: 520 words
Byline: JOE BRENNAN
Body


JOE BRENNAN
 Glanbia s plan to award its chief financial officer, Mark Garvey, a stock-based bonus worth EUR 750,000 as an incentive to remain with the company for at least two years has been slammed by big investor advisory firms.
Institutional Shareholder Services (ISS) and Glass Lewis, the world s two most influential firms that advise investors on corporate governance issues, have each advised shareholders to vote against Glanbia s remuneration policy at its upcoming annual general meeting (agm) on May 1st.
Say-on-pay votes are typically non-binding, as is the case of this resolution. However, if large blocks of shareholders vote against a remuneration report or policy, it is seen as embarrassing for a company and usually triggers engagement with investors to see if concerns can be addressed.
Glanbia said in its annual report it planned to award Mr Garvey, its chief financial officer for more than a decade, some 42,545 shares, to ensure his retention to support the group s new chief executive Hugh McGuire who took over in January following the retirement of the company s long-term head, Siobhán Talbot.
The number of shares contained in the planned award equated to his EUR 633,000 basic salary last year, based on the company s average share price in December of EUR 15.47.
However, Glanbia s shares have since jumped to EUR 17.61, meaning that the shares are now worth almost EUR 750,000.
Mr Garvey s total remuneration last year amounted to EUR 3.57 million, mainly made up of cash and share bonuses. Ms Talbot s came to EUR 7.95 million.
 The nature of one-off retention awards is a concern, and the absence of performance conditions a further concern,  said ISS in a report.  Ultimately, as the award is only subject to the CFO s continued employment . . . it diverges from good market practice. As such, shareholder support is not considered warranted for the remuneration policy.
Glass Lewis questioned the appropriateness of the bonus, particularly given its size and lack of performance conditions.  As such, we cannot recommend that shareholders support this proposal at this time,  it said.
 It was agreed that it was important to secure the retention of our group chief financial officer to support the continued delivery of our growth strategy, for the benefit of our shareholders,  said a Glanbia spokeswoman.  The CFO retention award is a one-off exceptional award, made in shares and the value is aligned to shareholder experience over both the vesting and holding periods [three years in total].
The Kilkenny-based nutrition group said in February that its after-tax profits jumped 20 per cent last year to $298.1 million (EUR 280 million) for 2023 as it benefited from a  protein mega-trend .
The Glanbia Performance Nutrition division generated $1.8 billion in revenue last year on the back of strong-selling brands Optimum Nutrition and Isopure. Its nutritional solutions united delivered just over $1 billion.
However revenues at its US cheese division fell by 13.9 per cent to $2.6 billion, driven by falling prices.
Shares in the group have advanced by 29 per cent over the past 12 months.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Go wild with this easy green soup; Wild garlic is one of Ireland's best crops to forage
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 38
Length: 323 words
Body


This recipe is quick and very easy,  with plenty of scope for variations. I add the spinach and wild garlic leaves right at the end, when the soup is off the heat, so it simply wilts. The vibrant green colour of this soup fades quickly once it is puréed, so serve it immediately.
Frozen peas, broad beans, broccoli or any other vegetables can be added to this. Substitute celeriac for potato if you want less carbohydrate. I love a potato-based soup and find it filling and comforting, it also makes it more likely that children will eat it. Celeriac does give a delicious mild flavour that I love. Mint leaves are a great addition and can be used in place of the chilli and coriander for a bright spring soup.
Woodlands are now pungent with the distinctive smell of wild garlic as the ground is carpeted with patches of the broad, waxy leaves and some already have the small pretty white flowers. This is one of Ireland s best crops to forage. I find the best way to preserve the leaves is to make a simple pesto or salsa verde by blitzing the leaves with good olive oil and a little salt. Add it to soups, sauces, lasagne, or simply use it to dress pasta or a salad. It is also great in a chicken sandwich. Shred some of the leaves and add them to your usual scone or bread recipe for a savoury seasonal loaf that is gorgeous with soups such as this.
If you can t find wild garlic, the hardy three-cornered leek is a good substitute. The leek is more readily available and has thin, rougher, straight leaves. It smells more like onion or leek than garlic and its pretty white bell flowers are edible too.
My kids have always loved this time of year when they get a run around the woods, picking a few handfuls of wild garlic then coming home and making pesto to drizzle on their pasta or pizzas. Foraging outings such as this are a great way to connect with nature and tap into the seasons. It is a lovely way to spend a spring afternoon.l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Guinness bottles and stout hearts
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 320 words
Body


Sir,   Further to Frank McNally s Irishman s Diary (April 10th) and recent correspondence (Letters, April 11th and 12th), I enjoyed reading people s reminiscences of the various forms of bottles of Guinness. Alongside these memories, there were two important factors which added to the goodness in the Guinness. First, up to some decades ago, Guinness in bottles contained live yeast. This could be seen as a cream-coloured layer at the bottom of the bottle.
This was why the beer was so nutritious, as yeast contained a concentration of various vitamins, mainly vitamin B, so important for a healthy blood supply. Second, after bottling, the Guinness needed to stand for about 10 days for the yeast to activate a secondary fermentation within the bottle, thus forming the nose-tingling effect of the CO2 gas.
Indeed, one of the attractions of bottles of Guinness is that it was to be consumed at room temperature, and no self-respecting kitchen cupboard would be without a few bottle of the good stuff, which could be served instantly to a thirsty visitor.
Sadly, in recent decades, Guinness no longer contains live yeast and is carbonated at the bottling stage, rendering it more attractive to newer or younger consumers and can be served straight from the fridge at home or from the cooler cabinet in the pub.   Yours, etc,
TONY CORCORAN,
Rathfarnham,
Dublin 14.
Sir,   Reading your various letters on Guinness reminded me of the time as a small child when my job was to place the hot water-soaked corks in a machine while my father then pressed  them into his own bottled Guinness.
We had great chats in that bottling shed and my pay was a bottle of raspberry juice. Happy days!   Yours, etc,
GERDA MURPHY,
Wicklow.
Sir,   The only snipe bottle that I can recall was the snipe of barley wine, which some used to drink on its own, or pour into a pint of Guinness to strengthen it.   Yours, etc,
MARTIN AHERNE,
Loughrea,
Co Galway.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Harris and Sanchez discuss recognition of Gaza; People of Palestine deserved equal respect, says Taoiseach
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 319 words
Byline: HARRY McGEE
Body


HARRY McGEE Political Correspondent  Taoiseach Simon Harris and the Spanish prime minister Pedro Sánchez have both said that the time when a group of six European countries formally recognise the State of Palestine is coming closer.
Mr Harris and Mr Sánchez held a half-hour meeting in Government Buildings yesterday and the war in Gaza dominated the discussion.
Speaking afterwards Mr Harris said a number of EU states agreed last month that they would move to recognise Palestine when the conditions were right.  That point is coming much closer and we would like to move together. The people of Palestine have long sought the dignity of their own country and sovereignty.
 When we move forward, we would like to do so with as many others as possible. And then we send a decision to the people of Israel,  he said.
Mr Harris added that the people of Palestine deserved equal sovereignty and equal respect.  In a region where people of all faiths and traditions came together in peace, I know that is our shared aim,  he said.
Both leaders indicated a ceasefire and a peace process were required.
Asked about Israel s strong criticism of the move, and its claims that it was giving legitimacy to Hamas, Mr Harris said he had condemned the Hamas attack on October 7th and the taking of hostages.
Mr Sanches said he believed the Israeli prime minister Benjamin Natanyahu had no clear peace plan.  Therefore, we believe that the international community and countries like Spain and Ireland must be involved and seek to bring solutions to this terrible situation.
Mr Sanchez said the solution needed to recognise  two states.  We do this with two clear objectives. The first is to send a message of hope to the millions of Gazans and Palestinians who are suffering in the region. And secondly, to show the world that in Europe there are also countries willing to defend respect for the international order in all cases,  he said.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Harris narrows his political priorities; Domestic issues, such as farming and childcare supports likely to feature
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 606 words
Byline: JENNIFER BRAY
Body


JENNIFER BRAY
and PAT LEAHY
 New Taoiseach Simon Harris has moved to scrap some potential political liabilities as he finalises the agenda for his first weeks in office, with new childcare supports and initiatives for farming and business to come.
Mr Harris will abandon a controversial Government proposal on disabilities social welfare provision and will place a proposed referendum on an EU patent court on the back burner as he looks to focus on a limited number of areas where objectives can be achieved before the next election.
Meetings in Brussels and Warsaw on Thursday, and the visit of Spanish prime minister Pedro Sánchez to Dublin yesterday, where the plan for several EU states to recognise Palestinian statehood was among the issues discussed, have meant that the focus in the first days of Mr Harris s tenure has been on international affairs.
But domestic issues have a greater political importance and they are likely to be more prominent in  coming weeks.
Mr Harris met his team of officials at Government Buildings yesterday morning to map out his priorities for the rest of the year.
Officials are said to be examining the establishment of a dedicated fund to help creche providers expand their services which would also assist other creche owners who have been forced to close down, in a bid to alleviate a shortage of childcare places for young parents. Officials are also discussing a possible new model of childcare for people from disadvantaged backgrounds.
The first meeting of an interdepartmental group to implement the optional protocol for the UN Convention on the Rights of People with Disabilities has also been set for this month, with the intention to name a date in the near future. The protocol would give disabled people the power to seek enforcement of their rights under the protocol.
The Government will also scrap the controversial Green Paper on disability reform, which proposes changes to social welfare benefits for people with disabilities, and had been the subject of protests from disabilities groups. Minister for Social Protection Heather Humphreys confirmed the move and said there were  significant concerns about the proposals . She pledged that a new Cabinet committee would take a  fresh look  at supports for disabled people.
Shelved
It is expected that the proposed referendum to join the EU patent court will be shelved next week. A potential plebiscite on a directly elected mayor for Dublin is also on hold, with  no plans  for a date.
Mr Harris has also indicated to his fellow Coalition party leaders that he wants to make a decision on the future funding of RTÉ before the summer recess, with decisions on the future of hate speech legislation and proposed laws on  opening hours also expected before then.
The Taoiseach will chair his first meeting of the Cabinet Committee on Housing on Monday with the waiver of development levies, under which property developers contribute to the cost of providing public infrastructure and services, likely to be agreed by Government.
The Fine Gael leader has also indicated to party members that he intends to travel to every constituency in the country before the local and European elections.
The party is already gearing up for the general election, with a source confirming that a new group tasked with devising a five-year tax strategy will examine  ways  to slash the universal social charge (USC) in the coming years. While some of the tax pledges will be achieved in Budget 2025, such as ensuring fewer workers pay the higher rate of tax, much of the new strategy will instead form a key plank of the Fine Gael general election manifesto.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Hate speech laws are open to abuse
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 16
Length: 865 words
Body


Our new Taoiseach, Simon Harris, famous for having both index fingers wetted and held up to the wind at all times, obviously intuits that there is a rising sense of unease about the hate crimes Bill. He has moved from unequivocal support to suggesting politicians need to demonstrate humility and the ability to listen.
Some people are concerned about hate offences legislation in general, and the multiple ways in which it can potentially be abused. For example, in 2015, 12 Palestinian activists were convicted under French laws that criminalise those who  incite discrimination, hatred or violence towards a person or group of people on grounds of their origin, their belonging or their not belonging to an ethnic group, a nation, a race or a certain religion . The activists collected groceries of Israeli origin into trolleys in supermarkets and handed out leaflets asking shoppers to boycott them because they alleged that buying Israeli products legitimised crimes in Gaza.
Russians were the most vociferous proponents of incorporating prohibitions on hate speech in the UN Declaration of Human Rights. Nadine Strossen, in her book, Hate: Why We Should Resist it With Free Speech, Not Censorship, describes how Eleanor Roosevelt skilfully resisted the Soviet Union s pressure tactics.
Others worry about the fact that key terms such as  hatred  and  inciting hatred  are not defined in the proposed Irish legislation. We will know it when we see it, apparently.
Hatred is an emotion or an attitude that surely constitutes criminality only when it results in actions that harm others. Intent must also matter. However, Section 10 of the Bill says it will be an offence merely to possess material that could incite hatred, even if it has not been communicated to the public. Paul Murphy TD has described this as creating an offence of thought crime.
The onus is on the accused to prove they did not intend to disseminate the material, a reversal of legal norms.
Scotland s widely disliked new hate speech law which   with unintentional irony   was introduced on April 1st, repealed the country s ancient anti-blasphemy legislation, last used in 1843.
Blasphemy
In William Blackstone s famous commentaries on the law, published in the mid-18th century, he describes blasphemy as the crime of revilement of the ordinances of the established Church of England.
The fear some people feel even to raise concerns about say, the use of powerful puberty blockers in children, is a disturbing echo of blasphemy laws that punished alleged heretics.
The Bill lists protected characteristics, which include race, colour, nationality, religion, national or ethnic origin (including membership of the Traveller community), descent, gender (including gender expression or identity), sex characteristics, sexual orientation and disability. To be clear, no one should condone hatred of any of these groups, much less intimidation or incitement to acts of violence.
But, to misquote Animal Farm, some protected characteristics are more protected than others. After successful protests by students, journalist Mary Kenny   who was there when Women s Liberation began in Ireland   was cancelled by the University of Limerick from an International Women s Day event. She was not even focusing on transgender issues.
The voices of moderate people wishing to proceed cautiously with gender transition for children are only beginning to be heard. The Cass Report, which was published this week, states that the puberty-blocking protocol that became standard for children with gender distress was based on a small Dutch study of young people who showed improvements in mental health. This cohort had experienced gender dysphoria from an early age, had no significant mental health difficulties and had good family support. Cass also points out these young people also had constant psychological or psychiatric support, which may have been responsible in part for improvements in wellbeing.
The preliminary results of a UK study on 44 young people carried out between 2011 and 2014 showed no improvement in psychological wellbeing. There was a significant increase among females after one year of treatment of scoring statements such as  I deliberately try to hurt or kill myself  as  sometimes true . From 2014, there was an increase in girls presenting with gender distress. Despite the adverse findings of the small UK study, puberty blockers and hormonal treatment became normal practice,  including for patients with no history of gender incongruence prior to puberty, as well as those with neurodiversity and complex mental health presentations . As Cass says, children deserve far better.
There has been vitriol on all sides, but gender-critical feminists such as Kathleen Stock and Maya Forstater suffered   Forstater lost her job and Stock said a lack of support from her colleagues and the unions led her to resign. It took three years for Forstater to be vindicated. Will hate crime legislation protect either people like them or religious people with views out of step with current mores? Blasphemy laws in the past supported the idea that heretics had fewer rights. Hate crimes law must not repeat that mistake.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Haunted, cut off from the mainland
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 28
Length: 713 words
Body


Hagstones have long fascinated writers and artists; many magical powers and stories have been attributed to them since before the time of Pliny the Elder. It is believed that these perforated stones were made by serpents  saliva. Only good things can pass through the holes; they are supposed to bring luck. There is something similarly magical and otherworldly about Sinéad Gleeson s debut novel Hagstone, successor to her acclaimed collection of essays, Constellations.
Nell is an artist on a rugged, isolated island, with an almost spiritual connection to the land; she draws inspiration from the sea, the shore, the folklore. She dreams of worlds past and present and craves a future where she is not tied to this land that has always been her home. She has many ideas and concepts that she is afraid to put into practice, some because of her own reticence or lack of self-belief and some because of a lack of funding and support. Most artists would relate to this, the desperate yearning to create something meaningful.
There is an eerie sound on the island that only some can hear. It is perhaps the sea and the land calling out to the people whose souls are entrenched deeply there. Nell receives an invitation to enter a secluded community of women, the Inions, to create an artwork to commemorate their lives. These are women who have escaped something or someone, creating a model of collaborative, self-sustained living. It sounds appealing, this desire to disconnect, to live away from external gaze. Nell resists becoming part of such a community, only seeing herself as an outsider, but finds slowly that perhaps they have much more in common than she imagined.
The story starts languorously and then picks up pace after part one. The main characters are beautifully fleshed out, especially that of Nell and the women in the Inion community. But some minor characters, such as the American actor searching for his next project who persuades the Inions to take part in a documentary, veer precariously towards stereotype. A frenzied momentum leads up to the Samhain festival, when everything comes to a climax, people s weaknesses and foibles are exposed, and then there is loss and a fresh start.
An island, cut off from the mainland, is a perfect setting for a haunting story such as this, where ancient rituals and beliefs can fester and thrive, where people can find solace in solitude, but also healing and recuperation. At times it felt that Nell and the island were one, a contiguous sense of wildness and restraint, hardness and softness nudging each other, both sensuous and ascetic at the extremities.
What does creativity need and desire? How to be a woman in this world? Can power be all-consuming? There are so many intricate threads wound together with Nell and the Inions, but the island and the sea are the main characters, sensuously pulsating with mystery on every page. There is a lyricism to the short, punchy sentences interwoven with folklore. A deep sense of intimacy which connects the reader to the people, their lives and their connection to the land.
The strength of the novel lies in the intense claustrophobia and spatial expansiveness that Gleeson s exquisite writing can evoke at the same time. The descriptions are detailed and poetic, the story is both inward looking into the lives of the Inions and Nell, while also outward looking, constantly drawing from science, art and contemporary media.
Gleeson is an intelligent writer, drawing on a deep knowledge of art and artists. I loved her descriptions of various artworks, the way these are folded in with the story itself. There are threads of what solitude means for creativity, and what connection and community can be good for, and how it can threaten the very thing that it strives and stands for.
You can smell the sea and the cooking, breathe the heady air and the smell of the candles, feel the salt on your tongue. It is a sensory explosion, a throbbing hankering for something bigger than what we believe we deserve in life. The ending was a bit dissatisfying, but perhaps it is an authentic one. Things don t close as neatly in life as in books, they always have holes you have to look through to see the world more clearly. And hopefully we will only see magic as in a hagstone.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Have I ever thought about having kids? Ask me, I dare you
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 3
Length: 726 words
Body


There are a few ways to respond to the  question  Why don t you have kids?  My current favourite is  Judge said I m not allowed . Sure it s a conversation killer and it might impact your entire social standing but that s showbiz, baby.
Sometimes I go for the classic  Nah, I m right thanks  as a more polite way to deflect a question that really has no business being asked in the first place. Especially if it s from someone who I haven t spoken to in years, or ever, until now, when they decided my reproductive choices was a good topic of small talk.
But people don t always take the hint and keep on asking anyway like they re at a Q&A session at an author talk instead of a backyard barbecue.
Have I ever thought about having kids? Would I not want to get a wriggle on lest my ovaries turn to dust? Who would look after me when I m old if I didn t have them? What s wrong with having kids? Would I not get married? Wouldn t my partner like them? Would I ever really know the meaning of love if I didn t have to wake up at 6am to wipe sticky jam-drenched hands for years?
In my pre-hag years when I was a soft, little people pleaser I used to give vague answers about  I d love a baby one day  and  can t rush God s plans  while looking out wistfully in the distance so they d leave me alone.
But now, depending on who s asking, I let them know either through a tactful joke or a straight-out statement that I don t want to answer such a clawing personal question standing over a buffet table of cheese cubes and mini quiches.
I d rather someone go through my handbag or my tax return or ask me what size bra I wear because the kid question is not really a straight request for information. It s asking someone  please justify to me why your life does not look like mine  and stepping back while they squirm out an answer.
Next time I m pulling a conversational U-turn. It s time to start asking people why they had children. Let them explain to us why they decided to have unprotected sex.
Did you decide to have kids to heal your own childhood issues or was it a last bid to save your failing relationship? Did you not think about all the money it would cost or the lack of sleep or the build-up of resentment between you as partners? What will you do when you re older and they re trying to put you in a home? Aren t you worried about putting your heart, soul and financial resources into a child who might turn out to be zero craic? (My greatest fear.)
I would love to lean in with the same face of faux concern I ve had to deal with for years and say  You know you could have frozen your eggs and kept them that way  to someone wrestling a toddler into shoes.
But that s not how it works. People rarely  have to explain their big decision to bring another life into the world. They re more likely to be questioned over why they went for a Dyson vacuum or a hybrid car than how they decided they were responsible enough to keep another human alive.
We don t question it because it s in line with the natural order of things. It s a bit like asking why we all have one plastic bag filled with loads of other plastic bags. It s just what you do when you hit a certain time of life.
This is why it s okay for people to ask me why I don t have kids or a husband and I can t ask them why they didn t become an astronaut or go to the Olympics.
I would never dream of asking someone why they haven t achieved the same things that I have because a) it s a bit of a rude thing to do and b) I don t presume people want the same things I do. Could you imagine standing next to a great-aunt at a family function going  I might be wilfully barren, Agnes, but when are you going to have a column in a national newspaper that people use to catch their weekend toast crumbs on before firing into the bin, huh?
 When are you going to annoy people enough to take time out of their day to write mean comments under your work, Agnes? You might want to hurry up with your biological clock.
Children are great. I have no problems with people who are into that sort of thing. I just feel the same ambivalence about having children as I do about having a swish boiling water tap in the house   it might be nice some day if I have enough money but at this point I m not really sure if it s worth the hassle. Just let me and the other child-free women enjoy our mini-quiches in peace. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



High-profile Dublin solicitor with an eye for a deal
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OBITUARIES; Pg. 13
Length: 1300 words
Body


Ivor Fitzpatrick, who has died aged 68, was a high-profile Dublin solicitor who had a noteworthy career in law and in business, and was associated with some equally high-profile figures of his day.
Although he avoided attention in his personal life, Fitzpatrick lived for many years in a Co Wicklow castle from where, during the heyday of the Celtic Tiger, he commuted to Dublin by helicopter. His substantial wealth also facilitated his membership of a syndicate, in which he is believed to have been the prime mover, that bought the Christina O, an oceangoing motor yacht formerly owned by the Greek shipping magnate Aristotle Onassis.
As a young lawyer, he founded his own firm, Ivor Fitzpatrick & Co, which, while never challenging the big five legal companies (Arthur Cox, A&L Goodbody, Matheson, William Fry and McCann FitzGerald), was highly successful in its own right. It specialised in banking, corporate advice, medical negligence and personal injury, real estate and planning, and in litigation, including defamation.
He made much of his undoubted wealth   he was reputed to be worth up to EUR 100 million at the time of his death   from property, in which he was associated with some of the country s big players, among them Paddy McKillen, Johnny Ronan and Pat Doherty. Other business partners and legal clients included Robert  Pino  Harris and Dermot Desmond.
Haughey
He was a long-time supporter and loyal friend of the late Charles Haughey, whose fall from grace did not diminish Fitzpatrick s admiration for him. He acted for Haughey during the investigations by the McCracken and Moriarty tribunals and the former taoiseach remained, in Fitzpatrick s eyes, a  chieftain  to be admired, despite any tribunal findings against him.
Ivor Fitzpatrick was the second of three children born to Seán Ivor Fitzpatrick and Carmel Horan on Dublin s North Circular Road in 1955. His father was a member of the RAF and the Irish Air Corps before joining Aer Lingus and later assisting with the foundation of Aer Rianta. The family moved to Terenure when Ivor was four and it wasn t long before his entrepreneurial flair became evident. When he was still in primary school, he and a friend began selling refurbished bikes.
Education came easy to him, and he was also remembered as a talented artist and boy soprano singer. He studied law in Trinity College while receiving his Law Society qualifications at the same time, and was apprenticed to James Fagan Solicitors on Parnell Square. This was where he met his future wife, fellow trainee Susan Stapleton.
In 1981, he founded his own law firm, and Susan joined him the following year. He operated initially from near the Pepper Canister Church on Dublin s Mount Street before moving to more prestigious offices on the corner of Hume Street and St Stephen s Green. He could be a  hard taskmaster, who didn t suffer fools gladly, but former employees also recalled a kind and generous boss who encouraged them to be the best that they could be.
 He was a very tough lawyer,  a professional colleague recalled this week,  and very dogged on behalf of his clients.
 If you were in business and the other side were represented by Ivor you were more than a little apprehensive,  said friend and former minister of state Conor Lenihan.  I saw quite a few senior business people wince when told that the other side was represented by Ivor.
One of those he represented was Desmond, who became known for his robust approach to media critics, many of whom opened with trepidation letterheads sent on his behalf by Ivor Fitzpatrick & Co Solicitors.
The firm represented, with considerable success, people adversely affected in the hepatitis C blood contamination scandal, among them Brigid McCole. It acted as well for Positive Action, the hepatitis C advocacy group, during negotiations with the Department of Health, securing a statutory compensations scheme. The lead solicitor was Stapleton, a partner and head of litigation in the firm.
Notwithstanding his success in law, Fitzpatrick is believed to have made much of his wealth from property and investments. He had several joint ventures, including with McKillen and Doherty, with whom he fell out separately.
He and McKillen redeveloped a large tract of South Anne Street, a retail and hospitality hotspot linking Dublin s Grafton and Dawson streets. A court battle was avoided when they agreed to split the assets of their company, Canton Caseys Limited, with Fitzpatrick ceding the South Anne Street properties and a Vietnamese quarry to McKillen in exchange for EUR 10 million.
A separate venture, this one with Doherty, also ended in rancour in 2008. It concerned Harcourt Developments  property assets in London and Jersey, reputed to be worth £150 million. After a two-week court hearing, Fitzpatrick and two partners settled on terms not disclosed, at Fitzpatrick s request.
In 2000, Fitzpatrick was instrumental, through his law firm and a separate company he owned, Sandyway Investments Limited, in buying the Christina O, helped by a EUR 2 million loan from Michael Fingleton s Irish Nationwide Building Society. The purchase involved, among others, the late Harris who sought to use his purchase to write off tax liabilities of more than EUR 9 million as his share of the refurbishment costs.
The 100-metre yacht, which today may be leased on a weekly basis for between EUR 700,000 and EUR 740,000, has a crew of 38 and can accommodate up to 34 guests in 17 cabins. At one stage in its history, the cabins were decorated and furnished by Jackie Onassis, formerly Jackie Kennedy. Following purchase by the syndicate, the yacht hosted the wedding of property developer Sean Dunne and Gayle Killilea.
Wifi
Fitzpatrick s family connection with Aer Lingus was revived in 2002 when he was appointed to its board by minister for public enterprise Mary O Rourke. He sat on the board until December 2010 and also served as chair of the group s audit committee. It was during this time that he noted the inadequacy of in-flight wifi and he set up Aeronet Global with Brian Russell to address the need. Their new high-speed wireless service was recently licensed by the US Federal Communications Commission for flights in the US and is already being used on cruise vessels.
According to current company records, Fitzpatrick held 44 company directorships. They include numerous property and investment entities but also Unicef Ireland and the TobaccoFree Research Institute Ireland. Colleagues in law recalled that in his early years, Fitzpatrick was almost invariably surrounded by cigarette smoke, and he became ill with a respiratory illness in December 2021   although subsequently never lost his enthusiasm for life.
Fitzpatrick adored his home, Castle Howard, the gothic-style, castellated 19th-century property in which he and his wife lived near the Meeting of the Waters in Avoca, Co Wicklow. Built in 1811 for the Earl of Wicklow, Lt Col Robert Howard, it was the setting for a vigorous social life in a mildly aristocratic, country estate setting.
He and Susan shared a lifelong love of horses and they set up a small breeding operation. Castle Howard Casanova, one of the horses they bred and later sold, is due to represent Brazil in the Paris Olympics this summer.
His funeral heard that the extent of his private generosity to charities would never be known. Condolences upon his death, both professional and personal, recalled Fitzpatrick as an amiable and generous host, a font of knowledge across a range of subjects and a man of fun. Castle Howard also facilitated his love of shooting and of dogs, one of which, Coco Bean, was remembered in his death notice, described as his  loyal canine companion .
Ivor Fitzpatrick is survived by his wife Susan, brother Nicky, sister Deirdre and extended family.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



How to . . . choose activities for your kids
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 6
Length: 588 words
Body


From tennis to t ai chi, camogie to krav maga, there is a bewildering choice of activities for kids. Participating can open up to new skills and opportunities for children, but how many activities should a child do?
Consider personality
  Research says five or six is the optimum number of activities, but I don t think a number is the right way to look at it,  says paediatric psychologist Dr Claire Crowe, who is a member of the Irish Association for Counselling and Psychotherapy.
Instead, consider your child s personality and follow their lead and what they are able for, says Crowe.
 You ll have some kids who just want to engage in everything and they are very good at it. The kids who are good at things will enjoy it and will end up making friends with it.
 If you have a child that is willing and open to trying lots of things and you have the time and resources to devote to them, it s a good thing to follow their lead.
 Involve them Before signing your child up to a new activity, be sure to involve them.
 You get some kids who don t want to do anything. Have them involved in the conversation from the start by asking,  what are you interested in?  and  what would you like to try?  The more they have exposure to different things, the more they will get a sense of what they like,  says Crowe.
If your child is reticent about trying new things, support them by going along and attending the class with them until they are comfortable. This might mean waiting with your child outside the door, looking in for a few weeks until they are ready to join.
 It s about understanding the personality of your child and what they need,  says Crowe. It can take time for a child to build up trust.
Include their friends If your child is reluctant or their enthusiasm tends to wane after a few classes, try pairing the activity with friendships, says Crowe.
Carpooling with other kids can make it a more enticing experience. If your child doesn t want to go, having to pick up Mary and Seán down the road can provide the natural momentum and distraction to get them out the door.
For teenagers in particular, that others in their peer group are going can be the tipping point.
 What if they don t want to continue? If your child is reluctant to continue with an activity, try the five-minute challenge, suggests Crowe.
 Activation precedes motivation. Once we start doing something, we tend to enjoy it. The five-minute challenge is a great thing to do with children. Tell them,  let s go for five minutes.
 Allow for free play Parents may feel their kids  spare time should be spent learning a demonstrable skill, or learning a hobby that they can do in adulthood. There is much value in free play too, however.
 What we had as kids was free play and playing with kids of different ages. That was really important for our psychological development,  says Crowe.
 There is research showing children play differently with adult supervision. If you always do structured activities, you learn to wait and it stifles your creativity and your autonomy and engagement with tasks.
 We know from research that having an activity that is not instructor-led is really important for emotional resilience and confidence. I would say, balance the amount of extra curricular activities that allow for free play,  she says.
 Research shows children enjoy activities better when they don t have adult supervision. As much as they may like going to tennis, if we leave them free to play on the green with their peers, they will say it was more fun.
Joanne Hunt

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Hugh Linehan What Netflix gets wrong about the news business
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 10
Length: 797 words
Body


Scoop, the new Netflix drama, is not about an actual scoop. The film s subject, Emily Maitlis s 2019 interview with Prince Andrew, was certainly a coup for the BBC s Newsnight programme. And Maitlis did a fine job of helping her subject to fillet himself. But no hitherto unknown facts were uncovered, unless you include the prince s nonoperational sweat glands. The only scoop in Scoop is portrayed in the opening sequence, set several years before the Newsnight interview, when an enterprising photographer managed to grab a picture of the prince and Jeffrey Epstein meeting in Central Park, New York.
Does this matter? Yes, because the drama begins from a false premise and goes downhill from there. It purports to  be a reliable account of the business of breaking news stories for a public-service broadcaster that finds itself under  pressure in the 21st-century media  environment. So far, so promising.  But it s really just another lethargic  entry into the often unlovely genre of hero-journalist movies.
There are different variants of hero- journalist movies. Elsewhere in these pages, Donald Clarke and Alex Garland discuss the most kinetic and exciting of them, the war-correspondent movie, which has had its own problems down the years. We should all be grateful that there are few films about opinion columnists or critics, although I am looking forward to Quentin Tarantino s directorial farewell on the latter subject with The Movie Critic. We can all agree that subeditors are criminally under-represented.
There are, however, a lot of films about investigate journalism. Blame Alan J Pakula, who set the ball rolling with All the President s Men. Much of the template has remained in place nearly 50 years on. Late nights in deserted offices. Rolled-up shirtsleeves and loosened ties (or the female equivalent). Tips that turn into dead ends. Endless phone calls. Repeated disappointments. Final vindication. In older variants, the presses start to roll in the final scene. In more recent ones, less evocatively, someone clicks  Publish .
The best films about investigative journalism emphasise the values of hard graft and dogged persistence, and steer away as much as possible from cheap cliffhangers. In the right hands, such as Tom McCarthy s, in Spotlight, or Maria Schrader s, in She Said, all that granular procedural detail accumulates its own dramatic tension. Even these films hover perilously close to some of the cliches  of the form, but they are both solid, midmarket entertainments of the  old school, rooted in the facts of their respective cases (child sex abuse in the Catholic Church, the crimes of Harvey Weinstein).
But there are a lot of bad examples. One problem is the temptation to spice up  the story with thrillerish bells and  whistles. More dangerous still is the tendency towards self-regard   to which the profession is always prone. That has been worsened by the current woes of the news business, which lend themselves to sermonising about how much worse off  we would all be without high-quality professional journalism. That this is true  is beside the point. Newsnight is rightly regarded as a UK institution and over  the years has done some pretty good investigative journalism. But please  don t sermonise about it.
It adds further insult that Scoop shares its title with the greatest satire ever written about journalism, Evelyn  Waugh s 1938 novel, described correctly by Christopher Hitchens as  a novel of pitiless realism; the mirror of satire held up to catch the Caliban of the press corps .
On film, Waugh s natural successors  are not the earnest seekers for truth of  All the President s Men. They re Burt Lancaster s sleazy columnist in Alexander Mackendrick s The Sweet Smell of  Success or Kirk Douglas s amoral reporter in Billy Wilder s Ace in the Hole. And, obviously, Orson Welles s morally riddled press baron in Citizen Kane.
Each of these films, in its own way, is as much about the messy, morally equivocal world of media as it is about journalism as a profession. And that s a subject which the Prince Andrew scandal, with its subtexts of class deference and wilful institutional blindness to gross abuses, lends itself.
There is still hope. We are not done with Emily and Andrew. Michael Sheen and Ruth Wilson are due to play interviewee and interviewer in A Very Royal Scandal, for Prime Video. As the title suggests, this is the latest in the strand that gave us A Very English Scandal, with Hugh Grant as the disgraced Liberal leader Jeremy Thorpe, and A Very British Scandal, about the colourful 1963 divorce of the duchess of Argyle (played by Claire Foy). Both of these explored the entanglements of sexual hypocrisy, snobbery and media with the sort of acid wit nowhere, sadly,  to be seen in Scoop. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



I can't understand why my plum tree isn't flowering
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 4
Length: 541 words
Body


Q A pattern has emerged that I do not understand. On planting a new plum tree, it takes a couple of years to establish and then flowers and bears fruit for several years, whereupon it stops flower- ing altogether and just puts on growth. The same thing has happened with damsons and greengages, but apples and medlar in the same area are trouble free. My orchard sits on light, sandy, well-drained soil; the ground is manured at planting and a 1m grass-free circle is around each tree. Have you any suggestions to get the trees reflowering?   NH
A There are several possible explanations as to why your plum tree isn t flowering and fruiting (no pollinated blossom, as I m presuming you already know, means no fruit). One is that the blossom is being damaged by frost or icy winds before it has a chance to properly open (plum trees flower earlier than other fruit), which can happen in a bad year or if the tree is growing in a very exposed position.
Bear in mind that as a tree matures, it can gradually grow above the protective cover of nearby walls and hedges, with the result that as it gets bigger its blossoming branches can become much more exposed to late spring frosts/cold winds, etc, than when it was a young tree.
Conversely, another possibility   and one that s increasingly becoming a problem as a result of climate change   is that your plum trees aren t being sufficiently exposed to cold temperatures during the winter months for them to successfully bloom the following spring.
Known as chilling hours, a plum tree typically needs approximately between 700-1,000 hours of being exposed to a temperature between 0 and 8 degrees over the course of winter for its flower buds to properly develop and to open at the right time of year. But, as apple trees also need a similar chilling period and yours are fruiting well, this doesn t seem to be the cause of your problem.
A more likely possibility is the soil, which you describe as light, sandy and free-draining. This isn t ideal for plum trees, which like a cool, deep, fertile, moisture-retentive but free-draining, slightly acidic soil. You mention that you added manure to the planting hole, so it may be the case that as your plum trees mature and their roots spread, they are running out of the fertile, humus-rich soil contained in the original planting hole. Light, sandy soils can often also be deficient in key plant nutrients, so I d suggest spreading a slow-release balanced granular fertiliser around the base of the plant every early spring and then very gently raking it into the soil, along with a light annual mulch of well-rotted home-made garden compost or manure.
Finally, bear in mind that other factors that can adversely affect a plum tree successfully blossoming and fruiting include bird damage (birds stripping and eating the flower buds), poor pollination due to bad weather or lack of a suitable nearby pollinating partner and incorrect pruning, which, if done at the wrong time of year, will result in removal of the nascent buds.
To reduce the risk of silver leaf disease and bacterial canker, plum, damsons and gages should only be lightly pruned in summer, both to encourage an open goblet-type shape and to remove any damaged, diseased or broken branches.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



I've come to regard psoriasis as a barometer on my general well-being
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 4
Length: 593 words
Body


Just in case you didn t know, Kim Kardashian has psoriasis. She s cornered the celebrity psoriasis market to such a degree that if you just google  psoriasis , her name is the first to pop up.
But other well known names have it too. Liam Gallagher. Phil Michelson. Art Garfunkel. The writer John Updike in 1985 wrote an essay about it entitled At War with My Skin: he spent much of his formative years avoiding swimming pools and regularly checking any exposed parts of his flesh. Like sand after a beach visit, psoriasis can suddenly pop up on any part of the body.
Updike says he was exempted from the military draft because of his psoriasis   which he found humiliating   and goes on to say that he married young because he was relieved to find someone prepared to forgive his defective skin.
That it could have shaped his life to such a dramatic degree I m not sure about. Then again, I don t know how bad his psoriasis was. Some people suffer with large swathes of it; others   like me   get it in spots of various sizes. They come and go, or seemingly change location.
In pictures, it looks extremely painful; and for some it can be. But for many others it s bit itchy (scratching it can be exquisitely pleasurable) and a bit gross: not just the angry-looking skin, but the flakes that can scatter across your clothes or be embedded in your eyebrows and behind your ears.
It s not known exactly what causes it. We all reproduce our skin at a certain rate, but for the psoriasis sufferer, this process has been kicked into overdrive, prompted by an over-anxious immune system. And it is a curious sensation to study it, to rub your fingers over the red, bubbly patches. To watch your skin seem to boil over. It s alien and familiar.
It was a few decades ago   relatively late   when I first noticed I had it: a red circle, about the size of a watch face, on the inside of my right arm just below my wrist. I ve had bad spells where there were large tracts of it on my back, but over time they disappeared. Other smaller eruptions have come and gone, but the spot on my arm has remained constant, and I ve come to regard it as a sort of barometer on my general wellbeing.
There have been times when it s shrunk down to the size of a two-cent coin and others when it threatened to wrap itself around my arm: and when it grew, when I would catch myself absent-mindedly scratching it, it would prompt me to think about how I was doing, particularly if there was anything stressing me. In an odd sense, it sometimes feels as if the psoriasis is reminding me to mind myself: my own built in battery indicator.
Of course, it s not always as straightforward as that. Sometimes the patch grows and other spots appear and there s no apparent reason for it: just my immune system doing its wonky thing.
It never impacted my life in the way Updike says it did his, but certainly, when I was younger, I was more self-conscious about it. I favoured long sleeves in summertime. I d be aware of people staring at the red blotches, wondering what they were, possibly wondering if it was contagious. Psoriasis comes with a medical and social cost. It looks weird and bit scary, and was originally classified as a form of leprosy.
For some years I had a vague hope that if I got enough sun, or if they developed some new sort of steroid cream, it might go away forever. But I m past that now. Psoriasis is with me, it s part of me. I still check myself for rogue flakes, but I don t attempt to hide it any more. As much as anything else, it s our flaws that make us who we are. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



In a Word . . . Good Friday Patsy McGarry
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 20
Length: 370 words
Body


Many distinguished people were born on this date, April 13th: Samuel Beckett, Seamus Heaney, my niece Mary (happy birthday, Mary).
 Beckett, like Mary, was born on Good Friday, April 13th   bless my queasy soul.
Indeed, I had the good fortune of being the third person to see Mary, after her mother and father, that April day shortly after her dignified debut at Sligo Hospital.
 Such calm arrivals are not usually associated with redheads. It has remained so with Mary, whatever the occasion.
Seamus Heaney, however, was born on Thursday, April 13th, 1939.  Thursday s child has far to go.  He could hardly have gone farther than the 1995 Nobel Prize for Literature.
I had that odd privilege of reporting on his funeral in 2013, and then writing a piece to mark the first anniversary of his death from Bellaghy where he lies, humbly, against a wall in a corner of St Mary s churchyard under ash and sycamore trees, his headstone reading, simply,  Walk on air against your better judgement .
It s from his poem  The Gravel Walks  and was, he said, about  being on the earth and of the heavens. I think that s where poetry should dwell.
Then there s poor oul  bleak Beckett. Did the despair and absurdity that so dominates his writing arise from his being born on a Good Friday, a day when all hope died for the followers of Jesus.
Big bould Sam was not averse to exploiting his birthdate either. In his semi-autobiographical 1980 novella  Company , he wrote  You were born on an Easter Friday after long labour . . .   and  You first saw the light and cried at the close of the day when in darkness Christ at the ninth hour cried and died .
He even claimed to have memories from the womb.
 In a 1970 interview, when he was 64, he said  I have a clear memory of my own foetal existence. It was an existence where no voice, no possible movement could free me from the agony and darkness I was subjected to.
It may explain the atmosphere of some of his work, though productions abroad generally miss the hilarious humour, born of an over-wrought reverence.
Bless their dull souls.
Good Friday. Good from Old English gód, for  holy , and Friday from Old English frigedæg, Frigga s day, after Frigg, Germanic goddess of married love.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Investigators face tough task in Kerry baby murder case; Criminal lawyer says it will be a 'huge leap' to advancing criminal case against couple arrested last year
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 8
Length: 1149 words
Body


Gardaí investigating the murder of a baby in Co Kerry 40 years ago are confident that DNA tests will stand up in any criminal proceedings and prove that a couple arrested last year are the parents of the newborn child found washed up on a beach near Cahersiveen.
Sunday marks the anniversary of the discovery of Baby John s body by a jogger, Jack Griffin, at White Strand on April 14th, 1984. A postmortem by the then state pathologist, Prof John Harbison, found the baby had been stabbed 28 times and his neck had been broken.
Last year detectives from the Kerry Garda Division, assisted by officers from the Serious Crime Review Team, arrested a couple in south Kerry for questioning. They set about preparing a file on the matter for the DPP after releasing the couple without charge.
Gardaí have maintained silence to date, but this week the Garda Press Office confirmed that  the investigation into the murder of Baby John is continuing and a file will be prepared for the Director of Public Prosecutions in due course .
It is understood that preparation of the file has been affected by a number of recent garda retirements, but that it is now close to finalisation and will be sent shortly to the DPP, who will then decide whether anyone is to be charged in relation to the baby s death.
The DNA results form a critical part of the file and, according to informed sources, prove the couple are the parents of the infant. He was named Baby John by local undertaker Tom Cournane, who arranged his burial at the Holy Cross Cemetery in Cahersiveen.
The couple, a man in his 60s and a woman in her 50s, were arrested by detectives at their home in south Kerry on March 23rd, 2023, and taken to separate Garda stations in Listowel and Castleisland in north Kerry for questioning.
Gardaí issued a statement at the time, saying they had arrested a couple  in relation to the discovery of the body of a male infant at White Strand, Cahersiveen, on April 14th, 1984 ... on suspicion of the offence of murder , adding that they were detained under section 4 of the Criminal Justice Act.
Both were later released without charge following interviews.
Conclusive proof
Garda sources confirmed at the time that DNA tests taken on samples from the couple would be critical in the investigation, and it is understood the tests prove conclusively that the couple were the baby s parents.
 Forensic Science Ireland carried out an analysis on the swab samples from both suspects, and the analysis found that the chances of anyone else other than the two suspects being the parents of Baby John were so infinitesimally small as to be irrefutable,  said one source.
According to the source, the samples were taken shortly after 9pm on March 23rd, when the man and woman were being processed at Listowel and Castleisland Garda stations.
Gardaí take samples under section 13 of the Criminal Justice (Forensic Evidence and DNA Database) Act 2014, which ensures they can subsequently use the sample as evidence if the investigation leads to the DPP directing that criminal charges are to be brought.
Under section 13, gardaí can take samples without the detained person s consent, but both the man and woman gave the samples without objection. The samples were taken to Dublin by members of the Kerry Traffic Bureau.
The samples were presented at the Forensic Science Ireland laboratory at Garda headquarters in the Phoenix Park when the laboratory opened at 9am on March 24th, and the results were back and available to interviewing gardaí in Kerry by 1pm that day.
However, gardaí had drawn up an interview schedule for both suspects in line with the An Garda Síochána interviewing model, and they did not present the results of the DNA tests to the suspects until late in both interviews, as they wanted to invite them to offer what information they could first.
One experienced investigator said:  Under the model, you give the suspects the opportunity to account for their actions and it s only towards the end of the interview that you put your strongest evidence to them   basically, you are keeping your trump card until last.
It is believed gardaí did not go into the specific statistical probability of anyone else other than the couple being the baby s parents, but they did inform them that DNA tests showed they were the parents, and this was witnessed by their solicitors, who were present through the interviews.
The interviews, in which the couple made no admissions, were also recorded on video. Memos of the interviews, along with witness statements from various family members and friends of the two suspects, will also form part of the extensive file that gardaí plan to send to the DPP.
The couple were originally identified as suspects weeks before their arrest, when detectives obtained a match between a relative of one of the suspects and a new DNA profile built up from Baby John after his exhumation from Holy Cross Cemetery on September 14th, 2021.
The couple strongly deny they are the baby s parents.
A fresh investigation into the  Kerry Babies  case began in 2018 following a Garda apology to Joanne Hayes, who had been wrongly accused of the murder of Baby John. Under questioning, Ms Hayes told gardaí she had given birth to a baby boy who was stillborn or died days later and was buried on the family farm in Co Kerry around the same time as the discovery of the baby on the beach.
In 2020, after a court found that all findings of wrongdoing made against her and her family were unfounded, the Hayes family were awarded EUR 2.5 million in damages.
Family tree
Officers from the Serious Crime Review, which was launched in January 2018, had taken voluntary samples from the 40 or so people on the Iveragh peninsula. After getting a match, they constructed a family tree for that person, which led them to identify the couple as possible suspects.
Gardaí had decided to obtain a new DNA sample from Baby John because the original sample taken at postmortem in the morgue at Kerry General Hospital in 1984 had become depleted, due to previous tests on it.Gardaí also wished to eliminate any possibility of cross-contamination of Baby John s DNA, amid fears from a member of the original 1984 investigation team that there may have been some cross-contamination of when he was being transported by car to Tralee in 1984.
As the 40th anniversary of Baby John s death approached, gardaí in Kerry expressed no opinion on whether the DPP would direct any charges in the case, but one experienced criminal lawyer said that investigators faced a considerable challenge to secure a direction to charge the couple.
 The science may well prove the couple are the baby s parents,  the lawyer said, but it would be a  huge leap  from that to proving if they were responsible for what happened to him, particularly in the absence of admissions.  So it will be interesting to see what transpires and what the DPP decides.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



INVITING NATURE INTO 'THE HARE'S CORNER'; Farmers and landowners are encouraging biodiversity by situating ponds and woods in less productive sections of their land with supports from a landscape charity
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 6
Length: 1028 words
Body


It s easy to feel despondent about the decline in habitats and plant, insect and bird species across Ireland but initiatives such as the Hare s Corner run by the Co Clare landscape charity Burrenbeo Trust offer a gleam of light for the natural world and its biodiversity.
Over the past three years, what started as a pilot project for farmers and landowners in Clare has grown into a larger scheme that offers farmers, landowners and community groups across Mayo, Galway, Meath and Leitrim expert support and funding to build wildlife ponds and plant mini-woodlands and orchards on their land.
Karen van Dorp, Burrenbeo field technical officer, says,  The Hare s Corner is designed to be a simple, hassle-free way to support our farmers and landowners to take actions for biodiversity and increase our collective resilience against the effects of climate change.
The term  hare s corner  is an old farming expression for an awkward section of a field which couldn t be intensively farmed and was therefore left to nature. Wetland specialists, ecologists, foresters and native orchard specialists, the Irish Seed Savers Association row in to give advice on projects.
David Kerr is a dairy farmer in Ballyfin, Co Laois who recently put in a wildlife pond on his farm as part of the scheme.  My late father, George, had a huge interest in nature and the environment as well as being a good farmer, and I am striving to continue his legacy,  says Kerr, who is one of a small number of conventional farmers and now an ambassador in Burrenbeo s sister scheme, Farming for Nature.
In memory of his father, who died at the peak of the pandemic in January 2021, Kerr put in a large wildlife pond that is now attracting migratory teal ducks, little grebes and swans from the nearby Ballyfin demesne. The area around the pond has been planted with Scots pine, mountain ash and a game crop of linseed, wheat and kale to attract birds.
 It has taken on a life of its own. When you fence off land from livestock, nature will just take over,  says Kerr. Wildlife ponds are recognised as being one of the quickest ways to invite nature on to farms. But because the fish in the pond (whose water comes from a tributary of the river Barrow) were eating the frogspawn, Kerr put in three smaller ponds around the perimeter of the fenced-off land. He is hoping over time that his new hare s corner pond on the edge of another sloping field will attract more wildlife to that area of the farm.
Hedgerows and wildlife
 Other areas of the farm have been planted with ash (which due to ash dieback are being felled at the moment), oak and Sitka spruce.  Fifty years ago, when we joined the EU, we were encouraged to clean fields and reclaim land but now it s the other extreme. In the 1980s my father planted trees, hedgerows and wildlife corners and now about 12 per cent of the farm is non-commercially productive land but I value it for its biodiversity and wildlife value,  says Kerr.
Clive Bright, a Co Sligo beef farmer, says that a pond can be like a campfire   a place to gather around or stare into and contemplate.  They can add greatly to the aesthetics and quality of life on a farm. That cursed wet corner that took so much work for so little gain while it was part of the farm production then becomes a place of no work and peace. With the pace of farming today, measures that break the landscape s productive monotony and create a place of mental respite should not be undervalued,  says Bright.
Sharon Parr works with landowners with various sized parcels of land to make a  Plan for Nature  as part of the Hare s Corner initiative. She says that often people are frightened to do the wrong things.  I give them advice on where to plant trees so that they don t destroy other habitats. It s about adjusting expectations and finding the low-hanging fruit as well as showing them what they have got already.
Maeve and Des Ryan, landowners in Co Clare, received a visit from Parr to help them decide what to do with their land.  She recommended that we keep a buffer of 1-1½m around the hedgerows in our hay meadow to get a diversity of plants. She also flagged habitats that we didn t realise were of value. In total, she identified eight areas of our land where we could make small and very manageable changes to enhance biodiversity,  says Maeve.
The Ryans planted 200 young saplings of Burren pine, hawthorn, oak, alder, hazel, birch and spindle.  The Plan for Nature is an education on your own land   to open your eyes to see things that you might not have seen otherwise,  says Maeve.
 You start to notice the layers of life surrounding you, and the more you look, the more you see,  says Des. The retired couple have about 10 hectares, about half of which has trees and the rest is used for grazing a couple of horses.
Kate Meleady put in a mini-woodland, a pond and a small orchard with support and funding from the Hare s Corner initiative in her west Clare smallholding.  We had no knowledge of biodiversity when we moved here in 2020. Being able to speak with specialists and experts on what is appropriate has meant that we could go ahead and develop it, confident that we were doing the right thing for the land and putting the right kind of plants in place that will encourage Ireland s native woodlands,  she says.
Since 2020 Meleady has noticed a huge increase in birdlife, including wild ducks, pheasants and lots of smaller birds.  The ponds are draining what is very wet land and I m planning to add two more ponds in other fields to encourage more wildflowers and wildlife,  she says.
 Very addictive
Féidhlim Harty is an environmental consultant who works with The Hare s Corner initiative.
 Putting in ponds is very addictive. When people put in one, they want to put in more, and a mosaic of pond habitats is really good for wildlife. The ponds can be shallow and they don t need to hold water the whole year round,  he says.
In 2024, the Burrenbeo Trust will offer more than 600 more hare s corners across Mayo, Galway, Leitrim and Meath.  All we ask in return is that they act as stewards for their own special hare s corner,  says Lee Worrell of the landscape charity.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Ireland made 'country of honour' at international trade expo in China
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 18
Length: 547 words
Byline: DENIS STAUNTON
Body


DENIS STAUNTON
China Correspondent  Irish food, fashion, culture and technology will take centre stage today on the southern Chinese island of Hainan at one of Asia s biggest consumer goods exhibitions.
Ireland will be  country of honour  at the fourth China International Consumer Products Expo, which will feature more than 4,000 brands from 71 countries. Twenty-nine companies and organisations will showcase more than 50 Irish brands in a 500sq m national pavilion jointly hosted by Bord Bia, Enterprise Ireland, IDA, Tourism Ireland, Culture Ireland and the Irish Embassy in China.
Diplomatic relations
 We are especially pleased to be country of honour this year, as 2024 marks the 45th anniversary of diplomatic relations between Ireland and China,  said Ireland s Ambassador to China Ann Derwin.  At the Hainan Expo, Ireland hopes to raise the profile of its consumer products in the Chinese market. We want to raise awareness of Ireland in terms of trade, as a destination for tourism, as a university education destination, and as a destination for investment by Chinese companies.
Small Irish food and whiskey producers will appear in the Irish pavilion alongside giant brands such as Kerrygold and Jameson, which are already established in the Chinese market.
University College Dublin, University College Cork and the University of Limerick are among the educational institutions taking part.
High-end clothing brand Landskein is one of several Irish fashion brands at the Expo, which will feature an Irish fashion show as well as music and dance performances. Tourism Ireland is promoting Ireland s architectural heritage as well as the country s golf courses at the Expo.
Technology companies include one using artificial intelligence to make supply chains more efficient and another offering green energy products, a sector in which China is growing ever more dominant.
Two-way trade between Ireland and China was worth EUR 45 billion in 2022 and a succession of Ministers have visited Beijing since the lifting of pandemic restrictions. Minister for Finance Michael McGrath was in Hong Kong, Shanghai and Beijing last month, meeting Irish and Chinese business figures and politicians.
The IDA has offices in Beijing, Shanghai and Shenzhen and Chinese companies employ about 5,000 people in Ireland, while about 100 Enterprise Ireland firms in China employ a similar number.
European headquarters
Chinese tech companies like TikTok, Temu and Shein have followed their American counterparts by making Dublin their European headquarters.
Hainan, a tropical island off China s southern coast, is home to a free trade port that Beijing hopes will rival Dubai and Singapore by 2035.
At the heart of the plan for Hainan is to make it a distinct administrative trading area within China.
Goods coming into Hainan from outside China will not face customs checks or tariffs on the way in or out, unless they are moving on to mainland China, so the trade border will be between Hainan and the mainland.
The idea is to use zero tariffs and low taxes to make Hainan a trading base for foreign enterprises, particularly those from southeast Asia.
The promise is for Hainan to offer free trade, free flows of investment and cross-border capital, transportation and exit and entry for people.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Irish homeowners left it too late to switch mortgages; Central Bank report shows homeowners responded sharply to ECB rate hikes   but would have saved more if they had switched earlier
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: NO SECTION; Pg. 2
Length: 534 words
Body


Irish homeowners waited too long to switch their mortgages when the European Central Bank moved to increase interest rates back in 2022, missing out on greater potential savings by locking into a lower rate.
According to a new report from the Central Bank, rather than move at a time when they can save the most money, Irish borrowers are more likely to be motivated to switch when they fear they might lose out by not doing so, ie after interest rate hikes.
Irish borrowers have long had a less than desirable relationship with switching. Despite the obvious benefits to be had by exerting competitive pressure on lenders, which can lead to better rates for all, the cumbersome nature of switching has made mortgage holders slow to do so.
Now this report shows that Irish borrowers also have a preference  to insulate from potential increase in future monthly repayments ; but could they save more by taking a more proactive approach to switching, rather than making a move only when they fear a sharp increase in their monthly repayments?
After all, this is not always the best way to save money. The Central Bank report notes higher switching activity after July 2022, when the European Central Bank first increased interest rates after years of zero rates,  despite the immediate monetary benefits from switching declining as interest rates rose . In July of that year, the ECB increased rates by 0.5 per cent, swiftly followed by further hikes, which means that rates currently stand at 4.5 per cent   with expectations now growing that a decrease may be on the way.
But back to 2022; if homeowners had opted to switch ahead of this monetary policy tightening move, they would have benefited from  much larger  immediate interest rate gains. However, switching during this period was  more modest , the report notes.
Indeed interest rate savings fell from 1.1 percentage points in July 2022 to 0.4 percentage points in December 2022, and was more notable across the non-bank sector, falling from 1.2 percentage points in July 2022 to 0.4 percentage points in December 2022.
The best time to switch, according to the report, was April 2022, just ahead of the interest rate rises, when there would have been gains of 1.3 percentage points. According to data from the Banking & Payments Federation of Ireland (BPFI), however, just 775 homeowners made the switch that month. Contrast this with July, the month of the rate hike, when some 1,549 borrowers made the switch.
Non-bank lenders
 The greater savings may have been for those switching from non-bank lenders   such as Finance Ireland and ICS Mortgages etc   as they responded more rapidly to monetary policy changes. Banks on the other hand, continued to offer lower interest rates,  reflecting slow pass-through of ECB policy rates into bank lending rates .
Nonetheless, borrowers who made the move did save money. According to the report, a homeowner with a median valued mortgage would have enjoyed savings ranging from EUR 1,000 to more than EUR 1,500 from September 2018 to December 2022. Those with larger mortgages would have saved up to EUR 4,000, while those with the lowest outstanding borrowings would have saved about EUR 500-EUR 1,000 a year.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



It took me leaving and going back to become a Derry girl; As a child, I feared not monsters under my bed but men in balaclavas. But while I had many unhappy memories, I needed to return
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 16
Length: 890 words
Body


Ionce was an Irish dancer. Arms straight down by my side, bouncing on the balls of my feet, legs crossing quickly to the music. My sister and I used to go to lessons in a town hall down the road from our first house in Derry.
We d moved there in 1982, when I was four and she was eight. Our house was modern, on one floor with dark slatted wood and bedroom carpet that was soft underfoot. We were two English girls, who spoke with a distinctly Surrey accent and, in an attempt to integrate, my mother drove us to Irish dancing lessons just down the road in   God s honest truth   Muff.
I liked the dancing. I liked the freedom of the feet with the static posture of the torso. I liked the fact there were clear rules   on no account should your arms move, for reasons left unexplained. I liked the costumes the more talented girls wore on competition day. There was an order to it and a sense of occasion. When we danced as a group, it felt safe.
The safety was an illusion.
I grew up at a time when the Troubles were raging across Northern Ireland: military checkpoints on the way to school and bomb scares emptying out the shopping centre at weekends. Derry was a place of unspoken assessment. Everyone was trying to work out where you fitted in, what religion you were, what side you were on. It was a city built on buried trauma. The history of its pain, long and deep-rooted.
It always felt bleak walking around the city walls, as though the drizzle of lost souls hung heavy in the air. My childhood memories were grey and rain-filled. I feared not monsters under my bed but men in balaclavas.
It took me a while to understand that I didn t fit in, despite the Irish dancing. My accent was always English and, over the centuries, Derry had turned increasingly republican, losing the colonialist  London  prefix and becoming known colloquially as  Stroke City  because of the implied slash. Over the summer months, the Apprentice Boys marched with embroidered signs of  No Surrender .
I walked those walls again when I went back to Derry recently. I was embarking on a tour of Ireland and the UK to promote my latest book. I had insisted that Derry be the first date. I wanted to pay tribute to the place I had grown up in. I left in 2004  and  hadn t been back for years. And while many of my memories were unhappy, the Belfast Agreement of 1998 had brought peace and hope. I wanted to get to know the Derry of today, to go back in order to move forwards. And yet the place that greeted me was still unfriendly, still wary. The weather was wet and cold. The Bogside was almost exactly how I remembered it, except the  You Are Now Entering Free Derry  sign had been given its own traffic island. I felt the heaviness of history snaking through the paving stones and the pound shops.
There was a Starbucks in the Richmond Centre   that was new   but a lot of the other units were boarded up. It started to seem stupid to have come back   an act of self-aggrandisement in a city that didn t have much disposable income to waste on evenings out where authors spoke about their publications. I realised I d been hoping to feel like I belonged; as though the intervening years had been one long exercise in proving myself a worthy storyteller in a city shaped by its own difficult stories. I should have gone to Belfast instead, I told myself. Out of all the venues on the tour, Derry was the slowest selling. We were still only at half capacity.
I d been wrong, I thought as I returned to my hotel room to get changed, they had never wanted me back.
It was only when Vogue Williams, who was interviewing me, and I walked to the wings five minutes before curtain up that I felt it: warmth. Unassailable, unmistakable warmth. The loudest whoop came when I said I d grown up in Derry. The atmosphere was charged with understanding and a willingness to reach out across whatever might have superficially divided us. Afterwards, at the book signing, I lost count of how many people told me they had some connection to me or my family. I got hugs that conveyed a thousand words, a thousand unspoken nods of recognition.
My friend Sinéad s mother, Mar Hasson, held me tight: she had lived through it all   the bombs, the violence, the loss of loved ones   and in her survival and strength, she represented a certain kind of Derry woman. They were the women who had silently kept hope alive. The ones who had mopped up the day after destruction, who had swept away the broken glass, who had grown their families around shrapnel holes. The ones who insisted on life continuing until, one far-off day, when instead of merely continuing, it would flourish. None of this needed to be said. But I felt it. And more than once, I was told by these ferocious, fabulous women that I was  a true Derry girl .
True healing comes not from the wound, but from the scar. The day I d spent in Derry, walking around furious and upset, had been the wound reasserting itself. It had reminded me of all the bruising confusion and sadness I d felt as a child who didn t belong. But in the theatre that night, we were the scar. We had healed together. And although that scar would always be there, a reminder of what had passed, it bore its own kind of magnificence.
Elizabeth Day is an English  author and broadcaster.  A  version of this essay was first published in  her newsletter.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Judge to decide if he should recuse himself from O'Doherty case
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 439 words
Body


A judge is to decide whether he should hear a High Court action over the alleged harassment of a woman by Gemma O Doherty because she says he once represented a former Garda commissioner.
Earlier this week, Ms O Doherty, editor of the Irish Light publication, was arrested outside her home over her failure to turn up in the High Court to answer a contempt application against her in relation to the harassment case.
She was freed by Mr Justice Conor Dignam to allow her get papers she said she needed to contest the case. The matter was adjourned to yesterday when Ms O Doherty attended court with what she said was a suitcase packed for her to go to Mountjoy Women s Prison.
About 30 of her supporters who packed into the small courtroom cheered her on arrival, some waving crucifixes, while several others who could not be accommodated remained outside the door, some reading prayer books. A garda requested that the supporters not record video or take photos, which is strictly forbidden in Irish courtrooms or their precincts.
Ms O Doherty immediately complained about the choice of a small courtroom to Mr Justice Dignam. The judge said he had no control over the allocation of courtrooms and that from enquiries he made there was no other larger option available.
Ms O Doherty told the judge he should recuse himself from hearing the case on the basis that before he was appointed to the bench he, as a barrister, had acted for former Garda commissioner Martin Callinan.
Ms O Doherty claimed Mr Callinan had her dismissed from her job as a journalist with Independent News and Media and for which she got an apology in court from the newspaper. She said a judge in another case being brought against her had recused himself last September on the basis that he too had acted for Mr Callinan and that a precedent had been set.
The harassment action has been brought by Edel Campbell, of Kingscourt, Co Cavan, over the alleged unauthorised use by Ms O Doherty of an image of her son Diego Gilsenan, who died by suicide, in an article linking unexplained deaths to the Covid-19 vaccine.
As a result of repeated breaches of an injunction restraining publication, Ms O Doherty was ordered to be brought before the court to answer a contempt application made on behalf of Ms Campbell.
She did not turn up for earlier sittings but after her arrest on Wednesday, she was released to allow her to prepare a case against the contempt application.
Yesterday, Ms O Doherty also applied to have the case thrown out on the basis of a claim that Ms Campbell s legal fees are being paid through a GoFundMe campaign. The judge adjourned the matter to June 7th.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Justice minister battles to pull Poland back from 'rule-of-law collapse'; Adam Bodnar is dealing with predecessor's 'messy' legacy which includes a EUR 66m slush fund and spyware
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 12
Length: 1299 words
Body


The gleaming white palace on Warsaw s ministerial and embassy belt doesn t look like a laboratory. But it is behind these walls that Adam Bodnar, Poland s new justice minister, is leading an unprecedented democratic experiment: stopping an authoritarian takeover midway and pulling his country back from rule-of-law collapse.
Under his predecessor Zbigniew Ziobro, Poland s justice ministry was ground zero of a national conservative push   led by the Law and Justice (PiS) party   to reshape courts, public prosecutors and state media.
Behind their professed aim   to oust a liberal, self-serving clique   critics in Warsaw and Brussels saw the planned capture of all state institutions. In his palatial office, Bodnar describes the plan in hindsight as an  omnipresent dream  to be the next Hungary.
 If Orban did it, it would also be the case in Poland,  he tells The Irish Times.  Things were constituted in a way that the system would last forever, that there would never be a moment of holding anyone accountable for what happened. It just happened that Polish voters decided differently.
After last October s election, though PiS finished first, it failed to find a majority and was ousted by a new coalition headed by former prime minister and European Council president Donald Tusk.
Choosing Bodnar for the justice portfolio, Tusk secured a man who, in his previous role as public ombudsman, was one of the last remaining independent voices criticising the reforms.
With his mild exterior masking a sharp legal mind, Bodnar has established himself as a cabinet heavyweight and, according to the well-informed Gazeta Wyborcza daily, is one of two  safe  cabinet ministers alongside foreign minister Radoslaw Sikorski.
Even with the right skills and sufficient stamina   14-hour days are the norm   Bodnar says the legal tangle he inherited is  as messy as I predicted . Possibly even worse.
Along with the known challenges such as politicised courts   more on which later   Bodnar and his officials stumbled on an elaborate slush fund allegedly operated by Ziobro and his cronies.
Prosecutors are investigating whether 285 million zloty (EUR 66 million) from a fund to compensate crime victims was redirected by Ziobro for political aims and to friendly institutions, in particular the Catholic Church.
 Ziobro created a system that was confident that, even if they were responsible for abuses, it was impossible to hold them to account,  says Bodnar, a nod to how the last justice minister merged the general public prosecutor role into his own.
This gave Ziobro, through loyal regional prosecutors, absolute power over what cases were pursued, dropped or delayed   the full scale of which is only now becoming clear.
Public prosecutors
 Next month Bodnar will present legislation to parliament to separate the prosecutor role from his own once more. He has already started sidelining public prosecutors appointed by Ziobro, and who Bodnar says  felt more responsible to the previous government .
Will Bodnar pursue Ziobro, currently undergoing cancer treatment?
 Irrespective of his sickness or illness, we should go forward with cases,  he said, adding that procedures are under way to lift the parliamentary immunity of several MPs.
As well as the slush fund inquiry, parallel parliamentary and prosecutor investigations are under way into Pegasus   a software system, purchased by the previous government, to spy on the phones of political rivals, even Ziobro s own coalition partners.
Bodnar describes the scandal as an  atomic bomb , with fresh shock waves every week; early next week Bodnar says he will reveal the full number of people spied on.
 We are conducting the audit right now, the secret service is,  he said.  And if we show abuse of power it means a right to compensation.
Given the scale of these challenges, Bodnar sounds sanguine on what was supposed to be his main task: judicial reform. The appointment of judges seen as loyalists to the PiS project was a major bone of contention with Brussels. In one of a series of searing rulings, the European Court of Justice said last year that a chamber of Poland s supreme court does  not constitute a court or tribunal for the purposes of EU law .
How does Bodnar plan to merge what are effectively two justice systems? With new judges appointed by a reformed, more politically independent judicial appointments body; sidelining problematic judges appointed in the PiS era in dubious circumstances, or simply ignoring   and running down the clock   on constitutional court allies of PiS. The latter court enjoys 25 per cent public confidence, he says.
But if, as Tusk and his allies claimed in opposition, the higher court is not fit for purpose: where are the checks and balances on his reforms? Who is controlling the controller?
Bodnar pauses briefly before suggesting he is  controlled by public opinion and by Polish voters .
He adds that major reforms will have to wait until a major legal block is lifted: PiS-allied president Andrzej Duda whose term ends next year.
Beyond new appointments, Bodnar has gone on a national tour to urge a mental shift, telling judges and prosecutors  to do their jobs .
 I don t want to control them, I tell them:  if you see abuses, you should make people accountable ,  he says.
It s a different tone to the PiS era, but the roots of that era spread wide and deep. Hundreds if not thousands of lawyers and other officials accepted a Faustian deal: expedited career advancement under PiS under dubious   if not outright illegal   circumstances. What happens to all of them?
Bodnar insists all must be vetted, before admitting the difficulty of  proper vetting and without sacrificing the stability of the legal system .
For now, he says he will be happy if those who accepted PiS-era career advancement accept  that there is a new atmosphere around the justice system and new standards .
 I am not going to promote any of these people to key positions,  he says. Bodnar s backing, he says, is for  independent judges who fought for justice in the last years  as well as minorities excluded   or exploited   as political scapegoats.
LGBT+ community
Top of that list is Poland s LGBT+ community, the subject of ruthless campaigns, incitement and violence from government officials and allies.
Given many such campaigns were steered from his ministry, Bodnar invited in LGBT+ groups last February and offered them a public apology  for the harm you have suffered from the state .
 It was quite a change for them to come to this ministry and meet a friend, he said,  someone who is favour of LGBT+ rights .
He also promised to expedite key legislative projects on hate speech, same-sex partnership and gender recognition.
Tight timetable
 Four months in, the ruling coalition is steady in polls, but there is growing impatience at the pace of visible progress. And although Bodnar s rule-of-law restoration has unlocked frozen EU funding, it is operating under a tight timetable from Brussels. Many there, and elsewhere in Europe, portrayed Poland s recent dramas as typical for a young, struggling post-communist democracy. Poles see it differently: with anti-democratic forces rising across the West, theirs is a cautionary tale from our near future.
What lesson does Bodnar think others learn from Poland? He thinks for a moment. Democracies have to stop taking for granted the guarantee of freedom they offer, he says, and take seriously the many citizens who do not understand the role of key democratic institutions, in particular the judiciary.
 You should take care in building relations between the courts and citizens, invest in good communications and in NGOs that may serve as intermediaries,  he said.  Be careful not to leave courts alone, encourage them to take a supporting role in the democratic state.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Kingsmill massacre 'an overtly sectarian attack by IRA', coroner rules
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 313 words
Body


The shooting dead of 10 Protestant workmen at Kingsmill in Co Armagh in 1976 was an  overtly sectarian attack by the IRA , a coroner has ruled.
Coroner Brian Sherrard delivered his findings in Belfast yesterday in the long-running inquest into the Troubles era deaths. He said the  glaring omission  in the proceedings had been the absence of any evidence from those who caused the attack.
 Unlike other legacy inquests which have examined the actions of the state in directly causing death, those responsible for the deaths at Kingsmill have not given an account either personally or through any organisation or any political party,  he said.
 Numerous calls to assist and provide answers were met with silence. Accordingly the inquest did not receive disclosure from any individual concerned in the attack, nor their organisation, nor their political representatives although expert evidence was given that records may well exist.
Gunmen
The massacre took place on January 5th, 1976 near the village of Kingsmill. Gunmen stopped a minibus carrying 11 Protestant workmen, lined them up alongside it and shot them. Only one victim, Alan Black, survived despite having been shot 18 times.
John Bryans, James McWhirter, Walter Chapman, Robert Freeburn, Reginald Chapman, Joseph Lemmon, John McConville, Robert Chambers, Robert Walker and Kenneth Worton died in the massacre.
Mr Sherrard said there had been no recognition from the perpetrators of the  utter wrongness  of the attack.
 Neither did the inquest hear evidence from the perpetrators regarding matters such as the motivation for the attack, its planning and personnel and its execution,  he said.  There has been no recognition by any perpetrator or their organisation or political representatives as to the utter wrongness of the attack which served to end the lives of 10 men and to devastate the lives of untold others.   PA

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Klopp left to rue Liverpool's mental fatigue; Manager says his team must regain their intensity, beginning tomorrow
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 727 words
Body


Barring another of the remarkable comebacks that have decorated Jürgen Klopp s Liverpool reign, his final European game at Anfield will have featured a flat performance and atmosphere, resignation to defeat and a divide between fans and club; everything, that is, that goes against the culture he has created over the past nine years. Rediscovering the spark and belief required to win a Premier League title, however, is the Liverpool manager s more pressing concern.
Liverpool hit a wall against Atalanta on Thursday that was not entirely of the Italian club s making. That is to take nothing away from an exemplary display by Gian Piero Gasperini s side, who demonstrated throughout a comfortable 3-0 victory why they are unbeaten in 11 Europa League away fixtures. Atalanta, sixth in Serie A, were clinical, tactically astute and commanding in defence against what was ultimately a four-man Liverpool attack.
Their defensive organisation will be a formidable obstacle to Liverpool s hopes of recovery next week in Bergamo, where Klopp s team won 5-0 in a Champions League group game during the dark days of Covid in November 2020. Rhys Williams and Joe Gomez were Liverpool s central defenders that night. But that was then.
Liverpool also hit a wall on Thursday when searching for the intensity demanded of a European quarter-final. The worry for Klopp with seven games remaining of a delicately poised title race is that fatigue has crept into several performances of late, and against Atalanta it affected players with varying conditions and workloads. Curtis Jones and Kostas Tsimikas started because they need game time after recent, lengthy injury layoffs. Both were off the pace and hooked at half-time along with Harvey Elliott.
 We didn t take off the three worst players,  said Klopp, explaining that a lack of rhythm prompted the triple substitution. With the exception of Andy Robertson, also rebuilding match sharpness after several months on the sidelines, Liverpool s substitutes   usually so effective in turning matches this season   also laboured.
Mohamed Salah threatened several times and had a goal disallowed for offside but was comfortably contained in possession by Matteo Ruggeri and Atalanta s captain, Marten de Roon. The tiredness of mind, as well as legs, that Klopp blamed for Liverpool s poor decision-making in extra time of their FA Cup defeat at Manchester United was again in evidence when Dominik Szoboszlai s loose pass led to Atalanta s third goal. Wataru Endo, Alexis Mac Allister, Gomez and Caoimhín Kelleher, influential figures this season for Liverpool, showed understandable signs of fatigue.
It is harsh, and hypocritical, to blame Klopp s decision to rest key players for Liverpool losing a 33-game unbeaten home run. His skilful juggling of resources amid considerable injury constraints is precisely why Liverpool have been able to challenge on numerous fronts this season.
Klopp has used 30 players in the Europa League, the highest number in this season s competition, and 35 across all competitions. Workloads are measured to the minute to ensure Liverpool finish campaigns strongly. But they are starting to flag at the worst possible moment.
 My job is not the easiest in the world, not the most difficult as well,  said Klopp after the defeat.  But it s about when you have players you need to make sure you get them together on the pitch and then it works out somehow. With different lineups we have played really good football this year, today we didn t. That s the reason we lost. There can be the headline:  Blah, blah, blah   it didn t work out.  It s absolutely fine and right. But we need them all, and we need them all aggressive, fit, going for it, a bit angry, full of desire and not so much dealing with your own situation, like:  I have no rhythm, I haven t played for ages.  You have to try to avoid that.
Crystal Palace must be braced for a reactiontomorrow, providing Liverpool find the energy. The Kop will be decorated again with flags, which were absent against Atalanta as fans protested against a 2 per cent increase in ticket prices at Anfield next season. Klopp, who has won more Premier League games against Palace (13) than against any other team, craves a return to normality from Liverpool as much as Dublin publicans long for the club s continued presence in the Europa League.
  Guardian

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Kyiv's calls for more air defences fall on deaf ears; Germany has sent two Patriot systems to Ukraine but is reluctant to give more
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 11
Length: 492 words
Byline: HENRY FOYGUY CHAZANCHRISTOPHER MILLER
Body


HENRY FOY in Brussels
GUY CHAZAN in Berlin
CHRISTOPHER MILLER in Kyiv  European capitals have rebuffed demands from Kyiv to send their air defence systems to Ukraine, after a week of relentless missile and drone bombardments from Russia that destroyed critical energy plants in the war-torn country.
Ukraine has long warned that it needed urgent air defence supplies to protect itself against an overwhelming number of Russian rockets targeting the country s power and heating infrastructure.
President Volodymyr Zelenskiy stepped up pleas this week for US-made Patriot batteries, castigating Kyiv s western partners for  turning a blind eye  as the capital region saw the destruction of its largest power plant.
Speaking at the Three Seas summit in the Lithuanian capital Vilnius on Thursday, he said Ukraine had fallen into a  routine  in which it suffers Russian air attacks and then pleads for more air defences from western partners who promise to provide them but have failed to deliver.
 Missiles are striking every day, and every day we hear that Ukraine will receive new air defence systems. Every day Russian terrorists cut off the electricity to Kharkiv and our other cities, and every day we hear that new aid is coming soon,  Mr Zelenskiy said.  The reality must finally match the words.
Josep Borrell, the EU s chief diplomat, said this week it was  inconceivable  that western countries could not provide seven extra Patriot batteries to Ukraine, given that they had about 100 in their arsenal they could spare.
Kyiv is lobbying for Patriot systems in Poland, Romania and Spain to be sent to Ukraine, two people familiar with the talks told the Financial Times.  They only need seven,  one person said.  But it s complicated.
European capitals have said that they do not have plans to send more systems to Ukraine, arguing that they need to retain defence capabilities.
Germany has given two Patriot systems to Ukraine, but made clear this week that it would not provide any more.
 We will not be able to offer any more systems for the time being,  the defence ministry said on Monday.
That stance has angered some in the opposition Christian Democratic Union (CDU). Norbert Röttgen, a CDU MP and member of the Bundestag foreign affairs committee, has said Berlin could give Ukraine two more Patriot systems, especially as those lent to Poland and Slovakia had now been returned.
 That would make a real difference for the people in and around Kharkiv,  he said on X.  It would save lives.
German foreign minister Annalena Baerbock last week told lawmakers in the Bundestag that talks were ongoing with other partners, in Europe and worldwide, to find spare Patriot systems.
 There are actors worldwide that have the systems,  she said.  They don t want to give them directly [to Ukraine], but via third parties. That s something we re working on intensively to try to achieve that as quickly as possible.     Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



La Rochelle give Leinster some reason to believe; O'Gara's champions never panic but their up-and-down form this season offers hope for the home side
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 3
Length: 1522 words
Body


Rewind to June 17th and Stade Rochelais were 2½ minutes away from completing the greatest day in their 126-year history. They had arrived in the Stade de France for the usual pomp and ceremony around the French Championship final, with President Emmanuel Macron introduced to both sides before kick-off. They d retained their Champions Cup trophy and, having won 13 of their previous 14 games, looked well set to complete a dream double.
They led Toulouse, their bêtes noires, by 26-22 and the clock had passed 77 minutes. Romain Ntamack had kicked a penalty to the corner into touch-and-goal in the 74th minute. The La Rochelle fans were giddily anticipating the club s first ever Bouclier de Brennus. The Toulouse supporters were resigned to defeat.
Whereupon Ntamack received ruck ball inside the Toulouse 10m line, saw UJ Seuteni shooting up out of the defensive line and beat him on the outside before dummying Dillyn Leyds on halfway and accelerating past him and Brice Dulin. Raymond Rhule swept across but there was no catching Ntamack. There s rarely been a better or more dramatic tie in the storied French championship. After the defeat, a stunned Ronan O Gara stood on the pitch and stared blankly ahead, as did his players and their supporters.
What s followed last May s heartbreak has been an unexceptional campaign to date, not helped by the demands of the World Cup. At this exact point last season, La Rochelle had won four more matches (17 to 13) and lost four less (eight as against a dozen) in the Top 14 and Champions Cup combined.
Yet James Coughlan, the former Munster number eight who has spent the last decade in French club rugby as a player and then coaching stints with Pau, Aix, Brice and Toulon, does not believe O Gara s team are carrying mental baggage from that crushing defeat last June.
 I don t think so. I think they have moved on from that. I ve spoken with Donnacha Ryan [the La Rochelle forwards coach] about that and he said:  If we play that final another nine times, James, we win the game. It s just that Ntamack did something special.
 Maybe there were scars afterwards but they dealt with it. They went away on holidays and I think they just moved on, because the World Cup would have done that for them. I d be more worried about the French lads who played in the World Cup than I would be about La Rochelle losing that final.
They have won nine out of 10 in the Top 14 at their Stade Marcel Deflandre fortress this season, and 11 out of 13 in total. Meanwhile, they ve lost nine out of 10 away in The Top 14. But they ve won two out of three away in the Champions Cup, as well as their 10 knock-out ties in succession in this competition, which tells us  exactly what it says on the tin , according to Coughlan.
 Cup rugby isn t about league form, it s about coming up with a game plan and  Rog  is very good at coming up with a game plan. He s done it over and over and over again, in La Rochelle, Marseilles and in Dublin,  adds Coughlan with regard to the semi-final and two final wins over Leinster in the last three seasons.
Lineout call
This was especially true in the Aviva last May, when Leinster roared into a 17-0 lead with three tries inside the first 12 minutes, and led 23-7 just past the half-hour mark, only to be outscored by 20-3 thereafter.
 The major thing in Dublin was that no one panicked. They didn t go off script, so that means he has a team that is 100 per cent convinced in the game plan that he s selling. If you re talking to a group and telling them:  Don t worry if Leinster go ahead of us, they ll crack, they ll crack, they ll crack,  then clearly they believed him.
For the last lineout of the game, the 24-year-old replacement lock Thomas Lavault called a throw to the tail by the replacement hooker Quentin Lespiaucq-Brettes before La Rochelle kicked the ball dead to close out the game.
 I told Donnacha it was the ballsiest call I ve ever seen at a lineout in my life. The margin of error is so high, at such a critical point in the game and they called the right call at the right time to win the game, because it worked. That for me also shows me that the players believe in their coaches.
There have been just two away wins in 23 matches in the Champions Cup knock-out stages over the last two seasons. Both have been achieved by La Rochelle, and both by a point. Last Saturday, they came from 16-0 down to beat the Stormers in Cape Town, before O Gara took the squad direct to Cork, which Coughlan describes as a master stroke.
 They re been a bit of a mixed bag this season but they re coming good. When they were 16-0 down against the Stormers in Cape Town, again there was no panic. It was very similar to what happened in the final last May. Everyone kept doing what they were doing and they dug it out again.
 There s nothing wrong with La Rochelle but there s been a huge lack of consistency.  Rog  has spoken about it, especially after Lyons,  says Coughlan, in reference to La Rochelle s 28-17 loss at struggling Lyons in February.
Missing their frontline French contingent, La Rochelle led 14-3 after 15 minutes before falling away badly.
 I can t be disappointed because I saw how we trained,  O Gara told the media afterwards.  This week, the players were more focused on real estate prices on the Île de Ré than on the field. It depends on what you want in life. If you want to be rich in apartments or houses, or rich with medals.
 So no, I m not disappointed or surprised . . .  We weren t good at anything. Neither in possession, nor in desire, nor in vision, nor in execution . . . It s a dark day for the club. It s too easy to say that there are absentees. For me, that doesn t explain this horrible, almost catastrophic performance.
 With all the respect I have for their club, LOU [Lyons] was dying in front of us at 14-3, and we are not capable of killing this match. It s serious, but it s exactly a reflection of what happened in training.
 This is not my vision of how to represent your club on Saturday afternoon. We were not a club that respects its supporters, its family . . . It was quite shameful.
Malfunctions
There are other slight malfunctions in the La Rochelle machine.  [Antoine] Hastoy has missed a few kicks that he shouldn t be missing, and Skelton hasn t been around much,  adds Coughlan. Skelton has started only nine games for La Rochelle this season, but that includes all five of their Champions Cup games.
Coughlan would be concerned about the Leinster backup front-row, and the need for Andrew Porter to play 70 minutes or more for province and country, and adds:  When [Joel] Sclavi comes on, he always gets a score.  Indeed, despite making 26 of his 38 appearances over the last two seasons as a replacement, the prop struck with a late match-winning, close-range finish to claim his ninth try in that time. This tells us something else too.
 Donnacha has them really well drilled in the scoring zone,  says Coughlan,  and their forwards are massive, apart from anything else.
Yet aside from overcoming La Rochelle at the Stade Deflandre last December by 16-9, Coughlan believes there is another factor at work that can infuse Leinster with belief, namely:  How Ireland were so convincing in beating France in Marseilles. Does that give a lot of confidence to the Leinster boys?
Well, given that 10 of the Leinster XV started in that 38-17 win, along with five more of the match-day 23, it should do. Furthermore, Jonathan Danty, Reda Wardi, Uini Atonio, Paul Boudehent and Grégory Alldritt all played that night.
Granted, Alldritt was a noticeable absentee when Leinster won in December, and he has been refreshed by the post-World Cup, two-month break he took. Against that, Rhule, Wardi and influential hooker Pierre Bourgarit are all sidelined.
Another game-changer, as Coughlan sees it, is the emergence of Joe McCarthy.  I thought he was brilliant in the Deflandre last December. I know he got a yellow card, but he got the yellow card for the right reason   not taking a step backwards.
Settled
The former Munster number eight also believes Leinster are more settled at half-back.  Gibson-Park is playing as good as anyone in the world at the moment at 9, apart from our friend in Toulouse.
 If I was in a coaching group at Leinster I would be looking at how South Africa beat France   not a dissimilar game plan with the same type of players, and you have one of the guys [Jacques Nienaber] who came up with that plan specifically for the big pack of French forwards.
 We saw the high ball with Eben [Etzebeth] on the edge. I think they ll have one or two of those up their sleeves. They now have a coach [Nienaber] who is renowned for that kind of stuff, to come up with specific plans, and then they ll have enough rugby to go on and win it then.
Coughlan has predicted each of the four previous meetings between the two correctly and ventures:  If I was going to call it, I d say Leinster. I m not entirely sure why, but how many times have Leinster blown a 17-0 lead like they had in the final? Surely, they ll have learned from that. Honestly, I could be wrong, but I think they ll just have enough.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



La Rochelle have learned how to press all of Leinster's buttons
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 976 words
Body


There is always that one team that gets under your skin like no other. It is like they instinctively know how to press all your buttons.
For Leinster, La Rochelle have become that team. This has not happened by accident and despite them being a French team, the entire situation has been manufactured in Ireland.
La Rochelle s dominance over Leinster has its roots in the troubled relationship between Munster and Leinster. Two teams that love to loathe each other. As only brothers can, they have enjoyed beating seven shades of sh**e out of each other for decades.
When one former Leinster great told me how much he hated Munster, I told him that hate was an exceptionally strong word that should only be used in extreme circumstances.
He paused for a moment to contemplate my words, then confirmed,  Hate ... yes that s the right word. I have always hated them . While some of that was obviously said in jest, the underlying tone tells us about the reality of a true intergenerational feud.
Part of Ronan O Gara s coaching brilliance in winning two Champions Cup Finals is that he has taken his deep understanding of this bitter rivalry between his home province and Leinster and somehow injected it into the hearts and minds of his highly talented French, Australian, New Zealand, Fijian and South African players.
O Gara s aim was for La Rochelle to be the best team in Europe. To achieve this goal they had to overcome Leinster. So he did it the only way he knew how. He brought his Munster mindset to France, enabling Les Maritimes, to emulate Munster s ability to press every one of Leinster s buttons.
La Rochelle chose Cork as their base for this week s camp for many reasons. A prominent one is that in Cork they can tap into the anti-Leinster sentiment and because of O Gara s folk hero status, and despite being French, they are the hometown favourites.
A situation beautifully stage-managed by O Gara.
Pantomime
Before O Gara began coaching at La Rochelle, most Munster supporters would have needed an old school atlas to find the place on the map. Today, rumour has it, that Ryanair is establishing a new direct flight between Cork and La Rochelle named  La Route de Rog .
All of this follows on from last year s pantomime where Grégory Alldritt, the La Rochelle skipper, claimed James Ryan, the Leinster captain and a great person, supposedly disrespected him by not looking him in the eye at the coin toss.
Then two of Leinster s all time greats, Johnny Sexton and Sean O Brien, were allegedly moonlighting as bodyguards outside the referee s change rooms, supposedly to stop Rog from having an influential word with the match officials at half-time.
Seriously, you could not make this stuff up.
O Gara s belief his side were viewed as a  little team  ahead of last year s final could well have had its origins in thousands of Cork rugby pregame speeches, where every well-balanced player has a chip on both shoulders.
The theme continued this week with a stream of social media posts from Les Rochelais. My highlight was the playing of The Fields of Athenry on the La Rochelle team bus. I am sure that some cultural explanation was required as to why stealing Trevelyan s corn earned Michael an all-expenses-paid, one-way cruise to Sydney.
All of this has been broadcast across Ireland for one very powerful reason. To get up Leinster s noses. And I would suggest to you that it has worked a treat. It has certainly got up mine.
In recent years Les Maritimes have forced Leinster to munch so much humble gateaux that there is no doubt that they have the psychological edge over the men in blue. All of this week s highly entertaining antics in Cork were aimed at cranking that up big time. While La Rochelle must be carrying some residual fatigue from their round trip to South Africa last week, they are a great team and a three-peat Championship victory remains real.
Yet from Leinster this week all the rugby world heard was crickets.
Trash-talk
It is not in Leo Cullen s makeup to trash-talk his opponent. However, the saying  beware the fury of a patient man  should be heeded. Do not be fooled by Cullen s quiet exterior. The man is as big a competitor as I have ever witnessed. He is also a realist. The two Champions Cup final defeats have forced Leinster into a situation where words are useless.
Cullen understands that the only way they can exorcise their demons of defeat is to win.
Another social media post from within the La Rochelle camp contained a photo of a group of players holding a poster of Ronan s face surrounded by the words  L opportunite c est F**king enorme.  Within the Leinster community, there is a deep feeling of resentment that the La Rochelle campaign has crossed a line.
As a player and coach Leo has been involved in many great, against the odds victories over Munster and several other excellent teams.
Passion
While it is part of Leinster s culture to not publicly talk about their passion, unlike Munster and La Rochelle, it is a very foolish team that deceives themselves into believing that their passion is superior to Leinster s. A trap that many Munster teams of the past have fallen into.
So while La Rochelle may have won the week, they are yet to win the day.
Then again, Caelan Doris may refuse to gaze adoringly into Alldritt s orbs, so O Gara can say  I know we ve beaten them in the last two finals, but these Leinster Langers still don t respect us!
While in the stands hordes of Corkonians will stand and wave La Rochelle flags, having arrived in Dublin via a 20-kilometre-long convoy following O Gara on the team bus, singing Zombie in French all the way.
While we often laugh at the antics of our cousins across the Atlantic and say  It could only happen in America , I can assure you that what continues to unfold this week falls into the joyously singular category of:  It could only happen in Ireland.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



LARKIN'S DAY IN IRELAND'S FLEDGLING COURT; 'Big Jim' Larkin was involved in the first case to come before the new Irish Supreme Court in 1924   and the trade union leader returned to the court just a year later
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 3
Length: 1032 words
Body


It was a bleak year, 1924; the Civil War had just ended, and the fledgling Irish Free State was struggling with an economic depression, mass unemployment, strikes over the slashing of wages and severe food shortages after a disastrous harvest following months of unrelenting rain.
The same year witnessed a seismic event in the development of the new State   the signing into law on April 12th, 1924, of the Courts of Justice Act creating an independent courts system. Just weeks later, a large crowd gathered at Dublin Castle on June 11th, 1924, for the opening ceremony for the new courts, marking, as Ireland s first chief justice Hugh Kennedy said,  the moment when the silence of the Gael in the courts of law is broken .
Five days later, the first appeal before the new Irish Supreme Court concerned allegations that Jim Larkin had been responsible for serious irregularities, over years, in the accounts of the Irish Transport and General Workers  Union (ITGWU).
The claims were advanced by the union s general president, Thomas Foran, and the executive council after Larkin, having returned to Ireland in 1923 after several years in the US, tried to regain his dominance of the ITGWU.
The court battle, sparked after Larkin and some relatives attempted to take over the union s offices in June 1923, opened before the master of the rolls, Sir Charles Andrew O Connor, in Dublin Castle in February 1924.
The plaintiffs alleged years of  chaotic  accounting of union funds by Larkin, maintained he effectively ran the union as his personal fiefdom, and argued that new rules overwhelmingly approved by the membership were valid and that they were trustees of the union, entitled to possession of its headquarters in Liberty Hall and offices at Parnell Square.
Larkin, in a separate claim, argued that the new rules were invalid. Having dismissed his counsel, he represented himself and made serious allegations, including fraud, against the plaintiffs. The plaintiffs rejected most of his claims, but admitted expending union funds for political purposes.
After an at times heated hearing, the judge said he was deciding the case  not from the point of view of the master or the worker, but simply as a lawyer .
The plaintiffs were the legal trustees and officers of the union, and Larkin s counter challenge, he ruled, was not justified. There was no dishonesty or secrecy about the past use of union funds for political purposes and its new rules, unanimously adopted by its conference, were intended to ensure compliance with the law in that regard, he held.
Forcible possession
 In seeking to take forcible possession of the ITGWU premises, Larkin was effectively deciding by force and violence his claims over his legal rights, he said.
 If that is the example to the working class it must result in chaos, and instead of being a society of civilised human beings, we will revert to our original position of savages.
Larkin appealed, but the Supreme Court was told on the morning of the hearing on June 16th, 1924, that the appeal had been withdrawn the previous evening.
Ireland s first chief justice, Hugh Kennedy, struck out the matter, with costs to the union side, which it was frustrated in recovering, as Larkin was made bankrupt in late 1924.
An undaunted Larkin was back before the Supreme Court in summer 1925 in another appeal, in entirely separate proceedings, against an award of £500 damages for defamation.
Thomas Johnson TD, then leader of the Irish Labour Party, alleged he was defamed in an article published in the Irish Worker, edited by Larkin, on May 24th, 1924, slamming Johnson over a Dáil speech delivered a few days earlier.
Johnson, after referring to correspondence from demobilised soldiers seeking pensions, urged the government to take warning of the  rising tide of agitation and discontent . It would have to deal with unemployment in a  much bigger manner  and raise a civil and industrial army to deal with it, he said.
The Irish Worker article, written by Larkin s father James and published under the headline  Johnson incites to chaos , claimed Johnson s speech meant workers thrown out of work due to the  murderous and suicidal  policy of the government must be shot down if they agitated for work.  It is time Labour dealt with this English traitor,  the article urged.
Johnson claimed the article wrongly meant he had incited the murder of workers, was a  traitor  to the labour movement, and had  gone over to capitalism .
He sued Larkin and The Gaelic Press, publisher of the Irish Worker, for defamation.
During the trial in April 1925 before Mr Justice Thomas O Shaughnessy and a jury in the new Irish High Court, The Irish Times reported that Larkin told the jury he did not write the article, but wished he had.
 If I wrote it, there should be more bitterness and invective in it,  the clearly unrepentant editor said, declaring he approved of  every line , that it was  perfectly true, well-founded and fair  and that he would repeat it even if all the juries of Dublin found against the defendants.
Asked was he above the juries and the law, he said:  I am.
When Serjeant Hanna KC, for Johnson, said:  These are the principles of Moscow,  The Irish Times reported that Larkin,  still shouting , said:  Yes, these are the principles of Moscow. I do not preach to unorganised men one day and tomorrow incite to their murder. They are the principles of Moscow. I am a member of the Moscow Soviet. There have been men murdered in Belfast by unctuous Christians like yourself.
Libel damages
 At the close of the hearing in May 1925, the jury found the article amounted to a libel and awarded damages of £500 each against Larkin and The Gaelic Press to Johnson.
Both appealed to the Supreme Court for a new trial, but The Gaelic Press, having agreed a sum of damages with Johnson, withdrew its appeal.
The Supreme Court allowed the appeal in late July 1925 on grounds that two separate actions for damages should not have been joined in the same writ. Larkin, it ruled, was liable for damages but was entitled to a new hearing on the amount, to be assessed on the facts found by the trial jury. Probably because of Larkin s bankruptcy, there was no new hearing.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Leinster look to front up to overcome their biggest rivals; Home advantage and Nienaber factor may swing the tie Leinster's way
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 1
Length: 1004 words
Body


There are Champions Cup quarter-finals and then, well, there are Champions Cup quarter-finals! No other match-up in European club rugby in no other city could become a 50,000 sell-out this week. That says it all really.
Out of nowhere, in just four years, has sprang a rivalry to equal anything in this competition s 28-year history. Last May, they broke new ground when providing the same final pairing for the second year in succession.
Now Leinster and La Rochelle take it to another level by meeting for the fourth season in succession in the knock-out stages, following the Covid-affected semi-final three seasons ago at an empty Stade Deflandre, the final in Marseille two seasons ago and last May s decider here.
That cut Leinster the deepest, but the arrival of Jacques Nienaber, the emergence of Joe McCarthy and that rain- drenched 16-9 pool win in La Rochelle last December gives Leinster belief that they can atone for the French outfit ending their dreams of a cherished fifth star three years running.
There have been several flashpoints on and off the pitch, so inevitably there s a degree of enmity between the two. Revelling in his role as agent provocateur, after the back-to-back champions played their get-out-of-jail card in Cape Town, Ronan O Gara had them decamp to his home city for the week.
Logistically, it reduced the travel, and afforded La Rochelle a second week of team bonding. In milking Cork s bonhomie for one of their favourite sons (and Munster antipathy toward Leinster?), La Rochelle trained in his old Constitution stamping ground at Temple Hill before mounting an insurrection to Dublin from Leeside. Cheeky and clever.
Civil war
So then, this isn t just war. This is, it seems, now civil war as well. Amid the calm before the storm in an empty Aviva for the Friday captain s runs, although smiling, tellingly Leo Cullen remarked of the rivalry:  There seems to be a bit of a Cork bandwagon. The mafia have jumped on to the bandwagon along with La Rochelle. It s great, isn t it? That s what sport needs, doesn t it, and I m glad that we re a part of it.
Cullen also said:  We re the only Irish team in the competition and you d love if all of Ireland got behind you. But that s not the way it works, as we know. But we re the last man standing of the Irish provinces.
This prompted one of Cullen s almost annual discourses concerning the different models in Ireland compared to the Top 14, with its millionaires and in some cases billionaires, and the scale of the challenge thus facing Leinster.
A tad non-plussed to be asked about Peter O Mahony s new contract, Cullen noted that O Gara would be following him into the Aviva media room.  They were being hosted down in Cork Con this week. Donal Lenihan organised a few things for them this week so maybe ask the lads.
Yep, it s civil war all right. But O Gara s move to Cork was also designed to reignite their season.  The weather was miserable but Con were great, Fota was great,  he said.  We got out a bit. We got to mingle with the Cork public. It was just really refreshing, without sounding cocky obviously, just to see that you mean something to them and that was very, very nice from a personal point of view.
 We ve not been as cohesive as we d like to be,  said O Gara, specifically of his backs.  But I think we can hopefully skip a few steps by getting a good buzz from arriving in an unbelievable stadium with a full house and an unbelievably good sod that will hopefully bring back all the good memories of last May.
Mental strength
O Gara likened it to a Test match, and as Uini Atonio warned, in that surprisingly soft voice of his:  If they [Leinster] want to win that trophy they will have to go through us.
Last week s latest comeback, from 16-0 down, was a reminder of their unwavering mental strength and close-range power game, which remains the biggest threat to Leinster. Hence, more even than most games, discipline in the middle third will likely be critical.
La Rochelle s frontrow stocks have also been de-powered by the loss of loosehead Reda Wardi, hooker Pierre Bourgarit and Georges Henri Colombe, who scored last May s decisive try off the bench, albeit they have signed the Wallabies  hooker Tolu Latu and have two recent under-20 World Cup winning looseheads in Louis Penverne and Alexandre Kaddouri.
They ve also lost fullback Brice Dulin, whom O Gara described as his rock, due to a knee injury, so Teddy Thomas is restored, with Dillyn Leyds shifting to fullback.
Nienaber s hand is all over Leinster s punchy selection. Jason Jenkins  is restored alongside Joe McCarthy to meet the brute force of Leinster s kryptonite, Will Skelton, and so is Will Connors.
 I think he s the best chop tackler in the game that I ve come across,  said Cullen of Connors, who demonstrated this in his only previous Champions Cup start, namely that December pool win.
Ross Molony and Josh van der Flier drop to a reconfigured 6-2 bench with Michael Milne chosen ahead of Cian Healy. Luke McGrath is also restored.
Granted James Ryan   whose departure after half an hour was a huge turning point in May   and Garry Ringrose are significant losses. But in addition to last December s win, nine of this Leinster XV and 14 of the 23 were part of Ireland s resounding 38-17 win in Marseille.
That, home advantage and the Nienaber factor, may swing what is liable to be another titanic tussle Leinster s way.
LEINSTER: H Keenan; J Larmour, R Henshaw, J Osborne, J Lowe; R Byrne, J Gibson-Park; A Porter, D Sheehan, T Furlong, J McCarthy, J Jenkins, R Baird, W Connors, C Doris (capt). Replacements: R Kelleher, M Milne, M Ala alatoa, R Molony, J Conan, L McGrath, C Frawley, J van der Flier. LA ROCHELLE: D Leyds; J Nowell, UJ Seuteni, J Danty, T Thomas; A Hastoy, T Kerr-Barlow; L Penverne, T Latu, U Atonio, U Dillane, W Skelton, J Cancoriet, L Botia, G Alldritt (capt). Replacements: Q Lespiaucq, A Kaddouri, J Sclavi, T Lavault, P Boudehent, Y Tanga, T Iribaren, I West. Referee: Karl Dickson (RFU). Forecast: Leinster to win.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



LESSER-TOLD TALES OF THE IRISH IN BRITAIN; Look Back to Look Forward, an exhibition showcasing stories that follow the waves of Irish emigrants to Britain from the early 1970s to today, has come 'home home' to Epic, the Irish Emigration Museum
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 1
Length: 1755 words
Body


Like most children, Maurice Malone was just beginning to look forward to Santa Claus and Christmas as he went to bed in his family s Birmingham home on November 21st, 1974.
Instead, the seven-year-old s secure world changed utterly shortly after 8pm when IRA bombs carried in duffel bags exploded in the Mulberry Bush and the Tavern in the Town.
Twenty-one people were killed, and 182 were injured, most seriously. However, the dead and injured were not the only casualties that night; the relationship between Irish immigrants and locals in the West Midlands city were seriously affected.
 Our family and our life, just overnight, changed. It had gone,  remembers Malone, one of many voices of first- and second-generation Irish who feature in a major exhibition on the Irish in Britain.
Malone s father lost his job in the Lucas car parts factory within days.
 He, and the other lads who were working with him, were asked to leave the factory, which had been his life. It had been their lives. My dad died that night as well. But he just didn t know it,  remembers Malone.  He lost his job, lost his income, lost a network of friends.
 He turned to the drink. Everything went downhill from there. He never recovered from the hatred, you know, the shame on the community. The community finished that night.
Malone s story is one of 50 featuring in the Look Back to Look Forward exhibition tracing the story of the Irish in Britain from the early 1970s to today, though scores more appear in an online exhibition.
Now, the exhibition has come  home home , as Ireland is often called by emigrants, to the Epic emigration museum on Custom House Quay in Dublin, where it opened last Thursday and runs until July 14th.
The project began to mark the 50th anniversary of the Irish in Britain organisation   once known as the Federation of Irish Societies, and which brings up to 150 Irish organisations throughout Britain together.
It was important to bring the story to Dublin, chief executive of the Irish in Britain Brian Dalton says, even though it began as a project to tell the story to their own in Britain.
 We are the oldest migrant community in Britain, with an average age of about 55/56. Much older than anyone else. So, there s a real risk of losing a lot of these histories,  says Dalton.
So far, the exhibition has been displayed in London, Liverpool, Leeds and Birmingham, and London again:  There has been a hugely emotional response.
 People were laughing, crying, hugging, really, really moved,  says Dalton of an exhibition that features the voices of many emigrants, along with actor Adrian Dunbar and comedian Ardal O Hanlon.
For some, the joy was in seeing their own generation s lives marked and celebrated. For others, it was in seeing  Mum and Dad s generation  remembered, while for some it was an opportunity to learn a story they knew little about.
 We had one guy early on who got really emotional and started shouting and screaming at a video of some construction subcontractors from the 1970s because he said he had not been paid by one of them. That was an amazing moment,  says Dalton.
Mounting controversy
 A Dublin exhibition was  always on the radar , especially given the mounting controversy in Ireland about immigration  and all that stuff last November , says Dalton, referencing the riots in Dublin.
 We certainly would not be telling people how to think about the challenges of migration,  says the Tramore, Co Waterford-born Dalton, who left Ireland  as an economic migrant , as he puts it, in 1987.
 We have a hard-earned experience to share about what it is like to set up and build new lives in another country, in cities where we weren t always welcome, either.
Equally, it is important to tell the story to a country that has often chosen to ignore or dismiss the Irish in Britain, especially the British-born generations,  so offensively  dubbed  plastic Paddies , says Dalton.
Angie Birtill, who was born in Liverpool to Irish parents and moved to London in her 20s, where she became a key member of the London Irish Women s Centre, remembers the women who came from Ireland, particularly in the 1980s.
 A lot of young women who weren t just coming for economic reasons, like my mum had come in the 1930s and the women who followed my mum, say like in the 40s and 50s.
 [They] were nurses like her and they were coming to fill the gaps in the economy,  Birtill says, but lots of  the women who came in the 80s ended up in many low-paid jobs. Many of them were leaving for more social reasons. They just didn t feel they could be themselves at home. Simple as that, they felt [it was] just a hostile environment,  she says.
Belfast-born Jim O Hara, who led the work that saw the construction of the multi-million-pound Irish Cultural Centre in Hammersmith, talks of the three waves of Irish emigration to Britain in the modern era.
The 1945-65 wave brought a lot of  country people, for that is what they were  to a highly-urbanised society who  were totally unequipped to cope with it, particularly the men .
 Many of the men are now dead because they actually killed themselves working, you know, on the roads, construction sites, and all the rest of it. There are very few left,  he says.
The second  wave  came in the 1970s and, again, between 1981 and 1990 during the recession at home, where most faced frequent difficulties because of the Troubles.
 That is somewhat downplayed in Ireland, that   the trouble that the Troubles caused for the Irish living in Britain, where they were often figures of suspicion. That was hard on them,  he says.
Besides the Birmingham bombings, the exhibition covers the wider effects of the Troubles on the community, especially the operation of the Prevention of Terrorism Act that frequently targeted the Irish.
 It was a really dark picture. Growing up in the South, I don t know about you, but we were quite skilled at turning a blind eye to the Troubles. It just didn t register, we never talked about it,  says Dalton.
Facing a Special Branch check at Holyhead in the 1970s, one emigrant, Liam O Hare, asked the plainclothes officer:  Are you still working here?   What do you mean?  replied the policeman.  You ve been here for years,  O Hare told him.
Taken aback, the policeman replied,  How do you know?
 Because you hassle me every time I pass through,  O Hare replied. The policeman was  actually genuinely shocked , he remembers, but  he was stereotyping Irish guys in their late 20s .
Prisoners
 Today, it is  cool  to be Irish in London, says Fr Gerry McFlynn of the Irish Chaplaincy, who spent years visiting Irish prisoners of all faiths and none in prisons throughout Britain.  Certainly, there was a time where it wasn t, that s for sure.
Even into the 1990s, the Irish were regarded  as a suspect community , says the Newcastle, Co Down-born priest.
O Hara, one of many Northerners to leave Belfast in the early-1970s agrees.
 The Irish coming today are completely different, they re young, they re confident, they re qualified, with none of the hang-ups about the Troubles, about being Irish, about being suspect. Being Irish, in fact, is a plus. The Irish are popular even. People say,  Oh, you re Irish .
However, the exhibition covers, too, the Irish that could never have flowered in the closed, conservative, religion-dominated Ireland of the day, but only outside of it.
Dalton says:  I m talking about people like Shane MacGowan, for instance, and Boy George, or Elvis Costello and the others featured here that absolutely couldn t have existed in any other place but in a London Irish household.
 Unique. And, you know, the London Irish accent, it is like no others, it s unique. No one else talks like that. I can spot it a mile away. The inflection and the elongated vowels only happens in London-Irish households.
 So, we need to build a place where all those people feel like they can contribute and be part of something. We don t make distinctions about first and second generations. A sense of shared identity, it starts with that.
The experience of the Irish in Britain holds lessons for Ireland today, Dalton believes.
 Many friends here have kids who are very comfortable wearing an England football jersey on a Saturday and an Irish rugby jersey on a Sunday. And there s no conflict in that. That sense of identity is worn very lightly but proudly, but without any conflict. I think there s much to learn, in Ireland, about how we organise and how we embrace diverse membership groups over here.
Loughborough University academic, Dr Deirdre O Byrne says the book, Across The Water, about the lives of Irish women living in Britain, written by Mary Lennon and Marie McAdam, reflected the experience of many Irish in Britain.
 You re not fully part of this, you re not fully part of that. And it is that not fitting in which encapsulates the Irish in Britain experience. I think it just nails it. We re here, and we re kind of not of here,  she says.
Preparing the exhibition, Brian Dalton and a team of oral historians, partly-funded by a UK Heritage Lottery grant, sought to track the unheard, unrecognised stories of the community.
 We wanted to showcase stories that don t often make it. There s been a million things about nurses and navvies, and that s right, so there should be. But we didn t really want it just about that again,  says Dalton.
Role of women
 Instead, the exhibition places the role of women generally into the foreground, along with people prominent in civic leadership and activism, or those from the travelling, and the LGBT community.
Some stories are difficult to tell:  There was a big responsibility on us to do it in a way that is sensitive, and we understood the obligation on us to get this right,  he adds.
And it s not just a southern story, either, as illustrated by Belfast woman Clare Hagan who left her home city because there was  nothing to do here and especially nothing to do, you know, for a lesbian .
Once in London, she said:  I felt that there was much more . . . I mean, like, I was in a city where there were gay bars, you know, it was like,  Hello. Wow , you know, where Pride, you know, and stuff like that [exists]. . .
The costs of bringing the exhibition to Dublin are being met by the Department of Foreign Affairs, a display of  maturity , says Dalton,  since the Ireland of 40 years ago wouldn t be paying for this. Some the stories are actually quite dark. It says an awful lot about how we ve changed and how the difficult parts of our story are being reconciled. An awful lot, and that s good.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Line speed and shitfights   how Nienaber has changed Leinster's defence; There have two identifiable shifts to Leinster's defensive system under coach
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 3
Length: 993 words
Body


The question surrounding Jacques Nienaber s arrival at Leinster this season focused on his ability to get them over their European hump. Could the defensive mastermind of South Africa s back-to-back World Cup triumphs add the missing ingredient to break their La Rochelle hoodoo? If so, how long would it take?
Thankfully, for narrative-hungry journalists, Nienaber offered a timeline for the bedding-in period of his new defensive system.  It will be 14 weeks,  he said, not long after first arriving in Dublin.  It took 14 weeks with Munster, it took 14 games with the  Boks when we took over in 2018.
How convenient that in advance of this weekend s season-defining quarter-final against La Rochelle, Nienaber passed the 14-game mark after the recent defeat of Leicester. Such a span includes two friendlies during the Six Nations where Leinster s non-international contingent lost to Bath and Saracens.
What is the state of Leinster s defence now that Nienaber has had his desired window? Statistically, it s difficult to draw any sweeping conclusions; we need a much larger sample size than 14 matches. Lest we forget, Leinster haven t had access to their first choice XV available for much of these games due to Ireland commitments.
Regardless, there is sufficient detail to shine at least some light on the two identifiable shifts to Leinster s defensive system under Nienaber.
First, there is a stark statistic that portrays a change in Leinster s line speed. Passes per defensive action (PPDA) illustrates how many times a defence allows an attack to make a pass before an attempted tackle. Essentially, the metric can be used to show the aggression of a line speed; a faster line speed allows fewer passes between tackles.
Per analyst Carrick Blake, Leinster were in the 69th percentile for allowing a low PPDA figure last season. This year, they have jumped up to the third percentile. Their speed off the defensive line has undoubtedly increased.
Before the round of 16, Ryan Baird led the Champions Cup in dominant tackles with eight. Asking a dynamic athlete to come flying off the line   akin to Pieter-Steph du Toit with South Africa   could well be the key to unlocking his best defensive work. Second to Baird was another Leinster man, Josh van der Flier.
The second area of difference is harder to assess statistically. Following his first game back for Leinster after the World Cup, Hugo Keenan succinctly summed up Leinster s new attitude towards the defensive breakdown:  Lads were trying to make a shitfight of it.
 Chaos at the breakdown
Under Nienaber, Leinster s forwards in particular have been tasked with being more disruptive, both in the jackal and when counterrucking.
 Towards the end of last season, it was something we spoke a little bit more about, creating chaos at the breakdown and every tackle is an opportunity to create chaos,  explains Caelan Doris.
 I think there is more of an onus on the individual tackle and barge, post end, and post tackle effort and trying to create a bit of a mess there. Teams have done it to us over the last couple of seasons . . . it s hard to play against.
 You can see with South Africa they have that massive barge mentality, you can see it from us, we re trying to implement it into our game as well,  said Scott Penny, who has been involved in half of these first 14 games.  Barge  has clearly become word of the day in plenty of Nienaber s sessions at UCD.
Today, the prevailing wisdom is that Will Connors is a horses-for-courses selection at openside given his ability to chop-tackle La Rochelle s powerful carriers. There is merit in this, given plenty of Leinster players, not just Connors, had success with the chop tackle the last time these two sides met in December when Leinster prevailed in the pool stages.
Yet perhaps Connors is included for his barge as well. In that Leinster victory, he impressed with his disruptive breakdown work. In this year s URC, he has been effective at slowing down opposition ball at a third of the rucks he s hit. If that factored into the selection, Van der Flier may feel hard done by, given he led Europe for turnovers forced (eight) before the round of 16.
Interestingly, Doris suggested that the newfound breakdown aggression started last season, before Nienaber came on board. It may be a stretch to suggest the province got sick of teams like La Rochelle disrupting their ball and decided to follow suit, but it s not beyond the bounds of imagination either. If you can t beat them, join them, then beat them.
Bold decision
The fact that Leinster started trying to turn opposition rucks into a  shitfight  towards the end of last year may partly explain the limited statistical differences from 2023 and 2024. In last year s final defeat to La Rochelle, Leinster forced a turnover once for every 27 defensive collisions. In this season s pool victory, that lowered slightly to 22. In this year s Champions Cup, Leinster are averaging 6.4 turnovers forced per match. Last year, that figure was six.
Despite the neat 14-game narrative, it s difficult to use data to gauge how effective Leinster s new defence is. At this early stage, with plenty of players still finding their feet under Nienaber, a one-off knockout game is going to be decided by individual moments, rather than identifiable trends.
Robbie Henshaw came up with one such moment last week, rushing out of the line to make a try-scoring interception despite giving up a dangerous overlap if he didn t come away with the ball. That was arguably the swing point of the match. Would he have made that bold decision if Nienaber wasn t his defence coach? In theory, this new system suits such moment-driven contests.
In December, in the swirling La Rochelle rain, Leinster prevailed against the masters of the defensive shitfight. Today, on what is expected to be a dry Dublin day more conducive to attacking rugby, Leinster s shitfighting skills will receive their sternest test yet.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Little, luckless Luton still have a shot at one of the great Premier League feats
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 1073 words
Body


On this weekend a year ago, Luton Town won 2-0 at Rotherham United. The win kept Luton third in the Championship behind Burnley and Sheffield United.
This is where Luton Town were, this is who Luton Town were. The Premier League barely gave them a glance and when it did, it was to say your ground s not big enough.
Twelve months on Luton travel to Manchester City as one of the stories of the Premier League season. The Hatters have defied expectations, used Kenilworth Road to their advantage, overcome punishing injuries, losses and in mid-April are still in with a shout of staying up. Those clubs who finished above them a year ago   Burnley and Sheffield United   they re all but down.
Luton? Today they go to the European champions. They have not played at the Etihad stadium before.
True, they are in the relegation zone. But it is only on goal difference and Luton are one of five clubs with a realistic aim of being in the division come August. Nottingham Forest, Everton, Brentford and Crystal Palace will not have anticipated being chased all the way by a team who won a Wembley play-off on penalties, a club with minimal resources and a stadium whose capacity is 12,000.
When Luton lost their first four matches by an aggregate of 10-2, those clubs existing in lucrative mid-table cosiness will have been reassured of another season of spectacular income to further buttress their squads and maintain their comfortable status quo.
Then on the last day of September, Luton won at Everton, Goodison Park shivered and a few other clubs felt a tap on the shoulder. Luton, a club who had not been in the top flight since 1992, had their first Premier League-era victory.
The Hatters  first goal that day came from Tom Lockyer, their captain. Lockyer had also scored the winning goal in the play-off semi-final against Sunderland that got the Hatters to Wembley. A clever, ball-playing centre-half, Lockyer gave his side aggression, wit and passing rhythm. Now he gave them belief the season might be more than a visitor experience.
Three days later Luton lost at home to Burnley and the  learning, growing, adapting, evolving  that manager Rob Edwards had spoken of after Everton suddenly sounded premature. Others looked away again.
By December there had been a second victory and a first at Kenilworth Road   against Palace   but when reigning champions City made their way to Bedfordshire in December Luton had nine points from 15 games and their Premier League status still felt temporary.
They took the lead against City, though, through Elijah Adebayo. While Bernardo Silva and Jack Grealish won the game for City, Luton had scored against Pep Guardiola s Treble winners.
That was a small landmark in the season s journey; another, rather more significant, was that the game also marked Lockyer s last major involvement. The following week he collapsed at Bournemouth, just as he had done after 12 minutes at Wembley and while Lockyer, who suffered a cardiac arrest, lost most, his team-mates, his coach, his club, lost a leader. This was not just a personal injury, this was a traumatic incident for the club.
Rocked, Luton reacted by beating Newcastle 1-0 and going to Bramall Lane and scoring three. They were still in the bottom three but now had 15 points from 18 games, a ratio that offered a glimpse of what could be.
As perceptions of the club changed, Brighton were beaten 4-0   with an Adebayo hat-trick   and though it has been hard since, one win in 11 plus a 6-2 home defeat by City in the FA Cup, when Erling Haaland scored five, Luton go to City as Premier League competitors. The odds say otherwise   they re 30/1 to win   but having scored in both games against City so far, they know they can at least do that.
Luton also know that three of their last five matches are at their old, raucous home and Brentford, Everton and Fulham will not be looking forward to their trip with any glee.
The fact is Luton Town can stay up and there s a reasonable argument it would be English football s greatest escapade since Leicester City won the Premier League in 2016. It is unwise to downplay their achievement, but Leicester had players of the experience of Kasper Schmeichel, Wes Morgan and Robert Huth, signings of the calibre of N Golo Kanté and Riyad Mahrez and a striker in Jamie Vardy who scored 24 goals in 36 games. And crucially they all stayed fit.
Edwards last week counted 11 players out, including Chiedozie Ogbene, Adebayo, Amari i Bell and Jacob Brown   and Lockyer. They all played in that breakthrough win at Everton. It s why Christian Chigozie was on the bench at Arsenal 10 days ago. He s 16 and still at school.
Ross Barkley has provided some Premier League pedigree, as have Marvelous Nakamba and Sambi Lokonga, though the latter pair are also out. You would have to say that, on Saturday, all this offsets Rodri saying he and the City players are feeling weary.
Rodri said this   understandably   after City s 3-3 epic at Real Madrid in the Champions League on Tuesday night; it s a long, long way from Kenilworth Road.
It is a quirk of the fixture list that City s run goes Real Madrid, Luton Town, Real Madrid, but Luton deserve this profile. It may feel unfeasible to travelling Hatters who watched their club enter the 21st century in the third tier, on a downward spiral that took in administration (2007), an incredible 30-point deduction (2008) and the inevitable loss of Football League status (2009). Even in 2018 Luton were playing in League Two.
But the manner of their adjustments (plural) this season is admirable. Edwards has a claim on being manager of the year and in talismanic centre-forward Carlton Morris, Luton have a contender for footballer of the year. He won t win it, of course, but Morris has impressed in the same way Neil Redfearn did for Barnsley in their lone Premier League season of 1997-98 or Charlie Adam did for Blackpool in the 2010-11 season. (Blackpool were relegated on 39 points.)
Relegation, Luton and Manchester City   it takes you back to 1982-83 and one of English football s unforgettable scenes. On the last day of the season Luton s Yugoslavian midfielder Raddy Antic scored an 86th-minute winner. It kept Luton up, sent City down and had David Pleat skipping across Maine Road. Managers didn t really do that sort of thing then.
 What an amazing act of escapology,  says John Motson, commentating for Match of the Day.
If 2024 Luton Town stay up, it will merit repeating.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Lowry: 'I'm here for the weekend, and I'll give it a run'; Irishman hangs tough to make cut after 'the toughest two days of golf I've played'
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 7
Length: 542 words
Byline: PHILIP REID
Body


PHILIP REID
at Augusta National  Even Van Morrison s lyrics didn t account for days like these, where those inside the ropes   in golfing paradise but subjected to hard labour   were required to second guess every shot as the wind noisily whistled through the branches of the swaying, towering cathedral pines and player and caddie determined fine margins with scientific know-how.
In such circumstances, Shane Lowry   the man executing the shots   and his bagman Darren Reynolds, his yardage book numbers studiously analysed on each and every shot, stuck diligently to the task at hand until a short par putt on the 18th green, for the second visit of a long day which started with a 5am alarm call, ensured further work for the weekend.
 It s just hard. It s hard to pick a wind and it d be hard to get it right playing around a normal golf course, but you re playing around Augusta National, where you have to be so precise, as well. You re trying to pitch the ball; you don t have much to pitch the ball in. You can be made to look like an idiot out there today by not doing too much wrong. I m not overly happy with my two days  work, but I m here for the weekend, and I ll give it a run,  said Lowry.
Frustrated
There were times Lowry looked frustrated, especially a spell of three three-putts in four holes   taking in his closing hole of his first round and then the first and third of his second round which came after a very short interlude   but, in difficult conditions, he produced a second round 74 to add to his opening 73 for 147, three-over-par, to maintain his streak of made cuts to five in the Masters.
The first task for any player is to ensure a presence with scorecard in hand going into Saturday and Sunday. On that point, it was a case of mission accomplished. But with ground to make up.  I battled well. I m proud of myself for playing the last six holes in one under to make the cut, and yeah, hopefully go out there and have a decent weekend,  admitted Lowry, adding:
 It s so hard out there. It s honestly a lot of guesswork, a lot of luck involved. It s hard to hole putts. It s hard to hit it close. There s a lot of luck involved out there today. The wind is all over the place. I ve never seen it like this. That was probably the toughest two days of golf that I ve played. I ll sleep well tonight!
Lowry, to his credit, hung tough. When he hit his tee-shot to the angelic if deceptive par 3 12th to a back bunker and failed to save par, the Offalyman slipped to four over for the tournament and, at that time, outside the cutline. He didn t drop another shot.
The all-important birdie came on the 14th, where he hit a 150-yard approach from rough to four-feet.  I said to Darren before I hit my second shot,  I m not sure I can actually hit the green here  because I thought it was going to come out and release over the back, but it actually come out lovely and soft and pitched in a perfect spot. Like I said earlier, a bit of luck involved in that.
And Lowry parred his way in, with a number of outside birdie chances stubbornly refusing to drop, but with the first part of the job done in surviving the cut.  I m very happy with how I played when I needed to,  he said, a good night s sleep and a weekend of golf ahead.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Lynn ordered to provide statement of financial means
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 318 words
Byline: EOIN REYNOLDS
Body


EOIN REYNOLDS  Former solicitor Michael Lynn will have to provide a statement of his financial means to the Director of Public Prosecutions before legal aid will be granted for an appeal against his conviction for stealing more than EUR 18 million from six financial institutions.
At the Court of Appeal yesterday, Lynn sought to change his legal representation and to transfer legal aid to his new solicitor John P O Donohoe.
However, a barrister for the Director of Public Prosecutions said they are seeking a statement of means from Lynn.
Mr Justice John Edwards granted the change of solicitor but reserved the court s position on legal aid pending the statement of means being served to the State. He said that if any issue arises the court should be notified.
Lynn, who was found guilty of stealing just over EUR 18 million from six financial institutions during the Celtic Tiger era, is serving a five-and-a-half year prison sentence.
Lynn (55) was found guilty by a jury of 10 of the 21 counts against him following a Dublin Circuit Criminal Court trial last year. The jury was unable to agree on a further 11 counts and those charges have since been dropped.
It was the second trial in the case after the jury in his first trial, which ran for 16 weeks in 2022, was unable to agree on any verdicts.
Lynn, of Millbrook Court, Redcross, Co Wicklow had pleaded not guilty to 21 counts of theft in Dublin between October 23rd, 2006 and April 20th, 2007, when he was working as a solicitor and property developer. He has no previous convictions and has been in custody since he was convicted of the 10 counts just before Christmas.
The court heard Lynn obtained multiple mortgages on the same properties in a situation where banks were unaware that other institutions were also providing finance. These properties included  Glenlion , Lynn s EUR 5.5 million home in Howth, and multiple investment properties.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Mahler Mission can land a very contemporary National; A record 26 Irish-trained horses line up in reduced maximum field of 34
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 9
Length: 911 words
Body


It is the oldest jewel in jump racing s crown but today s Aintree Grand National is a very contemporary illustration of the modern sport.
Continuing efforts to improve horse safety in the world s most famous steeplechase means a cut in the maximum field size to 34 runners although numerical Irish dominance is still reflected in a record-equalling 26 runners from this country.
Willie Mullins and Gordon Elliott have eight each, equivalent to the entire home team. JP McManus has a handful of runners carrying his silks as he bids for a third win. Ryanair boss Michael O Leary has four chances to get a fourth.
It is the sort of scenario that led the British Horseracing Authority to put out feelers during the winter about limiting the numbers any individual might be allowed run in top handicaps like the National. That it quickly got shot out of the water, as were ludicrous  stop the boats  type suggestions by the 2014 Grand National winning trainer Dr Richard Newland after more Irish superiority at Cheltenham last month, will hardly prevent resentment festering at the current reality in some quarters.
That is despite Scotland s very own Braveheart, Corach Rambler, who repelled the Irish hordes a year ago, once again leading the home defence. He will try to become just the eighth dual-National winner.
Trainer Lucinda Russell and Sligo-born jockey Derek Fox were also successful in 2017 with One For Arthur.
Brave battle
Wales s Kitty s Light is also in the mix for Christian Williams whose priorities are far removed from flag-waving due to the brave battle being fought against serious illness by the trainer s seven-year-old daughter Betsy.
Nevertheless, the modern reality of a concentration of resources in a few elite hands in Ireland is stamped all over this National.
If there is a temptation to dismiss some of the Elliott octet as being in the no-hoper camp, there is still an Aintree tradition of longshots coming in, most recently Noble Yeats who will carry top weight this time as he tries to repeat his 2022 success at 50-1.
Such is Willie Mullins s overarching sway, however, only the foolish will bin the chances of any of his runners.
That supremacy was underlined once again with nine winners at Cheltenham, equalling the entire British tally on his own. Should he pick up the National s £500,000 winning pot it will put him in the driving seat for a first trainer s title in Britain when the season ends there later this month.
If it proves to be I Am Maximus that does the business for Mullins, then in his unassuming way Paul Townend will have secured himself a singular piece of history.
Over the years, some of the sport s most high-profile riders have pulled off jump racing s unofficial Triple Crown and won the National on top of the Cheltenham Gold Cup and Champion Hurdle during their careers.
On the back of Galopin Des Champs and State Man landing the two major prizes at Cheltenham, Townend has a shot at pulling off the feat in a single season. His 13th ride in the race might prove very lucky indeed.
Only for overlooking Minella Indo in the Gold Cup, Rachael Blackmore could have beaten Townend to the punch in 2021. Blackmore s success on Minella Times is one of the modern-day National s most vivid results and this time she teams up with Indo who is part of a Henry De Bromhead trio.
Golden Miller famously pulled off the Gold Cup-Grand National double 90 years ago while L Escargot is the only other horse to win both, although he waited three years after the second of his Cheltenham victories to beat Red Rum in 1975.
Strike rate
At 11, Minella Indo is at the veteran stage and the trend has been towards younger horses thriving around the National s modern challenge. The last eight winners have been under the age of 10. That doesn t advertise claims for Elliott s apparent number-one hope, Delta Work, while Roi Mage is one of a pair of 12-year-olds.
Meetingofthewaters and Limerick Lace are two other prime JP McManus hopes while the latter s trainer Gavin Cromwell has another big shout with last year s runner-up Vanillier. Cromwell s cross-channel strike rate, underlined by Limerick Lace s full brother Inothewayurthinkin winning at Grade One level on Friday, means both will be popular.
Martin Brassil is already a National winner through Numbersixvalverde in 2006 and has recently bucked trends by competing against the big boys with his relatively small Curragh string. Drying ground at Aintree will help the chances of his lightly weighted hope, Panda Boy.
However, the fact the National is no longer as unique a test as it once was, could help the chances of a horse who looks to tick most of the boxes necessary to seriously compete around Aintree.
This will be just Mahler Mission s eighth start over fences and the last of them was a fine runner-up spot in Newbury s Coral Cup where the suspicion he might be a Grade One horse in waiting was boosted by how he performed despite losing both front shoes during the race. He is ground versatile, stays well, and has a progressive profile that suggests he may still be ahead of the handicapper.
Mahler Mission is a first National runner for Co. Meath trainer John McConnell, and for jockey Ben Harvey, so isn t from one of the behemoth operations. But if the experience box isn t ticked, he still looks a reasonable bet to be a fifth Irish winner of the National in six renewals.
Brian O Connor s Forecast
1. MAHLER MISSION. 2. Panda Boy  3. Capodanno  4. Kitty s Light

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Man who filmed himself sexually abusing baby boy is jailed for four years; Judge imposes custodial sentence for 'depravity of the highest order'
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 654 words
Byline: DAVID RALEIGH
Body


DAVID RALEIGH  A Limerick man who admitted filming himself carrying out  vile  sex acts on an infant boy and who then shared the video footage with others on a social media platform has been jailed for six years, with the final two years suspended.
At Limerick Circuit Criminal Court, Judge Tom O Donnell lifted reporting restrictions to allow the identification of the accused, Jamie Marshall (35) a native of Limerick City.
Marshall, who had 133 previous convictions, pleaded guilty to knowingly possessing child pornography; knowingly producing child pornography; knowingly distributing child pornography; defilement of a child; and using communication technology to facilitate the sexual exploitation of a child, on or before December 30th, 2020.
Judge O Donnell ordered that the specifics of Marshall s home address, where his parents continue to live, not be reported.
Marshall s barrister, Brian McInerney SC told the court that his client s elderly parents were  concerned  their address would be published.
The mother of the child told the court she wished to waive her right to anonymity. However, the court ordered that the child could not be identified.
Judge O Donnell said Marshall was entitled to  credit  on his sentence for pleading guilty to all of the charges at the earliest opportunity, for fully co-operating with the Garda investigation, and for having being in custody awaiting sentence since May 2nd, 2023. He had not taken up bail.
However, the judge said he had to impose an immediate custodial sentence, and he described Marshall s behaviour as  appalling, vile, egregious, and despicable .
 It was depravity of the highest order with an infant child,  the judge added.
Marshall was facing a maximum life sentence for the defilement charge, a maximum sentence of five years for the possession charge, and up to 14 years on each of the other three charges including producing child pornography, distributing child pornography and using communication technology to facilitate the sexual exploitation of a child.
After sentence was imposed, the boy s mother approached Marshall, telling him:  You are a dirty, ugly, smelly, horrible scumbag.
Marshall made no reply.
He signed a bond agreeing to keep the peace and not reoffend for a period of two years after his release.
Although he pleaded guilty to all of the charges, Marshall had denied in interviews with gardaí that he had a sexual predilection for children. He told gardaí the abuse occurred because he was taking cocaine and when he took this drug he became  a creep .
However, Mr McInerney told the court that Marshall no longer blamed cocaine.  He must accept what he did, no one is to blame but himself and he is deeply ashamed of his behaviour,  he said.
Marshall had filmed himself abusing the boy and uploaded the material to the Kik social media platform under the pseudonym  Honda22Civic .
When the material was uploaded onto Kik, it quickly alerted the US-based National Centre for Missing and Exploited Children, which tipped off the Garda.
Gardaí tracked down Marshall and identified the infant in January 2021.
Marshall had uploaded and shared 15 videos and two images of sex acts involving children, including the boy, as well as images and videos of a number of underage girls that were shared with him by a third party whom Marshall did not identify.
Marshall was identified by gardaí in the videos with the boy because of distinctive and unique tattoos on his forearms. He had also used his email address to set up the Honda22Civic account.
Reading a victim impact statement, the victim s mother told the court:  I never thought that something like this would come to my family, I never thought my son would be violated in such a way, it was such a shock to me, my family and friends.
The woman said the abuse of her son had destroyed her mental health, and she had  self-harmed  and had attempted suicide,  all because of what happened my son .

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



McManus tees up National hopes with hat-trick; Mullins lands two more top-flight prizes to help chances of success in trainers title race
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 11
Length: 710 words
Body


The JP McManus team goes into the Aintree Grand National in red-hot form following a Grade One hat-trick at Aintree yesterday.
McManus watched Mystical Power live up to his illustrious pedigree by landing the big two-mile hurdle prize for Willie Mullins while Inothewayurthinkin followed his Cheltenham success in the Kim Muir with a top-flight success for Gavin Cromwell in the Mildmay Chase.
Nicky Henderson s Jonbon made light of a first step up to 2½ miles in the feature Melling Chase to win at the Aintree festival for a third year in a row in the famous green and gold silks.
If Mystical Power, a son of Galileo and the 2016 Champion Hurdle winner Annie Power, indicated the value of breeding, then McManus will hope the same can apply to Limerick Lace in the National.
Inothewayurthinkin is her younger brother and got quotes of as low as 10-1 for next year s Cheltenham Gold after overcoming jumping errors to ultimately beat another McManus runner, Iroko, in some style.
Limerick Lace is one of five National hopefuls for McManus and her price has tumbled on the back of her owner revealing he has backed her 25-1.
For someone who once famously speculated on how many fish might still be alive if they d learned to keep their mouths shut, it was a rare piece of indiscretion pounced upon by many.
Limerick Lace is already a Cheltenham Festival winner also trained by Cromwell who will hope jockey Mark Walsh has picked correctly from McManus s National pack.
 She s good, I m happy with her, and she s come out of Cheltenham well,  said Cromwell.  There s a lot more stamina involved tomorrow, but it s encouraging her full brother has just won and she jumps well, so fingers crossed.
A sad outcome of the race was that Giovenco sustained fatal injuries in a fall at the final fence.
McManus has five chances in the National and said:  I ve had a little on Limerick Lace at 25-1 each way because I thought that was a big price. But if my life depended on it I think I Am Maximus is the one. Willie [Mullins] said we re going to try to win the Grand National and then the Gold Cup!
Blue-blooded grit
Mark Walsh s decision to commit earlier than ideal paid off on Mystical Power who showed blue-blooded grit to hold off Gordon Elliott s Firefox by half a length.
 I m delighted to win a Grade One with him. Rich [Ricci] has a share in him because he owned the mare, obviously, so it means a lot. For the mare herself to have a Grade One winner is special,  Mullins said.
If the champion trainer s James Du Berlias looked all over a Topham winner only for Arizona Cardinal to rally past in the final strides, his strength in depth was underlined by Dancing City s Sefton Hurdle victory.
Paul Townend s original mount Readin Tommy Wrong was a non-runner so he switched to Dancing City who landed his second Grade One of the season.
 It s taken a long time for him to show me he s the horse we thought he was when we bought him. A few times we thought we should maybe ship him on, but he s come right now and he s going to make an exciting novice chaser.
 My father always used to say to me  patience , which obviously at the time I didn t really understand but some horses just need time to come to themselves,  said Mullins whose top-flight double meant his odds on landing the British trainers title reduced once again.
 It was a great ride from Paul [Townend] because the game looked up crossing the bottom for about five or six strides and Paul even thought the game was up himself when he was off the bridle. But he just sat and sat and nursed him until they got over the last because it took some getting,  he added.
Limerick cancelled
In other news, the impact of the recent wet weather period meant next Saturday s flat fixture at Limerick has been cancelled eight days in advance. A National Hunt fixture is scheduled for the course next Friday and officials are keeping fingers crossed the weather fates are kind to them.
More concrete measures were announced by Horse Racing Ireland with a Curragh meeting arranged for next Saturday (April 20th) to replace a fixture lost last weekend. It will mean a weekend programme at HQ as a card was already in place for next Sunday.
A card will be run at Navan on May 7th to replace a meeting lost to waterlogging on Tuesday.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Methodist notes
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 20
Length: 581 words
Body


At a recent event in Belfast City Hall, Belfast City Centre Chaplaincy (BCCC) and other volunteering groups received certificates from the PSNI recognising the dedication, hard work and  outstanding efforts  which have made a significant positive impact on Belfast city centre.
Between 2007 and 2016, the now Lead Chaplain of BCCC and Methodist Minister, Rev Andrew Irvine, was the Belfast City Centre Manager. In his role Andrew brought together various  volunteer organisations, the city council and police into a nighttime steering group . Meeting monthly, they co-ordinated the efforts of all working on the streets to help vulnerable people and keep the city centre safe at night. Six years after Andrew established BCCC, which operates during office hours, the police and council are expanding the group s remit to also coordinate daytime volunteering.
On receiving the certificate, Andrew said;  Social action, particularly to help those who are most vulnerable, is a key theme which runs through both Testaments of the Bible. Christianity with an external focus that seeks to help its surrounding society, a faith found in action, has also been a distinguishing feature of Methodism s contribution to the Christian Church since Methodism s earliest days. I pray that we in Irish Methodism develop more initiatives like the Chaplaincy, which provide our people with opportunities to reach-out into our local communities. It is a particular blessing to work with others beyond the church   and we are delighted to receive this lovely acknowledgment from the PSNI.
Flooding
This week the President of the Methodist Church in Ireland, Rev David Turtle, issued a call to prayer in light of the flooding  across our island and beyond over the past nine to 10 months, and the serious difficulties that have arisen . He says many people are relatively unaware of the extent of the crisis. Farmers and their families face huge financial, emotional and mental pressures.
Rev Turtle details the problems:  The volume of rain falling has been bringing disruption and loss to farmers since right back in July last year. This has meant huge losses for  livestock and crop producers. A large proportion of vegetables and potatoes were unable to be harvested last autumn, and these producers now have no opportunity to plant this year s crop. A much lower area of winter cereals than usual was  planted in the autumn, and a proportion of what was has since failed. Even in traditionally dry areas it has been too wet to plant spring cereals during recent weeks. Due to the wet autumn, many livestock were housed several months earlier than usual, placing pressure on supplies of winter fodder. The continuing level of rain this spring means stock are already very late to return to grazing, and reserves of fodder have been exhausted.
He requests that each congregation meeting tomorrow include prayers in their services, seeking God for the rain to ease, asking for resilience and grace for farmers and their families; praying for understanding and appropriate responses from Government, companies in supply chains, and consumers.
He says, consider having a special prayer meeting with this crisis as the single focus. (One such event took place in Bandon Methodist Church in Co Cork this week.)
He asks that people would personally pray, and seek opportunities to offer support and understanding to the farmers  within our congregations and communities  who are facing these immense difficulties.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Monaghan confident Ireland can claim first win of campaign; Captain sees positives from two defeats against France and Italy
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 850 words
Body


Sam Monaghan has seen  incremental improvements through the first two matches of the Six Nations Championship and is confident that if that trajectory continues against Wales, Ireland can claim a first victory in this season s tournament.
Monaghan missed the defeat to France as she was recovering from concussion issues but returned to captain the team against Italy in the RDS, a tussle that ended in a narrow 27-21 loss. She explained:  France was a big defensive game; we fired a lot of shots.
 We knew going away to France [that it s] not an easy place to go and play but we fronted up defensively. I thought our attack improved a lot against Italy. Our execution [in terms of the final pass] let us down, especially in their 22. We d opportunities to score that we missed.
 But from both games I ve seen massive improvements. The training we put in [last week and this], we built off the Italy game, we did a lot of maul defence work. It wasn t going to happen overnight. Even off the progress we ve made from the WXV [tournament] to the Six Nations we are getting better and better every week. That s all we can ask for.
It s a fair summation and a benchmark for today s game in Cork. The hoopla surrounding Clíodhna Moloney s return to the Ireland squad should settle on the reintegration of a good player rather than remaining a giddy distraction ahead of today s game. Rumours that she was being courted to swap countries by England head coach John Mitchell are no longer relevant, so Moloney s focus can now be exclusively directed to on-pitch matters, a situation she ll no doubt appreciate. Monaghan said:  Personally I am delighted for Clíodhna. I ve played with her at Wasps.
Positivity
 She is probably part of the reason I m in this set-up. I learned so much from her experience. She s great to play with, not so great to play against. The experience she ll bring into this squad is class. She s got this dog-like behaviour which you need on the pitch. Yeah, it s great to have her in. It s been a great camp in the last couple of days.
That positivity will hopefully translate to improved performance, particularly in passing and handling, facets of the game that cost Ireland a couple of tries against Italy. It s easy to appreciate how much damage Béibhinn Parsons will do given a modicum of space; the ball often arrived with four Italian defenders at the RDS. That needs to change.
Dannah O Brien, Enya Breen and Eve Higgins must make smart decisions, underpinned by slick, accurate handling, something the Italians managed, to an appreciably higher level, when it came to their back play.
Ireland will also need to improve their breakdown work, too many balls were pilfered last time out, something that Irish defence coach Declan Danaher mentioned when discussing general improvement from the RDS match. He said:  Against Italy we created a lot of chances, but we turned over a fair bit of ball in the contact area.
 We know Wales will come after our breakdown, come hard at us there. The girls are aware we ve got to be hot on that from minute one.
Wales also lost their opening two matches, a narrow defeat to Scotland, and then a 46-10 thumping by England after a bright opening 20 minutes to that game. Head coach Ioan Cunningham has made four changes, one of which is the return of the outstanding wing Jaz Joyce.
Statement of intent
Monaghan knows the opposition firsthand from the club game in England. She said:  I think last year, when we played them, they have a quite cohesive side. They are a bigger side. We have identified moves, to be smart in this game, get underneath them in the scrums, same in the mauls and basically outwork them until fatigue sets in; then we can start playing our game and punch some holes.
It s admirable as a statement of intent but the primary challenge in Cork is to successfully translate theory to practice. A win would both reward the work they ve put in and provide a little confidence and momentum to take into the tougher assignments that lie ahead.
IRELAND: L Delany (Sale Sharks); K Corrigan (Old Belvedere/Leinster), E Higgins (Railway Union), E Breen (Blackrock College/Munster), B Parsons (Blackrock College/Connacht); D O Brien (Old Belvedere/Leinster), A Reilly (Blackrock College/Connacht); L Djougang (Old Belvedere/Leinster), N Jones (Gloucester-Hartpury), C Haney (Blackrock College/Leinster); D Wall (Blackrock College /Munster), S Monaghan (Gloucester-Hartpury); A Wafer (Blackrock College/Leinster), E McMahon (Exeter Chiefs), B Hogan (Old Belvedere/Ulster). Replacements: C Moloney (Exeter Chiefs), N O Dowd (Old Belvedere/Leinster), S McGrath (Cooke/Ulster), F Tuite (Old Belvedere/ Ulster), S Ikahihifo (Ealing Trailfinders), M Scuffil-McCabe (Leinster), N Fowley (Galwegians/Connacht), A Dalton (Old Belvedere /Leinster). WALES: J Hesketh; J Joyce, H Jones (capt), K Lake, C Cox; L George, K Bevan; G Pyrs, C Phillips, S Tuipulotu; A Fleming, G Evans; A Butchers, A Callender, B Lewis. Replacements: M Reardon, A Constable, D Rose, N John, G Hopkins, S Jones, K Powell, C Keight. Referee: Referee: Sara Cox (England).

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



More baggage-handling for Kelly
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 8
Length: 237 words
Body


Never get into a game of Monopoly with solicitor Noel Smyth or Richard Barrett of Bartra Capital. The property developers have been locked in a tortuous battle to gain control of Ardoyne House in Ballsbridge, Dublin 4 for several years with a view to redeveloping the prime real estate.
The 1960s-built block was one of the first high rises in Dublin, climbing to 12 storeys. In 2015 the scheme s management committee voted to approach a developer to seek help revamping the ageing building. Bartra expressed interest, with Barrett s company offering to buy all 46 units, but the plans stalled because the apartments  owners, many of them retirees or investors, couldn t agree on a deal.
Undeterred, Bartra has been buying up apartments and garages in the block since then and now owns about eight of the 46 units. To complicate matters, Smyth has also been buying up units. After securing two in recent months, he now has control of about 15 units in the development, along with almost as many garages.
He has also outflanked Bartra on the board of the property s management committee   two members are employees of Smyth s Fitzwilliam Real Estate, while his daughter, Alannah, is now Ardoyne House Management Ltd s secretary.
Another two units converted into one large apartment   numbers 73 and 74   recently came on the market for EUR 1.4m through Knight Frank. Will Smyth or Barrett be able to resist a roll of the dice?

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



No let-up as Blackmore stays in the winner's circle; Tipperary woman's completion of Cheltenham's big three a true feat
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 11
Length: 717 words
Body


So busy is Rachael Blackmore s sporting life, there s not much time to sit back and bask in recent glories. She was on her way to the airport when we caught up with her this week, Aintree her next port of call, and you wondered if she ever gets any time to catch her breath and savour her triumphs.  Sure look , she said,  you re happy to be going over and not watching it from home .
When she does manage to get home between meetings, she sneaks the odd peak at recordings of her races.  Some of them you enjoy more than others , she laughed, the Champion Chase at Cheltenham last month very definitely falling into the  pleasurable watch  category.
Having won the Gold Cup on A Plus Tard and two Champion Hurdles on Honeysuckle, Blackmore secured the third jewel in the festival s crown on 17-2 shot Captain Guinness, a horse that had failed to win in 13 previous Grade One attempts.
 I m not shocked,  she said after the race,  because I thought his day would come   but at the same time I can t believe it came today .
It was trainer Henry De Bromhead s fourth win in the race, but Blackmore s first, one that saw her join a select group of jockeys to have won Cheltenham s  big three  as well as the Aintree Grand National. It was also her 16th Festival winner since her first in 2019, making her the joint 10th most successful jockey in Cheltenham s history   and she ll have a few more visits there yet.
 An incredible day
 She s such an incredible rider , said De Bromhead, doffing his cap to the 34-year-old Tipperary woman.  As good as she is everywhere else, she s even better here. We ve had some incredible days.
Not that Blackmore had a whole lot of time to let it all sink in.  In our sport you probably don t look back too much, things happen so quickly, you re always on the move. I came back from Cheltenham, then we had the Irish National and now I m heading to Aintree. Then we ll have Punchestown. Things come quick and fast. You re all the time looking ahead, there isn t much time to reflect.
 But it was an incredible day, I really never imagined this happening. I probably never imagined having one winner at Cheltenham, never mind this. Henry had won the race a few times before, but I hadn t, so that was a real thrill. I was hopeful beforehand, Captain Guinness had been in really good form back home and Henry has a habit of getting his horses spot on. But still, it was hard to believe, hard to take in.
 It s just an honour to be associated with Henry s stable. He has such wonderful owners and fantastic horses, and he does a brilliant job with them. I m very lucky to be getting legged up on those type of horses.
She ll be legged up on De Bromhead s Minella Indo, the winner of the 2021 Cheltenham Gold Cup, for today s Grand National, three years after she made history by riding Minella Times to victory in the race   an achievement that, naturally enough, earned her our sportswoman of the year award.
Happiest days
 I m just really looking forward to it. It s a fantastic few days racing and Henry has some lovely horses going over, including Minella Indo. The Grand National is obviously the highlight, it s a special race with an incredible history and one that captures the imagination in different parts of the world like no other race does. And yeah, of course, it has very special memories for me.
 It s an honour to get this award, thank you , she said, at which point she was told the March decision was probably the easiest since the awards got under way when she was 15   just the 15 years before she rode her first Cheltenham winner.
Four of her happiest days at the Festival came, of course, on board the now retired Honeysuckle with whom Blackmore won 17 of her 19 races. And Honeysuckle recently became a mam for the first time   although, granted,  mam  isn t generally the term used in the racing world.
 Ha, yes she did. She had her first foal there two or three weeks ago, a filly by Walk In The Park   it s great, her story will live on now.
Will they name it after you?
 I doubt it!
But if they just opt for something along the lines of, say,  Queen of Cheltenham  it will, effectively, have been named after Blackmore.
Previous monthly winners
December Fionnuala McCormack (Athletics)  January Lucy Mulhall (Rugby)  February  Mona McSharry (Swimming)

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



NO TO BREHON ROBES IRISH JUDGES WENT BACK TO BLACK AFTER INDEPENDENCE
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 280 words
Byline: MARY CAROLAN
Body


MARY CAROLAN  A proposal by the first chief justice of the Irish Free State that Irish judges should wear colourful robes inspired by costumes worn by the brehons or judges of old Gaelic Ireland never got past the drawing board.
Hugh Kennedy, a skilled barrister and ardent nationalist, was appointed the first chief justice of the Irish Free State in 1924.
As chairman of the superior courts  rules committee, he campaigned for a new look for the Irish judges. His proposal that they should wear brehon-style robes, instead of wigs and gowns that he regarded as trappings of an alien regime, was supported by WB Yeats.
On Yeats s recommendation, Kennedy obtained sketches for the new robes from an English artist, Charles Shannon, and from the Dun Emer Guild, on Dublin s Hardwicke Street.
Kennedy s suggestions for the robes include an increasing use of colour, according to the seniority of the judge. Kitty McCormack, from the guild, said the inspirations for her designs included the Book of Kells.
The robe proposal received little support from judges or government and the existing wigs and gowns were mostly retained although some district judges adopted a form of head-dress favoured by Kennedy, modelled on that of the doges of Venice.
Kennedy himself did not wear his wig when sitting in the Supreme Court and instead carried it and placed it on the bench.
It took until 1995 for Irish barristers to be freed from the rule requiring them to wear wigs. In 2011, the superior court rules were changed to make wigs optional for judges and the Supreme Court led the way in not wearing wigs on the bench.
Judicial gowns are still black, apart from some colourful stripes on the sleeves,

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



NOTRE DAME RISING FROM THE ASHES; Five years after being engulfed in flames, Paris's iconic cathedral is almost rebuilt
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 12
Length: 2003 words
Body


The fire at Notre Dame was without doubt the most shocking event I ve ever witnessed. Especially as I had been in the great Gothic cathedral earlier that day   five years ago on Monday, on April 15th, 2019   with my brother Liam  and his extended family, most of whom were visiting Paris for the first time.
When the awful news came through that evening we could barely believe it. By the time we got to Quai de l Hôtel de Ville a devastating fire had taken hold. Dense clouds of smoke were billowing from the cathedral, where the central spire had just collapsed, and the entire roof was in flames, glowing brightly in the dusk.
As I recalled in an article in The Irish Times five days later, thousands of people had gathered along the quays of the Seine,  a few kneeling in prayer and some singing hymns, perhaps hoping for a miracle, as police sirens wailed incessantly and the fire service   the Brigade de sapeurs-pompiers de Paris   fought valiantly to quell the blaze with power hoses.
For a time it looked as if they were losing the battle, as we could see flames leaping into the cathedral s north tower, where eight of its 21 bronze bells are located; if the fire took hold there it could have brought them down and possibly even the tower. Only when it became clear that this grave danger had been averted did we feel  confident enough to leave.
As the fire was dying down a cartoon went viral on Instagram. Drawn by the Ecuadoran architect Cristina Correa Freile, it depicted a grief-stricken Quasimodo, the legendary hunchbacked bell-ringer, cradling the cathedral s twin towers.  The world embraces Notre Dame right now,  she wrote. I cried when I first saw it, and I m sure many others did too.
Within 24 hours some of the richest people in France   Bernard Arnault, head  of the LVMH luxury-goods conglomerate; François-Henri Pinault, whose Kering group runs a stable of fashion brands, Balenciaga, Gucci and Saint Laurent among them; and the Bettencourt Meyers family, owners of L Oréal   pledged to donate a total of EUR 500 million towards the restoration of Notre Dame.
In a televised address from the Elysée Palace, President Emmanuel Macron pledged:  We will rebuild the cathedral  of Notre Dame, even more beautifully, and  I want it done within the next five years     in time for this summer s Paris Olympics.  It seemed like a wildly optimistic timetable given the immensely complex restoration task facing France.
Although the cathedral s great organ, priceless treasures and rose windows were miraculously saved from the fire, the 13th-century oak roof trusses of its attic   known as la Forêt, or the Forest   were consumed by it. And when the 96-metre spire tumbled into the nave like a huge blazing shard it brought down a large section of stone vaulting at the transept crossing.
Ironically, a programme of restoration work was under way around the spire  when the fire started   apparently due to  an electrical shortcircuit or someone not extinguishing a cigarette. While the steel scaffolding erected to facilitate this work survived the inferno, it was in a parlous state   as were the coping stones on top of its walls, as well as the north, south and  west gables.
Urgent actions to secure the building began the day after the fire, following a visual inspection by Philippe Villeneuve, chief architect for historic monuments in the Paris region.
These included stabilising the gables with timber props for lateral support, as well as bringing in mountain climbers to stretch tarpaulins over the exposed nave, choir and transepts for protection from the weather.
Given that the surviving stone vaults were saturated with water from firemen s hoses, 40 sensors connected to alarms  were installed to monitor any structural movement down to the nearest millimetre. Statues on the gables were also taken down as a precautionary measure and nets put in place to guard against the risk of falling masonry; it was that serious.
Macron appointed a retired French  army general, Jean-Louis Georgelin, as  his special representative to oversee the restoration project; sadly, he died in  August 2023 after a hiking accident in the Pyrenees. Georgelin was succeeded as director of the new public institution, Rebâtir Notre- Dame de Paris, or Rebuilding Notre-Dame de Paris, by Philippe Jost, a former armaments engineer and senior civil servant.
Intense controversy erupted over  Macron s proposal for an international competition to design a new spire as a  contemporary architectural gesture   in restoring the cathedral. Villeneuve threatened to resign if this was done, the French senate passed a bill requiring that reconstruction be faithful to its  last known visual state , and the president relented.
The spire wasn t even original; it was designed by the French medievalist architect Eugène Viollet-le-Duc as part of his restoration of Notre Dame in the 1850s. But the form of his spire had imprinted itself in the public mind as an integral element of the cathedral. Fortunately, its set of 16 copper statues survived the fire as they had been taken down just a few days earlier.
Oak needed to create a replica of the spire was sourced in the old royal forest of Bercé, south of Le Mans, where the selected trees, all at least 18m tall, had been planted during the reign of Louis XIV to provide masts for French naval vessels. A thousand sturdy oaks needed to replace the roof trusses were donated by forests all over France, in solidarity with Paris.
It would have been so easy to specify  steel trusses, but the desire for authenticity dictated not only the choice of natural oak but also that the wood should be worked  in the same way that medieval carpenters would have done, employing axes and adzes, with dowels to hold pieces together rather than nails or screws. This is even more remarkable given the extremely  tight timetable.
The roof had been covered in cast lead sheeting and the spire in moulded lead, all of which   amounting to 460 tonnes   turned molten in the fire, scattering toxic dust everywhere. Lead levels reached up  to 500,000 microgrammes per square metre in the immediate vicinity of the cathedral   100 times the maximum  permitted level   and also contaminated  the surrounding area.
The environmental campaign group Robin des Bois took legal action against the authorities for failing to protect the health of workers on the site and nearby residents following the fire. This resulted in a month-long shutdown while the cathedral was decontaminated by a crew in hazmat suits that became compulsory for everyone entering the site until it was made safe.
First the cathedral s interior was cleaned with high-powered vacuum cleaners with filters to catch lead particles. Then a latex vapour was sprayed on the walls, including sculpted elements. After this vapour hardened to form a layer that captured any remaining dust, as well as centuries-old grime, the latex coating was peeled off to reveal the bright sand-coloured limestone.
A large quantity of the same Lutetian limestone   1,300 cubic metres   was needed to reconstruct the collapsed vaults, replace the damaged coping stones and carve new decorative elements. All of this was sourced from a single quarry at Bonneuil-en-Valois, 70km northeast of Paris, and brought to the workshops in large blocks for stonemasons to cut and shape.
As in the medieval era, a  sculptors  lodge  was set up outside the cathedral  for the team of craftspeople carving or recarving statues, gargoyles and other ornamental pieces. Major carpentry  and joinery work was done off site, with cranes used to lift the new oak trusses into position. Altogether 150 companies are involved, with a workforce of 500 on site most of the time.
 France is uniquely prepared to take  on such a delicate, complex, globally important project,  says Maeve Jennings, from Kells, in Co Meath, who has been living in Paris for 22 years.  The building site is a town of craftspeople and restorers who are so proud to be working on it. Even the scaffolding is amazing, lit up at night like a crazy cruise ship in the middle of the Seine.
 Making beautiful things is what Paris does better than anywhere in the world, and Parisians know it, so there is great confidence and pride in this project, a real sense of ownership,  says Jennings, who is on the board of Fondation Irlandaise and the Irish Cultural Centre s strategy committee.  And because it s the heart of the city we all see it progress from day to day or week to week.
 France has always had systems in place to ensure the handing down of craft skills from generation to generation through guild-like associations such as Compagnons du Devoir and Meilleurs Ouvriers de France. Even the bureaucracy of the approvals system for major projects  in Paris will ensure a world-class  restoration and protect the process of achieving it.
 I think it surprised most Parisians  how emotionally connected they are to Notre Dame, something we all knew  was wonderful but had totally taken for granted. They speak of seeing the spire  fall in the same way as people recall JFK s assassination or 9/11. Parisians are not given to showing their softer side, but they were weeping openly in the streets, in shared trauma and grief.
When the bells were rung for the first time since the fire, to mark the Epiphany on January 6th this year, and even more so when the replica spire was pieced together and then stripped of scaffolding before the end of March,  it was balm for the city s soul, and we needed that after what  had happened to Notre Dame and the horrifying Charlie Hebdo and Bataclan massacres in 2015 .
A new phoenix-like golden cockerel weathervane that tops the spire   designed by Philippe Villeneuve as a symbol of the cathedral s  resurrection    was blessed by the archbishop of Paris, Laurent Ulrich, before it was levered into position last December. And to guard against a future fire the oak  forest  in its attic has been fitted with a misting system to quench any outbreak.
Notre Dame s  voice , its incomparable great organ, is also being restored. The largest in France, with 8,000 pipes, five keyboards and 109 stops, it was also contaminated by lead dust and needed to be dismantled for deep cleaning before being reassembled, piece by piece, with its old sheepskin bellows replaced by new ones, and finally tuned to a new level of perfection.
Regrettably it proved impossible to organise a visit to the cathedral before the fifth anniversary of the fire   Rebâtir Notre-Dame de Paris cited scheduling constraints   but there is an immersive interior exhibition on the square in front of it, as well as an excellent outdoor display illustrating what has been happening, on large panels around the perimeter.
Work on the site is set to continue  long after the cathedral s scheduled reopening, on December 8th, the feast  of the Immaculate Conception. This includes a separate EUR 50 million project, financed by Paris city council, to  transform the surroundings of Notre Dame in line with a superb climate- friendly competition-winning scheme by the Brussels-based landscape architect Bas Smets.
Although still encased by an exoskeleton of steel scaffolding, the cathedral s thoroughly cleaned and fully restored interior will come as a complete  revelation   pristine limestone walls, stained-glass windows more luminous than ever, painted chapels and funerary monuments gleaming, woodwork in the choir stalls and elsewhere looking as good as new. All done and dusted.
By any measure the speedy restoration of the cathedral is an extraordinary achievement that is bound to be seen as Macron s most enduring legacy. It has also stirred the hearts of people everywhere. Some 340,000 donors from more than 150 countries   including French billionaires   have contributed a total of EUR 846 million towards the cost of this heroic project.
Like all of the cathedrals in France, Notre Dame de Paris may be owned by the French state, but it truly belongs to the world, now more than ever. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



O'Donnell calls for reform of Chief Justice's role; Chief Justice tells conference office holder faces unrealistic expectations
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 690 words
Byline: MARY CAROLAN
Body


MARY CAROLAN Legal Affairs Correspondent  The Chief Justice Donal O Donnell has said the  unrealistic  expectations created for the holder of the office of Chief Justice underline a need for  comprehensive review and reform  of the role.
The increased statutory roles of the Chief Justice, combined with expansion of the Supreme Court s international obligations and other engagements,  creates unrealistic and unsustainable expectations  of the office holder who is still expected to play a full role as presiding member in the Supreme Court, the  most important aspect  of the role, Mr O Donnell said.
Addressing a conference in Dublin Castle yesterday marking the centenary of the  revolutionary  establishment of Ireland s independent courts system, he listed some of many statutory functions of the Chief Justice who also sits on more than 30 committees.
He has suggested the Chief Justice be permitted to nominate any serving judge to perform some of the statutory roles currently assigned to the Chief Justice, which would improve efficiency but requires legislative change.
The role of Chief Justice today, and the support necessary to perform it,  requires comprehensive review and reform , he said. He could identify with a comment by a character in a novel, The Fraud, by Zadie Smith, who declares:  Poor man. Who d be a Chief Justice?
The presidents of the High, Circuit and District Courts told the conference of significant increases in the number and complexity of cases coming before their courts.
High Court president, Mr Justice David Barniville, said, for reasons including the start last year of the Assisted Decision-Making Capacity  Act providing for all High Court wards to be discharged within three years, there is  enormous  work to do to protect the interests of vulnerable people.
Circuit Court president Patricia Ryan said its jurisdiction, roles and responsibilities have grown  immensely , reflecting the complex needs of our society and growing population and the expansion and complexity of new legislation. Dealing with applications under the ADMC Act is anticipated to have a significant effect on the Circuit Court s resources, she said, noting an additional five judges for that work are yet to be appointed.
District Court president Paul Kelly said there were 547,519 new incoming matters before the District Courts in 2022, representing 85 per cent of all cases before the entire courts, when the District Courts then had just 36 per cent of the country s judges.
Family law and childcare cases occupy significant time, he said.  These see people at their lowest ebb, fighting desperately for protection from violence, nowadays often violence from adult children of elderly parents; or to recover arrears of maintenance, or access to their children.
The  most significant  change over the past century has been in the thinking and mindset of the court and its judges with a greater focus on matters such as human rights, civil liberties, protection and welfare of children, and support and recognition for victims, he said.
A  looming threat  to the courts is Artificial Intelligence, he said.  Can we trust what is put in front of us?
Surreptitious recording of court proceedings and the posting online of sensitive material in breach of the in camera rule is causing great difficulty for judges and the parties and children involved in litigation, he said.
The  Century of Courts  conference, organised by Professor Niamh Howlin of University College Dublin with the Courts Service and the Irish Legal History Society, was addressed by other senior judges, Courts Service CEO Angela Denning, academics, barristers and historians.
A multi-media exhibition at the event included a  New Irish courts  movie reel from April 12th 1924, featuring the new Irish judges at Dublin Castle; designs for proposed brehon-style judicial robes which were not adopted; artwork by court sketch artist Mick O Connell and commemorative stamps launched by An Post for the centenaries of the Courts of Justice Act 1924, which established the new courts, and the Ministers and Secretaries Act 1924, establishing the Irish Civil Service.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



OJ Simpson might have got away with murder, but he lost what he craved; After 30 years, it is difficult to think of another event where so many themes and tensions of American life collided
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 12
Length: 778 words
Body


News of the death of OJ Simpson flashed around Manhattan on Thursday lunchtime at lightning speed, but the reaction was muted. There were no conversations to be overhead on the street. The crowd milling through Penn Station took shelter from the sporadic bursts of rain; a classical trio played in Moynihan Hall and, although the news screens in the myriad eateries returned to Simpson s death on their rolling updates, the audio was switched off.
Anyone who was interested could locate the news on their own newsfeed, on their own device. In a city perpetually pressing forward, nobody under 35 would have cared much about the demise of a figure whom, if they knew at all, they knew as a macabre grotesque of the 1990s.
Almost three decades have passed since the afternoon of June 17th, 1994, when the New York Knicks were trying to win the city a first championship since 1973 (a feat that still eludes them) on the shiny basketball floor in Madison Square Garden, which was built over the warren of corridors and train tracks of Penn Station.
American sport was that summer still in mourning after the retirement of Michael Jordan the previous year. The NBA finals, between the Knicks and Rockets, were lacklustre. A helicopter news camera began to send a feed from California of a cavalcade of police cars following a White Ford truck, a Bronco, in a bizarre, mesmerising slow chase. In the truck was OJ Simpson, threatening to shoot himself.
By then, the football star turned actor-personality had moved from grieving husband to chief suspect in the gruesomely violent murder, five days earlier, of Nicole Brown, who was all but decapitated in a frenzied attack. Ron Goldman, a young man making his way in LA working as a waiter, and a visitor to Brown s home, was also brutally savaged. NBC made the decision to cut from the finals and so the strange procession along the freeways of Los Angeles was played out in front of a national and global audience: 96 million people watched that car drive.
And 30 years on, it is difficult to think of another event where so many themes and tensions of American life intersected   or, rather, collided. Simpson s trial for the murders illuminated the clear racial divisions between the black Los Angeleno community, who believed the LAPD to be inherently corrupt and biased, and the white community.
The televised trial; the spectacular missteps on the part of the prosecuting team; the composition of a jury deeply suspicious of the police authorities; and the pure hysteria of the moment weren t fully parsed for 23 years, until Ezra Edelman s Made in America, a breathtaking documentary that laid out the life of The Juice, from the glorious athletic career to the moment he was imprisoned for his part in a farcical robbery attempt in 2009.
Edelman was never interested in swaying viewers one way or the other in their view of Simpson s innocence or guilt. The sweep of the story conveys, as Edelman said in an interview, the dazzling nature of Simpson s emergence as the first black athlete to be fully embraced into white corporate society, and it was important to dwell on  how beautiful a guy he was on the field and just to look at, and there is something about engaging with him in that way that makes his story that more tragic .
Violent assaults
The film doesn t flinch from the shocking litany of domestic violent assaults inflicted by Simpson on Nicole Brown in the years and months before her death. It presents with utter detachment the views of the chief players in  The Trial of the Century , a legal proceeding that looks surreal and amateurish in retrospect and presaged an era when real life and televised life have blurred.
Nicole Brown was just 35 when she was murdered. Ron Goldman was 27. Both endured horrific injuries.
On Thursday night, among the jurors and allies plucked from a different time by the news networks, was Kato Kaelin, then a would-be actor who was thrust into the drama because he happened to be renting a studio from Simpson. Kaelin, now in middle age, explained how that summer shaped his life and recalled his last encounter with Simpson: minutes after he spoke against his former landlord in a deposition, he found himself alone with Simpson in the bathroom during a break.  And I was scared out of my mind, so I walked out. And he just said,  Hey, what s up?
That was OJ Simpson as the coin flipped towards the dark: a once revered figure who now invoked fear, who would become a pariah and who must have understood that the very thing he craved most   the adoration of the people   was irrevocably out of his grasp.
OJ Simpson might have got away with murder, but The Juice could not.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



ONE NATION, DIVISIBLE; In Alex Garland's propulsive new film, Civil War, an authoritarian US president is serving his third term, while escalating conflict engulfs the country
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 10
Length: 1635 words
Body


 It was a difficult film to anticipate how people would react,   Alex Garland says of Civil War.  Normally you have a hunch,  or you have a hope. With this I didn t have a hunch or a hope. I just had  no idea.
It has gone down a storm so far. The  buzz at the premiere at the South by  Southwest festival in Austin, Texas, was close to deafening. Early reviews have  been breathless in their enthusiasm. But there remains a feeling of unease around the dystopian adventure.
Garland, an English novelist who broke into directing with Ex Machina and Annihilation, has, in a presidential-election year, dared to take on the political divisions that, if you believe the grimmest Cassandras, have driven the US closer to dissolution that at any time since the real civil war.
The script leaves many origins of its imagined conflict vague. But we discern that the president, now in a telltale  third term , is some sort of authoritarian. A loyalist army holds much of the east and midwest while  western forces  are  aiming for separatism. Our eyes are with  a posse of gallant journalists played by Kirsten Dunst, Cailee Spaeny, Wagner Moura and Stephen McKinley Henderson.
So let s ask this straight up. The film is imagining what might happen if Donald Trump were to exceed worst expectations on re-election? Right? I m betting Garland will reject that simplistic interpretation. Pull it apart for me.
 Um, yeah, okay, I ll pull it apart,  he  says with a wry smile.  But it s a complex answer. I don t know how much you want  a complex answer.  We re a broadsheet newspaper. We can handle it.
 So it begins with the origin of the  story   why it exists   and it had two parts  to it,  he says.  One of them has to do with the nature of journalism   the nature of reporting without bias. The way many media institutions have clear bias. Some very, very big media institutions have clear bias. What does that do to journalists who are writing straightforward accounts? Are they trusted or not?
 We re making a film about reporters   and making the film like a reporter. It is showing things and removing its own bias.  I grew up around journalists   my dad was a cartoonist. They had strong opinions, but when it came to the work there was a kind  of purity.
As you may have already gathered, Alex Garland can talk. He has a calm, thoughtful manner, but when he gets his teeth stuck in, the mastication continues for some time. He is, indeed, the son of the veteran political cartoonist Nicholas Garland. He went to school in Hampstead, in north London, before taking an art-history degree at the University of Manchester. Sudden fame came when The Beach, his first novel, became a sensation.
Clearly that upbringing among top- flight journalists   Dad drew for the Daily Telegraph, Private Eye and the Spectator   has informed his work on Civil War. Fair enough. But we haven t yet got to the second part of his explanation. He admits that the film is, to an extent, also about the current divisions.
 It s not that we re not talking to each other. We are talking to each other. But we re not hearing each other,  he says.  Something strange has happened to discourse. I wanted to find a way to tell a story that allowed for discourse. I m not going to shut down that discourse. To take that one step further, I don t like the idea of zeroing in on individuals, because I think this is a wider phenomenon.
 In my country we have serious problem with polarised, populist, divisive politics, which carries within it extremism. And extremism has got far closer in my lifetime than I thought was going to be possible as someone who was born in 1970.
I am interested in the levels of ambiguity he allows in Civil War. The road to the conflict represented could have begun in many different places.
 The president depicted in the film is a three-term president who has dismantled one of the legal organisations that could threaten him,  he says. There is indeed a reference to the president disbanding the FBI, an agency that has caused Trump to fulminate.  He is killing their own citizens. And is that ambiguous? Or what? It might seem a bit ambiguous if you stop and think about it. But one thing you could not call ambiguous is that   that fascist behaviour.
No argument there. But that is not quite what I am getting at. The film certainly identifies its president as a malign force. In one brilliantly tense sequence we run up against some of his rural, racist supporters.
Garland has, however, toyed with our expectations of how such a dispute might play out. The successionist western forces comprise an alliance between California and Texas. We know that those two polities   combined population 70 million   are wildly diverse places, but, for the purposes of reductive politicking, they are often characterised as, respectively, liberal and right-wing heartlands. Was Garland deliberately sowing confusion here?
 It was a conscious decision,  Garland says.  It stops people making an easy judgment call on what are the forces at  play here. It s more complicated. I should stop unpacking it, because otherwise I ll dismantle the film. But you re saying:  these two politically polarised states have decided that a fascist president is a greater threat to what they believe in than what their polarised politics tells them.  The film doesn t say that. It infers it. This is a conversation.
None of this would matter if the film  were not so effective as a propulsive action drama. Civil War is likely to excite left, right and nonvoters. As much as anything else,  it is a thrilling journalism yarn in the vein  of Oliver Stone s Salvador and Roger Spottiswoode s Under Fire. There is a lot  of boozing and drug taking. The journos make some questionable calls. But the film does see them as heroes of the old school. Slinging cameras as the combatants sling submachine guns. All that stuff.
 I understand what you re saying, and I understand the implication,  he says.  And I think that s fair. When I was a little boy  my godfather was a foreign correspondent. My brother s godfather was a foreign correspondent. My dad really loved these guys. They would come back   this was the early 1970s   from places like Vietnam and Cambodia. As a tiny little boy I probably idolised them. They were funny and kind of glamorous. They were very, very clever, impressive people. Their colleagues were impressive people too.
Is he romanticising a bit?
 Yeah, probably. But journalists are seen, to my surprise, with contempt by a lot of people now,  he says.  I really object to that. I really feel it s like saying:  I don t like doctors.  What are you going to do without doctors? The BBC is one of the few places that at least tries to hold on to a lack of bias. It s incredible it has been so quickly and so commonly seen as an enemy that might be met with violence. That pisses me off.
After leaving university Garland spent some time drawing comic books, but the shadow of his father s celebrity in an adjacent area surely loomed large. He turned to novels. The success of The Beach rather unnerved him. Following a young drifter who encounters a community of expats in a remote corner of Thailand, that 1996 novel seemed to catch a hitherto untapped flavour of mid-Gen X hedonism. It was reprinted 25 times in its first year. Every sandal-wearer had a copy. Eventually it became a Danny Boyle film starring Leonardo DiCaprio.
 I always hoped to be a foreign correspondent,  Garland says.  I quickly found out in my early 20s I just couldn t write nonfiction. I tried. I mainly read nonfiction. But I got frozen every time I tried to do it. Somehow, when it was fiction, I just felt I was able to get to the next sentence   and then the sentence after that. And that became a novel. But I hadn t spent my teenage years thinking: I want to be a novelist. It wasn t a plan. It was a surprising byproduct of a failed plan. When I became successful I wasn t prepared for what that meant. Among other things, I wasn t ready to be a novelist. I set about writing another novel and thought, I don t want to do this. I have to sit in a room on my own for two years. And that sucks.
He did publish two more successful novels, The Tesseract and The Coma, but  it seems his heart wasn t quite in it.
 I had an advance for further books. I paid the advance back. I said:  I m not doing this any more.  And I started writing 28 Days Later, a zombie film.
That 2002 feature, directed by Boyle, brought new energy to the zombie genre and, along the way, helped propel one Cillian Murphy towards the mainstream. Garland explains how he favoured the  collegiate  nature of film-making. He preferred to be part of a crowd. The philosophical sci-fi Ex Machina came out in 2015. Featuring complex special effects (which won an unexpected Oscar), the film is not the sort of talky chamber piece one might expect from a first-timer. Where had he picked up the technical expertise?
 Partly by osmosis. Look, someone like Wes Anderson is an auteur director,  he says.  He is controlling the film on many levels. In a totality. But most films are not made like that. The films I make are not made like that. You have very brilliant VFX [visual-effects] supervisors, a DOP [director of photography], a sound designer. And so it goes on. I have also seen films that were out of control   and were being kept in control by the experience of the crew. Still these days when I see the  A film by  credit some part of me twitches.
Garland has a cinematic voice. His subsequent films Annihilation, Men and, now, Civil War have a common strangeness. But I can see why he baulks at the credit.
 It s much easier to say  made by  rather than acknowledging a disparate team of people. Just because that doesn t fit on  the poster.  l
Civil War is on general release

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



One night in Ballinakill   how Wicklow are getting in the groove; A unique insight behind the scenes at Wicklow training ahead of their showdown with Kildare
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 5
Length: 1640 words
Body


Monday morning. Phone Oisín McConville. Congratulate him on Wicklow s win over Westmeath, doing so in a sincere but slightly wheedling manner that makes him suspect, correctly, that you re after something. Ask if he might possibly tolerate The Irish Times coming down to watch training in advance of the weekend s game against Kildare.
 Funny, you re the second person to ask me that,  he says.  I m very popular all of a sudden.
 Probably because there s at least some chance you won t say no,  you reply.
 That might be it all right,  he laughs.  Yeah, no bother at all. We won t be doing much but you re welcome to come. It ll be good for them actually.
 It will?
 Yeah. A sign that the whole thing is stepping up a gear.
*  *  *  * The Wicklow Centre of Excellence is not the sort of spot you find by accident. It s in Ballinakill, a few back-road miles this side of Rathdrum, a few more that side of Glenealy. It s six pitches and a clubhouse perched on a hill and if you get a decent evening, there mightn t be a more gorgeous place in Ireland to prepare for a game.
The cars start arriving at six o clock. McConville can make it from Dundalk in about 2½ hours, depending on what mood the mid-afternoon M50 is in. He has performance coach Des Jennings in the car with him, the man who was Armagh s sports psychologist when they won the All-Ireland in 2002. Along the way, they picked up Mark Doran, the Down man who was Colm Collins s coach in Clare until last year and who also manages Slaughtneil in Derry.
If McConville is the brain and heart of the Wicklow set-up, Doran is the conscience. He will lead the session on the pitch later on but in the team meeting before and the huddle after, he s the one who brings everything back to basics. You can almost see his nose twitching when he senses drift or fading engagement.
The session starts with a video meeting. The players are split into groups to talk about the Westmeath game and each group is asked for two things they did well and two things they need to learn from. McConville goes around the room. Good: kick-outs, getting back in numbers in the first half, clinical finishing in the second. Learning: not reacting when Westmeath dropped an extra man back for kick-outs, getting caught in possession too deep.
 Did it get a bit chaotic at times, lads?  McConville asks.  I know we made a lot of changes in a short space of time in the second half   was that disruptive? Did the messages get on okay?
Gary Duffy, selector, runs the video section. Duffy is Wicklow to the bone. He played county at all levels, was co-manager in 2022 when Colin Kelly left mid-season and had a lot of these players at under-20. He goes through a series of clips for 20 minutes   some from the Westmeath game, some from last year s Kildare defeat. Attack, defence, transition, kick-outs.
As he s finishing up, Doran pounces. He s standing off to the side and you can tell he wants a bit more from the group than for them to quietly take instruction. With the exception of Dean Healy and a couple of others, they re a pretty young group. Mostly in their early 20s. They re dutiful and humble and keen to learn. If anything, management wouldn t mind a few more cranky pains-in-the-arse around the place.
 Boys, whenever we go man-to-man on their kick-out, what s the number one thing in your head?  Doran asks. Someone offers an answer from the floor and he runs with it.
 A battle,  Doran says.  That s all, lads. A battle. If they put five in their back line and we re going man-to-man, and only four of ours make it a battle, well then we re f**ked. No easy ball. One person switches off and they re out past us. If they drop one more back than we re expecting, you have to be able to solve that on the field.
McConville stands up to talk. He only keeps them for three minutes, talking key messages for the week. Sunday was fantastic. Brilliant. Everyone should enjoy it. Even heard the kit man Eugene Dooley interviewing on the radio on the way down the road. Love that.
 But now we can move on,  he says.  And the big thing for the rest of this week is mindset. What do you want, lads? What do you want from your football career? What do you want from this week? What way do you want to feel when you come off the pitch next Sunday? I personally want you guys to feel,  I couldn t have done any more.
 Okay? Okay, let s go.
*  *  *  * Wicklow aren t quite the nobodies you think they are. The win over Westmeath made it the fourth time in the past five years that they ve won their opening game in Leinster. The only other teams to match that record are Dublin, Kildare and Meath.
And yet, in some ways, they re exactly who you think they are. Back-to-back victories have been impossible to come by. Wicklow were last in a provincial semi-final in 1995   and they got a bye into the quarters that year. You have to go back to 1989 for the last time they had two wins in the Leinster Championship. They ve only ever been in one final, in 1897.
This is McConville s second campaign in charge. As far as results go, it hasn t been a patch in the first one. In 2023, they got promoted from Division Four with just a single defeat. This time around, they got booted from Division Three with just a single victory. Yet he feels they re in a much better place now than they were then.
 Even in terms of S&C [strength and conditioning], they re so much stronger now than they were this time last year,  he says as the players bounce around the stations of a 20-minute gym session.  By the time we got to the Longford game [in the Tailteann Cup in May], we had 14 people sitting in the dugout who couldn t tog out. Just the load, they couldn t take it. They re much more ready for it this year.
And though results are important, he reckons they got far more out of this spring than they did out of 2023. For one thing, they got away together. McConville brought them up to the Carrickdale Hotel just outside Dundalk. He arranged for them to head out to a nightclub on the Saturday night but they were enjoying each other s company so much in the hotel that they decided to stay where they were.
 The first thing I asked them when we came in last year was what did they think they needed. And they basically said,  We re actually grand for everything. But can we have one weekend away?  We couldn t get it done in the league last year. But we did this time. It s a big help.
*  *  *  * Around the centre of excellence, Owen Doyle is the boss. White-haired and wellied, he chases you away from the back of the goals. It s for your own good.  You ll ruin your shoes,  he says.  With all the rain, the muck there is about a foot deep. Anywhere you see rushes, you know not to walk. I ll get the balls for them, don t worry.
Doran takes them for a 12-minute game. Two juvenile goals, about 40m apart. Up and back, up and back.
Every move starts with three players sprinting out in a line from behind the goals, breaking at speed, looking to score a goal. Next three go from the other side as soon as a shot is taken. Everything is fast until everything can t be fast. On such heavy ground, they re all panting by the end.
One last huddle. McConville praises them for a good, sharp session and stresses mindset as the message for the week. They re just about to break up when Doran throws one last thing into the pot.
 Edge, lads. When we played Kildare in the challenge match before the league, we had no edge. If you have no edge in football, you have nothing. That s the one thing to make sure of. When we play them on Sunday, right from the start, we have to have an edge.
*  *  *  * Jonny Carlin is a Wicklow footballer half by accident. He landed down from Donegal, having played football and hurling with his home club Red Hughs. He played League of Ireland with Athlone Town and Cabinteely. He was doing S&C coaching in Barndarrig and then he ended up playing for them and then he ended up winning a county intermediate with them. In the middle of it all, he missed a year with a cruciate injury. All of it added up to last Sunday being his first championship match.
 It was unbelievable,  he says.  Whenever everybody has you trampled into the ground and you win by one, it s sweet. We had a disappointing league campaign, we didn t play a shadow of what we can play.
 We got beat by six or seven against Westmeath but we knew that wasn t us. We knew we weren t going up there last week to get beat by four or five. In the back of our minds, we knew we were good enough to beat them.
 The league was good for us, even with the defeats. We got away and got to know each other a good bit. It s my first year on the panel and I wouldn t even really have known a lot of the boys. It was unreal. You would have liked to stay in Division Three, even by the skin of our teeth. But we knew we weren t far away.
Carlin is one of the last off the field.  One more Owen,  he shouts, looking for Doyle to give him a final kick at the posts before he goes in.  No more Jonny,  Doyle says, gathering the last of the balls into the bag.  Ah here, I can t go on a miss, give me one more.
He does. It splits the posts. They head for food.
*  *  *  * In the clubhouse, there s a stack of tinfoiled trays piled up. Lasagne and spuds, nothing fancy. They sit around in groups, taking the piss, seeing out the night. In the corner, a few of them rattle into a game of table tennis. They head off in dribs and drabs.
 When we started, a lot of them took their food and went straight to the car,  McConville says.  I was looking at it going,  What chance have we if they don t even want to sit down and eat together?  That s changed. They enjoy each other. They all want to get better together.
Shortly after 9pm, the car park empties. Another night down, another test up ahead. Kildare are next and nobody gives them a prayer.
Nobody ever does.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Our housing market doesn't need a rate cut
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 14
Length: 1024 words
Body


It looks like the European Central Bank is going to cut interest rates at its meeting in early June.
This will be good news for mortgage holders, particularly those on tracker loans. But while borrowers may need an interest-rate cut, the Irish property market doesn t. And rising prices and rents are leaving many younger homebuyers caught in a bind, whichever way they turn.
Unlike in many other countries across Europe, Irish house prices are continuing to rise, and lower borrowing costs will add further fuel to a market that took the sharp rise in interest rates in its stride. Since ECB interest rates started to rise in mid-2022, Irish house prices have risen on average by 12 per cent. And after appearing to ease last year, house price growth has accelerated again going into 2024.
Falling interest rates will, of course, help prospective buyers too. But they are buying into a market with higher and higher prices, helped   in the case of those buying new homes   by increasing State support, with the Help-to-Buy scheme now being added to by the First Home Scheme, in that the State takes an equity stake. Boosting demand when supply is tight has a predictable result   higher prices.
Nonetheless, part of the policy solution of a Simon Harris-led Government would be to continue the supports for homebuyers. The Help-to-Buy scheme is due to run out at the end of next year, but Harris said in his ardfheis speech that  under my leadership, this party will extend Help-to-Buy for a further five years .
The main Opposition party, Sinn Féin, has promised to end Help-to-Buy and the First Home scheme, arguing that they are pushing up prices and benefiting developers. This is probably correct   the impact of these scheme on prices is controversial, but a 9.2 per cent rise in new home prices over the past year compared with a 1.6 per cent rise in second-hand homes tells its own story. And the vast bulk of new homes which qualify are in commuter country, outside urban centres. That said, unplugging the Irish property market from the intravenous drip of these schemes   now central to the finances of purchasers of new homes and the development plans of many builders   promises to be a tricky exercise.
In its remaining months in office, meanwhile, the Harris playbook is fairly obvious. Big up the increase in house- building in the latest figures   commencements have jumped and completions could reach 35,000 this year   and promise more to come if the party is back in government.
Waiver
A key step will almost certainly be the extension of the waiver on development levies and water connection charges on new housing developments, which is due to run out on April 24th. This was introduced a year ago   knocking about EUR 12,500 on average off the cost of building a new home   and it appears to have had a role in the latest surge in new building starts, some of which are trying to beat the deadline.
However, Harris faces a bigger task in outlining a longer-term plan for how 250,000 new homes would be built over the five years starting in 2025   as do the other parties who are making similar commitments. The Government is holding off announcing new formal targets until later in the year, informed by work under way in the ESRI. But at least Harris has conceded that a higher target is appropriate.
To inform this strategy, we still await the publication of the Commission on Housing report that is likely to be submitted formally to Minister for Housing Darragh O Brien in the near future. It is expected to point out that as well as the need to build substantially more houses to account for population growth and immigration, there is also the question of providing for the  backlog  of the tens of thousands of young adults living at home because they cannot afford to rent or buy.
Harris promised in his speech to  move mountains to get the children out of the boxroom and into a home of their own . And there are a lot of them. The CSO estimates that more than 40 per cent of 18- to 34-year-olds are living at home with their parents.
Ever-higher prices and rents will leave many stuck where they are. As pointed out by the latest MyHome.ie survey, prices are being bid up by better-off buyers who have benefited from wage rises; the average income of a first-time buyer is EUR 88,258, up 6.7 per cent over the past year. The implication is that many average- and lower-income earners are being left further behind. And that thousands of those in the middle ground can purchase only by maxing out State supports and borrowing near the maximum four times income.
The younger generation faces risks whichever way it turns. Rents are stratospheric and tenancies are now being clung to due to the protections given to existing tenants and the even higher cost of new rentals. Here, too, supply is the issue. Figures from estate agency Sherry FitzGerald have shown that, for much of the past decade, for every small private investor buying into the market, three have exited. Big funds are less in evidence, too.
But there are also longer- term risks of borrowing to the maximum to buy. Broker John Fahy of Pangaea Mortgages has questioned the longer- term market value of new builds bought with State supports   and cheaper  green  mortgages. What happens when they come on to the market as second-hand properties on which no such State supports are available under existing rules? As ever with the Irish housing market, it will all be fine until prices start to fall.
For now the Government response is clear: keep piling on incentives for house-building and house-buying and hope for the best. Some of the large amount of mud   or cash   being thrown at the wall in terms of incentives is sticking. And many are succeeding in buying a new home.
But the old issues of supply remains. The election campaign will see a gap between the  more of the same, only better  Government line and the promise of  change  from Sinn Féin and the Opposition benches. Billions will continue to be spent, whoever is in power; as Leo Varadkar pointed out as he departed, we are paying a heavy price for underinvestment after the financial crash.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Over 100 people gather at vigil for fatal attack victim
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 404 words
Byline: JACK WHITE
Body


JACK WHITE  The serious assault of a Croatian man which led to his death in Clondalkin, Co Dublin, was  disgusting, barbaric and backwards , a vigil has heard.
More than 100 people attended the vigil on Grange View Road, close to where Josip Strok was found on March 30th after being seriously assaulted.
The 39-year-old carpenter, who lived in Dublin city centre, suffered serious head injuries and was on life support for several days before being pronounced dead on April 3rd.
Shortly before the vigil began, three gardaí arrived to hand out flyers seeking assistance in relation to the assault.
While no arrests have been made, gardaí are now seeking the assistance of two individuals in particular who were in the area and may be able to provide information.
 I m in shock, I ve been crying for a few days now since I heard the news,  said Roberta Terzic, adding:  I have no words to explain how I feel.
Ms Terzic left Croatia nine years ago to live in Ireland and described the assault and death of Mr Strok as  devastating .
 I m in Dublin since 2015 and I ve never felt the way I feel now. That scenario changed the whole perspective about the environment that I live in,  she said, adding that she now fears for her safety.
 I always felt like I belonged here but now I don t feel like I m welcome any more,  she said.
Jelena Basic from Split has lived in Ireland for six years and echoed Ms Terzic, adding that she is  disgusted  by the assault.
 I don t want to live in fear in general but since this happened, I m a little bit shook,  she said.
The women met on Friday for the first time and were just two of dozens of Croatians at the vigil, all visibly in grief and shock.
 Within the Croatian community it was really a big blow to hear that somebody would be attacked in such a savage way,  said Mario, adding:  I don t feel safe any more.
The vigil was organised by members of Clondalkin for All, with member Darragh Adelaide describing the assault as  disgusting, barbaric and backwards .
 Clondalkin has always been a welcoming community, my dad came here from Nigeria 27 years ago and we ve lived happily here.
 You can see a lot of faces here, people come from all sorts of backgrounds, that s what Clondalkin has always been about,  he said.
In the background, other gardaí were carrying out door-to-door enquiries and handing out flyers to people living in the estate, while children cycled and played further afield.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Overworked and underfunded: Irish local government is hollow
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 14
Length: 852 words
Body


Local elections take place in the 31 local authority areas of this State on June 7th, along with European Parliament elections and the first vote for a new mayor of Limerick.
But although localism defines its political culture, research shows Ireland has paradoxically the weakest, most underfunded system of local government with the least power and authority of any country in Europe.
The councillors elected in the 26 county, three city and two county and city areas will represent 5,196 citizens per councillor, compared with 600 in Belgium, 620 in Spain and 412 in Finland. In France one councillor represented 118 citizens in 2002, in Austria 209, Sweden 256, while in Ireland the figure was 2,336. The abolition of 83 town councils here in 2014 severely increased the representation ratio.
So the councillors are overworked. Seventy-six per cent are, in addition, predominantly older and higher-income white, Irish-born males   just when so many of the social needs and demands of a rapidly changing and more diverse Irish society would be better served by local care, welfare, health and education services run and overseen democratically much more by younger women   and funded and spent more visibly there by local taxation.
Councillors have access to only 3 per cent of overall Irish tax revenue raised at local level, compared with an average of 15 per cent elsewhere in Europe. The  tax revenue spent at local level is 8 per cent compared with an EU average of 23 per cent. In Denmark the figure is 64 per cent. Property taxes, similarly, compare on a 2 per cent to 7 per cent ratio; Irish property tax was centralised and now does not return to local level evenly or predictably. Only rates on local commercial properties stay there.
Councillors lack power compared with executive managers in Irish local government, having seen their legislative initiative and autonomy stripped out at national and local levels over many decades. Theresa Reidy of UCC describes this as  a deep hollowing-out of the role of local government , in which health, education and water clearly show the mismatch between official narratives of form and actual function. The last round happened during the 2008-2014 financial crisis which centralised, privatised and outsourced many functions, thereby impoverishing Ireland s local democracy as well.
Accountable mayor
These figures are drawn mostly from expert evidence given to and deliberated on by the Citizens  Assembly on a Dublin mayor and local governance in the city which reported last year. It recommended that a mayor be appointed accountable to the four local authorities there. It voted for substantial relocalisation of powers and functions in education, childcare, primary and community healthcare, public transport and local policing away from central government. Climate action can be added to the list.
This would be in line with good practice elsewhere in Europe, as recommended last October by a scathing report from the local and regional congress of the Council of Europe, its most authoritative voice.
After a monitoring visit it recommended that Irish authorities transfer additional functions to local authorities, continue with reforms of the executive and elect members of regional assemblies directly; introduce a system of formal and regular consultations between central and local government; enhance democratic control over the internal administrative structure of local government; reduce administrative supervision; increase the amount of own resources that can be used at the discretion of local government and increase the share of non-earmarked grants.
All this matters greatly for the quality and scope of government and democracy in Ireland. Local democratic control of expanding governing functions and taxation needed by a growing and more equal society is an essential ingredient of political change here. But it is rarely articulated by political parties, which see local elections as vehicles towards national politics. That only encourages the clientelism and personalism used to discredit local government.
The sector needs to be transformed if such changes are to be made. Transforming institutional structures was discussed at a stimulating gathering of academics and senior public-service people in Maynooth University recently. Institutions can get stuck in an inertia that paralyses necessary changes in policymaking.
A politician in attendance made the good point that we can t expect policy to do something politics is not prepared to do. However, critical studies and discussions such as these demonstrate how comparatively out of line actual practice is, showing this creates structural and political blindness to problems   which suits the status quo.
We heard how European governments dismantled state capacities in recent decades of neoliberal globalisation and austerity. They are now taking a more normative, directional, multilevel and flexible turn to deal with new climatic, demographic and technological challenges.
In Ireland we need to radically relocalise an expanding State to deal with these challenges effectively.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



PADDY COSGRAVE'S HIGH-RISK RETURN; The businessman has returned to his chief executive role at Web Summit, six months after he resigned amid a tweeting controversy. Has he changed, and will his sponsors accept his return?
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 1
Length: 2201 words
Body


The return of Paddy Cosgrave as chief executive of Web Summit is a  high-risk strategy , according to serial entrepreneur Bobby Healy, whose drone business, Manna, is backed by a fund established by Cosgrave and the other Web Summit shareholders.
Earlier this week, six months after Cosgrave stood down as chief executive because tech companies were withdrawing from the November Web Summit in response to his comments about Israel, the controversial Irish businessman announced he was returning to the helm of the business where he has an 81 per cent shareholding.
 I think Web Summit is an amazing thing, and largely down to Paddy,  says Healy.  I think the business needs a leader and Paddy knows how to lead it. Paddy can definitely do the job.  But if the companies and venture capitalists that Cosgrave offended last year don t return to the Web Summit conferences, then the decision to come back as chief executive will be a mistake, Healy says. Hence his description of the move as  high-risk .
Cosgrave s expression of political views that are the polar opposite of those held by his key US customers and corporate sponsors  is a pretty dumb strategy , says Healy, who laughed when he was asked if he was surprised at Cosgrave s return. The future of the high-profile venture  is all in Paddy s hands . Healy says if Cosgrave adopts a  business as usual  approach then  I think he will run into problems . He says he hopes that does not happen.
Cosgrave announced his return on Monday on his X account, where he has more than 97,000 followers. His announcement came a little over a week after he posted a photograph on the same account of IRA bomb-making expert Rose Dugdale, who had just died, with the words:  Rose Dugdale was a legend. The real deal. RIP.  A few days later he posted a photograph of a young woman with previous links to Web Summit accompanied by the words:  Petty crook alert. More to come.  Nothing has been heard since about why this was published.
In the wake of Leo Varadkar s announcement that he would be resigning as taoiseach, Cosgrave tweeted that he would be holding a press conference to  reveal why Leo Varadkar resigned , but never did. He has also repeatedly announced he will be holding a press conference to disclose material about two minority shareholders in Web Summit with whom he is involved in a High Court dispute, but that press conference has also yet to happen. And, more recently, Cosgrave appeared to blame his difficulties on a  co-ordinated campaign  to smear him, referring to reports about supporters of Israel, who are strongly represented in the tech and venture capital community, helping the Israeli government in the social media  information war  about the Gaza conflict, with his resignation last year being cited as a win in that context.
In the High Court dispute with minority shareholders Daire Hickey and David Kelly, Cosgrave s personality, his political stances, his funding of the Ditch website, and alleged attempts by him to inflict  serious political damage  on Varadkar, are among the issues being aired. An interim judgment is pending on an application from the minority shareholders for discovery about Cosgrave s online comments last year about Israel which, they allege, caused significant financial damage to the business they partly own. The application includes the discovery of documents about the funding of the Ditch. A core matter in the case is the value of Web Summit, with values of up to EUR 350 million being cited.
The Ditch, which has received financial support from Web Summit, posted a picture of the Palestinian flag on the day of the October 7th Hamas attack in which more than a thousand people were murdered and more than 200 kidnapped. Cosgrave, on the same day, posted a screenshot of the numbers killed in the Israeli-Palestinian conflict in the 2008-2023 period, a post that has since been deleted, according to Hickey and Kelly.
 I don t think that the people who withdrew [from Web Summit] have forgotten what happened, that the Ditch posted the Palestinian flag on October 7th,  says Bobby Healy.  I think the sponsors will want an explanation about that. They have brands to protect, and they don t want to be associated with a toxic brand, so it is for Paddy to make sure that the brand is not toxic.
US-based Israeli venture capitalist
No one in the international scene cared when Cosgrave was taking  pot shots  at Varadkar, Healy says. But when he started to make comments about the Palestinian issue, one of those who paid attention was a US-based Israeli venture capitalist called Gil Dibner, who is well known in Silicon Valley.  Gil was the nuclear bomb that went off. He was ground zero for all Paddy s trouble, because Gil picked it up and tweeted it and alerted everyone in Silicon Valley to what Paddy was saying.
Others took up the issue then, Healy says, but it was Dibner  who was really angered by it. Bear in mind this was October 7th, so emotions were very high. Gil has family in Israel. The knives were very much sharpened for Paddy when that happened. I think it is people like [Dibner] that will have to forgive [Cosgrave], and Paddy will have to somehow repair those wounds.
Whether Cosgrave has the personality for such a challenge is the key question.
 He is a fascinating figure,  says someone who knows him but spoke on the basis of anonymity.  I think he relishes the notoriety. He is obsessed, consumed and possibly rattled by social media. He is also a very entitled kind of a guy. He puts out this story about his father being a farmer, but he went to Glenstal [a private boarding school in Co Limerick] and was the president of the Phil [the Philosophical Society at Trinity College Dublin]. I have always found him to be a pretty privileged sort of person.  In fact, Cosgrave has described himself as a  crony , referencing his own privilege, and posting on X at the end of 2022:  I am of crony royalty, AND most importantly I m wealthy to the point I don t need to backslap. I can just call it as it is, while having a boat load of fun doing it . . .
High Court affidavit
Among the issues complained of by Hickey in his affidavit to the High Court, is that Cosgrave has maintained  numerous petty vendettas against business or political figures by whom he feels slighted or underappreciated, which he seeks to disguise as principled political stances .
 Mr Cosgrave had a close relationship with [businessman Denis] O Brien and saw him as a mentor and he would regularly recount advice that Mr O Brien would have given him in terms of how to manage negotiations and deal with the press. He flew on a number of occasions on Mr O Brien s private jet to places such as Davos in Switzerland and the United States.
Cosgrave s relationship with O Brien soured after O Brien s Digicel stopped sponsoring Web Summit, says Hickey. Since then Cosgrave has conducted  a campaign of abuse against Mr O Brien through his Twitter account , where Cosgrave s connection to Web Summit is prominently displayed. The  gratuitous and abusive tone of those tweets serves to undermine the reputation of Web Summit,  Hickey says, and he is concerned this might dissuade other businesses from sponsoring the Web Summit  for fear of what might happen if the sponsorship ends .
In his replying affidavit, Cosgrave said the suggestion that he is  motivated by vendettas, for example against people such as Leo Varadkar, I reject this entirely . Rather, he said, he was passionate about contributing to making Ireland a better place. It would be  easy to live comfortably  but he would  end up living a life of regrets . He said the comments in Hickey s affidavit about O Brien appeared designed to attract news headlines and had no bearing on the proceedings.
There is material in the minority shareholders  affidavits about the origins of the Ditch website and links with the controversy over a confidential document leaked by Varadkar to his friend Dr Maitiú Ó Tuathail. (In November 2020 it emerged Varadkar had leaked the then National Association of General Practitioners president a copy of a confidential pay deal with a rival group, the Irish Medical Organisation, before it was published or finally signed off. Varadkar later said what he did was  not best practice , but that it was done in order to secure the agreement of all GPs for the deal, and that he and Dr Ó Tuathail were friends  but not close friends .)
According to Kelly, in August 2020   at a time when Cosgrave tweeted an apology to Ó Tuathail about comments Cosgrave had made about Ó Tuathail, health policy, and Covid   Cosgrave had been in contact with Chay Bowes, a former associate of Ó Tuathail, who in turn had copies of text exchanges between Ó Tuathail and Varadkar. Cosgrave, says Kelly, recorded a two-hour phone conversation he had with Bowes in May 2020, and shared the recording with Kelly.
About half an hour into the conversation with Bowes, according to Kelly, Cosgrave said:  so I end up having a business that, you know, 99.9 per cent of the revenue comes from everywhere else in the world, I can pretty much say whatever the f*** I want, and there s so little consequence . . . People outside Ireland don t care about that stuff. It s just totally irrelevant. And so I have that freedom, that a lot of other people just don t have that freedom.
Bowes subsequently acted as a director of the Ditch (he has since resigned and is now a controversial figure because of his online support for Russia despite the invasion of Ukraine), while two former employees of the Web Summit went on to become reporters for the Ditch. In November last, after Cosgrave s resignation, the Web Summit board said that, effective immediately, it would no longer provide financial support to the Ditch.
A request for an interview with Cosgrave was not acceded to.
In their High Court actions, Kelly and Hickey claim that Cosgrave has run Web Summit so as to oppress their rights as shareholders (they own approximately 12 per cent and 7 per cent respectively) and want the court to order they be bought out at a proper price. This is why the valuation to be put on the business is so important.
 I find it hard to reconcile on the one hand,  Cosgrave says in his affidavit,  that Mr Hickey and Mr Kelly claim that I have operated in an extremely damaging way internally to staff and externally in the media, and at the same time assert that the business may be worth EUR 350 million after two years of the worst global pandemic in a century which has crippled and in many cases closed similar businesses.  He is vigorously contesting the claims of the minority shareholders, and countering with claims against them.
Hickey and Cosgrave were schoolboys in Glenstal together, and then students in Trinity College.  I looked up to Mr Cosgrave [in Trinity] and sought to follow in his footsteps,  says Hickey, who served as president of the Philosophical Society after Cosgrave had. Their relationship has since soured, to put it mildly.  In the course of my time working with him, I came to realise that Mr Cosgrave is a highly egocentric, manipulative, volatile and vindictive individual,  Hickey says in his affidavit. When Cosgrave is challenged, Hickey says, he  typically reacts with extraordinary vitriol .
Similar fate
 Kelly, in his affidavit, says it might appear to the court that at times he acted with deference towards Cosgrave, but this was because he feared that if he fell foul of him he would face a similar fate to those against whom he had  pursued personal grievances with ferocious intensity.
Cosgrave, for his part, says Hickey and Kelly have not been oppressed and their interests had not been disregarded, and has disputed their claims about their role in the history of the business. Hickey, he says, had been involved in  significantly disreputable activity while engaged by the company as an employee and director .
Web Summit, which is holding a conference in Brazil next week, receives a substantial amount of funding from Portugal (up to EUR 8 million) and Qatar (reportedly EUR 20 million) for hosting conferences in those countries. It also secures income by securing sponsorships and selling tickets. It is the latter two income streams that will be watched closely to see if Cosgrave s October comments are having a continuing effect.
In a message to Web Summit staff on Thursday of last week, Cosgrave said:  2024 will be our biggest year ever, and by a huge, huge margin. We ve faced near collapse multiple times. But somehow, we ve succeeded against all odds.
The 2022 accounts for Manders Terrace Ltd, the holding company for Web Summit, show a turnover of EUR 52.5 million, up from EUR 31.8 million in 2021, and a pretax profit of EUR 326,489, down from EUR 4.3 million. The group had an average of 239 staff during the year, and Manders had five directors, one of whom was Cosgrave. Directors  remuneration was EUR 3.6 million. A director s loan during the year of EUR 1.1 million was repaid after year s end.
During 2022, Cosgrave and his wife, Faye Dinsmore, bought a substantial Georgian property and lands at Rossnowlagh, Co Donegal. The folio for the property indicates it is not mortgaged.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



PEARL JAM'S BATTLE OF WILLS; To make their new album, Dark Matter, the band wrestled creatively with just one question: how close should they go to their classic grunge sound? The answer, it turns out, was 'lots'
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 8
Length: 1964 words
Body


Eddie Vedder calls it magic time   that special, gone-in-a-fingersnap moment between an album s recording and its release. He has experienced it on several occasions, both as frontman of Pearl Jam and as a humble music fan. He recalls how, in the early 1990s, he and his friends in Seattle would pass around a battered cassette by an up-and-coming local band named Nirvana. The music was incredible, transcendent. But the real thrill came from listening to the LP before the rest of the world had a chance to hear it.
 It happened with Nevermind,  he says, referring to that world-shaking second album by Nirvana.  There was this tape being passed around Seattle. I remember driving to a secret Fugazi show in the desert [listening to Nevermind]. There is this magic before it became accessible.
Vedder, who is now 59, is in London with some magic of his own to share. He s on stage at Lafayette, a basement club on the border between Islington and Camden that looks like Whelan s in Dublin if it was trying too hard to be cool. The singer, wearing a felt rock star hat and holding a huge container of tequila, is hosting a playback of Pearl Jam s excellent 12th album, Dark Matter, before its release next week. He pours drinks for the uberfans up front while offering thoughts on the new LP and musings on life, the universe and everything. He also reveals an awkward truth about Pearl Jam: they re stalwart chums until they walk into studio. Then it becomes a battle of wills.  We ve had 30 years,  he says of the creative process.  We feel we re getting along better than ever. When it comes time to make a record, we realise we ve been getting along because we haven t had to make any hard artistic decision for two years.
On Dark Matter, Vedder and his bandmates wrestled with one question in particular: how close to classic Pearl Jam do they want to sound? The answer is  lots    it s an LP powered by those trademark supercharged guitars and Vedder s velvety, rumbling blues voice.
This is the version of Vedder fans love  the best: the grunge shaman delivering angst-slathered lyrics such as  steal the lights from our eyes / take my blood from my heart , as one couplet on the new album goes, as if it s still 1991 and plaid shirts, soul patches and knee-length cargo pants remain the epitome of alternative chic.
Dark Matter is a rollicking listen. It has that vaguely cheesy, excessively earnest quality that always distinguished Pearl  Jam from contemporaries such as Nirvana. But Pearl Jam were always more complex than the grunge tag they acquired with their 1991 debut, Ten. Here was a dark and stormy Seattle outfit whose lead singer grew up in sunny San Diego. Alternative hipsters who worshipped the Boomer faves Led Zeppelin and The Who. A major-label group who famously took on Ticketmaster and almost ripped themselves apart in the process, and who today charge top dollar for concerts brought to you by   but of course   Ticketmaster. (They play at Marlay Park, in Dublin, in June.)
These peers to Nirvana were also their binary opposite, flag-bearers for classic rock where Nirvana were a product of the indie underground. Forgot Blur vs Oasis: in 1991, if you cared about loud music and lyrics about the futility of existence, then it was either Nirvana or Pearl Jam. People who liked both were rare exceptions.
One musician who very much appreciated the two was Eddie Vedder. He adored Nirvana and was genuinely hurt when Kurt Cobain rejected Pearl Jam as coat-tail riders. He was stung, too, by the idea that Pearl Jam were sell-outs for signing to a major label and having hits. That cliche of Pearl Jam betraying a higher ideal by daring to be successful always baffled him, as he told me some years later.
 If someone said,  They sold out, they are being mainstream,  it was, like,  Yeah, I know. What the f**k?   he had said.  We felt as a band that we were doing the right thing and that this was what we had worked for   to play shows, to make music. But, you know, we were questioning the stuff that was being done in the industry . . . I hate to even go there. The criticism we had from Kurt   he was getting it too, from other people. From the punk side of things. There was a firestorm out there. It was a funny time.
Cobain didn t mince his words, calling Vedder  Eddie Bedwetter  and labelling Pearl Jam  corporate puppets that are  just trying to jump on the alternative bandwagon .
 Kurt said some stuff about us that was a real bummer,  Mike McCready, Pearl Jam s lead guitarist, said when I spoke to him separately.  Because of that there was a perceived thing between us and Nirvana. We didn t really know him. I thought Nirvana were a good band. Our response  to their criticism was,  Dude, why are you being such a dick? Why would you say that?
The  sell-out  tag rankled. So Pearl Jam went out of their way to demonstrate their bone fides. In 1994 they released their third album, Vitalogy, on vinyl two weeks before making it available on other formats   a brave choice in an era when the medium was regarded as obsolete.
That same year they squared up to Ticketmaster by insisting that tickets  for their US tour be priced at $18   with  a maximum $1.80 service charge.  Ticketmaster wanted to charge more, so Pearl Jam filed an anti-trust lawsuit against the behemoth (which is even more of a monster today than it was in 1994).
They testified to the United States Congress and hoped other bands would stand with them. It didn t work out that way. REM s attorney and co-manager, Bertis Downs, gave evidence against Ticketmaster. But REM went with  Ticketmaster for their Monster tour  (which included a stop-off at Slane Castle), agreeing to let Ticketmaster charge  $6.50 on a $40 ticket in the United States. Meanwhile, Pearl Jam had to set up their own touring infrastructure after in effect being shut out of arenas and amphitheatres that had signed exclusive deals with  Ticketmaster (which was subsequently acquired by the monolithic Live Nation).
 We had to start creating these other venues where we could play,  Vedder told me when promoting Pearl Jam s 2009 LP, Backspacer.  And we were having week-long meetings about chain-link fences and portapotties. Even the reviews of the performances were all about the ticket-surcharge issue, which really was something small. What we were trying to say was,  Hey, this could get worse if someone doesn t fight it now.  And apparently it looks like we predicted the future, if you look at all the mergers happening now, with Live Nation and things like that.
There were other struggles, too. Vedder, a quiet young man with a gorgeous croon, was not cut out for fame and ran shy of the spotlight. Pearl Jam got so big so fast that he and his bandmates struggled with the weight of it all.
 The conflict came with the destruction of our private lives,  said McCready, who turned to alcohol and drugs.  That was something we all struggled with in different ways. It all blew up so quickly. All of a sudden you had 100 new friends. And you couldn t help thinking,  Are these people really my friends? Or was something else going on?  It was disorientating.
That was a long time ago. On stage at Lafayette, Vedder cuts a cheery figure and speaks with passion about the healing power of music. In addition to promoting Dark Matter, he explains that he popped along to the Royal Albert Hall the previous night to play alongside The Who.
They were his heroes growing up in the 1980s, when he would listen to their masterpiece, Quadrophenia, on repeat. For an awkward teenager with a troubled home life   it was only after his parents divorced that he discovered the man he believed to be his dad was not his biological father   it was a godsend. To be on stage next to Roger Daltrey and Pete Townshend is a miracle  he will never take for granted.  I had no friends except for Quadrophenia,  he says.
Pearl Jam tend to go through the wringer in the recording process. For instance, during the making of their 1993 album, Vs   which produced the megahit Daughter   Vedder grew so fed up with his bandmates that he would sleep in a truck outside the studio to carve out head space for himself.
No such drama attended Dark Matter, which was one of their most straightforward studio experiences yet. On Vedder s recommendation, they worked with a new producer, Andrew Watt, who is perhaps best known as the midwife of Rolling Stones  comeback album, Hackney Diamonds. At his Los Angeles headquarters, he encouraged Pearl Jam to move quickly and not sweat the details. They wrote the bulk of the songs over a few days   an approach that gives Dark Matter a breakneck quality, the tunes romping by and rarely outstaying their welcome.
That Pearl Jam should be considered latecomers to grunge was always ironic, given their deep roots in Seattle music.  In 1984 Stone Gossard and Jeff Ament   Vedder and McCready s future Pearl Jam cofounders   started Green River with their fellow Seattle musicians Mark Arm and Steve Turner. Their sound was loud, dingy, electrifying   the template for grunge.  But a rift would open between the more commercially ambitious Gossard and Ament and the independent-minded Arm and Turner. Tensions bubbled over when Ament courted major-label executives ahead of a show in Los Angeles. Arm and Turner were furious, and Green River fell apart.
Ament s former bandmates went on to found Mudhoney, a major influence on Cobain. Ament and Gossard, meanwhile, hooked up with a local vocalist named Andrew Wood, whose roof-raising vocals marked him out as a sort of Gen X Meatloaf. As Mother Love Bone they championed a protogrunge sound that suggested a missing link between Guns N  Roses and what would become Pearl Jam.
Mother Love Bone signed a major-label deal in 1988. Alas, the project was not long for this world   nor was the self-destructive Wood. In a grim foreshadowing of Cobain s substance-abuse issues, Wood suffered a fatal heroin overdose. In March 1990 his close friend Chris Cornell of Soundgarden rushed to his bedside to say goodbye.
 That was the death of the innocence,  Cornell explained in the 2005 documentary Malfunkshun: The Andrew Wood Story.   It wasn t later, when people surmised  that [Cobain s suicide] was the end of the innocence. It was that,  he said of Wood in hospital.  It was walking into that room.
Haunted by Wood s death, Ament and Stone walked away from music. They were persuaded to return by Cornell, who proposed a tribute record to the late singer. In November 1990, at London Bridge Studios in Seattle, they recorded the Temple of the Dog album   a poignant farewell to Wood featuring many of his friends from the Pacific Northwest scene. Guesting on the LP was an out-of-towner named Eddie Vedder, who had approached Ament and Gossard with vocals he had set down to one of their demo tapes. They hit it off, and Pearl Jam was born. With the release of Ten a year later, grunge went mainstream.
Dark Matter is a worthy follow-up to  their blistering early output. At Lafayette, between pouring tequila for fans, Vedder speaks of it with pride.  Making music is one of the best jobs on the planet,  he says.  Most importantly, you have volume. What s volume to a painting? Music has helped [me] in survival, helped in mental health, helped in dealing with aggression.
Speech concluded, he pulls up a seat  and the album comes on. It is loud and wonderful, and in the darkness Vedder can t help but raise his arms and cheer. We ve arrived at his favourite place: that magic time when a new album is still a hush-hush treasure to be passed between friends. He smiles in the shadows, eyes bright with anticipation at this secret soon to be shared with the world. l
Dark Matter is released on Friday. Pearl Jam play Marlay Park, Dublin, on June 22nd

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Pluck of the Irish always a runner down Boston way
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 6
Length: 1026 words
Body


Just like any pivotal moment in Irish athletics history I can remember exactly where I was and what I was doing. Standing among the crowds on the footpath outside Boston College, most of us students and some half-drunk already, waiting for John Treacy to try his winning move.
It was 1991, Patriots  Day   always the third Monday of April   and we d come up on the train from Providence that morning, reliably informed by Treacy himself this was the best spot to watch the Boston Marathon unfold. Right around the 21-mile mark and coming off Boston s notorious Heartbreak Hill, a series of four rolling hills coming out of Newton.
Treacy was in his running prime, and except for his Olympic marathon silver medal from Los Angeles in 1984, this was the race dearest to his heart, the one he tried his absolute hardest to win. It was his first marathon after those Olympics, in 1987, when he ran into trouble on Heartbreak Hill and pulled up with a crippling tight hamstring.
He was back again in 1988, running on short notice and breaking everyone except the African duo of Ibrahim Hussein and Juma Ikangaa, finishing third in 2:09.15, before finishing third again in 1989, after fervently giving his all.
So it was that when Treacy lined up for that fourth time, in 1991, his hopes of victory ended in that moment directly in front of us. After closing in on the lead group, he suddenly sat down on the kerb outside Boston College, clutching his right hamstring with one hand, covering his face with the other.
Treacy knew full well the honour and glory that comes with winning in Boston. Especially for an Irish winner. The world s oldest annual marathon, it s been running since 1897, the olive wreath placed on the winner s head a direct link to the original Olympic marathon, in 1896.
There s timely reminder of all that around this Monday s race, with Neil Cusack, the last Irish winner of the Boston Marathon in 1974, invited back to act as the official race starter for the now 30,000 runners   strictly limited!   to mark the 50th anniversary of his victory.
Irish brigade
Cusack s win in 1974 is one of the many legendary tales of Boston, the then 22-year-old from Limerick a student at East Tennessee State University, part of the famed Irish Brigade that were dominating US collegiate distance running at the time.
In November of 1972, Cusack won the NCAA cross country title in Houston, Texas, helping the East Tennessee team   which also consisted of Irish runners Eddie and PJ Leddy, Ray McBride, Kevin Breen and Frank Greally   finish second.
Cusack was, by all accounts, a machine when training, never letting up. The harder the run, the better, and his thin frame, fleshed out only by his bushy hair and trim beard, was naturally built for the marathon.
During his final year at East Tennessee, he decided he would try Boston, in part to help earn his selection for the European Championships in Rome that June. Despite his young age, it wasn t his debut at the classic distance. At 19 he flew down to Atlanta to race in the Peach Tree Marathon,  for the craic , finishing in 2:16, a then world record for a teenager.
The college paid his way to Boston and that was it. There was no appearance fee in those days, certainly no prize money either. No one had great expectations from Cusack, except for himself, and for good luck, he spent the night before the race sewing a green shamrock to the front of his St Bernard-brand vest.
Heartbreak Hill
After just six miles he found himself in front, and by halfway was already running a minute clear of the rest. Surviving the infamous Heartbreak Hill, Cusack arrived home a comfortable winner in 2:13.39   the second fastest time in the then 78th running of Boston. The picture of him crossing the finish line guarded by Boston Police motorcycles remains suitably iconic.
The 22-year-old was immediately feted as a local hero, as well he should, and given that legendary status when famed American broadcaster Walter Cronkite asked Cusack live on CBS Evening News how he proposed to celebrate his victory, to which he replied:  By drinking lashings of porter.
That in turn gave the New York Daily News tabloid their perfect headline for the following day:  Irishman wins Boston, trains on beer.
Word of this celebratory method promptly spread, and before Cusack left Boston he later recalled members of the strong Irish community there stuffing $10 and $20 bills into his pockets, telling him to have another beer on them.
Cusack went on to achieve plenty more in distance running. A two-time Olympian, he ran the World Cross Country 13 times, and in 1981 became the second winner of the Dublin Marathon.
He also returned to run Boston a few times, finishing 20th as recently as 1986, running 2:21:24, when Rob de Castella won in 2:07.51. For all that, his 1974 victory remains his crowning moment, even if he missed on the big paydays of recent editions. The first man and woman home this Monday each get EUR 150,000, from the total Boston prize pot of $1.2 million.
Third runner
Part of his legend is that he remains  the only champion from Ireland in race history , according to the Boston Marathon s own race programme, although that is not strictly true.
Not taking anything from his achievement, Cusack was the third Irish runner to win Boston. John Lordan, born in Bandon in 1884 before emigrating to Boston and living in Cambridge, won the 1903 race (and there s a monument to him in Bandon).
Honourable mention must also go to Boston s first winner John McDermott, whose parents were Irish, as were the parents of John Caffrey, who won in 1900 and 1901, and Thomas Morrissey, who won in 1908.
Then in 1914, the race was won by Jimmy Duffy, who was born in Sligo in 1890, raised in Scotland, before moving to Canada. Duffy briefly ran as a professional, losing his first race to Édouard Fabre, also from Canada.
He then enlisted in the Canadian army at the outbreak of the first World War.
Duffy was killed in a charge against the Germans in the Second Battle of Ypres on April 23rd, 1915, eight days before his 25th birthday and four days after Fabre won the 1915 Boston Marathon.
And that s the truth of it all.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Portrait of an enslaved man; There is humour and humanity in Percival Everett's recasting of Mark Twain's controversial classic
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 24
Length: 812 words
Body


Mark Twain s Adventures of Huckleberry Finn(1884)   his sequel to The Adventures of Tom Sawyer(1876)   is a controversial classic. First banned in the US for its use of  coarse language  (ie slang, for example using the word  sweat  rather than the more elegant  perspiration ), Huckleberry Finn has more recently come into question for its prodigious use of the n-word. In an essay on this  amazing, troubling book , Toni Morrison described her  muffled rage  at the minstrelisation of the character of Jim. Reading the racial epithet  hundreds of times , however,  embarrassed, bored, annoyed   but did not faze  her.
Percival Everett agrees that Huckleberry Finnshould not be banned or redacted to omit the n-word, which  makes perfect sense in the story , he has said.  Without it, it would be impossible to understand the world in which this story happens.
In James, Everett reimagines the story from the slave s   rather than the 13-year-old white boy s   perspective. When James learns that Miss Watson plans to sell him, thus separating him from his family, he hides out on a nearby island. After Huck fakes his death to escape his abusive father, unintentionally putting James under suspicion, the pair flee along the Mississippi river.
The stakes here are higher than in Twain s picaresque of Huck s boyhood  adventures : James  odyssey involves evading capture (there s a $300 reward for his return) and liberating his wife and nine-year-old daughter from slavery. One poignant scene has him witnessing the rape of a girl who reminds him of his daughter.  If one knows hell as home,   he wonders,  then is returning to hell  a homecoming?
Much of James  survival is thanks to agile code-switching, which Everett plays to great effect. Illiterate in Huck Finn,here James has taught himself to read by surreptitiously borrowing books from Judge Thatcher s library. Even the slaves who can t read or write are  bilingual , using dialect only when whites are in earshot. James offers  language lessons  in  the correct incorrect grammar  to black children to secure their  safe  movement through the world .
 White folks expect us to sound a certain way and it can only help if we don t disappoint them,  he tells them.  The better they feel, the safer we are,  the kids chant back in unison. Or, as one of them translates the phrase into  slave talk ,  Da mo  betta dey feels, da mo  safer we be.
A sly satirist (like Twain), Everett is the author of more than 30 books, including Telephone (2020), a finalist for the Pulitzer Prize; the Booker-shortlisted The Trees(2021); and Erasure (2001), which was recently adapted by Cord Jefferson for the Oscar-winning screenplay of American Fiction(2023). Everett shifts the story of James forward from the 1830s/1840s to the 1860s, on the cusp of the civil war.
He recreates some of Huckleberry Finn s best-known scenes, including James getting bitten by a rattlesnake, Huck disguising himself as a girl, and their interactions with the  rapscallions  the Duke and the King. Other storylines are new, including James being bought by the Virginia Minstrels, a blackface singing troupe in need of a tenor. James finds himself in the absurd situation, as such, of putting bootblack on his face and feet to try to pass as white underneath   a  meta-minstrelisation, of sorts.
By inverting Twain s childlike depiction of Jim, Everett returns James to his rightful role of father figure to Huck. In taking back his name and narrative, he reclaims his dignity. He is called Jim by whites and even his wife; when he begins to introduce himself as James,  my name became my own . Every time he sneaks into the library, he wonders  what white people would do to a slave who had learned how to read. What would they do to a slave who had taught the other slaves to read? What would they do to a slave who knew what a hypotenuse was, what irony meant, how retribution was spelled?  When he later holds up the slave owner who has bought his wife and daughter,  it was not the pistol, but my language, the fact that I didn t conform to his expectations, that I could read, that had so disturbed and frightened him .
 In language, and in ownership of language, there resides great power, and resides an avenue to any kind of freedom that we re going to have,  Everett has said. It can come at a high price, however: a slave is lynched for stealing the Faber pencil stub with which we watch James write himself  into being .  My interest is in how these marks that I am scratching on this page can mean anything at all,  James writes, in what is to become the book we re reading.  If they can have meaning, then life can have meaning, then I can have meaning.
By recasting Twain s flawed classic as a portrait of an enslaved man   in all the fullness of his courage, humanity and humour   Everett leaves a meaningful mark on American letters.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Recognising a Palestinian state
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 938 words
Body


Sir,   The Israeli ambassador to Ireland bemoans anti-Israel sentiment in Ireland ( Ireland s planned unilateral recognition of a Palestinian state sends a dangerous signal , Opinion & Analysis, April 11th). But how can we feel sympathy with Israel, given the ongoing merciless onslaught unleashed on Gaza by Israel s army and air force?
The thousands of dead Palestinian children, the indiscriminate levelling of buildings and homes, the closing of aid and food routes, and the spread of famine are shocking.
We feel, with the Jews, that the Holocaust was a heinous moral outrage that will haunt humanity forever. The Hamas killing of Israelis and the abduction of hostages were atrocities.
But now, as we follow the Gaza story, the dilemma for us is that Israel may have, unfortunately, neglected to follow a human moral compass in its prosecution of this terrible war.
The ambassador has to understand our perplexity.   Yours, etc,
SEAN McENTEE,
Dublin 6W.
Sir,   I am grateful to The Irish Times for the article by the Israeli ambassador to Ireland Dana Erlich. Listening to alternative perspectives (regardless of whether we agree) is a necessary part of democracy and a healthy discourse. It is also a further reason (for those who need one) to maintain diplomatic relations with Israel. Please continue to offer diversity in my daily reading about the Israel-Hamas war.   Yours, etc,
ROBERT WHELAN,
Greystones,
Co Wicklow.
Sir,   I have no time for the theocratic regime in Iran and the last thing the Middle East needs is more violence but are there no international laws or conventions Israel will not breach in pursuit of its foes?
Embassies throughout the world have largely enjoyed the status of the Vienna convention on diplomatic relations which affords them protection   but not from Israeli missiles. Under international humanitarian law, patients are protected while being treated in hospitals   but not from Israeli assassins, as in the Ibn Sina hospital in the city of Jenin in the occupied West Bank. Aid workers, and not just those killed working for World Central Kitchen, must be  respected and protected , according to the International Committee of the Red Cross but, guess what, not when it comes to Israel.
If international law is to mean anything, Israeli exceptionalism must end.   Yours, etc,
PAUL ARTHERTON,
Belfast.
Sir,   David McWilliams writes in favour of a new  Marshall Plan  for Gaza and makes a convincing case that the economics work out ( A successful, prosperous Gaza is possible. Here is a model , Opinion, April 6th). According to McWilliams, the global community can achieve peace in the region if we all simply  put our money where our mouth is . But the main problem with McWilliams s idea isn t the money, but the politics. The Marshall Plan, enacted in 1948, was made possible by the unconditional surrender of the main Axis powers, Germany and Japan, three years previously. In the intervening years, there was little resistance   armed or otherwise   to the Allied occupation of the former Axis countries of Europe, as the war-weary population tried to rebuild their shattered lives.
In Gaza today, the situation is very different. McWilliams conjectures that an unnamed  new Palestinian leadership  would agree to unspecified  conditions  in order to access his proposed Palestinian Marshall Plan aid.
To take his analogy seriously, though, what would actually be required to replay the postwar Europe recovery is the unconditional surrender of Hamas, including release of the Israeli hostages, followed by several years of unopposed occupation of Gaza by a dominant military power   presumably Israel. (What other country would volunteer its own soldiers for such a thankless mission?) This all seems unlikely, to put it mildly.
Another complicating factor that isn t even mentioned by McWilliams is the presence of Iran, a large and powerful country that is currently engaged in a proxy war against Israel, which it prosecutes mainly by arming and empowering militant radicals all over the region.
Unfortunately, for all concerned, money won t solve what is first and foremost a political problem.   Yours, etc,
COLM P KELLEHER,
Cambridge,
Massachusetts.
Sir,   Israeli ambassador Dana Erlich writes that many Israelis and Jews living in Ireland  have expressed . . . fear and insecurity since last October  and  the entire nation of Israel and Jewish people  have been vilified by extremists.
Ms Erlich ignores Jews, both here and internationally, who reject the Israeli government s war against the Palestinian people, and who see a genocide unfolding in real time before our eyes. We stand proudly as Jews, from Skibbereen to Derry, rejecting the false claim that Jewish security is more important than the lives of nearly 34,000 Palestinians brutally murdered, including 14,000 children. That it justifies withholding water, electricity, food and aid to ordinary people in Gaza, while we watch children and babies starve.
It is precisely because the nation state of Israel depends on a cruel system of inequality, inhumanity, ongoing violence and land dispossession that we reject Zionism. And let us be clear, fighting against Israel s genocide of the Palestinian people is in no way, shape or form anti-Semitic. On the contrary, our Judaism has nothing to do with the Zionism espoused by the nation state of Israel which stands for Jewish supremacy and which has developed a cruel system of domination characterised by Amnesty International as the  crime of apartheid  and a  crime against humanity .   Yours, etc,
ANNIE de BHAL,
Skibbereen,
Co Cork;
JACOB WOLF,
Dublin;
SUE PENTEL,
Belfast.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Roasted monkfish with fricassee of peas and bacon
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 36
Length: 464 words
Body


As the evenings get longer and the temperature gauge slowly rises, it really feels like summer is around the corner. Better weather calls for lighter cooking, and expect more of it in these pages in the coming weeks.
As promised, I m trying to include more simple fish recipes here. Both recipes this week are designed to be cooked in less than 30 minutes. While they have a little bit of restaurant look and feel, you ll be surprised how easy they are to put together, without compromising on flavour.
First up is salmon, an ingredient that was the top of the seafood mountain in  its heyday. These days wild salmon is virtually impossible to source, apart from a few small suppliers at specific times of the year.
A ban on drift-net fishing in Irish waters came into effect in 2006 in a bid to protect stocks, but the impact wasn t as widely felt as was hoped. Along with bycatching, water temperature changes, pollution and abundance of predatory species, the stocks are fragile and will require vision and leadership to protect them.
In Ireland, the bastion of salmon knowledge lies with Sally Barnes of Woodcock smokery in west Cork. She has been documenting the traditions of salmon sourcing and preparation for years, passing the knowledge on to the next generation of younger chefs such as me. These traditions are extremely valuable and I would recommend anyone with an interest in Irish seafood to look her up.
For this recipe, I have sourced the best salmon I could find and served it with a light dressing called sauce vierge, which is the perfect companion for any good quality fish.
At its heart, it involves diced ripe tomatoes, capers, good-quality olive oil and herbs. A good dash of lemon is essential. I usually make it in bulk and add it to my midweek meals. Cooking the salmon slowly on the skin side will avoid it curling and result in a crackling like texture. I love eating crispy salmon skin, even if it is not for everyone. This is a beautiful light dinner, with a glass of chilled white wine.
Next up is monkfish, a more sustainable species that has a meaty texture and great flavour. Without wishing to cause offence, it is an ugly fish, so much so that it was traditionally barrel-aged and used as bait for lobster pots, simply because it didn t look good. Now you will struggle to find it for less than EUR 20 a kilo, the rags to riches story of the sea.
I serve it with a simple fricassee (or fresh stew) of frozen peas and bacon lardons. Feel free to add some boiled potatoes to the mix as well.
By brushing the monkfish lightly with honey before browning it in a hot pan,  you will get that lovely charred exterior in 10 seconds. After a nice bath in some foaming butter, with a load of sea salt and lemon juice at the end, you will be cooking like a pro. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



RSA welcomes directive on roads policing but Garda sources call it 'empty PR stunt'; Instruction to gardaí to devote 30 minutes per shift to road policing met with scepticism
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 609 words
Byline: CONOR POPE
Body


CONOR POPE  The Road Safety Authority (RSA) has welcomed a directive from the Garda Commissioner for all uniformed gardaí to do a mandatory 30 minutes of road safety policing per shift. However, Garda sources described it as  bizarre  and warned it would serve only to improve road policing statistics.
Garda Commissioner Drew Harris said on Thursday that, with immediate effect, gardaí would be required to devote 30 minutes to road safety policing per shift. He issued the directive in the wake of a sharp jump in the number of road deaths when compared with the first three months of last year.
At the time of writing, 63 people had been killed on Irish roads since the start of the year, an increase of 15 on the same period last year.
The chairwoman of the RSA, Liz O Donnell, noted that  enforcement is key to tackling this problem  and welcomed the response to her call for more gardaí deployed immediately to road safety.
 This will result in increased Garda visibility on our roads and acts as a deterrent to dangerous drivers,  she said.  This deployment can save lives.
However, the directive was described as a  bizarre  step which could create more bureaucracy without making a substantial difference to the roads policing done by the force by one garda source who spoke to The Irish Times.
The source said the directive  reeks of desperation  and had members of the force  scratching their heads and asking if this is just an empty PR stunt .
They described it as  ill-thought out and instead of just sending a directive saying  keep an emphasis on traffic when you re out and about  it is insisting that it s 30 minutes on every shift when you don t really have much control over your time and you should be doing that anyway all the time when you re out and about .
One impact of the directive might see statistics improve but at the expense of actual policing, the source suggested.
 Guards might be asked to create a record on Pulse for something they should be doing and are doing anyway so it could involve more admin and more time calling a call centre in Mayo that is understaffed so they re just generating statistics and creating bureaucracy to record something that didn t result in any outcome.
In a statement, the Association of Garda Sergeants and Inspectors (AGSI) said the deployment of resources was a matter for the Garda Commissioner.
 However, AGSI will say that frontline resources is a major challenge coupled with the demands of desk-based work on our members [and] is well-documented by us.
 The commissioner is trying to counteract the increase in road deaths with the deployment of scarce resources as best he can. The underlying problem is the commissioner does not have sufficient resources available which is a direct result of a recruitment and retention crisis which the Government have has not addressed despite repeated warnings.
The statement noted that  resources are then being deployed reactively as opposed to proactively .
Susan Gray of road safety group Parc welcomed the announcement from the commissioner but warned that it would be insufficient to address the problem.
 The most recent Government figures show 627 gardaí in roads policing but we know that there have been further reductions since and more are due to leave roads policing in the coming months. This is a critical situation which must be addressed properly by the Government and Garda HQ without further delay.
Taoiseach Simon Harris met Commissioner Harris and Minister for Justice Helen McEntee yesterday. A Government statement said issues discussed included Garda recruitment and retention, the roll-out of body cameras, and also road safety

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



RTÉ SEEKS AS MUCH FRESH DRAMA AS IT CAN AFFORD; 'No ghosts, vampires or mummies', RTÉ has told pitching producers. But as it plots its way out of its financial crisis, what type of stories does it hope to bring to screen?
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 2
Length: 1774 words
Body


Could an RTÉ drama   the kind commissioned by its executives, not starring them   make headlines?
The life-altering success of ITV s acclaimed Mr Bates vs the Post Office, written by Gwyneth Hughes, has brought renewed focus on the power of  state-of-the-nation  television drama to not only reshape political priorities, but attract a colossal audience in the process.
So how might Irish state-of-the-nation drama fit into RTÉ s striking ambition to double its post-watershed drama output to 60 hours a year? I asked RTÉ s acting head of drama, David Crean, and its director of co-productions and acquisitions, Dermot Horan, starting with when they thought RTÉ had last aired one.
 I would say Taken Down, which Jo [Spain] and Stuart [Carolan] wrote, just because it is something that really deals with an issue that is right at the heart of our culture,  Crean says.
The 2018 fiction series, which followed a Garda investigation into the death of a young migrant found abandoned near a direct provision centre, would have been my answer too. But that was almost six years ago. Isn t there a case for more?
 There definitely is,  agrees Crean. RTÉ has two limited series in development for 2026, both based on  literary IP , and one   a story about growing up in Ireland in the 1980s and 1990s    would be state-of-the-nation , he says.
 I think the challenge in Ireland is to make sure you have writers and producers who want to write them, rather than me saying,  I want to do a drama on this.
For example, he doesn t want to specifically say  we want to commission a drama on neurodiversity , but he was recently discussing ADHD with a writer,  and that is a great way of getting something that is definitely state-of-the-nationy.
Dramas don t have to be self-consciously state-of-the-nation to have something to say. Crean hails the BBC s The Responder, though  ostensibly just a series about a cop , as  the best show  on mental health, while Horan describes Connell s visit to a therapist in Normal People, made for the BBC and Hulu by Element Pictures, as a  transformative  scene for younger Irish men.
Specific issues
 True, dramas that overtly beat a drum on specific issues can be clunky in their execution. Arguably, the whole concept of state-of-the-nation television is anachronistic, harking back as it does to an era when audiences were much less fragmented and nobody had ever heard of Netflix.
Although it was dubbed state-of-the-nation TV by the Guardian, Mr Bates vs the Post Office s ratings-reputation double sprang from the real-life Kafkaesque injustice that was its source material. State-of-the-nation dramas in their purest form   sprawling fictional pieces with political intent   may struggle to win the same cut-through.
The term has become  a little dusty and old-fashioned , BBC director of drama Lindsay Salt declared in February, saying she wants to redefine it to mean stories that are not  earnest or overloaded with messages  but revealing,  messy  and urgent.
But, in an industry where international co-productions are the norm, can a small, precarious market such as Ireland even afford to make television that provokes national reflection?
RTÉ director general Kevin Bakhurst s New Direction strategy outlines how RTÉ typically stumps up 20 per cent of the money for a drama it develops and commissions. If it has been developed elsewhere, it chips in much less, though for some series, such as upcoming four-parter The Boy That Never Was   adapted by Jo Spain from a Karen Perry novel about a missing child   it might put in more.
The Section 481 tax credit then accounts for a net 25 per cent, with Screen Ireland contributing 10 per cent and 45 per cent coming from international distributors and broadcasters, meaning that when RTÉ spends EUR 12 million-EUR 13 million on drama   excluding Fair City   in a year, as it did in 2023, what viewers see on screen will have had a total budget of EUR 60 million.
Financing structure
 This financing structure   only Netflix, Disney+ and Apple TV+ fully fund their originals now, says Horan   has allowed RTÉ to step up its quantity of post-watershed drama to about 30-plus hours a year. In volume terms, the hard-won international deals bring bang for licence fee-payers  buck, although, in true RTÉ fashion, a swollen tally of 43½ hours in 2023 was actually the product of constrained finances   to limit its 2022 deficit to EUR 2.8 million, it opted to delay transmission of thriller Clean Sweep and Element Pictures comedy drama The Dry.
Nancy Harris s The Dry, co-commissioned with ITV, is a line-perfect jewel that returns for a second series next month, with a third series in development. Another pearl of 2023, Ray Lawlor s dark comedy crime drama Obituary, delivered an offbeat tone that is rare for RTÉ and, after streaming in the US on Hulu, will return next year. Both series are, and feel, authentically Irish.
But what is missing from the picture?
 Certainly, there are ideas that come in to us where you think this would make a big drama for an Irish audience, but if you don t have significant resources from your domestic public service broadcaster as the anchor backer of the project, it is hard to see it being financed internationally,  says producer Ed Guiney, co-founder of Element Pictures.
Guiney, though grateful to RTÉ for backing The Dry, believes its corporate governance crisis should not be wasted.
 One of the things that I hope they re really taking on board with all the reviews is how they engage with the creative community, because historically that has been wanting.
RTÉ is  probably quite risk averse , says Jennifer Davidson, a screenwriter who chairs the Writers Guild of Ireland.  At the moment, it feels like everything they are doing is a crime drama, which is not to knock the crime dramas.
Writers feel there is no point attempting certain genres, such as period pieces, because production companies will tell them  RTÉ won t want that , she says.
Indeed, in something of a timesaver for all concerned, RTÉ s current commissioning brief specifies what not to pitch. It s a list that includes supernatural stories ( no ghosts, vampires or mummies ), science fiction, biopics, story-of-the-week hospital or Garda station-based shows and, yes, period drama.
 It kind of sounds a little bit glib, but it s not meant to be,  says Crean.
 If you re commissioning something, the last thing you want to do is be prescriptive, but we still have to be cognisant of what is actually financeable, what we think the audience will watch and also what the brief is from our bosses.
His slate for the next few years will be  very carefully targeted so we re not making four crime dramas featuring a female detective in a woolly jumper , he adds.
 My sense is that people don t want to go to bed terrified and hiding under the sheets.
In the meantime, the multiple-jurisdiction crime series has become a familiar sight, with critics collectively seeming to lose patience with the formula by the time New Zealand-based The Gone, co-produced by Keeper Pictures, arrived last autumn. The Irish Independent said it came across as  driven by production incentives rather than creativity , while The Irish Times concluded that  to pass it off as Irish drama is to risk taking licence-fee payers for fools .
 I think that s really unfair, because we developed it. We put more money into it than TV New Zealand,  says Horan. The plot, which centres on a missing Irish person, is  an absolutely valid Irish story that people could identify with  in an age of youthful emigration.
 Also, did anybody in the UK say  oh, The Tourist, the BBC shouldn t be making a drama in Australia?
The Gone will return later this year. Another cross-border  returnable , the pacy Hidden Assets, will be back in 2025 for a third run that shifts the overseas portion of the action from Antwerp to Bilbao. However, North Sea Connection, which ended on a raft of cliffhangers in 2022, was  one and done , as Scandinavian streamer Viaplay ditched its policy of financing English-language co-productions.
And then there is the unfinished business of Kin, RTÉ s biggest drama ratings magnet since Love/Hate. Canada s Bron Studios   the big money behind Peter McKenna s Dublin gangster family saga   filed for Chapter 11 bankruptcy last summer, meaning the assets of Kin are for sale and RTÉ must wait to see if a third series can be greenlit.
 It s like trying to buy someone s property in an executor s sale,  says Horan.
Scripted content
 Bumpiness like this is the consequence of a global industry plot twist everyone saw coming: the bursting of a streamer-propelled bubble in scripted content known as  peak TV . We are now  post-peak-TV , which will inevitably make RTÉ s 60 hours target harder to pull off. And then there are its own uncertain finances.
 Obviously, yes, the 60 hours is dependent on ongoing future funding,  says Horan. Licence fee reform is only one component of this. A content levy on the international streamers and broadcasters that operate here would generate estimated annual funds of EUR 25 million for the sector but remains conspicuous by its absence.
Good scripts can find a home beyond RTÉ: Baz Ashmawy s charming, contemporary family sitcom Faithless, at one point in development with RTÉ s comedy department, found a backer in Virgin Media Television. Stephen Jones s Northern Lights, a touching, slow-burn grief drama that RTÉ decided not to pursue, was picked up by TG4.
But, unless the Government completely pulls the plug on it, the most likely stage for  national statement pieces  that trigger conversation and change is still RTÉ.
Mr Bates vs the Post Office, shown in the middle of a public inquiry, has sent UK commissioners racing to procure dramas that might repeat the trick with other outrages deserving of attention.
Inspired also by BBC plans to adapt Dear England   James Graham s play about masculinity, colonialism and Gareth Southgate   I jokingly propose to Crean and Horan that RTÉ should commission a Football Association of Ireland drama. They point out that, as RTÉ remembers from Whistleblower (2008), the  legal minefield  of a live news story can be immense.
 Fair play to ITV for finding a way,  says Horan.
With its own future left dangling by the Government, big swings like these may be beyond RTÉ for now. But Guiney will not be the only one who thinks it is part of the national broadcaster s remit to  advocate for bold stories that resonate with contemporary Ireland . Viewers, too, may hold out hope that, at some point soon   to paraphrase RTÉ s promo for  local drama    it will be able to scratch a different type of itch.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Russian city faces mass evacuation due to floods
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 11
Length: 551 words
Body


Authorities in the Russian city of Orenburg called on thousands of residents to evacuate immediately yesterday due to rapidly rising flood waters after major rivers burst their banks due to a historic deluge of melting snow.
Water was also rising sharply in another Russian region   Kurgan   and, in neighbouring Kazakhstan, the authorities said 100,000 people had been evacuated so far, as rapidly warming temperatures melted heavy snow and ice.
The deluge of melt water has forced more than 120,000 people from their homes in Russia s Ural Mountains, Siberia and Kazakhstan as major rivers such as the Ural, which flows through Kazakhstan into the Caspian, overwhelmed embankments.
Regional authorities called for the mass evacuation of parts of Orenburg, a city of over half a million people about 1,200km east of Moscow.
 There s a siren going off in the city. This is not a drill. There s a mass evacuation in progress!,  Sergei Salmin, the city s mayor, said on the Telegram messenger app.
Emergency workers said water levels in the Ural river were more than 2m above what they regarded as a dangerous level. Water lapped at the windows of brick and timber houses in the city, and pet dogs perched on rooftops.
Loss of belongings
Mr Salmin called on residents to gather their documents, medicine and essential items and to abandon their homes.
People living in flooded homes lamented the loss of their belongings.
 Judging by the water levels, all the furniture, some household appliances and interior decorating materials are ruined,  local resident Vyacheslav said as he sat in an idling motorboat and gazed over his shoulder at his two-storey brick home, partially submerged in muddy water.  It s a colossal amount of money.
Alexei Kudinov, Orenburg s deputy mayor, said more than 360 houses and nearly 1,000 plots of land had been flooded overnight. He said the deluge was expected to reach its peak yesterday and start subsiding in two days  time.
People in danger
Orenburg governor Denis Pasler told President Vladimir Putin on Thursday that 11,972 homes had been flooded and if waters rose further 19,412 more people would be in danger.
The village of Kaminskoye in the Kurgan region was also being evacuated yesterday morning after the water level there rose 1.4m overnight, Kurgan s regional governor Vadim Shumkov said on the Telegram messaging app.
Kaminskoye is a settlement along the Tobol river which also flows through the regional centre Kurgan, a city of 300,000 people. Mr Shumkov said a deluge could reach Kurgan in the coming days.
 We can only hope the flood plain stretches wide and the ground absorbs as much water as possible in its way,  he said, adding that a dam was being reinforced in Kurgan.
Kurgan is home to a key part of Russia s military-industrial complex   a giant factory that produces infantry fighting vehicles for the army, which are in high demand in Ukraine where the Russian military is on the offensive in some areas.
There were no reports that the factory, Kurganmashzavod, had so far been affected.
Rising water levels are also threatening southern parts of Western Siberia, the largest hydrocarbon basin in the world, and in areas near the Volga, Europe s biggest river.
Water levels in some other Russian regions are expected to peak within the next two weeks.   Reuters

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Ryanair's shares are flying, but can O'Leary get his EUR 100m?
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 18
Length: 962 words
Body


As Michael O Leary kept an eye on course conditions this week at Aintree   where Delta Work offers the tightest odds among four geldings he has lined up to run in Saturday s Grand National   he must also have cast a sporadic glance at the going on the stock market.
With good reason. For Ryanair s shares peeped above EUR 21 for the first time three weeks ago   something that would unlock a EUR 100 million bonus in stock options for the airline s long-time boss if held for 28 days in a row.
So far, however, it s only been able to string together two full sessions above that level, with that being broken on Thursday as sector investors balked at a fresh rally in oil prices amid heightened tensions in the Middle East.
The incentive plan   which could also be triggered by Ryanair hitting a EUR 2.2 billion annual profit   was originally due to run until this year, but was extended until 2028 in late 2022, when the shares were below EUR 13.
Were O Leary s bonus tied, however, to Ryanair s US American depositary receipts (ADRs)   US trading certificates in foreign companies   he would have long been home and hosed. The ADRs of European companies typically trade at a premium to their underlying shares. But few more so than Ryanair, where the ability of non-European investors to play the arbitrage game is severely limited.
Ban on non-EU investors
EU airlines are not allowed to have more than 49.9 per cent of their shares in the hands of investors outside the union. In an effort to protect its European licences in the wake of Brexit, Ryanair moved in 2021 to extend a long-standing ban on non-EU investors purchasing ordinary shares to those in the UK. Ryanair ADRs   where each unit equates to five ordinary shares in Dublin   are the only option available.
However, Ryanair has not allowed the US bank behind its ADR programme   Bank of New York Mellon   to convert ordinary shares into new ADRs for the past 23 years, in order to avoid the risk of the foreign ownership rule being breached. (It also dropped its London listing in 2021 and took away voting rights of non-EU shareholders.)
As of last June, the equivalent of 43 per cent of its shares were held by way of ADRs by 54 holders.
The current $143.63 price of Ryanair s ADRs   which would be the equivalent of EUR 27.39 per ordinary share   put a market capitalisation of $33.2 billion (EUR 31.1 billion) on the carrier, making it the highest-valued airline in the world, eclipsing Delta Air Lines  $30.6 billion.
The ADR-based valuation is more than 30 per cent higher than the EUR 23.7 billion one arrived at by the ordinary shares in Dublin. The premium has never been greater than now, according to Bloomberg data.  The ADR premium reflects growing demand among North American investors for exposure to the Ryanair equity story,  according to Joe Gill, director of origination and corporate broking at Goodbody Stockbrokers.  That exposure is limited due to ownership rules.
But part of the growing premium is down to a widening divergence between Wall Street investors and their peers in Europe when it comes to environmental, social and governance (ESG) investing, according to other observers.
Ryanair lays claim to being a European leader in the climate change agenda for aviation, with a growing fleet of more fuel-efficient planes, a goal to have 12.5 per cent of flights with sustainable aviation fuel by the end of the decade, and investment in carbon-offsetting arrangements.
Still, it emitted 14.3 million metric tonnes of CO2 equivalent through jet fuel consumption in the year to March 2023 as it carried almost 182 million passengers, according to its latest sustainability report. (It flew 183.7 million passengers in its financial year that came to an end two weeks ago.)
European investors have seven times as much money in sustainable fund assets than US investors, following five consecutive quarters of US outflows, according to data from Morningstar, the US financial services group.
US outflows from sustainable investment funds in the fourth quarter of last year reached $5.1 billion versus $3.3 billion of inflows in Europe.
Climate change
Almost three-quarters of European pension schemes said climate change was an investment priority in 2023, compared with a little over half of US schemes, a London Stock Exchange Group survey carried out last year found.
It s not just Wall Street. In Washington, the ESG agenda has become a political flashpoint in the last few years, with conservatives leading a cultural war on so-called woke capital and a watering down of regulations that promote disclosures.
The ESG backlash has largely been avoided, for now, by Europe, where the green agenda continues to enjoy consumer and political support. Will that see the valuation gap between Ryanair s ordinary stock and ADRs continue to expand?
For O Leary s incentive plan, the focus remains on the ordinary shares. The next catalyst to drive the stock, which remained below EUR 21 on Friday but still up 40 per cent over 12 months, may be the unveiling of its latest annual results on May 20th.
Bank of America analyst Muneeba Kayani said in a report this week she d be looking for comments on summer bookings and fares, the effects of Boeing delivery delays, and the potential for the company to announce a fresh share buyback plan.
O Leary, meanwhile, had a L Oreal moment last month when asked about the bonus scheme in a Wall Street Journal interview.  The obvious question is, well, is anybody worth EUR 100 million over five years?  he said.  If premiership footballers are earning f***ing EUR 20 million a year and [French soccer star Kylian] Mbappé is being paid EUR 130 million to go play football for f***ing Real Madrid, then I think my contract is very good value for Ryanair shareholders.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Ryanair claims search warrant was invalid
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 19
Length: 271 words
Byline: ELLEN O'RIORDAN
Body


ELLEN O RIORDAN
 Ryanair has issued High Court proceedings alleging a search of its premises by officials from competition authorities in Ireland and Italy, accompanied by gardaí, was conducted with an invalid warrant.
The airline is asking the court to quash the warrant, issued by the Dublin Metropolitan District Court last March 8th, on grounds that the issuing judge was wrongly not informed about two key Italian rulings that it says supports its position that it is not abusing its dominant market position.
It alleges the Italian competition authority, Autoritá Garante della Concorrenza e del Mercato (AGCM), and its Irish counterpart, the Competition and Consumer Protection Commission (CCPC), breached its fundamental rights by failing to tell the District Court judge about relevant information and by acting on a warrant that contained errors.
The court should declare that the material seized is, either in whole or in part, tainted by illegality and is inadmissible and should not have been removed from Ireland, Ryanair says.
Some 30 officers of both authorities and gardaí conducted an unannounced inspection of Ryanair s premises in Swords, north Dublin, on March 8th.
The CCPC said the search was conducted on behalf of the AGCM.
The Italian authority announced in September 2023 that it had opened an investigation into Ryanair for  possible abuse of a dominant [market] position .
In an affidavit, Ryanair s head of competition, Eoin Kealy, said the company had co-operated with the AGCM throughout its investigation, which arose out of claims from two Italian travel agency associations and a consumer association.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Seanad's leisurely pace must change
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 290 words
Body


Sir,   This week the Seanad returned for just one day, following a three-week break.
The 34-page Order Paper for the Upper House of the Oireachtas for Thursday included almost a dozen pages of important legislation, ranging from family courts reform to a Bill on adoption tracing information, and much, much more. Yet only one piece of legislation was discussed.
The Order Paper also included motions for debate from September 2023 right through to March 2024.
Unlike TDs, senators do not have geographic constituencies. They do not represent a specific county, but rather the entire country.
There is no need for them to hold constituency clinics or attend the opening of a new road in the town where they live.
In February, all sitting senators, without exception, took a standard allowance for their travel   an additional payment on top of their salary. Some picked up EUR 1,456.25 for the month, while others claimed as much as EUR 3,663 just to travel between their home and Leinster House for 23 days of the month.
The question must therefore be asked, what are our 59 senators doing that they need a three-week break followed by a one-day working week? In fact, their standard working week is usually only three days.
While senators also sit on Oireachtas committees and do important work in that respect, committee work cannot be the obstacle that is preventing them dealing with the lengthy backlog of legislation on the Seanad Order Paper.
For the EUR 76,329 a senator is paid, plus the many allowances they collect, the Seanad should meet five days per week, for at least six hours per day and do the work senators are paid to do, rather than the work they wished they were paid to do.   Yours, etc,
TOMÁS
HENEGHAN,
East Wall,
Dublin 3.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Settlement of EUR 200,000 for girl over care she received; Medication changes saw teen become more anxious and stressed, court told
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 560 words
Byline: ELLEN O'RIORDAN
Body


ELLEN O RIORDAN  The High Court has approved a EUR 200,000 settlement for a girl who was alleged to have suffered  very significant  harm as a result of the care she received from south Kerry Child and Adolescent Mental Health Services (Camhs).
The girl, now aged 16, alleged she was inappropriately prescribed antipsychotic medications that exposed her to the onset of bulimia nervosa and a foreseeable risk of injury. The court heard she developed a self-harm  habit  and attempted suicide at the age of 13.
The EUR 200,000 settlement against the HSE is the largest of any sanctioned by the court over south Kerry Camhs treatment that formed part of a review of some 1,300 patient care files.
The 2022 Maskey report, commissioned by the HSE on foot of concerns raised in September 2020 about clinical practice, found that 240 young people did not receive an appropriate standard of care and 46 suffered significant harm.
The High Court heard yesterday this plaintiff was referred to the HSE-run south Kerry service five years ago, when she was 12, on account of her panic attacks, stress, anxiety and self-harming behaviours.
She was prescribed the antidepressant Setraline and the antipsychotic Risperidone, the latter of which was later replaced by two antipsychotic drugs: Quetiapine and Aripiprazole, her senior counsel, John Gordon, told the court.
He said the girl s health  deteriorated rapidly  as a result of the medication changes and she suffered  very significant injuries .
Although his client was on the drugs for a  relatively short  period, he said the  damage was enormous .
She became more anxious and stressed, extremely tired, gained some 20kg in weight and developed a habit of self-harm, he said. She suffered bullying as a result of her weight gain and developed bulimia, for which she is still receiving treatment, said Mr Gordon, who was instructed by Coleman Legal solicitors.
In her legal papers, the girl said her mother brought her to a hospital emergency department in September 2020 where a psychiatrist reviewed her treatment plan and ceased her prescription for the Aripiprazole antipsychotic.
Suing through her mother, she claimed the HSE apologised for the deficits in the standard of care and acknowledged harm was caused to her although, due to the inadequate monitoring of her case, the extent of harm could not be evaluated.
Panic
It was alleged that the HSE was guilty of negligence and breach of duty in prescribing Risperidone, which, she claimed, is not recognised for treating panic disorder in adolescents. There were also failings in continuing to prescribe the drug, and increasing the dosage, after her GP communicated elevated levels of prolactin, which is the hormone responsible for lactation and breast development, she claimed.
She also alleged negligence in prescribing two antipsychotic drugs at the same time and in allegedly failing to document the rationale for this. Although she self-harmed before attending the service, it is alleged that this became much more serious afterwards, partly due to the girl s mood and partly due to her weight gain. She said her mood and energy levels improved after she ceased taking Aripiprazole.
She was later diagnosed with obsessive compulsive disorder and has received counselling and cognitive behavioural therapy. She is awaiting referral to a local eating disorder clinic.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



SF policies rule out coalition, says Martin; Fianna Fáil leader criticises Sinn Féin's record in Government in Northern Ireland
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 401 words
Byline: HARRY McGEE
Body


HARRY McGEE Political Correspondent  Tánaiste Micheál Martin has repeated his position that Fianna Fáil cannot go into Government with Sinn Féin while vast policy differences remain between the parties.
Mr Martin did not rule out the possibility completely, but said coalition was impossible given current positions.
The Fianna Fáil leader was speaking in advance of his party s ardfheis which opened in the Royal Convention Centre in Dublin last  night.
In his opening address to delegates Mr Martin excoriated Sinn Féin and its record in Government in the North, and in the Oireachtas in the South.
 In the three elections which will be held over the next year they are hoping to bulldoze their way to power,  he said.
 They hope they can avoid scrutiny, avoid the hard questions everyone else has to answer   but we ll make sure that they have to answer for the reality of their policies and the terrible impact they would have on Ireland.
Expanding on that theme when speaking to reporters, Mr Martin said Fianna Fáil could not negotiate with Sinn Féin  if it maintains policy positions they ve been wanting to maintain on Europe, like it s flip flopping on the whole area around the Middle East, for example, one week, they were not calling for the expansion of the ambassador and the next week they were.
Sinn Féin lead in general election polls by a significant margin, but are nonetheless likely to require coalition support should they emerge from the next election as the largest party.
In his speech, Mr Martin also emphasised education, farming and housing as well as immigration. In a signal of the Government s toughening policy on this issue, he told delegates.
 We also fully understand that the global migration crisis is causing huge pressures, particularly in the European Union.
 Our policy has to be firm and fair. In asylum cases we have to respect humanitarian needs, but also join with others in speeding up decisions.
Diplomacy
Mr Martin defended the party s decision not to invite Israeli ambassador Dana Erlich to the ardfheis as Fianna Fáil was  not satisfied with what was going on in Gaza.
He said he believed in diplomacy and did not believe in expelling Ms Erlich.
 I was asked 12 months ago to expel the Russian ambassador. I was asked to expel the Iranian embassy,  he said.
 I believe in keeping challenge channels of communications between governments open through their diplomats.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Shares flat as traders look to ECB rate cut
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 19
Length: 575 words
Byline: CIARA O'BRIEN
Body


CIARA O BRIEN
 European shares were flat yesterday after hitting a one-week high in early trade, as rising tensions in the Middle East eroded some of the continued optimism around the European Central Bank s hint of imminent rate cuts.
DUBLIN The Dublin market edged lower
, closing the session around 1 per cent lower. The index was weighed down by a decline in shares in Ryanair, which fell 2.64 per cent. That followed a fall of more than 3 per cent in the stock the previous day. Other fallers included Bank of Ireland, which was down half a per cent to EUR 9.77, and AIB, which lost 0.8 per cent over the session to end at just below EUR 4.80.
Packaging giant Smurfit Kappa gave up some of its gains from the previous session, falling 0.6 per cent to end the week at EUR 41.39.
Kerry Group was among the few climbers, making a marginal gain of 0.19 per cent after the previous session s 2.75 per cent rise.
LONDON Britain s FTSE 100 rose to a near-record closing hig
h as soaring commodity prices lifted mining and oil stocks, while data showed Britain s tepid economy is on course to exit a shallow recession.
The resources-heavy index breached the 8,000 mark at one point before closing 0.9 per cent higher at 7,995.58, not far from its all-time closing peak of 8,014.31 set in February 2023.
BP advanced 3.7 per cent after Reuters reported the United Arab Emirates  state-owned oil company recently considered buying BP, though the deliberations did not progress beyond preliminary discussions.
Britain s mid-cap FTSE 250 index slipped 0.3 per cent, with airline operator Wizz Air tumbling 8.2 per cent on concerns about higher fuel costs. Other airline stocks including EasyJet and British Airways owner IAG fell 4.3 per cent and 3.8 per cent, respectively.
 EUROPE The pan-European STOXX 600 ended the session 0.1 per cent higher, after rising as much as 1.2 per cent during the day, but logging its second straight weekly decline.
Luxury giants LVMH and Richemont lost 1.2 per cent and 3 per cent, respectively, weighing on the STOXX 600. The broader luxury sector shed 1.3 per cent to a near two-month low.
Orsted climbed 4.5 per cent, while Evotec rose 3.5 per cent after Deutsche Bank upgraded the German biotech firm to  buy  from  hold .
Societe Generale gained 2.1 per cent after the lender agreed to sell Société Générale Marocaine de Banques and La Marocaine Vie to Moroccan conglomerate Saham Group for EUR 745 million.
Varta slumped 31.1 per cent after the German battery maker said its restructuring plans would fail to make it profitable by 2026.
NEW YORK The blue-chip Dow and the S&P 500 were on track for weekly losses
 after most megacap growth stocks and chipmakers retreated, while some big banks fell after reporting dour quarterly earnings.
JPMorgan Chase dropped 5.9 per cent after the bank s forecast for its income from interest payments came in below analysts  expectations. Citigroup
 lost 2.8 per cent after its first-quarter profit fell.
The S&P 500 banks index shed 3.3 per cent, hitting its lowest level in nearly a month.
Falling megacap growth stocks weighed on the three indexes, with Nvidia, Tesla
 and MetaPlatforms down more than 1 per cent each.
Advanced Micro Devices and Intel
lost 4 per cent and 3.6 per cent, respectively, after a report that Chinese officials had told the country s largest telecom firms earlier this year to phase out foreign chips that are key to their networks by 2027.   Additional reporting: Reuters

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Shed Distillery in Leitrim invests EUR 10m to double whiskey-making capacity
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 19
Length: 470 words
Byline: CIARÁN HANCOCK
Body


CIARÁN HANCOCK
 The owners of the Shed Distillery in Co Leitrim, best known for its Drumshanbo Gunpowder Irish Gin, are investing EUR 10 million to double its whiskey-making capacity.
Some EUR 3 million was spent in the past year with  at least  another EUR 7 million to come over the next three years to support the company s growth at the premium end of the market, according to its co-founder Pat Rigney.
The money will come from its own resources and double its capacity to 120,000 cases of whiskey a year.
 For us that s quite a big investment,  Mr Rigney told The Irish Times.  It s still relatively small within what s happening in Ireland [in whiskey], but we re very focused on that top-quality single-pot still segment. For a family-owned business it s probably where it needs to be.
 We d be anticipating releasing our single-pot still whiskeys between five and 12 years of age when the quality is right. Everything we sell we produce at the Shed Distillery, every drop. We don t bring in any whiskey from a third party.
Accounts just filed for PJ Rigney Distillery & International Brands Ltd, which operates the distillery, show that the company increased its revenue for the year to the end of September 2023 by 7.5 per cent to just under EUR 18.4 million. Its pretax profit was flat at EUR 3.8 million.
It closed the financial year with accumulated profits of EUR 15.3 million.
Playing the long game
 We invested quite heavily in our brands in 2023 and in our facilities,  Mr Rigney said of the profit performance.
  It s a very competitive marketplace. We increased our top line, but we didn t take any price increases . . . so it s real organic growth.
 We are a family business and the strategy is to reinvest. We re playing the long game. When we make a decision we re thinking five to 10 years out. Hopefully another member of the family will be running the business at that point. That s the way we re thinking. It s a very controlled expansion.
Based in Drumshanbo, Co Leitrim, the Shed Distillery was founded by Mr Rigney and his wife Denise Rigney, and produces gin, vodka and whiskey, with its Gunpowder gin brand the flagship product. It also operates a visitor centre at the distillery, conducting about 25,000 tours last year.
The distillery has just launched a seven-year-old Drumshanbo Single Pot Still Irish whiskey marsala cask edition, retailing at EUR 89. The whiskey has matured since 2017 in casks brought over from Sicily that had been previously used for marsala wine. It will be available at Dublin Airport s duty free shops from mid April.
The distillery laid down its first whiskey in 2014 with its inaugural release in 2019. Mr Rigney said its biggest export market is the United States, followed by France, with Ireland and duty free retail also strong contributors to its revenue performance.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Shipley not shy and retiring
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 7
Length: 223 words
Body


You couldn t accuse Neal Shipley of being the shy, retiring type . . . . but the US amateur runner-up   who asked none other than Jack Nicklaus for some tips on how to play the course   benefitted from his prep work in making the cut on his  debut.
Shipley doesn t come from a golfing family. It was while watching the 2004 US PGA Championship   won by Vijay Singh   that he got hooked, got his father s clubs out of the cupboard, dusted them off and, the rest, as they say, proved to be history.
 I took his golf clubs over, which were dusty and probably never used, and started swinging around. I decided to get me my own little set and kind of took off from there. I kind of credit Vijay for getting me into it, which is pretty cool and I think a different story,  said Shipley who, with rounds of 71-76 for 147, survived into the weekend.
Shipley made his introduction to childhood hero Singh on meeting him earlier this week and touched the Golden Bear for his advice, but it was his pre-tournament visits that really enabled him to map out how to play the course.
 We did five practice trips, that s allotted for an amateur. I did like 36 or 27 (holes) every time out here. So I think it was something in the neighbourhood of 140. I had a lot of work on the golf course, and I think that s one of the reasons I feel really comfortable.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Sinn Féin is sick of experts. Have they forgotten Brexit?
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 16
Length: 955 words
Body


 I think the people in this country have had enough of experts,  the British minister and leading Brexiteer Michael Gove said at the height of the Brexit campaign in 2016.
He was right, too, as the result of the referendum showed. The British people had indeed enough of the experts who were warning them about the economic effects of Brexit. They are repenting that particular mistake at their leisure now. And while pondering the fact that Brexit has not actually cut the levels of immigration to the UK, they might also consider the desperate damage that Brexit has caused to Britain s standing in the world.
There was once a time when the UK was seen by countries all over the world as an exemplar in politics and statecraft, a model to be emulated. Now, alas, it is seen as the opposite   as a warning about a particular type of politics.
Nowhere is the folly of Brexit more keenly appreciated than in Ireland, where we had a ringside seat and skin in the game. Which is why the lessons of Brexit should be so apparent to us.
Many participants in focus groups for last year s North and South series, which examined attitudes to a possible united Ireland and related issues, were very clear about the lessons of Brexit: if and when border polls come in the two jurisdictions, many participants said, they want to know what s on offer. What are the plans for a united Ireland? What would it look like? What will change? What will stay the same? And how much will it cost?
As one Northerner said during the focus-group discussion:  The way Brexit was handled . . . was completely arse about face. They agreed to leave and then they negotiated it. That was completely bizarre. So, for the Ireland debate it has to be the other way around. Agree the terms of leaving and then put it to the vote.
Some participants in The Irish Times Inside Politics live podcast in Belfast this week said much the same.
 Conversation
And Sinn Féin and the wider united Ireland movement have been saying similar things   we need to work out what a united Ireland looks like. Their favourite word is  conversation . Let s have the conversation about a united Ireland, they say. Let s hear from everyone.
But like Michael Gove, it seems, some of them don t want to hear from experts when they don t like their conclusions.
Last week, the pro-conversationalists sought to jump all over the recent report from economists John FitzGerald and Edgar Morgenroth, which calculated that a united Ireland could cost the Republic up to EUR 20 billion a year for 20 years. They rubbished the research, sought to discredit its methodology and, in some cases, attacked the authors personally.
Sinn Féin TDs, including chief whip Pádraig McLochlainn and others, disputed the findings and insisted that after unification the British government would still be obliged to fund some costs in the former Northern Ireland, an approach characterised by some unionists as  feck off and leave your wallet on the table .
Those who didn t like the conclusions questioned the research, citing other more favourable surveys and reports.
But the outburst by Joe Brolly, football pundit, barrister and spokesman for Northern nationalism s resentment of their southern confreres, was an ominous foretaste of how a united Ireland debate in the future could become bitter, personalised and partisan. John FitzGerald, he said,  is Fine Gael royalty. His grandfather a founding member of FG. As taoiseach, his father Garret supported Margaret Thatcher s position on the hunger strikes. He loathed our community.
Talk about playing the man, not the ball. It s a good example of how partisans   on all sides, probably   will seize on anything that bolsters their case, and dismiss anything that doesn t. If FitzGerald s research had found that a united Ireland would lead to an economic nirvana, Brolly would probably have hailed the fact his grandfather fought in the GPO in 1916.
Brolly s outbursts are not infrequent, and occasionally entertaining. I agree with him about Gaelic football, as it happens. But this one was a warning to us that the passions that will be stirred by the united Ireland debate will be intense and combustible. People may be personally attacked for their views and beliefs. This is not an argument to avoid that debate; it is, however, an argument to proceed cautiously towards it. And if it comes, to conduct that debate in a civil and constructive fashion. To bear in mind the idea that is so often missing from politics   that people can, in good faith, disagree.
And what of the substance of the question about the economics of a united Ireland?
On the one hand, the recent history of this country would suggest that providing for worst-case scenarios would be the prudent thing to do. Before the financial crash unfolded, a decade and a half ago, politicians and economists were full of soothing noises about a soft landing.
On the other hand, departing taoiseach Leo Varadkar made important observations this week. He underestimated, he said, the capacity of the economy to bounce back after the financial crisis and again after the pandemic. Had he not done so, he said, a programme of public investment   especially in housing   could have been commenced earlier. Maybe it would, maybe not   but he s right about the strength of the Irish economy.
What is beyond doubt is that we will need a comprehensive economic assessment of all aspects of unity   even if the big unknown would be political stability in the wake of unity. The economic debate, and indeed the wider political debate, should be about facts, truth and reality. Not a shouting match about what side you re on. Conversations require listening as well as talking. And let s not get it arse about face.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Some minor bumps on the road to victory; Sparks almost fly as Home of the Year picks its series winner; Michael Douglas is in his element as Benjamin Franklin
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 18
Length: 986 words
Body


 A day full of violence   is the prediction of Hugh Wallace, one of the three judges on   Home of the Year (RTÉ One, Tuesday), as the property series rounds the bend into its grand final.
The promise dangled before us, like a hunk of raw beef steak, is that Wallace and Amanda Bone (both architects) and Sara Cosgrove (an interior designer) will scrap tooth and nail for their favourite property.With seven contenders, that s a lot of potential conflict.
Alas, this long-awaited smackdown is nowhere near as visceral as viewers may have hoped. Yes, there are one or two flashpoints as the panel debate the merits of the addresses that have made it to the grand decider.
Here, the big clash of personalities is between Wallace, who loves all houses equally, and Bone, a minimalist with an existential dread of ornate designs.
Bone expresses her misgivings about  an old rectory in Derry, where she says  that the  interiors overwhelm the home .  You want it all painted white!  says Wallace. Bone throws him a look that could strip wallpaper at 50 paces.
Another (very minor) bust-up concerns an en-suite loo with a unique design.   The main bedroom didn t have a door into the bathroom,  says Cosgrove. Wallace is stunned:  It s not like you have party guests trooping past you.
This is the red meat we came for.  Unfortunately, there is nowhere near enough. Instead Hugh and the gang have  a generally matey time as they whittle down the hopefuls.
Aside from a lack of friction, the other big problem with the finale is that it removes the crucial snoop factor that makes Home of the Year so addictive. In the series proper, the fun comes from watching the trio of experts swan around and wax poetically about cupboards, hall stands and open-plan kitchens the size of several student bedsits.
Sadly, there is no such excitement in the final. Instead, the shortlisted homeowners gather at Palmerstown Estate, near Naas in Co Kildare, and exchange small talk as the judges hash it out.Tension is conspicuous by its absence, and the decision to award the top prize to Shane Murray and Marty Campbell s restored 1920s redbrick terraced home in Dublin feels random. It s a lovely house. But is it head and shoulders above the competition?
While Cosgrove, Bone and Wallace believe so   it  balances creativity and functionality . . . full of style and bold design , says Cosgrove   you come away with the sense that, on a different day, they could have picked any of the other six.
A common criticism of Home of the Year is that, amid a housing crisis, there should be no room on the schedules for property porn   even when it s at the tasteful end of the spectrum. Such a critique feels mean-spirited in the context of the seven wonderful designs, however, and Murray and Campbell get the tone right when expressing joy at their win and humility  at being selected over the other  candidates. They are to be congratulated for their triumph   it s just a pity the road  to victory didn t offer more of the gory drama that Wallace had promised.
Crusty American If you
 re a fan of Americans in wigs visiting 18th-century France with a view to furthering the downfall of the British Empire, you may have already enjoyed Jefferson in Paris, a 1995 James Ivory costume drama in which Nick Nolte donned a hairpiece and parlayed with the Parisians. Now comes a spiritual sequel  in Michael Douglas s Franklin (Apple TV +, Friday), in which the pre-eminent bad boy of 1980s erotic thrillers plays a crusty American revolutionary weaving mischief at the court of Louis XVI.
Franklin has one thing going for it,  and that one thing is the star of Fatal Attraction and Basic Instinct. Douglas,  at 79, remains one of Hollywood s most charismatic mischief-makers. He is in his element as the cunning and mercurial Benjamin Franklin. That s just as well, because everything else about the eight-part series   loosely adapted from Stacy Schiff s nonfiction book A Great Improvisation: Franklin, France, and the Birth of America   is by-the-book frock porn.
Arriving in Paris eager to forge an alliance, Franklin is passed from courtier to courtier and spends half his screen time attending dimly lit masked balls. Our hero spends much of the rest of his free hours exchanging sarcastic quips with the French. (He seems more interested in wry banter than in securing weapons for the war against Britain.) Meanwhile, great fun is extracted from a sequence in which the naughty nabob breaks wind. Yes, prestige TV is now leaning into fart gags.
Louis s court is a nest of vipers in  treacherous toupees. All have their own reasons for becoming close to Franklin. They include the flirtatious Madame Anne-Louise Brillon (Ludivine Sagnier). We also meet machiavellian foreign minister the Comte de Vergennes  (Thibault de Montalembert). The comte is all for giving a bloody nose to the British but suspicious of the American Revolution and its promise of liberty for all.
Our American in Paris has motives  of his own. He has bought with him his grandson Temple (Noah Jupe), to whom he wishes to pass on the lessons of a  lifetime of statecraft. Temple, at one  point, echoes a line from the Broadway  hit Hamilton, observing that the Revolutionaries are outgunned and outmanned.
Fittingly, much of Franklin feels like a musical without any song. You half-expect Douglas to burst into a rap as he reflects on the fall of New York to the Red Coats   or jump on a table and do a moonwalk when trying to talk the French around. But Douglas stays earthbound. Despite the actor s charisma and the sumptuousness  of all those wigs, so, too, does Franklin. l
Ones to Watch
Abortion provision in Ireland comes under scrutiny in RTÉ Investigates: Ireland s Abortion Services (RTÉ One, Monday 9.35pm)
 Tom Hollander and Naomi Watts head the cast as sparring members of New York high society in the mid-20th century in Feud: Capote v The Swans (Disney+,  Wednesday)

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Stardust jury to resume deliberations on Monday
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 260 words
Body


The jury in Stardust inquests will resume deliberating for a ninth day on Monday.
The seven women and five men jurors, who have been considering verdicts on the disaster for more than 30 hours, are tasked with returning verdicts in respect of each of the 48 people, aged between 16 and 27, who died as a result of a fire in the north Dublin nightclub in the early hours of February 14th, 1981.
They must establish the identity of each as well as the date, place and cause of their deaths, and return verdicts based on facts of the circumstances of the fire. The verdicts available to the jury are accidental death, misadventure, unlawful killing, open verdict or narrative verdict. They must also establish facts about the fire.
The inquests, which opened in April 2023, sat for 122 days and heard from 373 witnesses, including staff and management, patrons, members of the public who saw the fire, emergency services personnel and fire and pathology experts.
When charging the jurors last month, the coroner Dr Myra Cullinane said they must be  dispassionate  and  clinical .
 She  detailed the parameters within which the jurors must confine themselves if considering a verdict of unlawful killing.  You have heard evidence in this case about how certain things were done and how they might have been done differently. Some of that evidence sought to set out a particular version of events,  she said.  However, neither you nor I are allowed to record any conclusion ... which attaches criminal responsibility or civil responsibility to any person.
  KITTY HOLLAND

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Ten Hag says United have had bad luck
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 405 words
Byline: JAMIE JACKSON
Body


JAMIE JACKSON   Erik ten Hag claims Manchester United have suffered huge bad luck but accepts that, like a government minister, he is held responsible for how his team perform.
After last season s Carabao Cup triumph and third-place finish, Ten Hag has had to contend with myriad problems. These include uncertainty regarding Mason Greenwood s future, Jadon Sancho s refusal to play, Antony s off-field issue, serial injuries and the club s state of flux owing to Sir Jim Ratcliffe becoming a part-owner at Christmas, then conducting a structural overhaul.
Ten Hag likened himself to a senior politician when asked whether, in private, he had sworn at all this.
 The thing is you have to be realistic,  he said.  As a manager it s like a minister, yeah? You don t have anything in your hands but at the end of the day you have to accept that. You are responsible for everything. And I take that.
 It s huge (the bad luck). A lot went against us this season. You see all the penalties we conceded in the last weeks (against Chelsea and Liverpool) could also have been going in another way.
 You think over the course of a season sometimes you will get one, sometimes you will concede one, but this season it feels like we only concede.
Ratcliffe is intent on appointing Newcastle s Dan Ashworth as sporting director and Southampton s Jason Wilcox as technical director.
Ten Hag was asked whether time in the summer market may be wasted if they are not in before the start and suggest different targets when appointed.
 We are working in the background on plans with scouting.
 We are working on our plan, the plan is ready, but it has to execute, and I trust the new ownership that they will work as quick as possible and bring new good structures and that they can execute.
 We have good plans, I think also with quality players. You see now about recruitment: (Andre) Onana is doing very well, Rasmus Hojlund, everyone is seeing his big talent and potential. (Lisandro) Martinez, everyone was hugely happy with him, and there are others.
 So the recruitment is good. But if they (new directors) have even better ideas, we are always open. If you have options but they come with better options we are open.
 But we have a way we want to play, so we know our profiles, so it has to match the profiles we want.
Marcus Rahsford is being assessed while Scott McTominay faces a late fitness test before today s  trip to Bournemouth.
  Guardian

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



The chaotic story of the Blues Brothers
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 26
Length: 384 words
Body


Is there good reason to write a whole book about The Blues Brothers? Daniel de Visé does not contrive a definitive  yes  in his zippy study of a late 1970s phenomenon that   from this side of the Atlantic, anyway   still defies easy explanation.
The covers act of that name (let s start there) was a blokeish creation of supernova-hot comics John Belushi and Dan Aykroyd. Neither had much of a voice, but their celebrity on Saturday Night Live, then not yet entirely dreadful, helped them draw the most gifted musicians of postwar R&B into the backing band. The Brothers  1978 album, Briefcase Full of Blues, made No 1 in the US. How?  Disco was dying and new wave hadn t started yet. There was nothing on the radio,  Aykroyd says here.
Briefcase Full of Blues appears in few lists of greatest 1970s albums, but John Landis s The Blues Brothers, a ruinously expensive spin-off film, does still have purchase. That project does not begin forming itself until halfway through the book. Before then we get efficiently structured outlines of Belushi s US-Armenian upbringing, his early sporting prowess, improv in Chicago and arrival at the first incarnation of Saturday Night Live. Nothing here will win over those allergic  to the scrappy NBC talent funnel, but de Visé does argue successfully for its role  as a cultural marker.  It is probably the first network show produced by and for  the television generation,  critic Tom Shales remarks.
The description of the film s shooting is a mass of drug-fuelled chaos. We hear a lot (a lot!) about the narcotic consumption that ultimately led to Belushi s death from an overdose in 1982, but get little on the psychological pressures that led him to such excess.
The Blues Brothers, all car chases and blaring brass, emerged in 1980 to indifferent reviews and healthy US box office. Some felt black co-stars such as Aretha Franklin, Cab Calloway and James Brown were used as mere spear carriers for the white duo. But Brown was among several all-time greats who had their careers boosted.  These young people never heard of me,  he said of the film.  If they like it maybe they ll come hear us play.
They did come. Franklin, Calloway and Brown profited from a second or third wind. For that, if nothing else, The  Blues Brothers deserve this diverting celebration.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



The key decisions facing the new Taoiseach
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 1361 words
Body


Yesterday morning, Taoiseach Simon Harris sat down for the first time with his newly appointed team of advisers to map out his plans and priorities for the coming months. Immediately afterwards, he was straight into a meeting with Garda Commissioner Drew Harris before a press conference with Spanish prime minister Pedro Sánchez. On Monday he will chair his first meeting of the Cabinet committee on housing. He will then meet representatives from the Road Safety Authority and then discuss migration with Minister for Integration Roderic O Gorman. With his list of engagements and demands growing by the hour, Harris has also told Fine Gael that he plans to visit every constituency in the country ahead of the local elections. While he has told his fellow Coalition leaders that his intention is for the Government to go full term, the speculation about an October or November election has not gone away.  There is still a good possibility that we are going in autumn,  one Minister told The Irish Times this week. Either way, Harris has an unenviably short amount of time to make his mark as Taoiseach.
APRIL In the next two weeks, while the Taoiseach acquaints himself with his fellow European and world leaders, work will quickly get under way to establish and staff a new task force on safety in Dublin, and to set up the first meetings of two new Cabinet committees. The establishment of the first Cabinet committee   children, education and disability   has already been welcomed by the Opposition. It is likely that one of the first things this committee will discuss will be the date for ratifying the optional protocol for the UN Convention on the Rights of People with Disabilities, to give disabled people the power to enforce their rights. Through the second committee   migration, integration and Ukraine   Harris will be hoping to explore new ways to tighten up the rules around entry into the State, including the addition of new states to the list of countries of safe origin.
MAY Expect to see the first major announcements from Team Harris in May with a package for both businesses and farmers due to be unveiled. Businesses can expect to pay less PRSI, with measures due to be introduced which could offset some of the extra costs borne by employers with the increase in the national minimum wage. Plans to add an extra two days on to statutory sick leave could be delayed in order to give businesses extra breathing room. There could be either  training vouchers  or money given to companies to upskill employees through courses or education, sources say.
At the same time, proposals to assist farmers are expected to be unveiled. One source said this could involve fodder and tillage supports and there will  absolutely have to be a financial element to this  with potential financial incentives mentioned around managing fodder.
On May 27th, Harris will attend his first National Economic Dialogue as Taoiseach to hear the various demands being made by stakeholders for Budget 2025 ahead of the Summer Economic Statement. Harris will outline his thinking around Budget 2025 and the question is: will he play it conservative or will he try to push the envelope? Will he build or dampen expectations?
JUNE With a one-week recess at the start of June, the main focus will be on the local and European elections scheduled for Friday June 7th, meaning Harris faces his first major electoral test in just a matter of weeks. Sources say Fine Gael is pretty much finished with local selection conventions, and will run at least 350 candidates across the country. Harris plans to visit every constituency before June and to put his communication abilities to use. Fine Gael has suffered a few local defections since the 2019 local elections when it won 255 seats, and is estimated to have about 250 seats at present. The party also has five MEP seats and it will be a tall order to hold on to all of these. A win by Fianna Fáil TD Barry Cowen would create a byelection that would have to be defended by the Government, which is an unwelcome prospect that could ultimately feed into the Taoiseach s wider thinking on the timing of a general election.
Another issue that will arise in late June or early July will be Ireland s nomination for EU commissioner   EU member states will want to get their names in early. Harris will stick by an agreement to allow a Fianna Fáil name to go forward. If it is Minister for Finance Michael McGrath, expect further change at Cabinet but not for a few months.
JULY The new Taoiseach is pushing his Ministers to progress a number of key pieces of legislation before the summer recess, with the Dáil currently scheduled to rise on Thursday, July 11th. On housing there will be a push to introduce legislation to protect lease lengths after some housing platforms switched to obliging students to commit to uniform 51-week leases for the next academic year, increasing annual rent costs for tenants. Minister for Children Roderic O Gorman has been asked to fast-track laws to ensure those using childminders can avail of the existing childcare subsidies.
Minister of State with responsibility for mental health Mary Butler will be asked to progress long-promised new mental health laws. On crime, Minister for Justice Helen McEntee has been asked to fast-track legislation to give judges new powers to make sure heinous crimes (rape and murder) earn long sentences with those cases not coming back before parole hearings for up to 40 years after sentencing.
The big-ticket item, however, will be the future of RTÉ. Reviews of culture, governance and contractor fees are due in the coming weeks. A senior source confirmed to The Irish Times this weekend that Harris will make a definitive decision on the future funding of RTÉ before the recess. Will he back direct exchequer funding or a new model of TV licence collected by Revenue? We ll see.
AUGUST With the Dáil in recess, Simon Harris will have time to turn his attention to party matters and general election planning. There is growing speculation within Fine Gael that a shake-up of the party s national executive could be in the offing. With a potentially divisive budget looming, all parties will be knuckling down in August to ensure that candidate selection processes for the general election are well under way as budget season will suck up plenty of politicians  time when it starts the following month.
SEPTEMBER The battle of Budget 2025 may well be business-related, with Fine Gael coming under sustained pressure to lower the VAT rate for hospitality businesses. Michael McGrath   having resisted pressure from his Coalition colleagues for a budget-style springtime package for businesses   will try to hold the line against introducing a lower tax rate for food services of 9 per cent. Having promised to prioritise and support businesses, however, the pressure on Harris from his ranks will become intense.
The Taoiseach has also said that the renters  tax credit should be more than EUR 1,000 (up from EUR 700) and that, eventually, workers should not pay the higher rate of tax on the first EUR 50,000 of their salary. There will also be a push for universal social charge (USC) cuts. Any of these things on their own would constitute a big chunk of change and severely limit the wider room for manoeuvre.
At the same time, Fine Gael is preparing to unveil a five-year tax strategy, some of which it hopes to achieve in the budget. Most of it, however, will form a key plank of the next Fine Gael general election manifesto. The strategy will be led by Minister for Public Expenditure Paschal Donohoe, Minister of State in the Department of Finance Neale Richmond and other senior members of Fine Gael such as Richard Bruton.
 We really want to do something new,  a source said. It is expected Fine Gael could outline a plan to significantly reduce USC, with one source describing the existing level of USC as a  real kick in the teeth  for voters. The document will also outline tax supports for businesses and entrepreneurs as well as looking at the future of inheritance tax, capital gains tax, carbon tax and the new multibillion-euro funds for the future.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



The magic of making a garden
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: NO SECTION; Pg. 4
Length: 1149 words
Body


It s often said that making a garden teaches all kinds of valuable life lessons, from the importance of patience and the virtue of persistence, to a recognition of the fleeting nature of time and the bittersweet beauty and resilience of the natural world.
Many would also say that it helps to nurture a kind of inner tranquillity, supporting mental wellbeing and serving as a path towards personal spiritual enlightenment, all of which is underscored by two great new books by Irish gardeners.
One, called Grounded in the Garden, is by the Tipperary-born artist TJ Maher, creator of Patthana Garden in Kiltegan, west Wicklow. It was published by Pimpernel Press last month.
The other book is the self-published Growing Beauty by garden designer and former jeweller Des Doyle of Lavistown House, Co Kilkenny, which comes out later this month. Both are beautiful publications that are intensely personal, contemplative and celebratory accounts of the magic that comes with making a garden and the lessons learned along the way.
Patthana Garden, which I first wrote about for this paper in 2017, will already be well-known to many as one of Ireland s loveliest small gardens, albeit not anything as small as it used to be. Maher and his husband Simon Kirby extended the garden after buying the field adjacent to the original site in 2020, so that it now stands at a little over an acre.
It s in this new area that the author has developed his new Torc garden, as well as Patthana s native flowering meadow. A charming and atmospheric country garden, it s known for its expert use of space and its joyful, exuberant, expansive use of colour. In the hands of an artist like Maher, sizzling pinks, fiery oranges, rich reds and magentas are combined in masterful ways, something he has in common with his fellow Wicklow gardeners, June and Jimi Blake, whose influence can be seen in his palette of favourite plants.
Multipurpose space
 Maher s deft use of colour and his ability to manipulate it to create mood and ambience is one of the central themes of his book. So too, is his adroit understanding of what it takes to keep the show on the road in a smallish, multipurpose space, from prioritising ultra hard-working, long-flowering varieties with multiple seasons of interest to creating container displays for maximum impact. In summer, graceful, species-type single dahlias, salvias, linarias, perennial geraniums, geums and cosmos abound.
Before them, it s the turn of tulips in luminous shades of rust, apricot, pink, scarlet and gold, which Maher mixes in theatrically beautiful combinations. In autumn the show continues with crocosmia, helenium, monarda, sanguisorba and sedum, alongside the floaty, transparent grace of ornamental grasses including Calamagrostis brachytricha.
Maher s love of nature also shines brightly throughout his book s beautifully illustrated pages, which are filled with sumptuous photography by Richard Murphy, Jason Ingram, Clive Nicholls, Jonathan Hession and Maher himself. The book includes a preface by garden writer Jane Powers, who mentored Maher throughout the writing and editing process.
In its final chapter, Embracing Nature, Maher writes with intense feeling of how his Buddhist beliefs inform his deep love and respect for the natural world, which in turn has directed his own journey of self-growth and his willingness  to embrace some imperfection . One of our greatest personal challenges, he points out, is  to embrace our mud . . . just like the bulb or seed that is put into the ground where no sunlight can reach, the darkness can be a place where beautiful things begin .
The ways in which gardening can profoundly shape our personal growth are also at the core of Des Doyle s engrossing book, Growing Beauty. It charts his own evolution as a gardener and garden designer, in parallel with the historical gardens of Lavistown House, the home of the author, his wife Claire Goodwillie, their two teenage children and his parents-in-law, Roger and Olivia Goodwillie, who first moved there from Dublin in the 1970s.
Seasonal essays
 Functioning as a series of interlinking but individual seasonal essays, it s a deeply thoughtful and atmospherically written meditation on the challenges that life throws at us and the powerful ways in which our gardens can be redemptive, creative, nurturing spaces that help us to meet and overcome them.
What fascinates Doyle, and what he writes about with great insight, is the idea of the garden as a highly dynamic, living entity that s in a state of constant flux yet still somehow endures, much like our own lives. The insightful lessons he s learned and shares in his book will ring true for many experienced gardeners   from the need to understand and respect that all-important sense of place, to how relinquishing that all-too-human desire for control can lead us to a much richer, deeper and more meaningful relationship with the natural world.
After 12 years of reimagining the one-acre ornamental gardens surrounding Lavistown House, he s learned to make room for what he describes as  spontaneous gorgeousness and moments of sublime takeover , and to take a deep delight in the  maverick touches provided by unexpected pairings .
Embracing the unexpected is something that Doyle discusses throughout his book with grace and good humour   from how he suffered from a period of deep depression after injury forced him to give up his earlier career as a jeweller, to how Storm Darwin in 2014 radically reshaped his early attempts at making a woodland garden at Lavistown by toppling 10 mature beech trees. Literally overnight he was presented with an entirely different landscape and set of growing conditions, a calamity which he doggedly turned into an opportunity to create a very different, contemporary gravel garden where sun-loving shrubs and perennials now flourish.
Evolution
 Over the last four years Doyle has also recorded the evolution of his garden on film with film-maker Alan Slattery, the edited version of which will be shown at a private screening at Rothe House in Kilkenny city at the end of this month, to coincide with the launch of his book. It will subsequently be available for public view via his website.
Both Maher s and Doyle s books point the way forward in terms of how radically Irish gardeners  attitudes to the art and craft of garden-making have changed over recent decades, most notably in our relationship with the natural world. We re less hidebound, less conventional, less authoritarian, and as a result far more interested in what Doyle aptly describes as a wildness of spirit. It s a way of gardening that could be described as a conversation with nature rather than a monologue, and because of which our gardens   and ourselves   are all the better.
 TJ Maher and Des Doyle s new books are available to order from their websites, patthanagardenireland.com and  gardenfable.com

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



THE SECRET AUDACITY THAT LIT FIRE OF PEACE; Denis Bradley's new book tells the inside story of the backchannel between the British government and the IRA that accelerated the ceasefire in Northern Ireland
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 4
Length: 2560 words
Body


Denis Bradley has a lot to say in his usual easy, imaginative and contemplative way   on politics, policing, the past, on faith and other matters. But there is no escaping that the main thrust of his just-published book, Peace Comes Dropping Slow, is the backchannel: the secret line of communication between the British government and the IRA that accelerated moves towards silencing the guns.
As we chat in the sittingroom of his lovely old Victorian home in Derry,  he  is anxious to stress that there is a lot more besides in his memoir   and there is a lot more   but the meat of the book is that covert link that stretched as far back as the early 1970s, and an act of audacity on his part that propelled the peace process forward.
The big moment is February 1993 when Martin McGuinness, the former IRA chief of staff who would become Sinn Féin s chief negotiator, conveyed a message through the backchannel of Bradley and Derry businessmen Brendan Duddy and Noel Gallagher, which supposedly read verbatim:  The conflict is over but we need your [British] advice on how to bring it to a close.
Most people would accept that however McGuinness might indicate an IRA willingness to parley, it would not be through such words. Still, those were the words that ended up in front of prime minister John Major.
 It would be tempting,  Bradley (now 78) writes in the book,  to claim that the letter was an especially clever subterfuge to get a match put to the fire, when in reality it simply reflected our desperation to get the fire lit.
Just stoking the embers took some nerve   and a degree of recklessness borne, as he says, out of  utter frustration    to put such a gloss on whatever McGuinness actually had said. But Bradley has no doubt that ending the violence is where McGuinness and the majority of the IRA leadership wanted to take the organisation at that time.
 You learn how to read things,  he says.  The role of a good interlocutor or a good intermediary or a good interpreter is to ideally not speak too often but to make a move every so often, which is based on a reading of the situation that other people can t read because they arein the situation.
It resulted in a very tricky meeting about 10 days later between the MI5 agent known as  Fred  and, in the way of spies, also known as Robert McLarnon or Colin Ferguson, and McGuinness and Gerry Kelly with the backchannel triumvirate in attendance. The meeting was nearly aborted because the deal was that Fred would be accompanied by some other senior British representative. Bradley had to use his diplomatic skills to ensure the discussion went ahead.
When it did he writes that Fred, who may have been acting without full authority, delivered a  tour de force  exposition that included a  journey through Anglo- Irish history , culminating in his requiring a two-week ceasefire from the IRA to get peace talks under way.
Fred, who said he was speaking on behalf of Major, also promised that a week into a two-week ceasefire negotiations could begin in Scotland or possibly Norway and that the head of the Northern Ireland Office, the late John Chilcot, would join the discussions after a few days.
This in turn resulted in another meeting solely with the backchannel in which McGuinness conveyed the IRA s willingness to hold a two-week ceasefire. Bradley recounts McGuinness taking out  scrunched-up pieces of paper  from his clothing on behalf of the IRA army council and dictating the words to Bradley to be forwarded to Fred and other spooks and senior politicians in London, while emphatically warning him:  Don t be changing any of this.
Beginning of talks
 There it was,  Bradley writes.  The two-week ceasefire demanded to allow for talks to begin. At that stage I wanted to stand up, clench my fist and shout  yes , the way golfers and winning football managers do. I didn t. I just smiled inwardly, and I think, although this might be retrospective and wishful thinking, I said a quiet prayer of thanksgiving.
Of course, it didn t run smoothly thereafter. Major s Tory government had a slim majority and he was fearful of upsetting the nine Ulster Unionist Party MPs whose votes could keep him in office. The British response to the IRA overture therefore was dilatory and tantamount to rejection.
But the fire was lit.
Overlapping with all this were the secret negotiations between SDLP leader John Hume and Sinn Féin s Gerry Adams, while newly installed taoiseach Albert Reynolds, against expectations, decided to make peace in Northern Ireland his No 1 priority. The backchannel briefed both Hume and Reynolds on what was happening. And while peace, as per Yeats s line and the book s title, did come dropping slow, cumulatively it all led a year and a half later to the first IRA ceasefire of August 1994 and to the definitive peace agreement of Good Friday 1998.
Bradley believes that Hume, who was under fierce pressure for dealing with Adams, was unaware of the backchannel. He writes that his learning of that separate effort to make peace  was akin to a water hydrant being supplied to a dehydrated man in a very large and hostile desert .
Privately, McGuinness let it be known that he received serious criticism from the  harder  IRA men about the initial letter. Bradley says he had not heard of McGuinness sustaining internal censure but wouldn t be surprised if he had. He chuckles and says:  I had no problem causing McGuinness grief.
His interpretation of McGuinness s words, he acknowledges, was indeed audacious but regardless he was  absolutely  convinced that was where McGuinness wanted to go. He also recalls   he thinks it was in 1989 or 1990, although in the book he more generally says it was the early 1990s   McGuinness coming to him and saying:  We need to make peace.
Bradley notes too how the level of IRA violence in Derry, where McGuinness s writ ran, diminished considerably around that time.  It s said that Derry went on ceasefire about three years before everyone else went on ceasefire.
One reason for writing the book, Bradley says, is to set the record as straight as possible. He wants the role of Noel Gallagher and himself to be equally as recognised as that of Brendan Duddy in terms of the backchannel.  I have a healthy ego,  he acknowledges.
Gallagher and Bradley get their place in the impressive academic book Deniable Contact by Niall Ó Dochartaigh, professor of political science and sociology at University College Galway. The book is based on the papers presented to the college by the late Brendan Duddy. Bradley feels that the main thrust of Ó Dochartaigh s work is on Duddy.
In any case Peace Comes Dropping Slow is a different work to Ó Dochartaigh s in that, as a player, it is written, as he says,  from the inside out rather than the outside in . He writes with a philosophical depth and a graceful style that puts one in mind of the great Reading in the Dark, by fellow Derry writer Seamus Deane.
The book is reflective and revelatory, imbued with a warm humanity, and ties up a lot of loose ends around the backchannel. Bradley also captures the pressures and tensions   the intrigue and paranoia at times   and the jealousies and little vanities between himself, Gallagher and Duddy, and between some of the other main characters involved in the peacemaking.
He particularly wants Gallagher s part in the backchannel recognised. He says his friend could be difficult and awkward but that they are  like brothers . Gallagher, he says, came into his own when dealing with Albert Reynolds and briefing him on how republicans were thinking, which helped in the shaping of the 1993 Downing Street Declaration, a vital part of the prelude to the ceasefires.
While living in Derry city for most of his life, Bradley actually is a native of Donegal, born in Illies near Buncrana on the Inishowen peninsula. The two areas are in any case intertwined.  Donegal has always been the salvation of Derry. It embraces us all and humanises us a bit,  he says.
He had a happy childhood, his mother running a guesthouse in Buncrana, his father driving a bus for the then Londonderry and Lough Swilly Railway Company. He was youngest of a family of eight, his sister Frances dying in childhood.
He was a boarder Derry s St Columb s College. One of his young teachers was Hume, who was inspiring and didn t use corporal punishment, common at the time. The book nonetheless recounts a few verbal scraps the pair had in later life, although there was mutual respect.
Bradley says nobody was more surprised than himself when at the end of school he decided to study for the priesthood, ending up at the Irish College in Rome.
Much of his work in Derry was in the largely working-class Long Tower parish. While a priest he also worked as a counsellor and set up shelters for the homeless and treatment centres for alcohol and drug addiction.
He was one of the priests on Bloody Sunday and was in Glenfada Park, in and from where concentrated shooting resulted in four of the 14 victims being killed. He remembers grabbing one of the soldiers, who pushed him aside, but isn t certain whether it was Soldier F, who is charged with two murders and five attempted murders   the only soldier to be charged.
He remembers too being  frogmarched  away by paratroopers when the shooting finally ceased until an officer intervened and ordered:  Let the padre go.  He s hated the word  padre  ever since. He recalls the shock and the silence and later sitting quietly in people s houses  by the coffins of those who had been shot .
 Litany of killings
Bradley was a curate during the worst of the Troubles and much of his parish work was dealing with  the litany of killings  in his small neighbourhood, or trying to prevent killings. There are a number of such stories in the book that, like his account of Bloody Sunday, may haunt the reader as they haunted the priest.
In one he tells of a gun battle between the IRA and British army in which three soldiers were wounded and two teenage republicans, Colm Keenan and Eugene McGillan, were shot dead. Bradley was called out to say the prayers of the dead over the two young men.
The following day a young British officer, a captain he thinks, called to the parochial house wanting to speak to Bradley about the shootings. He was convinced he had shot either Keenan or McGillan.  It was the first time he had killed someone, and he wanted, needed, to talk about it. I listened and he talked. He was very distressed about the shooting.
Similarly, on another occasion a British army bomb disposal soldier was killed in an explosion and again Bradley was called to pray over the  disjointed  body. He did not learn the name of the soldier until the Lost Lives book about the dead of the Troubles was published. He still regrets that he did not do more to find out the man s name and perhaps to tell his family he was there with him shortly after he died.
Soon after that killing he was approached to speak to another distressed young man.  He spoke very quietly and hesitantly and told me that he had set the bomb,  he recalls.  He had made bombs before, he continued, but he didn t think they had killed anyone. I sat with him for an hour, talked and drank a cup of tea. He was very shocked and emotional, but then so was I. I have no memory of what we talked about; I think there were long silences when we just sat and said nothing.
He didn t need convincing about the horror and futility of violence, but such incidents reinforced the need to try to end that violence, which resulted in his long association with the backchannel.
There were happier moments. One day a young English teacher, Mary Wilson, called asking for advice on how she might head off to Africa to do voluntary work. You could do such work, he told her, nearer to home assisting with his drug and rehabilitation projects. She accepted the challenge.
 I fell head over heels in love with her,  he says cheerfully. They are married 43 years, and have three children   Laura, a specialist cancer nurse in Manchester; Eoin, a political adviser to the Scottish National Party; and Tom, a financial adviser in Derry   and four grandchildre n.To his great relief Eoin and Tom are, like himself, diehard Derry City fans. Golf also is an escape.
As much as anybDody, Bradley is appalled at the sins of the Catholic Church but faith is important to him and so is the future direction of the church. He would still be a priest if he had had permission to marry.
He likes Pope Francis but worries about elements in the church who don t and want to take the church back to a more conservative place. He feels too that the absence of faith is creating a societal malaise.  I think that s beginning to be seen. If you are living in a world that is free of the transcendental it s a weird, weird, weird world.
His time as a priest and his dealings with the media gave him the confidence gradually to become a public figure, engaging in journalism with the likes of The Irish Times and the Irish News, which he still does, and also doing regular TV and radio work.
With the former Church of Ireland archbishop Robin Eames, Bradley headed the Consultative Group on the Past, which in 2009 provided the template for all future and so-far failed attempts to deal with the legacy and continuing trauma of the conflict.
Fifteen years on, legacy remains unresolved, with the latest legislation from the British government rejected by the Irish Government and most parties. Bradley says that if the British and Irish governments, acting in unison, had grasped this problem it could have been resolved years ago, and still could be settled.
His time as the first vice-chairman of the Northern Ireland Policing Board, formed in 2001 as part of the Patten proposals on police reform, with Prof Sir Desmond Rea as first chairman, proved more successful, although there was a price to pay.
Widespread backing
 Bradley and Rea, who quickly overcame an early spat between them, helped drive the agenda in gaining widespread backing for the newly created Police Service of Northern Ireland, with Sinn Féin in 2006 finally endorsing policing and joining the board.
But this work led to threats and attacks, the most serious of which was a dissident assault in 2005 in which he was battered by a masked man wielding a baseball bat while he was watching a soccer match in a pub in Derry.
The city rallied behind him. He recalls:  We had a couple of boys who came here one day to tell me who it was that did it. I didn t want to know. Some things are better not known. It s a bit like Confession, you just have to learn to forget.
As for the dissidents:  I wish they would go away, they are neither good to themselves, nor to anybody else.
Overall, Bradley says he is optimistic for the future and believes unionism should engage in a debate with nationalism on what comes next. He favours a united Ireland over time but a  unity that is resolved, not one that is imposed .
 Partition doesn t work, never has worked, never will work.
He concludes that two of the main political lessons he has learned in a long and eventful life is that true progress is made only when the British and Irish governments work well together and  that if you don t deal with the extremes then you don t deal with the issues .
 Denis Bradley s Peace Comes Dropping Slow: My Life in the Troubles is published by Merrion Press

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



The statues of O'Connell Street
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 201 words
Body


Sir,   Frank McNally s Irishman s Diary about the Fr Mathew statue on O Connell Street (April 11th) reminds me that at school I was taught a very clever way of remembering the statues in O Connell Street by reference to water. Nelson s Pillar was still there at that time, and the statue of Jim Larkin had not yet been erected. This is how the mnemonic goes: Daniel O Connell is looking into the water; William Smith O Brien was transported across water; Sir John Gray brought water to Dublin; Horatio Nelson fought all his battles on water; Fr Mathew wants us to drink nothing but water; and Charles Stewart Parnell got into hot water.   Yours, etc,
FELIX M LARKIN,
Cabinteely,
Dublin 18.
Sir,   Frank McNally s Irishman s Diary gives us an account of the various pieces missing from the statuary on O Connell Street, including Fr Mathew s thumb, which he located in the Little Museum of Dublin.
Perhaps he would be kind enough to apply his sleuthing skills to find the blade that formerly graced the sword held by the Winged Victory of Patriotism on the O Connell Monument. This has been missing for decades. I clearly remember it being present and correct in the 1980s.   Yours, etc,
DAVID POWER,
Lucan,
Co Dublin.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



The thorny question of devolution; Alvin Jackson explores the political underpinnings of home rule, from Ireland to Holland, from Norway to Austria-Hungary
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 26
Length: 1138 words
Body


In 1887, James Bryce, Ulster man and distinguished academic and author, published his Handbook  of Home Rule: Being Articles on the Irish Question. It was a serious statement of support for Gladstone s newly established policy of home rule for Ireland. It contains some fine essays on Irish realities. There was a notable analysis  by Earl Spencer, an exceptionally  experienced and intelligent occupant  of Dublin Castle and essential to the respectability of Gladstone s new  strategy:  The Irish peasantry still live in poor hovels, often in the same room with animals; they have few modern comforts; and yet they are in close communication with those who live at ease in the cities  and farms of the United States. They are also imbued with the advanced political notions of the American republic and are sufficiently educated to read the latest political doctrines in the press which circulates them. Their social condition at home is a hundred years behind their state of mental and political culture.
But these articles were not entirely discussions of Ireland as such. Rather Bryce s pro-Home Rule message included substantial chunks of discussion of  dual  monarchies (as opposed to the British unitary state model) such as Sweden- Norway and the Austro-Hungarian  Habsburg Empire. The message was constitutional flexibility in Europe worked and should provide in home rule a good future for Anglo-Irish relations.
In 2023, another Ulster man and  distinguished historian and author, Alvin Jackson, published a scholarly and lucid volume revisiting this terrain. As Jackson, the Richard Lodge, Professor of History at the University of Edinburgh, points out, WE Gladstone, the great Liberal premier, was a firm believer in the message of  the Bryce volume: it was proof of the irrefutable, benign logic of the historic compromise known as Home Rule.
In 1892, Gladstone wrote, as Jackson points out at the start of this book:
 Holland was asked for Home Rule by Belgium and refused it. Belgium is now independent of Holland . . . But Home Rule has often been conceded; and, as the denial has in no case been attended with success, so the concession has in no case been attended with a failure. Through the establishment of Home Rule in Norway  at a time when she was on the verge of an armed conflict with Sweden, they have been enabled to work peacefully together; and not only the sentiment of friendship, but even the sense of unity, has made extraordinary progress.
Gladstone went further and added another striking example:  The relations of Austria and Hungary forty years ago were not only difficult but sanguinary, and they constituted not simply a local but an European danger. Since Home Rule was granted, profound peace and union have prevailed.
There it is   a sure-fire formula for political success for a community faced with intractable problems of ethnicity, national identity and sometimes language. Jackson is far too serious a historian to  fall for this sunburstery and his careful, precise narrative describes, for example, the collapse of the Austro-Hungarian Empire. There are many subtle observations along the way:  Supranational aristocracies were not the sole, or even  the principal bolster of complex union polities . He adds:  It was not central to  the story of Sweden-Norway . But it is still striking, as Jackson points out, that the demise of both Austria-Hungary and the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Ireland was  immediately preceded  by the retreat of those powerful aristocratic interests which  in association with monarchy, had over served to bind their respective states .
Why did Gladstone get it quite so wrong? Part of the answer lies in his impatient way with inconvenient historical facts. But above all, there is a refusal to come to terms with hatred. He explicitly regarded the famine as an act of providence and this excused the UK government, and indeed his own subsequent role as chancellor  in the early 1850s. But the best-read nationalist of the 19th century, John Mitchel, insisted otherwise   that the Famine was indeed a conscious act of British genocide. Mitchel s influence penetrated many Irish households  and fuelled militant separatism   a  phenomenon which Gladstone never understood.
The author argues convincingly that fluidity and malleability are essential qualities for union states   certainly not rigid straight lines demarcating power flows. Living in Edinburgh, home of the Scottish parliament, for some years  now, Jackson has had plenty of time to contemplate actually  existing  devolution   with its striking failures, as in Wales,  in the fields of education and health. Although the end date for the book is  1925, Dr Jackson is a concerned citizen,  the last remaining item of his  select union chronology  is tellingly the Windsor Framework of February 2023.
When devolution in Scotland and Wales was introduced by Tony Blair in 1997, there was an overwhelming  Gladstonian  consensus in British politics. Speech after speech in the UK parliament declared that the Scottish movement for national independence was now marginalised or dead. The correct  Gladstonian  policy had now at least been taken. In fact,  of course, though the historic roots of Scottish nationalism are, to say the least, far weaker and less substantial than that  of Irish nationalism, the movement for Scottish independence has grown  substantially under devolution.
At this moment, Scottish nationalist politics is going through a leadership crisis and much embarrassment. But Jackson likely is much too experienced a scholar of the  long run  to be overly impressed by this. He has written well of Irish nationalism s agonies in 1890/1 at the time of the Parnell split   in the short-term debilitating, in the long run still retaining mass popular support. To go to the heart of the matter, he knows that the fascinating observation by Gladstone which he  employs to open this book is at best only partially true, even if it is also true that the UK has no alternative to devolution for its survival, as Jeffrey Donaldson recently noted at the DUP conference before he resigned after being charged with sexual offences.
There is perhaps one slip when the author refers to former British prime minister Margaret Thatcher s tendency  to lecture the Scots in Smilesian cliches . This is a little unfair to Samuel Smiles (1812-1904), apostle of self-help and opponent of Gladstonian Home Rule he undoubtedly was. He was capable of sympathising with Irish poverty and capable of praising as serious and   eloquent  a Cork speech by Parnell  which called for the  quick-witted genius of the Irish race  to be mobilised in support of economic and political progress. Was there any such act of imaginative intuition on the subject of Scottish nationalism  from Mrs Thatcher?

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



There used to be a ferocity to Dublin-Meath   now it isn't even competitive
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 5
Length: 1007 words
Body


The morning after Dublin picked up their first National League win this year, I was in the car heading for Kiltipper Road. I took the M50, came off at exit 12, and followed the road all the way up to the home ground of Thomas Davis.
It was mid-February and I was travelling to play in Ballymun s first league game of the season. The previous evening at Croke Park, Dublin had beaten Roscommon.
The consensus at the time was that Dublin needed to win that match after losing their opening two fixtures, but events from Croke Park certainly weren t my main focus of concern on the road to Tallaght.
The nervous energy was generated solely by a desire for us to start our league campaign competitively against Thomas Davis. Making my way across the city, with the Sunday morning traffic light and the club season about to get under way, everything about it felt right. My focus had changed, almost unknowingly.
When I retired from Dublin in January, I was content with the decision. Nothing in the months since has changed that feeling. I had my time. I still haven t watched last year s All-Ireland final.
And, to be honest, there were no pangs of regret this past week as Dublin prepared for tomorrow s championship opener against Meath. The Dublin-Meath rivalry used to be huge, but the reality is that during my senior intercounty career it didn t really exist.
I grew up in Garristown, right on the Dublin-Meath border, next to Ardcath. So, from a young age I was aware of the rivalry, the ferocity of it, the emotions it stirred in people, at times it was almost hatred among the supporters and indeed some of the players.
Dad got his collarbone broken in a collision with Liam Harnan during the 1986 Leinster final. The physicality of games between the counties during the 1980s and   90s was often brutal.
But that was then. Now? It s not even so much the lack of a rivalry, it s more that for years games between the counties have lacked competitiveness. I was on the bench in 2010 when Meath last beat Dublin. It was impossible to foresee the dramatically different trajectories both counties were about to embark upon.
Natural rivalry
Dublin versus Meath is a game that should feel different for Dublin players, but I don t think it does any longer. That kind of edge for Dublin players now comes when they play Mayo or Kerry or indeed Derry   competitiveness between teams breeds a natural rivalry.
Dublin have largely swatted aside Meath teams for more than a decade at this stage. The average winning margin in championship games between the sides since 2010 is slightly more than 11 points.
And yet every time we went out to play them there was a kind of Meath stubbornness about the players, in many ways tradition had hard-wired them to believe they always had a shot. But the games mostly took the same course, Dublin building an insurmountable lead and putting the outcome beyond doubt well before full-time.
I have no doubt Meath will arrive in Croke Park on Sunday believing this will be the day they turn it around, but I am interested to see if they can bring a level of maturity and game-smarts that hasn t always been visible in recent years.
Meath have a dangerous full-forward line in James Conlon, Mathew Costello and Jordan Morris. Dublin will have to go man to man with those three and that will create opportunities for Colm O Rourke s men. Because those forwards need to be followed, it will provide chances for the trio to manipulate the Dublin defenders in ways to create space for Meath runners to break in behind.
I think they are going to have to score three or four goals to win, and their return of 3-19 against Longford   2-18 from play   was impressive. The concern would be in the concession of 3-12 at Pearse Park, especially when seven days later you are playing Dublin in the wide open spaces of Croke Park.
If Meath need goals to win, then on the flip side, should Dublin snatch an early goal or two, then it will be a difficult afternoon for the men in green.
Dublin played a very high pressing game in the league final against Derry, which brings its risks, and obviously Mickey Harte and Gavin Devlin had done a huge amount of work to develop a kickout strategy which aimed for most of their long restarts to be put on top of the smaller guys in Dublin s half-back line.
Derry looked to get flick-ons and at times, from a Dublin perspective, it was too easy for them to generate goalscoring chances. Both teams will have learned a lot from the league final.
Playing that high press in future, Dublin will need to shore up their defence when opposition kickouts do go long. I d imagine a lot of focus on the training pitch has been put on that over the last fortnight   working on the breaking ball, spotting the ghost runners in behind and tagging players breaking to ensure there are no needless goal chances allowed.
And while the league final won t define Dublin s season, and they will be mostly encouraged with how their campaign went, I d imagine losing that game would have hurt the lads.
Right wrongs
Dublin haven t won a Division One final since 2018 (the title was shared in 2021), so it was a medal they would have wanted to win. I believe the short break provides them with an ideal opportunity to get back to Croke Park, try to right a few wrongs from that league final and put their season back on track.
Brian Fenton s suspension is a disappointment for Dublin and it will give confidence to Meath, but I m not sure it s going to be enough to tilt the balance, or anything like that. Dessie Farrell might try use Fenton s absence as a chance to get 45-50 minutes of game-time into James McCarthy around the middle of the field.
I ll be hoping to get game-time myself this evening when Ballymun are at home to Clontarf in the league.
I m a former intercounty footballer now, and that s fine. I m 34 and it s almost like my club career is starting afresh. If the body allows, I ll try hang in here until I m 40.
The championship starts for Dublin this weekend. The league continues for Ballymun.
The show goes on.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



This week's soccer fixtures
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 8
Length: 974 words
Body


Last night s results  LEAGUE OF IRELAND   Premier Division:  Drogheda Utd 2 Derry City 2; Dundalk 0 St Patrick s Athletic 0; Shamrock Rovers 3 Sligo Rovers 0; Shelbourne 1 Bohemians 2; Waterford 0 Galway Utd 0. First Division   Athlone Town 1 Finn Harps 0; Cobh Ramblers 2 Wexford 4; Treaty Utd 0 Kerry FC 0; UCD 0 Cork City 0. IRISH LEAGUE   Premiership: Crusaders 1 Linfield 2.
ENGLISH LEAGUE   Championship:  Plymouth 1 Leicester 0. SCOTTISH CHAMPIONSHIP   Morton 1 Dundee Utd 4. SPANISH LA LIGA   Real Betis 2 Celta Vigo 1.  GERMAN BUNDESLIGA   Augsburg 2 Union Berlin 0.  ITALIAN SERIE A   Lazio 4 Salernitana 1.
Saturday
ENGLISH PREMIER LEAGUE   AFC Bournemouth v Manchester Utdl Brentford v Sheff Utd; Burnley v Brighton; Manchester City v Luton; Newcastle v Tottenham Hotspur; Nottm Forest v Wolverhampton.
ENGLISH LEAGUE   Championship: Birmingham v Coventry; Bristol City v Huddersfield; Hull v QPR; Ipswich v Middlesbrough; Leeds v Blackburn; Millwall v Cardiff; Preston North End v Norwich; Sheff Wed v Stoke; Southampton v Watford; Swansea v Rotherham; West Brom v Sunderland.  League One   Barnsley v Reading; Bolton v Portsmouth; Cambridge Utd v Charlton; Carlisle v Blackpool; Cheltenham v Bristol Rovers; Derby v Leyton Orient; Fleetwood Town v Northampton; Lincoln City v Wigan; Oxford Utd v Peterborough; Port Vale v Exeter; Shrewsbury v Wycombe; Stevenage v Burton Albion.  League Two   Crawley Town v Colchester; Crewe v Grimsby; Doncaster v Accrington Stanley; Gillingham v Barrow; Harrogate Town v Sutton Utd; Milton Keynes Dons v Mansfield; Newport County v Tranmere; Salford City v Bradford; Stockport County v Morecambe; Swindon v AFC Wimbledon; Walsall v Notts County; Wrexham v Forest Green.
SCOTTISH PREMIERSHIP   Aberdeen v Dundee; Celtic v St Mirren; Hearts v Livingston; Motherwell v Hibernian; St Johnstone v Kilmarnock.
SCOTTISH CHAMPIONSHIP   Airdrieonians v Dunfermline; Ayr v Arbroath; Queen s Park v Inverness CT; Raith v Partick. League Two  : Alloa v Montrose; Annan Athletic v Cove Rangers; Hamilton v Falkirk; Kelty Hearts v Stirling; Queen of South v Edinburgh City. League Two   Dumbarton v Clyde; East Fife v Bonnyrigg Rose; Peterhead v Forfar; Spartans v Stranraer; Stenhousemuir v Elgin. IRISH LEAGUE   Premiership: Carrick v Ballymena Utd; Coleraine v Glentoran; Larne v Cliftonville; Loughgall v Glenavon; Newry v Dungannon Swifts.
Division One   Ards v Newington; Ballinamallard Utd v Dergview; Ballyclare v Knockbreda; Dundela v Bangor FC; Institute v Annagh Utd; Portadown v H & W Welders.
SSE AIRTRICITY LEAGUE   First Division: Longford Town v Bray. SPANISH LA LIGA   Atlético Madrid v Girona; Rayo Vallecano v Getafe; Mallorca v Real Madrid; Cádiz v Barcelona.
GERMAN BUNDESLIGA   Mainz v Hoffenheim; Borussia Mönchengladbach v Borussia Dortmund; Bayern Munich v Cologne; RB Leipzig v Wolfsburg; Bochum v Heidenheim; Stuttgart v Eintracht Frankfurt.
ITALIAN SERIE A   Lecce v Empoli; Torino
v Juventus; Bologna v Monza. WOMEN S LEAGUE OF IRELAND   Premier Division: Shelbourne FC v Shamrock Rovers; DLR Waves v Cork City; Treaty United v Sligo Rovers; Galway United v Bohemians; Athlone Town AFC v Peamount United.
Sunday
ENGLISH PREMIER LEAGUE   Arsenal v Aston Villa; Liverpool v Crystal Palace; West Ham v Fulham.
SCOTTISH PREMIERSHIP   Ross County v Rangers.
ENGLISH FA WOMEN S SUPER LEAGUE   Arsenal v Bristol City.
ENGLISH WOMEN S FA CUP   Semi-final: Mancehster Utd v Chelsea; Tottenham Hotspur v Leicester. SPANISH LA LIGA   Las Palmas v Sevilla; Granada v Alavés; Athletic Bilbao v Villarreal; Real Sociedad v Almería.
GERMAN BUNDESLIGA   Darmstadt v Freiburg; Bayer Leverkusen v Werder Bremen.
ITALIAN SERIE A   Napoli v Frosinone; Sassuolo v AC Milan; Udinese v Roma; Inter Milan v Cagliari.
Monday
ENGLISH PREMIER LEAGUE   Chelsea v Everton. SSE AIRTRICITY LEAGUE   Premier Division: Bohemians v Dundalk.
 SPANISH LA LIGA   Osasuna v Valencia.
ITALIAN SERIE A   Fiorentina v Genoa; Atalanta v Hellas Verona
Tuesday
UEFA CHAMPIONS LEAGUE   Quarter-final, second leg: Barcelona v PSG; Borussia Dortmund v Atletico Madrid.
ENGLISH LEAGUE   Championship: Southampton v Preston North End.  League One   Bolton v Shrewsbury; Bristol Rovers v Cambridge Utd; Burton Albion v Cheltenham; Oxford Utd v Lincoln City; Peterborough v Fleetwood Town; Port Vale v Wycombe; Portsmouth v Barnsley.  League Two   Colchester v Grimsby; Crawley Town v Barrow; Mansfield v Accrington Stanley; Notts County v Stockport County; Walsall v Swindon.
SCOTTISH League One   Edinburgh City v Montrose.
IRISH LEAGUE   Premiership: Ballymena Utd v Glenavon; Crusaders v Cliftonville; Dungannon Swifts v Loughgall; Glentoran v Larne; Linfield v Coleraine; Newry v Carrick.
Division One   Ards v Ballyclare; Dergview v H & W Welders.
SSE AIRTRICITY LEAGUE   First Division: Wexford v Longford Town  Wednesday
UEFA CHAMPIONS LEAGUE   Quarter-final, second leg: Bayern Munich (3) v Arsenal (3); Manchester City (2) v Real Madrid (2).
Thursday
UEFA EUROPA CONFERENCE LEAGUE   Quarter-final,second leg: Fenerbahce v Olympiacos; Fiorentina v Plzen; Lille v Aston Villa; PAOK v Club Brugge.
UEFA EUROPA LEAGUE   Quarter-final, second leg   Atalanta v Liverpool; Marseille v Benfica; Roma v AC Milan; West Ham v Bayer Leverkusen.
Friday
ENGLISH LEAGUE   League One: Oxford Utd v Stevenage.
SCOTTISH CHAMPIONSHIP   Inverness CT v Raith.
SSE AIRTRICITY LEAGUE   Premier Division: Bohemians v Drogheda Utd; Derry City v Shamrock Rovers; Galway Utd v Shelbourne; Sligo Rovers v Dundalk; St Patrick s Athletic v Waterford.
First DivIsion   Bray Wanderers v Treaty Utd; Cobh Ramblers v Finn Harps; Cork City v Longford Town; Kerry FC v Athlone Town; Wexford v UCD.
IRISH EAGUE   Premiership: Linfield v Larne.
SPANISH LA LIGA   Athletic Bilbao v Granada.
GERMAN BUNDESLIGA   Eintracht Frankfurt v FC Augsburg.
ITALIAN SERIE A   Genoa v Lazio; Cagliari v
Juventus.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Tipp set to test Galway
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 5
Length: 372 words
Body


Galway have enjoyed considerable success in the league since Cathal Murray took over the reins.
This is their fifth consecutive final   the competition went unfinished due to Covid in 2020   and they are attempting to secure a fourth title in that period and a three-in-a-row.
They have recovered from losing to Tipp at The Ragg, when Eimear McGrath plundered a hat-trick by keeping clean sheets against Kilkenny, Waterford and Cork with Róisín Black an inspirational captain at full-back and erstwhile attacker Áine Keane making a big splash at centre-back.
Carrie Dolan has excelled both from placed balls and in the loose, while Annmarie Starr has re-established herself at midfield after a lengthy absence.
Niamh Kilkenny and Niamh Hanniffy are back in the fold while youngsters Ciara Hickey, Ally Hesnan and Niamh Niland have made an impact, and former Down superstar, Niamh Mallon is now a member of the squad.
It was momentous for Tipp to finally make a national final for the first time since the 2009 league decider.
They are attempting to win a first title since their double-winning season of 2004. It would be a third Very League Division 1A crown were they to succeed. Galway are in pursuit of an eighth.
Denis Kelly s crew lost their opening tie to Waterford but followed up with wins over Galway, Cork, Kilkenny and Clare to make it this far, so it is well deserved.
 They have done so despite being without long-time talisman Cáit Devane, who got married recently, but Karen Kennedy s return from injury has been significant.
Clodagh McIntyre and Karin Blair have blossomed in new defensive roles but it is McGrath who has really taken up the baton.
Another interesting element of this tie is the presence of the Ferncombe brothers on the opposite coaching tickets. Dinny, who spent a number of years with Tipp, has joined Galway while Michael is now in the Premier corner.
There is a lot at stake here and one suspects the result will be in doubt right up to the final whistle.
Today Division 1B League final    Wexford v Dublin, SETU, Carlow, 2.0; Division 3A final    Laois v Armagh, Abbottstown, 2.0 .  Divison 4 final   Wicklow v Tyrone, Darver, 2.0.  Tomorrow Division 2A final    Derry v Westmeath, Croke Park, 12.30

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



TV weekend
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 444 words
Body


Saturday (Apr 13th)
TRIATHLON  Eurosport 1, 7am-11.30am
Singapore  T100 World Tour event
SOCCER   TNT Sports 1 (Premier League)
12.30pm   Newcastle Utd v Tottenham
SOCCER   Sky Sports Football
12.30pm   C: Leeds Utd v Blackburn
RUGBY   TNT Sports 3 (Challenge Cup)
12.30pm   Clermont v Ulster
SOCCER  LaLigaTV & Premier 2 (La Liga)
1pm    Atlético Madrid v Girona
RACING   UTV & VM One, 2pm-5pm
Aintree   Inc the Grand National
SOCCER   Premier 1 (Premier League)
3pm   Man City v Luton Town
SOCCER   TNT Sports 4 (Serie A)
5pm   Torino v Juventus
RUGBY   BBC 1 (Women s 6N)
2.15pm   Scotland v England
RUGBY  TNT Sports 3 (Champions Cup)
3pm   Bordeaux v Harlequins
GOLF   Sky Sports Golf, 3pm-0.30am
Augusta   The Masters
RUGBY   VM Two (Women s 6N)
4.45pm   Ireland v Wales
RUGBY   RTÉ 2 & TNT Sports 3
   Champions Cup Quarter-final
5.30pm   Leinster v La Rochelle
SOCCER   Sky Sports Premier League
5.30pm   Bournemouth v Man Utd
SOCCER   LaLigaTV & Premier 1 (La Liga)
5.30pm   Mallorca v Real Madrid
8pm   Cádiz v Barcelona
GAA   BBC 2 (Ulster SFC) 6pm   Down v Antrim
TRIATHLON  Eurosport 1, 6.30pm-9pm
London   Super League
SOCCER   TG4 (Women s PD)
7.15pm   Athlone v Peamount Utd
RUGBY  TNT Sports 3 (Champions Cup)
8pm   Northampton v Bulls
 Sunday (Apr 14th)
BOXING   Sky Sports Action from 2am
Texas   J Anderson v R Merhy
UFC    TNT Sports 1 from 3am
Las Vegas  A Pereira v J Hill
TRIATHLON  Eurosport 1, 8am-noon
Singapore  T100 World Tour event
TENNIS   Sky Sports Tennis, 11am-4pm
ATP    Monte Carlo Masters Final
SOCCER   Sky Sports Football
Noon   SP: Ross County v Rangers
CYCLING  Eurosport 1, noon-4.15pm
One-day races Amstel Gold Race
SOCCER   BBC 2 (Women s FA Cup)
Noon   Tottenham v Leicester
RUGBY   TNT Sports 1
   Challenge Cup Quarter-final
12.30pm   Benetton v Connacht
CAMOGIE  RTÉ 2 (League finals)
12.30pm   2A: Derry v Westmeath
2.30pm   1A: Galway v Tipperary
RUGBY   VM2 & BBC RB (Women s 6N)
12.30pm   France v Italy
BASKETBALL TG4 (Super League)
2pm   Women: Killester v Wildcats 4.30pm   Men: Éanna v Killester
SOCCER   Sky Sports Premier League
2pm   Liverpool v Crystal Palace
4.30pm   Arsenal v Aston Villa
GAA   BBC 2 (Ulster SFC) 2pm   Fermanagh v Armagh
SOCCER   BBC 1 (Women s FA Cup)
2.35pm   Man Utd v Chelsea
RUGBY   TNT Sports 1 & ITV (C Cup)
3pm   Toulouse v Exeter
GOLF   Sky Sports Golf, 3pm-0.30am
Augusta   The Masters
GAA   RTÉ 2 (Leinster SFC)
4.30pm   Dublin v Meath
SOCCER   Sky Sports Mix (Bundesliga)
4.30pm   B Leverkusen v W Bremen
RUGBY   BBC 2 (Challenge Cup)
4.30pm   St Helens v Warrington
SOCCER   Sky Football & Showcase
6.45pm   WSL: Arsenal v Bristol City
MOTOGP  TNT Sports 2 from 7.15pm
Austin   GP of the Americas
SOCCER   TNT Sports 1 (Serie A)
7.45pm   Inter Milan v Cagliari

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Two men hit by car on M9 hard shoulder in critical condition
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 229 words
Body


Two men who were hit by a car as they stood on the hard shoulder of the M9 motorway after their vehicle had broken down remain in a critical condition in hospital.
Gardaí are appealing for witnesses to the incident which occurred on the M9 southbound close to Danesfort, Co Kilkenny between junctions 8 and 9 at 7.35pm on Thursday.
The men, who are in their 30s, were taken to University Hospital Waterford where they are said to be seriously injured. The male driver of the second car is receiving treatment for injuries at St Luke s General Hospital in Co Kilkenny.
Inspector Paul Donohue said the men  weren t actually driving a car at the time of the collision. They were outside the vehicle on the hard shoulder on the motorway as their car had broken down.
In a statement, gardaí said:  The M9 remained closed for several hours between Junction 8 (Kilkenny) and Junction 9 (Kilkenny South).
 A technical examination of the scene was conducted by Garda Forensic Collision Investigators.
Anyone with information in relation to the incident is asked to contact Thomastown Garda station on 056 775 4150, the Garda Confidential Line on 1800 666 111, or any Garda station.
Meanwhile, a second stretch of the M9 was closed for a time yesterday morning following another crash. The incident occurred northbound between Junctions 4 and 3, Castledermot and Athy, Co Kildare.
  SARAH SLATER

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Tánaiste now leading a more settled party; Vast majority of existing Fianna Fáil deputies will be standing for re-election
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 748 words
Body


If you scroll back two years, most TDs in Fianna Fáil would have predicted with a fair degree of accuracy the narrative of the early months of 2024.
The party would continue to struggle in opinion polls. There would be a change of leader. A fresh face from a new generation would emerge to revitalise the party in advance of the local and European elections and then lead them into the general election.
And it all came to pass. Except it happened for Fine Gael, not Fianna Fáil.
The party with seemingly continuous leadership issues since 2010 has persevered with its leader, while the party which seemingly had an anchored structure now has a new leader charged with reversing Fine Gael s wane.
Fianna Fáil will go into this summer s elections with a leader who has been in situ for 13 years and arguably as dominant as Bertie Ahern was at the party s helm.
All the predictions of Micheál Martin being eased out   that we have heard periodically over the past decade   have come to nothing.
By the summer of last year, most Fianna Fáil TDs had come around to the view that not only would Martin not be stepping down any time soon, but he would be leading the party into the next general election.
There was no dramatic showdown. It just happened in the way rust happens. Fianna Fáil TDs and Senators might sometimes struggle to distinguish the party from others but it is in a far more settled place than Fine Gael has been.
Unlike its Coalition partner which will face into the general election without a third of its sitting TDs, the vast majority of existing Fianna Fáil deputies will be standing for re-election.
 We are in a bit of bother,  a Fianna Fáil TD who has experienced the slings and arrows of high office confided several months ago.  But we are in a better place than Fine Gael.
That said, the party s opinion poll ratings have been mediocre but there is a view in the ranks that there are  silent  Fianna Fáilers and the true level of its support is a little higher.
The first true test of that will be the forthcoming local and European elections. This weekend s ardfheis in the Royal Convention Centre in Dublin is very much focused towards those elections
Ardfheiseanna have long been a vehicle to allow parties to showcase policies, messages and candidates to the public, especially when an election is dawning.
The schedule features ministers highlighting all the party s main policy areas: building more homes; safer streets; rural Ireland; financial stability; and the disability sector. There is no reference to climate change or immigration on the agenda.
Indeed the only motions relate to foreign affairs and defence, and the continuing debate within the party on neutrality.
Fianna Fáil might have been a little more sure-footed than Fine Gael of late. But Simon Harris s arrival could change the dynamic, certainly in the short term, for the June elections. In reality, too, both have been lagging well behind Sinn Féin   and Independents for that matter.
Fianna Fáil gained 12 council seats in the local elections in 2019 to win 279. It will be hard-pressed to repeat that performance now, especially given the reality that Sinn Féin   which lost half its 160 seats in 2019   will double its tally, and then some.
Expect the focus of Fianna Fáil this weekend to be on the European elections, which have more potential for claiming a win. The choice of Dublin as the location is very much geared towards sitting MEP Barry Andrews, who will be in a dogfight to retain his seat in the capital. Billy Kelleher should be expected to hold his seat. And in Midlands North West, having Barry Cowen on the ticket should give the party its first seat in that constituency for a decade.
Getting three MEPs elected would be portrayed as a win, although there are slim hopes that Lisa Chambers or Niall Blaney in Midlands North West or Cynthia Ní Mhurchú in South could pull a rabbit out of a hat.
It looks unlikely to be Martin s last ardfheis. His colleagues now believe he won t go to Europe and will lead the party into the next election.
It s hard to see the party regaining its once-dominant position in Irish politics but, for now, it s not slipping into irrelevance. It also needs to be able to show much stronger gains on its two big promises for this Government: building more homes and improving health services.
Another big quandary will come when Martin eventually steps down as leader because unlike in Fine Gael, there is no obvious successor. And that could cause problems.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Ulster's semi-final hopes given lift as Henderson and Kitshoff are fit to start
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 419 words
Byline: MICHAEL SADLIER
Body


MICHAEL SADLIER  Uplifted but presumably not beguiled by the nature of their triumph in Montpellier, Ulster will still feel they have a decent shot at making the Challenge Cup s last four when they rack up at Clermont.
With their hosts located in a far from comfortable spot in the Top 14 table   they sit just four points above one from bottom Montpellier   there is a certain optimism that Richie Murphy s squad can profit from Clermont s rather more pressing domestic issues.
Though their win over Montpellier was predicated on the home team having Paul Willemse red carded ahead of two virtually simultaneous yellow cards, ensuring that Ulster faced just 12 opponents for a period of the second half, there have nevertheless been signs of recovery in terms of what Ulster are bringing to their work under Murphy.
No bad thing considering all the tumult which has surrounded the northern province in recent times and their cause at Clermont will have been improved by the fitness of skipper Iain Henderson and that of the soon to depart Steven Kitshoff, both of whom start.
Breakdown
Harry Sheridan is one of two changes to the team which   took to the park at Montpellier, Michael Lowry the other alteration as he comes onto the wing.
With Ulster s breakdown in need of urgent repair along with the need for extra physical presence, Sheridan will be expected to put himself about while a 6-2 bench split has both Dave Ewers and Marcus Rea poised to get to work when required.
Much will also hinge on how Ulster s also at times vulnerable-looking set piece holds up. Should it be in ruder health then there is scope for Nathan Doak to further grow into his new role at outhalf and for them to deploy Stuart McCloskey s game-breaking talents, not to mention the attacking edge of a rejuvenated Robert Baloucoune.
This is an ideal opportunity for Ulster give it a go  while not being burdened by considerable expectation.
CLERMONT: A Newsome; B Delguy, L Darricarrere, J Heriteau, A Raka; A Belleau, B Jauneau (capt); G Beria, Y Beheregaray, R Slimani  T Lanen, T Lavanini; K Tixeront, P Yato, P-G Sowakula. Replacements: E Fourcade, D-B Biziwu, G Dzmanashvili, R Simmons, A Fischer, S Bezy, T Giral, J Jurand. ULSTER: S Moore; R Baloucoune, J Hume, S McCloskey, M Lowry; N Doak, J Cooney; S Kitshoff, R Herring, T O Toole, A O Connor, I Henderson (capt); H Sheridan, David McCann, N Timoney. Replacements: T Stewart, A Warwick, S Wilson, C Izuchukwu, D Ewers, J Flannery, E McIlroy, Marcus Rea. Referee: C Ridley (England)

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Voices of the abused and the abandoned
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 18
Length: 560 words
Body


 Irish people have an awful habit of brushing things under the carpet,  says  Mary Norris, who was sent  to a Magdalene laundry for going to the cinema without permission.   Don t talk about it; it will go away.
But Norris talks about it. She tells us how she was examined by a doctor to determine whether she was a virgin. She tells us how she worked cleaning linens for Harrods, in London, for which, rather than being paid, she was given  marks  that could be used for things such as toothpaste and soap. She talks about the lack of laughter and jokes in the laundry, where companionship was discouraged. She talks about losing two years of her life there.
Norris s is one of several voices we  hear in The Magdalenes and I, a new podcast about people who spent years  in institutions run by Irish nuns, abused and abandoned by society, and about one young man who took up their cause.
Steven O Riordan was in his early 20s, studying in Bath in England, when he first heard about the laundries, introduced through The Magdalene Sisters, Peter Mullan s 2002 film. He couldn t square what he was seeing with his view of the modern, progressive Ireland he had grown up in. So he went home and took to the internet, scanning for news and information. That s how he found out that the bodies of 133 women who had died at a laundry had been exhumed and cremated, to be reinterred in a common grave in Glasnevin Cemetery. Only one of the bodies was claimed by relatives.
There s a poignant moment in this podcast when O Riordan reads the list of women in that initial 133, many of them unknown, unidentified, forgotten. All of these women had died in a laundry, largely abandoned by their families and their country. The dates of their burials range over the past century, making clear how long these laundries operated and how many women lived and, often, died in them.
That s where O Riordan s documentary The Forgotten Maggies, from 2009, began. In this new podcast he draws heavily from the footage and interviews he recorded while making it, interspersed with commentary about its genesis and how he found his interview subjects. It s an uneven approach, and although much of value is laid out in short episodes, it feels as if the podcast hasn t quite figured out its throughline yet. Is the subject the film-maker or the women? It s not a tidy story, with bursts of audio and jumping timelines, but it s compelling nonetheless, in large part because of the women O Riordan tracked down and the stories they told him.
Maureen Sutton was 12 when she was put in a laundry after the death of her father. She slept in an industrial school and worked in the laundry by day, a fact that should have made her eligible for State compensation. In an extraordinary recording, we hear a meeting she and O Riordan had with the Good Shepherd nuns who ran the laundry and who gaslit Sutton about her memories.
 For your own sake, Maureen,  the nun on tape says as she urges her to abandon her claim to have slept in St Aidan s while working at the laundry. But Sutton doesn t let it go, and nor does O Riordan: that s the value in The Magdalenes and I. It s a messy story about our messy past, and what it lacks in narrative shape it makes up for in the raw truth of the stories told.  Nobody wanted to listen to us,  says Mary King. But O Riordan did, and so should all of us. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Vote on elected Dublin mayor in June unlikely; People in Limerick city and county will vote on directly elected mayor in June
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 547 words
Byline: CORMAC McQUINN
Body


CORMAC McQUINN Political Correspondent   No plans have been made  for Dubliners to go to the polls alongside other elections in June to decide if they want a directly elected mayor for the capital, the Department of Local Government has said.
The day of the local and European elections had been mooted at a Cabinet meeting last year as a likely date for the plebiscite to be held.
However, with eight weeks to go until polling day on June 7th for the local and European elections the chances of a plebiscite being held at that stage appear slim.
The department is still considering reports on the proposed new office, drawn up by the Citizens  Assembly on local government in Dublin and the Oireachtas Committee on Housing and Local Government.
A spokeswoman said:  The Government will, in due course, consider and publish its response to the recommendations of the Dublin Citizens  Assembly as such no plans have been made to hold a plebiscite in June.
People in Limerick city and county will have the opportunity to choose Ireland s first directly elected mayor on June 7th. A successful 2019 plebiscite saw voters in Limerick approve the creation of the office. Similar proposals on creating such a role in Cork and Waterford were defeated.
Executive powers
The Dublin Citizens  Assembly voted in favour of creating a powerful new mayor with wide-ranging responsibilities in 15 policy areas including housing, homelessness, community healthcare, transport, the environment and emergency services. Six other areas including policing, water and education were recommended to be devolved after five to 10 years.
The role would incorporate the ceremonial activities of all four mayors of the four existing local authorities in the capital but the office holder would also have executive powers.
The assembly s report was published in January of last year and the Oireachtas committee subsequently examined its recommendations and produced its own report last December. Members endorsed the proposals for a directly elected mayor  to provide stronger and more effective government for Dublin .
Concerns
It said a plebiscite would bring  great democratic legitimacy to the mayoral role  and endorsed the holding of such a vote this year along with the publication of a detailed outline of the legislation to create the office in advance.
The committee s report says the assembly expressed hesitance about delaying a plebiscite with concerns that  a plebiscite needs to be put to the people of Dublin in June 2024 during the local and European elections, otherwise it will not happen .
However, the committee s report, while supporting the idea of a plebiscite taking place at some point in this year, also said it  could be run anytime in the next 23 months when many elections are expected to take place .
The job of directly elected mayor of Limerick will come with a salary of some EUR 154,000 and a budget of EUR 8 million a year to be spent on projects and initiatives. The most significant power the mayor will have is proposing the annual budget for Limerick City and County Council, though this will still have to be approved by councillors.
The mayor will also propose the five-year local development plan and will have access to cabinet ministers via a set number of meetings each year.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Weather warriors
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 28
Length: 494 words
Body


Dressing for the elements in transitional months is never easy. Coats for the unsettled weather conditions of spring are often found lacking: they re too light, too heavy, not waterproof or not warm enough. And while Irish designers are stellar players in knitwear and textiles, few of our best known names have made their mark with fashionable rainwear.
As for the looks themselves, the favourites that endure tend to originate from utilitarian sources   there s the gender-fluid trenchcoat (find linen ones in Marks & Spencer, EUR 110; more modern hooded variations at Cos, EUR 225, and any number of inexpensive secondhand Burberrys on Vestiare); Barbour waxed jacket (Arnotts and elsewhere); and the ubiquitous parka.
Irish designers are surely missing opportunities when you consider the number of Scandinavian brands with their welded or taped seams that cater for wet days and unpredictable weather.
The latest one to set up in Dublin is Rains, Denmark s leader in elevating functional design, but the company joins many other specialist brands stocked throughout the country, such as Stutterheim, Ilse Jacobsen, Norwegian Rain and Brgn.
It s time for rethinking and modernising sou westers perhaps and the best, like the Norwegian Helly Hansen, are usually to be found in outdoor shops specialising in protective wear for hiking, sailing and skiing.
The British brand Sweaty Betty, also recently opened in Dublin, offers waterproof parkas and jackets from EUR 130. Rains also offers waterproof backpacks.
At home Irish brand Jack Murphy includes weatherproof jackets and coats in its collection of durable tweeds, like its Malvern full-length caped coat, EUR 185, and practical rainhats. Stable of Ireland have very stylish macs in a range of colours for men and women, while Macintosh by Francis Campelli on Dublin s South William Street has a history of double textured cotton outerwear going back to 1889. Its online site includes cotton and leather satchels. Anna Guerin at The Landskein is also developing a range of trenchcoats.
As for other accessories, designer Clare O Connor, originally a graphic designer turned fine artist, has brought a new sense of artistry and vibrancy to her eco-friendly umbrellas, having already established a luxury scarf collection. Her umbrellas are now stocked in James Smith & Sons, the oldest umbrella shop in London.
O Connor recently won a residency in France with the Enniskillen gallery Hambly & Hambly, where, in due course, designs from her new paintings will transfer into accessories and what she calls her  wearables .
Fashion has always been about changing trends and styles, but global warming imposes its own demands, and the seasons no longer conform to traditional expectations. We might find ourselves wrapped up in winter woollies and weatherproof outerwear for a little longer this year. l
While Irish  designers are stellar players in knitwear, few of our best  have made a  mark with fashionable rainwear

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



West's wild swimming pool passion; Actor Dominic West built a naturally filtered pool at his Cotswolds home. Now he has plans for another at Glin Castle in Co Limerick
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: NO SECTION; Pg. 2
Length: 1079 words
Body


As a Bafta-award-winning actor, Dominic West is known for the diversity of roles he s played over his long and successful career, from the tragic Jean Valjean in the BBC 1 adaptation of Les Misérables, to the former Prince Charles in the Netflix series The Crown, the troubled writer Noah Solloway in the Sky Atlantic series The Affair and the anti-hero Jimmy McNulty in HBO s The Wire.
But the actor also has a hidden talent   building his own wild swimming pool.
West is married to the Irish garden designer Catherine FitzGerald, who he met while studying at Trinity College Dublin, and they have four children: Dora, Senan, Francis and Christabel (Senan played a young Prince William in Season 5 of the Crown). The couple split their time between their family homes in the Cotswolds and London, as well as FitzGerald s ancestral home, Glin Castle in Co Limerick. The couple acquired the home following the death of FitzGerald s father Desmond, the 29th Knight of Glin.
It s at their Cotswold home that West, who is soon to reprise the role of Eddie in Arthur Miller s A View from the Bridge on London s West End in May,first discovered his love of natural swimming pools. Here, he masterminded the creation of a very large and exceptionally beautiful one in its large country garden, just months before the pandemic made so many people around the world enviously dream of doing something similar.
A famous actor builds a swimming pool . . . what s new about that? some might say. To which the answer is, that West s pool is nothing like your conventional Hollywood swimming pool. Put out of your mind, for example, any thoughts of the legendary pool belonging to Hollywood s Beverley Hills Hotel, beside whose glittering aquamarine waters Faye Dunaway was famously snapped languorously lounging by her future husband Terry O Neill the morning after her Oscar win. Forget, too, those smart suburban American pools through which Burt Lancaster s The Swimmer travelled, or those manicured swimming pools of the French riviera, glimmering bluely in the Mediterranean sunlight.
Different beast
 West s swimming pool is a different beast entirely.
A million miles away from these chlorine-filled, biodiversity-free, energy-consuming status symbols of yore, it s fringed with wildflowers and is home to a rich variety of native garden life that happily share its naturally filtered waters and plant-filled edges with its owners.
Not only is it nature-friendly and planet friendly to maintain, but it s also, as West happily points out, vastly cheaper to construct so long as you re not afraid of carrying out most of the work yourself, as he did.
 When the idea of a natural swimming pool occurred to me, I first got in contact with a company that quoted me an insane sum of money, somewhere in the region of a quarter of a million pounds. That was never on the cards, so instead I decided to build it myself. Depending on the size, you can make them for a couple of thousand pounds, which is just one of the many reasons they re becoming so popular. But I quickly realised I needed some help, when I found myself with this giant muddy hole in the garden, which is when I came across the work of David Pagan Butler. I got in touch, and we quickly became firm friends.
Known for his innovative  bubble-powered , chemical-free, low-energy, organic natural swimming pools, Pagan Butler s work has won him more than 100,000 devoted followers on YouTube, where the former film-makers shares self-build videos explaining their design and construction (one video shows he and West happily larking around together).
His designs use aquatic plants contained within a shallow planting zone to filter the water along with a simple, low-energy aquarium-type air compressor which moves the pool water through layers of sand and gravel into perforated drainage pipes where it s naturally cleaned by beneficial micro-organisms.
There s no use of nasty, environmentally harmful, allergy-causing chlorine or expensive-to-maintain high-tech filtration systems, while Pagan Butler is also an enthusiastic advocate for upcycling and repurposing materials wherever possible, both for environmental reasons as well as to keep costs down.
As a result, his natural swimming pools are so affordable to construct and maintain that their designs have been replicated all over the world, from Chile and South Africa to United States and Europe.
Measuring 30m long, 4m wide and 2m deep, West s family pool is a giant, but he points out the concept can be easily scaled right back.  It can be any size you like, just so long as you follow the basic principles of David s design. That versatility is one of the many great things about it.
For the couple, their own pool has proved to be a wonderful way to support biodiversity and nurture garden wildlife as well as boost their health and wellbeing.
 Immediate connection
 I ve always loved swimming in the sea as well as in lakes and rivers. But there s something very special about swimming in a natural swimming pool. It makes me feel bulletproof, while of course there s also that immediate connection to nature. When I m in the mood I do a spot of underwater gardening by weeding the aquatic plants. Then when I m finished, I head straight for our home built sauna.
For FitzGerald, her work as a garden designer strongly informed the planting surrounding their pool.  It was very important to me that it looks and feels very naturalistic, so that it appears completely rooted in the wider landscape. So we planted native trees like hawthorn, willow and rowan, and encouraged wildflowers like oxe-eye daisies, purple loosestrife and yarrow.
Those softened edges are one of the many things that West loves about the design.
 There are no hard lines, no sense of it being alien to the garden. Instead, it s just very beautiful in this gentle, dreamy kind of way.
In fact, the couple love it so much that their plan is to install one in the gardens of 800-year-old Glin Castle, which they now run as an exclusive private venue, hosting intimate weddings, family occasions and both private and corporate events.
 Can you imagine a natural swimming pool set within Glin s beautiful Robinsonian gardens?  says FitzGerald.  Wouldn t that be glorious? Dominic West and David Pagan Butler will be speaking about natural swimming pools later this month as part of the inaugural Festival of Gardens and Nature at Ballintubbert House in Co Laois.  See festivalofgardensandnature.com

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



WHAT'S NEXT... FOR QUEER- FORWARD PUBLISHERS SMUT?; Artists Jack Scollard and Jordan Hearns on showcasing the work of often 'overlooked and underrepresented' artists
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 16
Length: 837 words
Body


Jack Scollard and Jordan Hearns are the founders of Smut Press, a publishing project that provides a platform for queer artists, and where the ghosts, aspirations and adventures of night-time loom large.
The two London-based Irish artists  had collaborated on a photography  zine, Reverie, in 2020. The following  year Hearns was inspired by a student exhibition at Paris Photo fair.  Everyone said they were making work for themselves and their friends,  he says. A penny dropped: he and Scollard should adopt  the same approach in Ireland by, with Smut, starting something interesting.
Reverie contained the DNA of what would become Smut s ongoing series of publications. The zine s photographs, in which sweat and fog machines almost became characters, were often rooted in the now-closed Dublin DIY space Jigsaw. When they printed the second edition, more stockists came on board.
The goal of Smut, says Scollard, is to  champion work that might find it difficult to get published elsewhere   maybe a bit risqué or provocative. But the main basis is that we want to work with queer artists. Their work can get a little bit overlooked and under-represented. But there s not necessarily any kind of driving sentiment. A lot of it is people we have built up  relationships with over the years, so it  feels very organic.
Hole in the Head, the press s first zine, by Scollard, is a collection of photographs encompassing portraiture, clubbing and bodies.  My life feels really shaped by nightlife,  says Scollard.  It s been the foundation of so many friendships since I moved to London. It s helped me find housing; it just feels that it s such a central part of my life and sense of belonging.  He cites the club Fold, in east London, as particularly important.  It s funny   that s a place where a lot of friendships were made, and led on to things that I wouldn t have imagined.
Hearns nods in agreement.  I echo that. I come from a music background. I ve been in bands for years. So when I started clubbing, it was for music. I came out, started going to queer clubs; going to Jigsaw, specifically, was quite formative for me. Me and Jack became close by going to Jigsaw together, going to nights like Dip, and whatever else was on.
Smut s second zine, Feel Me, I m Here with You, by Hearns, is a  romantic chronicle  of photographs produced over the course of the year in Dublin, Lisbon, Paris and London. Blurred city lights from bridges, airline views of clouds, clasped hands and bedroom doors all detail moments of movement and pause.
The Horny of Plenty, by Scollard, documents a year of living in London, from lake swims to house parties. The photographs in Close One s Eyes, by Peter Greene, offer moments of diffuse beauty in bedrooms and bars. Dani d Ingeo s New Order is rooted in southern Italy, where  as a queer child and teenager they often felt rejected  but returned  to establish a new, renovated connection with their roots .
At the 2023 Tsundoku Art Book Fair in Dublin, Smut Press showcased What Began as Desire, a collection of postcards by 11 artists   David Lindert, Issey Goold, Michele Baron, Léann Herlihy, Tobias Huschka, Augustin Puzio, Brian Teeling, Tyler Kelly, Kyle Quinn, Simon Dyer and Nicholas Flanagan   plus an essay by the curator Iarlaith Ní Fheorais.
Just three years after that Paris Photo moment, a bit of a full-circle moment is in the offing, as Smut has been invited to next month s Paris Ass Book Fair,  which is one of the largest queer book fairs probably going on in the world right now,  says Scollard. They re keeping under wraps the new publication and project that they ll be presenting at Palais de Tokyo.
An inspiration for Scollard is Spyros Rennt, the Berlin-based Greek photographer, whose most recent published work is the book Corporeal, as well as the London photographer Roxy Lee. Hearns foregrounds the influence of the Dublin artists Brian Teeling and Dorje de Burgh.  I was influenced obviously by Wolfgang Tillmans, but I think for me it came back to that local level, where I was seeing the way they worked, and the way they produced work. Also people from Jigsaw, seeing their resilience in producing work, helped me a lot in terms of feeling comfortable doing what we do. Dorje is incredible. He s probably my favourite Irish artist. His work is amazing. He s a big influence. His attitude towards photography and representation of himself was really formative for me, still is and always will be.
Smut s progress appears as exciting to its founders as it does to its audience.  I feel really proud of it as a project,  says Scollard.  I never anticipated it getting to this point. You start off on a project and you never know if it s going to stick or not. There was always a chance that we might have done that first publication and run out of steam. It does require a lot of energy to keep sustaining things, but it s a snowball effect. You get more people involved, more people take interest, more people want to be a part of it. It just builds.  l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



When Jack B Yeats won the Free State's first medal; In Paris in 1924, The Liffey Swim painting took the silver medal in the art competition, giving a new state a treasure that has lasted a century
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 6
Length: 1546 words
Body


It is the ultimate annoying quiz question. Who won Ireland s first Olympic medal? Do you say Pat O Callaghan in Amsterdam in 1928, the first Irishman in any sport to win a medal since independence? Or do you go with John McNally in Helsinki in 1952, the first medal after the establishment of the Republic? Do you pick one and not the other and turn a benign sports question into a political hot-take riot?
No. You do neither. Instead, you make the choice of all right-thinking know-it-alls and, pushing your glasses up on your nose, you declare that actually, it was Jack B Yeats. Yes, that Jack B Yeats. And no, not for sport. Not directly, at any rate.
So let s go back. Back to Paris in 1924. Back to the Grand Palais on the Champs-Élysées where, 100 years ago next month, began the exhibition to choose the Olympic champion in painting. Not just in painting, as it happened. Five categories went to make up the broad sweep of  Les Arts    painting, literature, architecture, music and sculpture.
Now. Quite where all that fits into the whole Citius, Altius, Fortius deal is obviously a question worth asking. It all goes back to the foundation of the modern Olympics and the dubious figure of Pierre de Coubertin. Say what you will about the father of the Olympic movement but he knew what he liked (Nazis) and what he didn t like (women s sport). He also dabbled in a little poetry here and there, which may or may not have influenced his desire to have an arts competitions as a part of the Games when they were reinstated in 1896.
Olympic ideal
As it happens, the organising committees in the earliest iterations of the games   in Athens, Paris (1900) and St Louis   all essentially told the good Baron that they had enough to be doing putting on a sporting Olympics without stitching on a cultural one as well. But de Coubertin always had it as part of his Olympic ideal.
 There is only one difference between our Olympiads and plain sporting championships,  he said.  It is precisely the contests of art as they existed in the Olympiads of Ancient Greece, where sport exhibitions walked in equality with artistic exhibitions.  It took him until the 1912 games in Stockholm to finally get his way, whereupon the incorrigible chancer not only entered himself but won the gold medal for literature.
Spin the tape on to 1924 and by now the arts competitions were a full part of the Olympics. Entries had to be on a sporting theme and since it was being held in such a prestigious cultural capital as Paris, it s maybe no surprise that the list of judges across the five categories became a roll-call of some of the world s biggest names. The music competition for instance was judged by, among others, Maurice Ravel, Igor Stravinsky, Gabriel Fauré and Béla Bartók.
For what it s worth, they must not have been overly impressed   they decided not to award a medal of any kind. The judges in the painting category were more generous, as Brendan Rooney, head curator of the National Gallery of Ireland explains.
 It was, for all intents and purposes, an art exhibition,  Rooney says.  The really interesting thing about  24 is the jury, which really was made up of the great and the good. Maurice Denis, John Singer-Sargant   you re talking about really serious artists. John Lavery was in there as well, from Belfast. Now, obviously, it was spread far and wide so as to defend against any accusations of bias. But I quite like the idea of Lavery putting in a good word for Yeats. I m sure it happened!
By 1924, Jack B Yeats was well on the way to becoming a hugely significant figure in the art world. He was 53 years old, a friend of James Joyce and Samuel Beckett, a brother to William who had won the Nobel Prize for Literature the previous year.
 He started to paint in his 40s,  Rooney says.  Most people know him for his painting but he actually took it up relatively late. He had been an illustrator and a watercolour painter up to that   and a very successful one too. But he turned his hand to painting quite late in life and then became incredibly prolific.
 He would have been critically well-regarded at the time. This was the beginning of the swell of interest in his work. He was critically well thought-of in 1924 but commercially not as successful as he would be in subsequent years.
Yeats had always been drawn to sport. As historian Paul Rouse says, the artist spent a lot of time in London in his 20s going to boxing matches in the East End.  Yeats captured many aspects of this world, sketching the fighters, the officials, and capturing the crowd who attended , Rouse wrote in The Examiner in 2021.
 [In] a painting called  The Master of Ceremonies , a man leaning on the red ropes of the ring, making an announcement, resplendent in evening dress and wearing white gloves. But boxers are also painted: Yeats admired them and their courage, and in short he loved their sport.
Over his career, paintings by Yeats featured all manner of sporting scenes. Jockeys and horses, cricket players and fishermen, hurlers and shooters. Some in the foreground, some as barely perceptible details out the back. And his most celebrated   and probably one of the most famous Irish paintings in history   is The Liffey Swim, which won him the Olympic silver medal in Paris in 1924.
North quays
Yeats lived in Wicklow around this period but loved to come into Dublin with his sketchbook in his pocket and to take in whatever was going on. On this day, he and his wife Cottie came in to watch the 1923 Liffey Swim. At least we presumed Cottie was with him   most analysts of the painting itself pick out the couple, he in a fedora and she beside him in a yellow hat.
The location of the painting is instantly recognisable as the north quays, in and around Bachelors Walk. O Connell Bridge is up ahead and the swimmers are more or less halfway through their race. The route of the Liffey Swim is much the same now as it was then   beginning around the Guinness Brewery and ending at Butt Bridge, near the Customs House.
As it turned out, Yeats s subsequent success in Paris wouldn t be the only Olympic link to the 1923 race. The winner that year, Cecil Fagan from Blackrock, actually competed in Paris as part of the Ireland water polo team. In fact, Fagan was two-time Olympian, as the water polo team went to Amsterdam in 1928 as well.
Yeats didn t carry on his Olympic career, presumably deciding he had done enough first time around. He entered two paintings in Paris in 1924, The Liffey Swim and Before The Start. The latter was a painting he had done in 1915 depicting jockeys just before the tapes go up. But it was The Liffey Swim   retitled  Natacion  for the purposes of the Olympic exhibition   that took the prize.
 The thing that amuses me and always has done is that no one ever asks who won the gold,  Rooney says.  But the guy who won it, Jean Jacoby, was a Luxembourg artist who lived in France most of his life. He was an altogether more pedestrian painter. Yeats was an infinitely better artist. But Jacoby won again in  28! He was the Michael Phelps of the scene. I wanted to get a T-shirt saying  Who the hell is Jean Jacoby?
Hang on   so you re saying we were robbed?
 Ha! Not quite! Well, obviously, we don t have any record of those deliberations but the fact that Jacoby won does cast the whole thing into ... well, it s apples and oranges really. Yeats s painting is a seriously good picture. Jacoby s were very pedestrian studies.
However it all broke down, The Liffey Swim took silver. It was the first Olympic Medal of the Irish Free State, founded just over a year and a half earlier. Later at the same Olympics, Oliver St John Gogarty took bronze in the literature category for his poem  Ode To The Tailteann Games . It hasn t had quite the same afterlife   even Gogarty himself reckoned it was  rather tripe .
The Liffey Swim, on the other hand, has become one of the best-known pieces of Irish art in history. It was bought for £250 in 1930 by the Haverty Trust and bequeathed to the state. Later that decade, it was brought to New York for the World s Fair exhibition. It has featured on a stamp to mark 100 years of the Liffey Swim race itself. In 1991, it adorned the front of the 01 area phone book.
For such a genuine national treasure, it s entirely accessible too. You can walk into the National Gallery just off Merrion Square in Dublin today and see it hanging in Room 14, pretty much straight in front of you as you come through the entrance. Yeats s silver medal is there too, displayed by the painting. He went on to enormous acclaim in artistic circles and some of his paintings have sold for millions since his death in 1957.
As for art competitions at the Olympics, they survived until 1948. They were eventually done away with because the IOC declared that since so many of the entries were by professional artists, they couldn t live up to the Olympic ideal. This is the self-same IOC, of course, that would stoop to craven levels of abasement in the name of money over subsequent decades.
Much like a great painting, hypocrisy lives forever.  This story is part of a series, The Greatest Irish Olympic Stories Never Told, which will run every Saturday in The Irish Times up to the beginning of the 2024 Olympic Games, on Friday, July 26th.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Whimsical Joe plays the game of the name; Talk of missed buses, obscure saints and baby names has Liveline host Joe Duffy in flighty form
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 18
Length: 992 words
Body


It used to an ironclad law of tabloid journalism that if a child was described as a  tot  in a headline, tragedy would follow in the  accompanying story. In that spirit  a similar sense of foreboding descends  on Monday s Liveline (RTÉ Radio 1, weekdays) when Joe Duffy, so often Irish radio s catastrophist-in-chief, opens a conversation with a caller by ominously asking,  What happened?  Those bracing themselves for the worst are in for a surprise, however, as the ensuing item turns out to be the exception that proves the rule.
Rather than experiencing a traumatic event, Duffy s caller, Kenia, has merely suffered a irritating inconvenience. Kenia, who sounds as if she s originally from Brazil, recounts how she and a visiting friend were left  in the middle of nowhere  when their tour bus departed without them on a trip north. Luckily they were able to get a lift to the bus s next stop in Belfast    or  the middle of somewhere , as Duffy chucklingly puts it   while Kenia s desire for a refund is seemingly satisfied when the bus company s boss phones in to apologise. It s obviously good news that no one was hurt in the incident, but even by the prosaic standards of Liveline s small-claims department this is trifling stuff.
Then again, Duffy is in conspicuously whimsical form throughout the week. He devotes the bulk of Monday s show to a confab on the origins of the name Gobnait, prompted by the announcement that one of Naval Service s newly purchased patrol vessels is to be named after the Irish medieval saint. The discussion duly follows a meandering course. For those of us who automatically associate the name with  the late Frank Kelly s comedic creation Gobnait O Lunacy, Duffy reveals that the original Gobnait was the patron saint of beekeeping. But there are tangents into the supposed bad luck of changing a ship s name, as well as Duffy s oddly peeved aside about the number of buildings, boats and bridges named after James Joyce and Samuel Beckett    two men, by the way, who hated the country . Yeah, go back to France, ya moaners!
The host is in even flightier mood on Wednesday, when he returns to the nomenclature theme, helping an  expectant mother choose a name for  her soon-to-be-born daughter. Nicola,  a Chicago-based Meath woman, is  seeking ideas for an Irish girl s name that  is easily spelled and pronounceable for Americans, an ostensibly simple request that somehow ends up filling the entire programme.  We thought it would last three minutes,  Duffy observes.
Not that he s hurrying things along.  The host quizzes Nicola at length about her interests, his queries at times sounding more applicable to a dating-service  questionnaire than a phone-in show:   Are you into astrology?
As the suggestions flood in, Nicola must wonder what she s let herself in for: Duffy chats to callers about the back story to each suggested name, which frequently diverge from the brief, while bemoaning the mundanity of his own.  Joe, what a boring name,  he mutters. But that it was the only dull aspect of proceedings: by the time the host has whittled the potential baby monikers down to a shortlist of four, the listener has lost interest, while Nicola merely sounds relieved. At least Duffy doesn t start talking about  tots . Then we d really be in trouble.
The Liveline presenter doesn t completely neglect heftier matters, occasionally breaking off his various chats to keep tabs on Simon Harris s election as Taoiseach on Tuesday. But given the sense of anticlimax surrounding the new leader s ascension, Duffy s hands-off approach is probably the correct one. In contrast, Today with Claire Byrne (RTÉ Radio 1, weekdays) is almost entirely given over to coverage of the Dáil vote on the matter. Despite the vainly heroic efforts of Byrne and her  cast of pundits to fill airtime, it s all a bit underwhelming: a rambling colloquy  on saints  names suddenly seems like essential listening.
It s more lively later in the day on  The Last Word (Today FM, weekdays), where Matt Cooper, its presenter, has the advantage of following the slightly more unpredictable spectacle of Harris s  Cabinet reshuffle. Though the much- anticipated ministerial shake-up turns out to be a damp squib, it s grist to the mill of Cooper and his guests. The columnist and former minister Shane Ross, an erstwhile Cabinet colleague of Harris, is typically blustery as he lays out the new Taoiseach s positives    a young man with great ability    before twisting the knife about his cautious changes:  He s completely and utterly bottled it.
Cooper, though restrained in any criticism of his own, doesn t sound displeased by such harsh verdicts, which keep the show bubbling along. The host only really gets worked up when one texter disparages Harris for not getting elected as a TD until the 15th count in 2020: Cooper delivers an impromptu homily on the workings of proportional representation, emphasising that the result is what matters, not the process. It might seem a strange thing to get exercised about, but it speaks to Cooper s otherwise low-key sense of propriety.
If national politics seem strangely  muted despite changes at the top, the atmosphere is more heated at local level, with Cooper hosting a spirited debate on the introduction of  bus gates  in Dublin city centre. The move, which will initially see arterial routes along the Liffey closed to cars in August, is derided by the Independent councillor Nial Ring, who says it discriminates against disabled residents in particular, while claiming the inconveniences outweigh any environmental gains:  We re putting the cart before the horse, because we don t have proper public transport.  The Green Party councillor Michael Pidgeon disagrees, and although he doesn t convincingly rebut all the objections, he says  this is about pushing efficiency, speed and reliability in our buses .
At least the buses will hopefully run on time. Just don t get left behind. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Why does no one ask camogie players about wearing skorts?; Motions to allow women to wear shorts were voted down at Congress, sending a message that, after 100 years, elite players must be ladylike
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 14
Length: 832 words
Body


Can shorts replace skorts in camogie s playing uniform? Alternatively, could shorts be added alongside skorts to the list of approved playing gear?
These were the motions proposed by Tipperary, Meath and Britain respectively at this year s Camogie Association Congress. Unfortunately, it became a missed opportunity to modernise the players  gear: both motions were rejected. Replacing skorts was defeated by 64 per cent to 36 per cent, while adding shorts had slightly more approval, but ultimately 55 per cent voted no.
Speaking on Tipp Mid West Radio, Tipperary Camogie PRO Geraldine Kinane said:  Disappointed would be the main word, ya know? A bit surprised by the margin of defeat. We knew that some counties were in favour of keeping the status quo but we did think that with the 120th anniversary of the Camogie Association, we ve come a long way from back in 1904, where they had to wear long skirts, and we thought now is the time to join the 21st century and modernise the game.
The amount of No votes is significant, which makes the results of a survey undertaken by Thomas MacCurtain s GAA club in London all the more important.
In early 2023, the team launched their  Shorts Not Skorts  campaign. Shorts were introduced to their official kit, and in a survey of 250 players a staggering 82 per cent said they preferred shorts.
The reality is that skorts can be restrictive, that they re less comfortable than shorts and bending down to take frees can feel exposing. This traditional sign of being a  lady  can feel like it s getting in the way of moving efficiently, an imperative in elite sport.
There s also the issue that faces virtually all sports: the drop-off rate when girls hit puberty. Numerous studies show that body image, body confidence and physical discomfort affect teenagers  desire to stay playing sports. Requiring a skort for matches can be a deterrent in a time of hormonal and emotional turbulence, and physical change.
The motions  rejections mean that players will do as they have always done: train in their shorts; wear their skort on match days; save themselves the risk of being upbraided for dissent and then yellow-carded; speak up about the issue during interviews, and hope for the best at the next congress in 2027 (also the year integration between the LGFA, Camogie Association and GAA is due to take place).
The big question is: Why? Who is this for? If the players don t want this, who is voting to keep it?
Delegates, not players, vote at Congress. This year, 150 representatives came from counties, provincial councils and delegates from international clubs. Certainly, some delegates listened to their players and voted in line with their desires, but could all 150 say that?
Reasons don t have to be provided for a delegate s vote and they don t have a mandate from their club, but the outcome prompts questions: what was the reason for the majority refusal? Is it really about tradition? Is it to keep camogie distinct from football? A personal preference? Why aren t they listening to the players? Would the result have been different had players voted?
Prominent players including Dublin s Aisling Maher and Tipperary s Mary Ryan expressed their disappointment and frustration on X following the announcement.
There seems to be a disparity between those who vote and those who play, seeing it as two different games. For some of the former, who may find it hard to see women as elite athletes, it must be kept ladylike in the traditional sense. Camogie is seen as the  girls  version of hurling  and not a sport/spectacle in its own right. Shorts are for the men and the Gaelic footballers (and rugby players, soccer players, runners, boxers, and so on).
As far as the players are concerned, camogie involves training at an elite level as an amateur. It s a physical, active battle, demanding blood, sweat and tears. It is resilience, it is team work and it is fun.It s bruised legs and hairbands.
Camogie is also the issue of dual fixtures for Gaelic footballers and camogie players, lack of expenses for travelling players   and, regrettably, women being told what they can and can t wear, by people who are no longer playing (if they ever did).
And, as is the way with women s sports, the scandal takes the spotlight away from the sport. Tipperary Camogie take on Galway in the Very Camogie 1A League final in Croke Park tomorrow, but more articles (this one included), podcasts and radio interviews will discuss their rejected motion than the match.
Had the motions passed, it would have been both extraordinary and not.
For as long as camogie has existed, there has been discussion over what players should wear. The floor-length skirts and long-sleeved blouses they started out with in the 1900s were modest and ladylike. This was not an accident, but a priority. While it has evolved over the decades to the skort, the principle remains: image over practicality, ideal over reality, telling over listening.
Louise Lawless is a freelance journalist

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Woods defies ailing body to once again prove the headline act; Former champion makes a record 24th consecutive cut as Homa sets early pace
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 7
Length: 680 words
Body


The mystique of it all, in a snapshot: Tiger Woods   who knows the hilly terrain and its nuance like no other   defied an ailing body which has seen him hidden away from tournament play for much of the past year, to set a new record of consecutive cuts made, his 24th, in the Masters; an accomplishment which proved beyond all other legendary players down the years.
And, on a day where strong winds blew sand from bunkers, and tested the very fabric of flags on sticks, Woods   using a fade off the tee to keep control of his ball   walked, gingerly at times on a surgically fused ankle, for 23 holes, completing the final five holes of his first round and then all 18 of a second.
Not quite like the Woods of old, lacking fluidity and rhythm, but back again as a headline act, even if it was another of those in his grouping, Max Homa, who headed into the weekend eyeing a green jacket.
Homa, still to achieve a Major breakthrough, his only top-10 finish coming in last year s Open at Royal Liverpool, shot a second round 71 to add to his opening 67 to claim the early 36-holes clubhouse lead on six-under-par 138.
And, yet, Homa remained very much in the Woods s shadow on a day when each and every player in the field endured a tough day amidst the cathedral pines, a wind which only served to assist the swirling wind in raising questions in players  minds.
Woods s body may have ached, his pain at times visible to all, but his mental strength ensured he kept to the task at hand, ably assisted by caddie Lance Bennett, as he scrambled for par saves right to the end, as evidenced by his play of the 18th   shielding sand whisked up from a greenside bunker with his hand from his eyes   where he missed the green left, pitched to 10 feet and sank the par saving putt for a 72 for 145.
 Grinding
 I m tired. I ve been out for a while, competing, grinding. It s been a long 23 holes, a long day. But Lance and I really did some good fighting today, and we ve got a chance. I ve always loved playing here. I ve been able to play here since I was 19 years old. It s one of the honours I don t take lightly, being able to compete. The years I have missed, I wish I was able to play because there s such an aura and mystique about playing this golf course that I don t think that    unless you have played and competed here, you probably don t really appreciate,  said Woods.
And Woods also managed to get a close-up view of Homa, and liked what he saw:  He s got all the talent in the world. I got a chance to play with him at the Open Championship at St Andrews, and his ball flight, as solid as he hits it, it s just a matter of time before he starts winning in bunches. I saw it up front; he doesn t really mis-hit shots. That s something you just have to do around this golf course.
Indeed, Woods was not the only old master to survive, as Vijay Singh   at 61 years of age, 13 years his senior   also made the cut, for the first time since 2018.  I was forced to get up-and-down a few times today, and I was able to do that. A lot of those chip shots I was able to get up-and-down because I left it in the perfect spot, and that s understanding how to play this golf course,  explained Woods.
High numbers
But it wasn t only a day for the old guys, as Denmark s Nicolai Hojgaard   competing in his first Masters at the age of 23   added a 73 to his opening 67 for a midway total of 140 headed into the weekend in a strong position to contend.
 It feels good. I m enjoying the challenge I felt like I managed my game really well today, even though I didn t strike it properly. I felt like I was a bit all over the place, but kind of putted myself around, which was quite good to see. Yeah, I m looking forward to the next two days,  said the Dane, who was a member of Europe s winning Ryder Cup team in Rome last year.
It was to Hojgaard s credit that he kept his focus, on a day where high numbers came thick and fast, among them Jordan Spieth running up a nine on the Par 5 15th, a hole which   for the first time since 1999   had more than 10 double-bogeys over the opening two rounds.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



A second-rate rail service to Sligo
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 102 words
Body


Sir,    I have seen many letters on the Dublin to Belfast train service, with the latest one from France (Letters, April 12th). The journey time on the Sligo to Dublin train regularly and significantly exceeds three hours for the 207km trip. The train has, on occasion, had to travel back from where it came along the track to allow a train to pass and then continue onwards. With continued lack of investment in the northwest, it seems we will have to settle for a second-rate rail service that operates at a snail s pace. I suppose it is a case of  C est la vie .  Yours, etc,
STEPHEN O HARA,
Carrowmore,
Sligo.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Critical minerals
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 68 words
Body


Sir,   Mairide Woods brings back memories of  socials  that were the main form of late entertainment back in the day (  What about a Fanta, clubbers?  , Letters, April 11th). Any youth was always in danger, when asking his latest dance partner, after the set finished, if she  felt like an orange  of getting the reply  Naw, do I look like one?  Happy days!   Yours, etc,
JOHN K ROGERS,
Rathowen,
Co Westmeath.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Dive into gardening
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 4
Length: 93 words
Body


This white embroidered dress is from a Greek label called Theatre D (EUR 145.95), newly introduced by Avoca to its stable of well-known and long established brands that include Part Two, Fabienne Chapot and Barbour. Avoca s recent presentation of its spring offerings at Powerscourt House featured its traditional mix of dresses, separates and casual wear as well as a holiday shop with beach essentials and kaftans including some from Theatre D. Knitwear included swirl cardigans from Never Fully Dressed and multi stripes from FRNCH.
avoca.com
DEIRDRE McQUILLAN

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Dublin city centre traffic plan
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 86 words
Body


Sir,   As someone who lives and works in Dublin, I am disappointed that there appears to be no consideration to the many people who must traverse the city on a regular basis for work. This is becoming a more and more difficult task for those of us realistically cannot use public transport, even if it was reliable.
There are deliveries to be made and appointments to be kept, often at short notice, and this plan will make a difficult situation even more difficult.   Yours, etc,
KEIRON DIAMOND,
Goatstown,
Dublin 14.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Ex-Christian Brother accused of abuse offences in Dublin school
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 108 words
Body


A former Christian Brother, Jack Manning (87), who is facing 60 charges of child sex abuse in the 1970s involving six alleged victims, was granted legal aid when his case came came before the Dublin Circuit Criminal Court yesterday.
Judge Martin Nolan granted the application from solicitor Donough Molloy of Sheehan and Partners and set an arraignment date of June 11th next.
Mr Manning, with an address in a Dublin nursing home and who attended court in a wheelchair, is charged with indecent assault on the alleged victims on dates in the early to mid-1970s at Westland Row Christian Brothers School, South Cumberland Street, Dublin 2.
  COLM KEENA

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Four lighter wines to put a spring in your step; Two whites, a sparkling wine and an almost summery red offer interest and good value for money
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 38
Length: 196 words
Body


There is a spring feel to my wine  choices today - two refreshing whites, one sparkling and a lighter, almost summery red wine.  All four stood out as offering interest and good value for money in recent trade tastings.
The sauvignon blanc comes from a Sancerre producer and contains a little of the same character at a more affordable price.
The importer told me it was his best- selling wine. I am not surprised. Picpoul de Pinet has become a firm favourite with Irish consumers. I thought the latest version from Aldi was very good.
Austrian producer Judith Beck was in Dublin recently to show a range of her excellent wines. Beck farms biodynamically in the Burgenland region.
While she produces exciting wines from local grapes such as sankt laurent, zweigelt and Blaufränkisch, you should also keep an eye out for her very tasty chardonnay and pinot blanc. The Ink, featured here, is a blend of zweigelt and sankt laurent.
Limoux, in the Pyrenean foothills close to Carcassonne in the Languedoc, has a long tradition in sparkling wine.
In fact, it claims to have been producing it before the Champenois. The firm of J Laurens is one of the leading small producers there. l

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Gym goer wins EUR 3,000 in ageist case
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 188 words
Body


A gym goer who was told she was too old to apply for a student discount on her membership has won EUR 3,000 for ageist discrimination.
The award was made by the Workplace Relations Commission on foot of an Equal Status Act 2000 complaint by Margaret Fitzpatrick against West Wood Club CLG, which operates gyms and swimming pools in Dublin.
Setting out her case last November, Ms Fitzpatrick explained that she had been a member of her local gym for around 14 years when she became a full-time student in April 2023.
She asked about switching to its student membership rate the following month and showed her student card for verification, but was told she was ineligible because she was  more than 25 years old .
Ms Fitzpatrick said she served statutory notice on the company alleging discrimination in June that year but got no response.
Denying the claim, West Wood s solicitors, Peter Duff & Co, submitted the gym s  full-time student membership  was restricted to those aged under 25.
Ruling Ms Fitzpatrick s complaint to be well-founded, WRC adjudicator Jim Dolan ordered the gym to pay her EUR 3,000 in compensation.
  STEPHEN BOURKE

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Hamilton will make his Ferrari debut in Melbourne next year
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 140 words
Body


 Lewis Hamilton will make his Ferrari debut in Australia next year  after Formula One s bosses announced next season s record-equalling 24-round calendar.
Hamilton, 39, is set to realise a childhood dream when he swaps Mercedes for the Ferrari in 2025, with the seven-time world champion s opening race for the Italian team to take place in Melbourne.
It will mark the first time since 2019 that the F1 season has kicked off at Albert Park after the following year s scheduled opener was cancelled at the last minute amid the outbreak of Covid-19.
The 2025 campaign is due to end in Abu Dhabi on December 7th, with the British Grand Prix   starting the first of its new 10-year contract extension at Silverstone   on July 6th.
Triple world champion Max Verstappen has been vocal in his criticism at the ever-expanding length of the F1 schedule.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



More listening and less scrolling
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 45 words
Body


Sir,   Peter Malbasha is quite right to highlight the number of TDs in the Dáil preoccupied with their mobile phones (Letters, April 12th). Perhaps, like schoolchildren, they should have to leave their phones in their lockers!   Yours, etc,
 MIKE CORMACK,
 Blackrock,
Co Dublin.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Nature Diary Glenbower Wood
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 7
Length: 139 words
Byline: SYLVIA THOMPSON
Body


In a great example of people power, residents of Killeagh in east Cork bought a woodlands on the edge of their village to protect it from commercial development. Now, led by Greywood Arts, a creative arts hub, the community is launching a new project, Seeing the Wood from the Trees, to explore future plans for Glenbower Wood. One of their first tasks is to clear invasive species such as cherry laurel and, over time, replace them with native trees grown from seeds collected in the woodland itself.
Meanwhile, Killeagh will celebrate the history and ecology of the neighbourhood from May 3rd-6th with picnics, music, dancing, a dawn chorus walk and lots more in a revival of the May Sunday festivals that used to take place in Glenbower Wood under the ownership of the De Cappell Brooke family.
See greywoodarts.org.
SYLVIA THOMPSON

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



O'Mahony signs one-year extension with Munster
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 143 words
Body


Peter O Mahony will remain at Munster for at least one more year after signing a contract extension with the province.
After Ireland s final Six Nations match against Scotland last month, O Mahony said he would consider his future with his IRFU central contract expiring at the end of this season. On Friday, Munster announced that they had reached an agreement with their former captain which will see him contracted by the province while the IRFU contributes to his salary.
In January, it emerged that O Mahony s future remained in doubt as Munster had not offered him a contract at that stage. During the Six Nations, contract offers were made to both him and Conor Murray, who also was coming to the end of his Ireland central contract.
Last month, The Irish Times reported that Murray had accepted his one-year deal while O Mahony has now joined his teammate.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Poem Dandy By Cherry Smyth
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: TICKET; Pg. 28
Length: 115 words
Body


It s a funny thing to start looking
like your father who s been dead two years.
It began when he was dying, imperceptibly,
and I wanted to wear his silk cravat
and suede jerkin. I donned a cheap trilby
from Camden and was called  sir  on the tube.
I carried his  sir  with a pride that wasn t gendered
  it was gentlemanly and made men and women
kinder to me. I walked in my own parade,
hearing his clipped greeting,  How do?
I walked for every daring dandy, thinking
of when Dad taught me how to tie
my school tie and slip the knot
so I could keep it forever. Dear Dads,
you ve slipped the knot but I hold the silk,
gauging its quality between my fingers, knowing
the measure of goodness and how to wear it.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Referendum on European patent court
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 192 words
Body


Sir,   I believe that it would be a mistake not to proceed with the EU Unified Patent Court referendum with the European and local elections as planned in June ( Doubt over whether June referendum will go ahead amid fallout from family and care votes , News, April 12th). The patent system ensures that scientific research is published, and Ireland is per capita in the top 10 users of the European patent system. The court is part of a package of measures to reduce costs so that smaller businesses can avail of the patent system. A Joint Oireachtas Committee endorsed the importance of proceeding with the referendum as soon as possible.
Already decisions are being made by the court which can affect Irish innovators, Irish production lines and ultimately Irish jobs. Because we have not yet joined the court, it  operates without any Irish judges, any hearings in Ireland or any other form of Irish input into its functioning.
When put to a referendum in Denmark alongside the 2014 European elections, it was approved by over 60 per cent. I am sure that the people would consider the proposal on its own merits.   Yours, etc,
JONATHAN
NEWMAN SC,
Dublin 7.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Scoliosis patients and waiting lists
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 50 words
Body


A chara,   My granddaughter is still on the waiting list for scoliosis treatment. She is  now 16.
The Taoiseach, when he was minister for health,  made promises to girls like her.  Broken promises.  How can young people have faith in the political system?   Yours, etc,
TONY O GORMAN,
Clonmacken,
Limerick.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Weekend Rugby Fixtures
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 2
Length: 126 words
Body


Today European Champions Cup   Quarter-finals: Bordeaux Begles v Harlequins, Stade Chaban Delmas, 3.0pm; Leinster v La Rochelle, Aviva Stadium, 5.30pm; Northampton Saints v Bulls, Franklin s Gardens, 8.0pm. European Challenge Cup   Quarter-finals: Clermont Auvergne v Ulster, Stade Marcel Michelin, 12.30pm; Sharks v Edinburgh, Hollywoodbets Kings Park, 12.30pm. Women s Six Nations Championship: Scotland v England, Hive Stadium, 2.15pm; Ireland v Wales, Musgrave Park, 4.45pm.
Sunday European  Champions Cup   Quarter-final: Toulouse v Exeter Chiefs, Stade Ernest-Wallon, 3.0pm. European Challenge Cup   Quarter-final: Benetton v Connacht, Stadio Comunale di Monigo, 12.30pm. Women s Six Nations Championship: France v Italy, Stade Jean Bouin, 12.30pm.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



Year of the Nana
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 17
Length: 35 words
Body


Sir,   Time was when a newly elected Taoiseach celebrated the occasion with his grandchildren; this week, it s with his grandmother! Good enough reason for celebration.   Yours, etc,
TOM CLEARY,
Sandycove,
Co Dublin.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 1
Length: 501 words
Body


The latest deadline to announce a Republic of Ireland manager is next Wednesday, or perhaps Thursday. Uncertainty still reigns in Abbotstown.
Yesterday was a busy day. It was looking increasingly like John O Shea could be unveiled next week, before Ole Gunnar Solskjaer s name appeared and disappeared in the space of a few hours in the afternoon.
Solskjaer was reportedly in discussions with the FAI back in January but, as with several other candidates, including England under-21 manager Lee Carsley and Bayern Munich assistant coach Anthony Barry, the Ireland job does not appeal to him.
Now, seemingly, O Shea s late run to succeed Stephen Kenny after a 143-day search is running out of steam.
The length of the recruitment process has heaped pressure on the FAI recruiters, chief executive Jonathan Hill and director of football Marc Canham, to deliver an acceptable  head coach  for the board to ratify.
Unemployed
A surge of money placed on Solskjaer yesterday suggested that he could be appointed with his former United teammate O Shea as an assistant coach. By yesterday evening some bookmakers had slashed the former Norwegian striker s odds to 17/20. But, like the media, the bookies have been inaccurate on several occasions during this protracted process.
Solskjaer has been unemployed since his three years at Manchester United ended in November 2021. The 51-year- old had two stints at Molde FK and 30 games in charge of Cardiff City in 2013, when his team lost 16 times.
O Shea speaks to the media on Tuesday evening at the Aviva stadium as an ambassador of the Uefa Europa League trophy s promotional tour, when he will be inundated with questions that only Canham and Hill can answer.
The FAI are keen not to link O Shea s long-slated appearance in Dublin to the announcement of their new Ireland manager 24 or 48 hours later. The two executives are expected to hold a press conference on Wednesday or Thursday.
Alongside Carsley and Barry, former Ireland  coach and player Chris Hughton, Willy Sagnol, Chris Coleman and Greece manager Gus Poyet have been connected to the vacancy.
Apparently, following Canham s  robust  and  confidential  recruitment process, none of the initial short-list of candidates has chosen to sign on.
This prompted Canham to appoint O Shea as the interim manager in March when Ireland drew 0-0 with Belgium and lost 1-0 to Switzerland.
Following the Swiss game, O Shea revealed that he had not been considered for an interview to replace Kenny due to his lack of managerial experience.  If I could be manager of Ireland in the morning, I would make it happen,  O Shea said.  My instinct would be that I m more than ready and capable to be a manager.
In 2023 O Shea, who won 118 caps for his country, worked as an Ireland coach, effectively the number three below Kenny and his primary assistant Keith Andrews. The 42-year-old has also spent three years as an assistant to Ireland under-21s manager Jim Crawford and previously spent time at Stoke City and Birmingham City.

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 7
Length: 548 words
Body


1This little bird has begun visiting the same branch in the garden each day. He does a dance and taps on the window. He could do this for hours. What is he doing and could he harm his beak?    Zara Lee, Co Dublin This is a male blue tit and he is holding territory at this time of year. He sees his reflection in the mirror and thinks it is a rival male. This behaviour is intended to drive the interloper out of his territory. He is on a hiding to nothing unless you hang something on the window, which stops him seeing his reflection and so convinces him that he has been victorious.
2 This gannet was sitting on a harbour wall in Belmullet for several hours and seemed unable to fly. It didn t look injured.  S Ó hArdín, Dublin It may not have looked injured, but the fact that it sat there not flying away when approached is indicative of it being ill   most likely with bird flu. This disease was rampant among gannets last year and breeding colonies were particularly hard hit as the virus spread among the closely nesting birds. It doesn t seem likely that this one will make it to the nearest breeding site on Clare Island farther south.
3In Wexford the furze and heather bloom on mountains in September. In 1996 the hills were ablaze with the county colours as we brought home the Liam McCarthy Cup. So why were the Mayo hills of Corraun and Achill sporting the Wexford colours at the end of March?    J Maher, Wexford The furze in bloom at the moment in Mayo and many other places is Ulex europaeus. This is a different species to Ulex galii, which is most frequent in the east and south and blooms from July until the end of September. The spring heather in flower at the same time is the Lusitanian species Erica erigena: the Irish heath. This occurs only in western Mayo and Connemara as well as Spain and Portugal. There is no hurling subplot.
4A common dolphin and a large bull grey seal were swimming and splashing  close together near to the RNLI station in Skerries one afternoon at  the end of March. At times it looked as though the seal was holding  the dolphin, their heads sticking out of the water close together. The seal repeatedly appeared to be on top of the dolphin, but we never saw the seal bite it, and no fresh wounds were seen on the dolphin. I was talking to Padraig Whooley of the Irish Whale and Dolphin Group, and it seems there are few or no such records. After two hours, the animals moved to deep choppy water, where they could no longer be seen. Strange, unexplained behaviour. The picture was taken by Johnny Woodlock.   Ciaran O Keeffe, Skerries, Co Dublin
5Michael Keane of Blacksod Sea Safari sent in this picture of a basking shark. He says  the first basking shark off the coast of Achill was seen at the end of March, which is very early. Basking sharks arrive in our waters in summer following the concentrations of plankton blooms on which they feed. They generally arrive at the end of April/early May and stay all summer. It is another indication of how warm our ocean has become if the plankton can bloom here in sufficient number to attract the basking sharks up from their winter quarters around the Canaries and the Azores so early.
 Please submit your nature query,  observation, or photo with a location, via irishtimes.com/eyeonnature

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SATURDAY MAGAZINE; Pg. 30
Length: 1393 words
Body


A more subdued Trinny Woodall than I expect greets me over Zoom from the back of a black London minicab. As one of her four million social media followers, I m far more familiar with her neon-clad, frenetic alter ego, who is often as brightly packaged as her yellow and silver Trinny London cosmetics.
But today, the British entrepreneur, beauty expert and fashion guru, who has been  back-to-back  since returning from a holiday in the Caribbean the day before, speaks surprisingly softly and cuts an understated figure in a simple navy ( her black , she calls it) two-piece, accessorised with a chic pair of thick-framed glasses, also in navy.
She looks every inch the successful chief executive of a multimillion euro company, and she s obviously matched her outfit to her mood, as she suggests in a business-like fashion that we get started, which I appreciate as I have just 15 minutes to chat with her as she travels from a product development meeting at Trinny London HQ in southwest London to an interview with best-selling author Mo Gawdat for her podcast series Fearless.
Though restrained, she is warm and communicative, speaking with passion and purpose about Trinny London, which is launching in Brown Thomas on Tuesday. It will be the brand s flagship location in Ireland and will be followed by several more concessions throughout the country later this year. Customers can meet Woodall, browse the collection, try out products and book appointments with professional Trinny London make-up artists.
The premium, but affordable, make-up brand has enjoyed phenomenal success since it was established in 2017, due in no small part to Woodall s vision, work ethic and willingness to do whatever it takes to succeed. This included selling her home and £60,000-worth of clothes to raise funding, while working 16-17 hour days, six days a week until she felt she was on the edge of burnout. It was only when media executive Linda Yaccarino told her,  Do what only you can do. Everyone else can do the rest,  that the Londoner s mindset shifted and she was able to achieve a measure of balance in her life.
Not that you would think it to watch her on social media, which she populates with a furiously energetic cocktail of try-ons, tutorials and shop-ups, which are served up around the day-to-day business of running an award-winning make-up and skincare line, which ships to 180 countries worldwide. Trinny London has captured the imagination and customer loyalty of women across the age divide with its unique brand of messaging that insists that with a few relatively inexpensive, easy-to-apply products, a woman can be her best self, and, more importantly, that her best self is good enough.
 It s a fresh way of looking at make-up,  says Woodall.  It doesn t have to be difficult. In fact, make-up can be quick and easy. Trinny London is for women who have  10 minutes to get ready in the morning  as much as it is for those who have 40 minutes. Being your best self isn t the insurmountable journey some women think.
Woodall says the challenge has always been to find a language that speaks to both the woman who doesn t wash her face in the evening and the one who layers on eight products every night. Whatever vernacular Woodall s been using, it s working. Trinny London has 1.2 million customers. The ambition? Twenty million.
 I d say we re only one-10th of the way into our journey,  she smiles. She s the brand s own best ambassador. With the endearing imprecision of someone always on the clock, she spends about three minutes most mornings  smudging ,  sponging  and  sprinkling  her cream-based coloured pigment pots into enviably chic make-up looks that have a DIY charm far removed from the technique-driven messaging of traditional make-up brands.
This accessibility is reinforced by company branding that, for the most part, eschews professional models in favour of  real  women with a range of skin types, tones and textures   flaws  and all.
Despite the strength of her social media following and the success of Trinny London, Woodall describes herself as  Marmite .  I used to be more Marmite,  she says,  but I think I ve evolved as a person.
Certainly, Woodall has gone through many incarnations since she founded her first business selling bows at the age of just 16. She traded commodities in London ( I bloody hated it! It was me and 64 men on a trading floor ) set up a direct-to-consumer business in the late 1990s ( way too early ), wrote a style column in the Daily Telegraph and became one half of the pull-no-punches noughties TV makeover duo Trinny and Susannah on the BBC s television show What Not To Wear. Best-selling books followed and a global TV spin-off before their very particular, hands-on style of makeover fell out of fashion.
Her personal journey has involved as many highs and lows. She s been married, divorced, bereaved and she struggled to conceive for almost a decade. After a heartbreaking 16 cycles of IVF, she gave birth to her now 19-year-old daughter Lyla, who is clearly the great love of Woodall s life, and mother and daughter share a home in Notting Hill with their two rescue dogs, Lily and Daffy. Woodall is also a devoted stepmother to her late husband s son Zak.
The 60-year-old believes it s her candid sharing on Instagram that women like most about her and certainly she has managed to cut through the cacophony of fashion, beauty and lifestyle influencers that clutter up the online space.  I share whether I feel good or bad,  she says.  Social media is full of  life is all sunshine  or  poor miserable me  and I think I offer something in between.  It s true, Woodall shows the good, the bad and the ugly, exposing her open pores and pimples as readily and matter-of-factly as her latest Zara haul.
Having suffered from acne as a young woman, it s not surprising to hear that Woodall feels the future of Trinny London lies in skincare.  That s my sweet spot,  she says.  We have our own lab here in London and we re constantly searching out raw ingredients. We re innovative. We re not a brand that has its name above the door and buys in white label products adding a single active ingredient. I m all about efficacy and I want to explore and push how effective skincare can be.
She laments the Irish obsession with fake tan, although she understands it.  Of course, when it s dark all the time, women want a bit of colour. But fake tan destroys good skin. Bronzer and fake tan block pores, stain skin and dehydrate it.  Woodall believes that striving for a glowing complexion in your natural tone and adding a touch of blusher is the best approach and she s determined to convince us all.  It s a mission for me,  she says.
Her other mission is to educate.  We need to reinforce education about skincare. We launched our at-home microneedle last year and it sold out in six weeks. There were people who said we couldn t put a microneedle in the hands of someone at home, but you can if you give people the right information. It s about not treating women like fools and remembering that not everyone can get to a salon. When we sold out, I thought  Yes! Our intuition is right!
It s this intuition that has attracted her global community of fiercely loyal  Trinny Tribes    women, largely over 40, who, says Woodall, empower, support and uplift one another online, and in person at the brand s various events, openings and launches. She ll be meeting her Irish tribe this week, the fifth-largest in the world at almost 6,000 strong.
 These communities started organically,  says Woodall.  A woman called Kelly in northwest England founded the first, and the whole thing just mushroomed from there. I simply helped them join up with each other.
It s a far cry from the cold and calculating white-collar, male-dominated trading floors of London city, where Woodall says she learned to tell filthy jokes. She uses the word  emotive  several times throughout our conversation, describing the brand, its message and her own perspective as  speaking to people emotionally . She says:  At Trinny London, we always talk about how something makes you feel. It s less about how something makes you look.
And this is the true Trinny London sweet spot because when you feel good, you look good. l
 Trinny London s new counter opens at Brown Thomas, Grafton Street, Dublin, on Tuesday, April 16th

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 8
Length: 140 words
Body


 I learned to hide my Irish accent, or at least to feel deeply ashamed of it  Dublin s Victorian fruit and vegetable market finally to reopen  Divorced man no longer has to pay EUR 385 monthly maintenance to ex-wife, judge rules  Applegreen manager sacked after investigation found worker not paid for 16 weeks  Man killed in south Dublin crash was due to go on trial for almost 100 sexual offences  Simon Harris s new Cabinet formally appointed by President at Áras an Uachtaráin  John Magnier s Coolmore pays EUR 8.925m for 591 acres in Tipperary   When my grandad arrived he was illiterate, and now his grandson is earning this country an Oscar nomination   Girl s jacket kept her afloat until rescuers saved her from sea in Dún Laoghaire during Storm Kathleen   Dublin Jimmy  was friendly with and worked for Sean Quinn, brother tells court

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 13, 2024 Saturday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: WEEKEND; Pg. 8
Length: 48 words
Body


Most Read On irishtimes.com
Opportunity knocked over and over again, louder and louder, and was ignored. No one answered, and these two people should have and sure didn t   A Michigan judge sentences the parents of school shooter Ethan Crumbley to 10-15 years for involuntary manslaughter

Load-Date: April 12, 2024


End of Document



'I know my children need me. I know my children's best interests are going to be served in Ireland'
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 548 words
Byline: SARAH BURNS
Body


SARAH BURNS
 A woman has said she is  hopeful  that diplomatic efforts will see her two young children returned from Egypt after two years and that  no parent should have to grieve their children when they re alive .
Mandy Kelly (38), from Dundalk, Co Louth, said her estranged husband, the children s father, refused to let the boys come home from a family holiday in Cairo in April 2022.
She said she has had no contact with Zayn (5) and Kareem (3), who were born in Ireland, for two years and that they were taken by their Egyptian father.
Egypt is not signed up to the 1980 Hague Convention, which aims to protect children from international abduction by a parent using diplomatic pressure to ensure the prompt return of the child.
Ms Kelly met Minister for Justice Helen McEntee yesterday, accompanied by her solicitor and a mediator. Speaking afterwards, she said the Minister was  open  to looking at a potential bilateral agreement or a memorandum of understanding between the two countries that could help with her situation.
 She [Ms McEntee] was of the agreement also that further talks are required and she also agreed to speak with her colleagues in the Department of Foreign Affairs regarding key issues that were mentioned, in particular the return of my children s passports.
 I addressed this because we had written to the Department of Foreign Affairs to request them to reach out to my ex-partner to return my children s passports or to cancel them,  she said, adding that both requests were denied or ignored.
Ms Kelly said she felt this  was incredibly important because my ex-partner can still get up and bring my children anywhere in the world .
She said that while she has had some  horrific days  over the last two years without her children, she remained  incredibly positive and hopeful  about their return.
 I know my children need me. I know my children s best interests are going to be served in Ireland, their education, their religious needs and their basic, just maternal family needs, are going to be served in Ireland. So that s what keeps me going,  she said.  My youngest son was 16 months old when this occurred and my other son was three. So I ve missed out on so much of their lives. The Irish authorities know from previous cases that mothers that go through this, once they re reunited with their children after years upon years, that the damage is already done.
She said she was  adamant that action is taken  and that even when her children are returned, she hopes to be an advocate to help parents who find themselves in similar  horrific  situations.  I don t actually have words to tell you what it s like living without my children, as in no parent should have to grieve their children when they re alive.
In a statement, Ms McEntee said she met Ms Kelly and  heard about her incredibly difficult situation .  I expressed my admiration for her resilience,  the Minister said.  I also assured her of the Government s ongoing support, which of course includes DFA consular assistance, as she works through the Egyptian authorities to get her children home.
Ms Kelly met Tánaiste and Minister for Foreign Affairs Micheál Martin last November and he is understood to have advised her to appoint a lawyer in Egypt to engage with the country s legal system.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



'It's been a huge push, a mammoth effort by the team'; Brothers Fergal and Barry Doyle have just cut the ribbon on a EUR 4.5 million expansion of their Wicklow destination garden centre
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 4
Length: 1995 words
Body


On a bright and warm spring morning, Fergal Doyle   chief commercial officer of the Co Carlow-anchored gardening centre and lifestyle brand Arboretum   is sitting in a cafe above a bookshop in Dublin s north city centre, flanked and backdropped by a canopy of lush green plants. The location is the oasis-like Urban Green, a new concept for the brand, catering to city gardeners, which opened almost 12 months ago above Chapters Bookstore on Parnell Street in Dublin 1.
At the same time, his brother Barry Doyle   co-owner and chief executive of the family-run business   is ensconced in Kilquade, Co Wicklow, putting the final touches on an expansion plot hatched by the brothers more than five years ago.
Frantic is the only adjective to describe the pace at which the Doyle brothers have been operating of late.
 We re wrecked,  a tired but apparently contented Fergal says, ordering what looks to be a much-needed coffee from the Urban Green cafe.
 It s been a huge push,  confirms Barry, joining the conversation.  A mammoth effort by all the team here and the contractors and everyone, getting everything under our feet. We stuck into merchandising over the last two weeks and it s a credit to all the team. They really pulled all the stops out.
That effort has seen Arboretum officially cut the ribbon this week on a significant redevelopment and expansion of its existing garden centre in Kilquade. The 2,390sq m (25,726sq ft) facility, where they broke ground last July, spans six acres, incorporating a food hall, a fashion section and an expanded health and wellness department at the National Garden Exhibition Centre.
For the first time, the Wicklow site also stocks Arboretum s range of indoor plants, something made possible by the technology in which the brothers have invested over the past nine months.
 This is a bit geeky,  Fergal explains.  There s a 250mm thermal gutter bridging our unheated space, which is our plant area, and our heated   indoor plant   area.
It catches water run-off and built-up rainwater, feeding back into the facility s rainwater harvesting system. There are also solar panels to help fuel the heating system for Arboretum s indoor plant space.  That allows us to get that building up to maybe a B or a B1 Ber (Building Energy Rating),  explains Fergal.  We ve got a lot of money in the ground, buried in the ground with water harvesting tanks, solar panels. But we have gone with a high-spec building.
 We ve never had house plants here before,  says Barry.  So, it s great to have those new categories coming into the facility here. It s an exciting time for all of us.
This investment in sustainable processes was a key consideration for the brothers when mapping out their plans for the site, which they bought in 2015.  There were legacy issues from the previous owner,  recalls Fergal.
 We had to kind of smooth that over and convince Wicklow County Council that we weren t here to mess around.  They engaged extensively with the local authority and community, submitting several options for the scheme, eventually receiving the green light in 2019.
All in, the new facility   designed by German garden centre specialist Rabensteiner   cost Arboretum about EUR 4.5 million, split roughly 50:50 between capital expenditure and debt provided by AIB. There are now 64 people on site in Kilquade, says Barry, an increase of about 25 since the project got under way last summer, bringing to 200 Arboretum s total headcount across its three locations: Kilquade; the original shop and headquarters in Leighlinbridge, Co Carlow; and Urban Green in Parnell Street Dublin 1.
It was a priority for the brothers that the Kilquade shop remained open in some capacity during the nine-month redevelopment process. To that end, the team had been operating from a marquee on the site.  That was difficult,  says Barry,  trading in a marquee with a 40-seater cafe and a little garden shop with a plant area.  Arboretum Kilquade just about broke even over that period, they say, but it was worth it to maintain its presence and keep people employed.
Green light
Among the team, the sense of relief that the site is now fully up and running is palpable.  As soon as they got the green light from Barry to start stripping shelves and move across to this new, modern building, they didn t need to be asked twice,  Fergal, says.  They were a bit like: Let s get out of this marquee. We re sick of it.
Kilquade is the latest phase of an expansion plan the two brothers have spearheaded since taking over the running of the business from their mother, Rachel Doyle, over the past decade or so. Founded by Rachel, Arboretum has grown into a proper brand over its lifetime, generating EUR 14 million in annual revenues across its three locations.
Fergal and Barry s mother is also well known within the industry. A horticulturalist by training, she set up the original garden centre with her husband Frank Doyle in Carlow Town before moving and expanding into a 10-acre site in Leighlinbridge, where she opened the pioneering Arboretum Home & Garden Heaven in 1977. She serves as chairwoman of the horticultural division of Bord Bia and is a former president of the International Garden Centre Association. Rachel also remains very much involved in Arboretum as executive chairwoman and brand ambassador.
 I don t believe she s going to leave the business any time soon,  Fergal says.  She s very much there every day, as is my dad, even though he s retired. He s still in the business, asking questions and giving feedback. You can t pay for that kind of experience.
Both brothers credit their mother with inspiring them to get into business, even if their paths to where they are now diverged somewhat.
For Barry, there was little ambiguity about what he wanted to do with his life. He followed his mother into horticulture, studying the subject in college and learning his trade at the National Botanic Gardens in Glasnevin before becoming a landscaper himself.
 I remember being in school and being offered career guidance and I said:  I don t need to go to that class, I know what I want to be . It was just never a doubt for me. I grew up in the nursery, working with the plants, growing the plants, learning their names. Going to horticultural college then, I had a great head start.
He wound up rejoining the business shortly after his brother Fergal did in 2006.
 I did the landscaping for a couple of years, and I really enjoyed myself,  Barry recalls.  I probably decided then, for the long term, that going back to the garden centre is really where I wanted to be.
Fergal s route back to Leighlinbridge was a bit more circuitous. After studying business in University College Cork, he worked in bars around the area for a while, but his real interest was music.  People who don t know me, I guess a surprise might be that I was a DJ for years,  he says, with an almost guilty smile.  I still have all the gear, all the decks. I won t get rid of any of it.
He says the experience away from home and the business was invaluable.  It was a great thing to do, to go away to Cork, not just for the whole college thing. But then not to come back straight away and actually work in the pub business and in entertainment and stay with it.
Chalk and cheese
Eventually, though, like his brother, Fergal felt the pull to return to Carlow and the garden centre, working initially on the hard landscaping   think patios, decking and fencing, etc   and DIY side of the business before moving on to other categories.
 I think mom kind of saw our passion,  he says.  We became directors but with the caveat that we were going to do continuous learning. It was later on then   fast forward to 2016 or 2017   that we started to think about succession and roles.
The brothers are  very different people , says Barry.  To look at us, you probably wouldn t even think we re brothers and it s definitely the same with our personalities.  They are  chalk and cheese , says Fergal.  I think we recognise though that we have different strengths and weaknesses.
With that in mind, they had to work out a division of labour that was best for them and for the business. As chief operating officer, Fergal is focused on the big commercial picture for Arboretum, as well as marketing, the company s properties and its various systems. Barry, with his background in horticulture, focuses on the customer, Arboretum s product ranges and also its people.
In recent times, the pair have been able to hire senior managers to take some of the day-to-day workload off their hands. That has given them more time to think about big, long-term projects such as the Kilquade expansion and Urban Green.
Despite their differences and the pressures of running a business together, the brothers are close and have been able to work out differences of opinion in typical Irish fashion.
 I guess if something wasn t going well,  Fergal says,  myself and Barry would probably go to our local pub in the village in Leighlinbridge for a pint and have a chat about it. That probably sums up the relationship.
Kilquade, officially open on Friday, is the second big project the brothers have delivered over the past year after Urban Green. The latter was an opportunity that fell to them shortly after Chapters reopened under the stewardship of its new owners Mick Finucane and Kevin Neary in March 2022 following its sudden closure during the pandemic.
With the Kilquade project in the offing, the timing of was not ideal, says Fergal, but they felt it was a bet worth taking.  The opportunity came,  he says,  and, as mom says, the lifetime of the opportunity exists in the lifetime of the opportunity.  The result is one of the most surprising retail spaces and cafes in Dublin, an oasis of urban calm in the heart of the city centre.
Taking a punt
Arboretum s move into the 14,000sq ft space   where it sells plants, seeds, water features and even barbecues and accessories   was seen as something of a vote of confidence in a part of Dublin city that has struggled in recent times, not least in the wake of last November s Parnell Street riot. But it s a punt they do not regret taking, says Barry.
 We opened in the summer, which was not the ideal time. You are better off opening in the spring or around Christmas. The cafe was doing really well but we were still tweaking and changing.  Then came the violence last November and the uncertainty it caused for city traders in the crucial period running up to the end of December.
 We had 10 days there where, to be honest with you, I really questioned what we were doing,  Barry recalls.  It was a difficult period but to be fair, the people of Dublin rallied around the city centre in December, and we had a cracking good month. Christmas sales were really strong and so were gifting sales. That was a really good indicator for us of how the store was going to perform.
Now that Kilquade is open and trading, the Doyles want to spend more time honing and perfecting their city offering.  Our social channels are really good,  says Fergal.  We re doing a lot of engagement with young people in the city centre. There s a lot of influencer stuff happening here around indoor plants. So it s exactly what we expected it to be.
But promoting the concept has been the biggest challenge.
 When people come up to the top of the stairs, it s kind of nice and equally frustrating that they say they didn t notice until then that Urban Green was there. There s only so much you can do to tell people. But you get people saying:  This is amazing!  and it s like, I know, yeah.
CV
Names: Fergal and Barry Doyle. Ages: 45 and 41. Family: Both married with kids. Live in: Leighlinbridge, Co Carlow. Hobbies: Fergal is a keen outdoor chef and Barry runs for fun. Something you might expect: They think their new Urban Green concept could be rolled out at other city locations. Something that might surprise: Fergal is a former DJ and Barry has run four marathons.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



'Real' Iseq 20 market value is more than double the official list's EUR 100 billion; The recent departures of a number of heavyweights from the Dublin stock market have triggered concern within the financial industry about its future viability
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 5
Length: 1887 words
Body


Malin Corporation, the life sciences investment firm cofounded by former Elan chief executive Kelly Martin after overseeing the pharma group s $8.6 billion (EUR 8 billion) sale to US peer Perrigo in 2013, floated on the Irish stock market nine years ago with great hopes.
The premise was simple: invest in a small portfolio of promising companies, keep its own costs down to a minimum, and wait to reap the profits.
While the stock would jump 50 per cent over the first 15 months after its IPO, it didn t take long for the market to become concerned about the ragbag of investments in start-ups across various fields of life sciences and Malin s high head-office costs.
Martin s contract was terminated in late 2017, and a strategic review the following year   after a wider management and board overhaul   saw it focus on less than a handful of priority investments.
Since late 2021, Malin has returned EUR 236 million of cash to shareholders as it has sold down investments   including stakes Immunocore, which is focused on developing cancer treatments, and eczema-targeting Kymab. It values its remaining portfolio at EUR 124 million.
With a market value of just EUR 113 million, Malin is today the smallest component of the Iseq 20, an index established 19 years ago this week for the largest Dublin-listed companies.
Its days on the index are numbered as it continues to eye  realisation  opportunities for its remaining investments and further cash returns to shareholders. But the Iseq 20 has bigger problems.
The total market capitalisation of Iseq 20 is now just over EUR 100 billion, having shrunk dramatically in the past six months following the exits of the two largest groups on the market   CRH and Flutter Entertainment.
Between them, CRH and Flutter have a market capitalisation equivalent to about EUR 85 billion. Both have increased in value since they took on listings on Wall Street, where stocks typically trade at a premium to European shares, relative to earnings.
US-listed stocks trade on an average of 21 times  company earnings, compared to a ratio of 14 for European equities and 12 for UK ones.
The moves are also down to the fact that North America now accounts for three-quarters of CRH s earnings, while Flutter s fast-growing US fantasy sports website FanDuel is increasingly pulling the group s centre of gravity across the Atlantic.
The Iseq 20 is set to be further hollowed out over the summer as Smurfit Kappa, with a market value of about EUR 11 billion, prepares to drop its Irish listing under a planned merger with US cardboard box- making peer WestRock.
 Right now, you have a G1 world in capital markets where the US accounts for over 70 per cent of the MSCI World Index,  said Noel O Halloran, chief investment officer with KBI Global Investors in Dublin. G1 refers to  group of one .
O Halloran added:  Wall Street is acting like a magnet for companies that believe they ll be rewarded more for listing there. Whether that s an illusion or not remains to be seen.
Barry Glavin, head of equity investment platform at Amundi in Dublin, said the recent heavyweight exits  seem to be primarily driven by the scale of their existing US activities, their future growth opportunities in that market and their assessment that a US listing is important to capturing those opportunities .
 Real  ISEQ 20 As it stands, the market cap of the official Iseq 20 is now less than half the EUR 220 billion combined value of the 20 largest Irish public companies listed on stock exchanges on both sides of the Atlantic, according to Irish Times calculations.
This alternative, or  real , Iseq 20 would be led by CRH, Flutter, Ryanair and clinical trials group Icon, which ditched its Irish listing in 2012 for a fully fledged one on the Nasdaq. It would also include fuel-to-technology supplying conglomerate DCC and Woodie s and Chadwicks owner Grafton Group, both of which are listed in London.
New York-quoted Dole plc, formed in 2021 through the merger of Fyffes spin-out Total Produce with Dole Foods, would also make the list.
It also takes in companies such as Zurich-listed bakery group Aryzta and New York-quoted drink cans group Ardagh Metal Packaging, which are domiciled in Switzerland and Luxembourg respectively but have Irish roots and retain some significant functions in Dublin.
However, it excludes companies that moved their registered headquarters to the Republic for tax reasons in recent decades or are the product of tax inversion deals that were all the rage in the early 2010s.
Examples include Perrigo s purchase of Elan or the world s largest medical devices business, Medtronic, which is now a Dublin-domiciled business following its 2015 takeover of Covidien.
Current Iseq 20 components Uniphar, Glenveagh Properties, Ires Reit, FBD, FD Technologies, Kenmare Resources, Origin Enterprises and Malin wouldn t make the cut.
London woes The recent Irish exits for New York have come a decade after a slew of companies   including DCC, sandwich maker Greencore and Grafton Group   ditched their local listings for the then bright lights of London.
The more recent shrinking of the Irish market, however, is more a reflection of a crisis at the London Stock Exchange. The number of listed companies in London has shrunk by more than 25 per cent over the past 10 years, according to research from trading platform XTB.
This has been driven by private equity-fuelled buyouts of public companies and the growing attraction, particularly in the wake of Brexit, of the US and other markets.
O Halloran said the exodus by a number of Irish companies to London a decade ago had not paid off for them.
 The companies would be no better or worse off today had they retained their main listings in Dublin,  he said.  Of course, Brexit and its effect on the UK economy and capital market have had a major impact. We ve seen a derating of the UK market since Brexit.
Plumbing supplier Ferguson quit the FTSE 100 in 2022 for a primary listings in New York. And UK computer chip designer Arm shunned London last year to pursue an initial public offering and flotation on the Nasdaq.
While there had been speculation that Swedish buy-now-pay-later group Klarna was gearing towards a London IPO after it set up a UK holding company in November, its chief executive Sebastian Siemiatkowski has since indicated that a US flotation was more likely. UK pollster YouGov has also threatened to shift its listing from London to New York.
CRH is among the companies to move its main quotation from London to New York as part of its listings rejig, resulting in its exit from the blue-chip FTSE 100 as it eyes access to the S&P 500, the index most followed by investors worldwide. Flutter plans to follow suit, subject to shareholder approval at its annual general meeting in May.
The move will  give greater access to much deeper capital markets  and provide  greater overall liquidity in Flutter shares , the company said in an agm notice to shareholders.
Back in Dublin, the average daily value of shares traded on Euronext, which operates the Irish stock market, plunged by 30 per cent in the year to February, following the departures of CRH and Flutter in September and January respectively.
The departures contributed to the Republic s two largest securities firms, Davy and Goodbody Stockbrokers, both shedding jobs in their capital businesses over the past six months.
Dublin and London have company in their misery. In the past six months, the likes of Finnish sports-brand group Amer Sports, which owns Wilson tennis racquets and Salomon skis, and German sandal maker Birkenstock also listed in New York.
IPO drought To make matters worse, flotations in Dublin have been few and far between in recent times.
Only three companies have floated on the Irish exchange in the past five years: Uniphar, the healthcare group; Corre Energy, a developer of underground storage solutions for renewable energy; and medtech firm HealthBeacon, which succumbed to examinership last October and ended up being taken over by US home appliances group Hamilton Beach.
The Republic doesn t have a natural group of large institutional investors these days for IPO prospects to target to anchor share sales.
A coterie of Irish pensions and investment groups   such as Irish Life Investment Managers, AIB Investment Managers, Hibernian Investment Managers and Ulster Bank Investment Managers   typically acted as  cornerstone investors  in IPOs in the 1980s and 1990s, taking large chunks of the new shares on offer.
However, since then, a triple whammy of Irish pension funds being pressed by advisory firms to lower their exposure to Irish equities, foreign takeovers of the main local players and a general shift by the industry from active stock-picking to passive investment   where funds track stock market benchmarks   has all but killed off this old port of call.
Officials from Euronext Dublin and the wider Irish capital markets ecosystem are developing a detailed pitch for the Government to help reboot the IPO market, sources familiar with the project said last month.
They are seeking to flesh out proposals which were submitted last year but met resistance in the Department of Finance, as they were not developed enough. That report, written by Grant Thornton, called for the establishment of type of cornerstone fund to participate in IPOs, tax incentives for retail investors to put money into public companies and tax breaks for founders or owners of companies that join the market.
The hope is that this pitch will be ready for submission by the end of this month, according to sources.
Viable exchange
The Grant Thornton report said a domestic exchange was  critical to supporting local enterprise . Companies listed on the Irish exchange contributed EUR 12.4 billion to the domestic economy in 2022 and employed or supported almost 90,000 jobs across the State, it said.
 Enterprise Ireland has backed about 6,000 companies in the past decade as part of Government strategy to support and grow indigenous Irish business,  said Joe Gill, director of origination and corporate broking with Goodbody Stockbrokers.
 Having a viable stock exchange is a logical extension of that strategy, to secure further growth capital for companies that choose to stay independent and base themselves in Ireland.
But there are bigger, more global forces at play. Most Western markets   including the US   have seen their lists of investible public companies shrink in recent decades as many public companies and would-be IPO prospects succumbed to the attractions of private equity money and trade sales in an era   until recently   of ultra-low interest rates.
The number of listed companies in the US has fallen from more than 7,000 to fewer than 4,000 since 2000, the Financial Times reported last week, citing figures from Wilshire, the investment services company. A similar trend has unfolded in Europe and Britain.
The so-called de-equitisation phenomenon has been compounded by companies using spare cash and borrowings to buy back chunks of their own shares. US investment banking giant JP Morgan estimates that about $1.2 trillion will be spent by companies globally buying back shares this year   broadly in line with each of the past three years.
A host of Iseq 20 companies, from AIB to Origin, have participated in that game, too.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



'We could see that it's Ronan's city, and because of that, there are a lot of expectations'; O'Gara's decision to bring La Rochelle direct from South Africa to Cork goes down well with team
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 13
Length: 519 words
Body


Excitement is building rapidly as we prepare to witness the next instalment of the blossoming European rivalry between Leinster and La Rochelle.
 Ronan O Gara s decision to take his La Rochelle side to Cork to prepare for their goliath Champions Cup clash with Leinster has created vast swathes of interest within the rugby world.
As the reigning Champions Cup winners look to repeat last season s 27-26 final victory in the Aviva Stadium against Leinster this weekend, Cork is being used as a base to mount this assault as they look to claim their third consecutive European title.
Made history
And since landing in O Gara s hometown the squad have embraced every second of their Irish training base, according to La Rochelle s back row forward Judicaël Cancoriet.
 It is good to change,  he said.  To prepare and get directly into the atmosphere already in Ireland is different. It feels similar to a preseason where we ve had more cohesion by only being with each other for these two weeks. And it brings us even closer.
 It s the first time that we will have a bit of time to go out. We went training yesterday, and we could see that it s Ronan s city, and because of that there are a lot of expectations around the team.
La Rochelle made history last weekend as they became the first European side to win away in South Africa in the Champions Cup.
O Gara s side did not make light work of it, as they rarely do in Europe, as they had to overturn a 16-0 half-time deficit to escape Cape Town with a 22-21 victory over the former URC champion Stormers.
The Herculean effort needed to win this fixture requires as much recovery time as possible to be ready to face the formidable challenge of the four-time Champions Cup winners in their home city, and O Gara has provided that with the trip to Cork.
Cancoriet said:  The first two days were about recovering and working the mind, especially when talking about all the strategy. We re very welcome here; there is nothing bad to say. We ve had the time to recover; we ve had a day of training yesterday . . . So there s no excuse, we ve had time to deal with the trip.
Inevitability
There is an inevitability to these two sides facing each other at some stage of this competition should they wish to claim the title by the end of the season. Leinster claimed victory in the last match between the two with a 16-9 pool stage win in France.
However, La Rochelle have not tasted a Champions Cup knockout defeat since the 2021 final loss to Toulouse. They will be confident coming into this fixture but know they need to be at their best having been within a score both times they have beaten Leo Cullen s men in the final.
He said:  It will be important to be tight. We are in their city, where there is more atmosphere . . . increasing the tension and pressure. We know that we are going to play against one of the best teams in Europe, with very good players in every position.
 I try to give my best to the team and also surf this wave of experience that this team has in this competition. But it is important for us to get better. That s what is important this weekend.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Academics criticise universities over lack of action on Gaza
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 496 words
Byline: EMMET MALONE Irel, '
Body


EMMET MALONE  Ireland s universities have been criticised by a group representing many staff over what they call their failure to abandon links to Israeli institutions and investments in the wake of the war in Gaza.
The group, Academics for Palestine (AfP), had a letter published in The Irish Times in November which has now been signed by about 950 university staff.
The group said yesterday it has been dismayed by the lack of response to a call it issued last month to presidents of third-levels institutions to take action. To date, it says, only the University of Galway has given an undertaking to review its links and policies.
 Two other institutions have provided responses, both of which have been entirely inadequate,  the group said.
 They are hiding behind contrived positions of  neutrality , or deflecting and avoiding the substance of our request entirely. To be clear, it is not legally or morally defensible to be  neutral  on the matter of genocide and violation of international humanitarian law,  says Dr John Reynolds of Maynooth University in the statement.
AfP s references to the war as a genocide, along with some of its other language in relation to the October 7th Hamas attack that sparked the Israeli invasion of Gaza, were previously criticised by other academics.
Israel says 1,200 people were killed and 253 hostages seized in the surprise Hamas-led attack. It says 133 hostages have yet to be released by Hamas, though it is not known how many of them are still alive.
According to the Hamas-run Gaza health ministry, more than 33,400 Palestinians have been killed since the war began.
 One of the things that is striking is that the universities haven t even been keeping in step with the Government,  says Dr Patrick Bresnihan, also based at Maynooth, who is involved with AfP.
 You d think that maybe they might take their lead from the Government, but the Government has been much stronger.
AfP cites the example of Trinity College Dublin   whose involvement in two research projects that included Israeli institutions reported to have links with the state s armed forces or security forces as partners, as well as investments in companies operating in the occupied territories   as the sort of issue it wants action on.
In a statement, Trinity said it  strongly believes in the right of everyone in its community to hold different opinions and views, and to express them in a manner that is lawful and within college policy on dignity and respect.
 Academic freedom permits academic institutions to work on research topics and with research partners of their choice, and to teach and discuss accordingly.
In November, UCD president Prof Orla Feely responded to calls for action by saying:  Were it to be our practice to take an institutional position on geopolitical matters, we would be inhibiting the freedom of members of our community to express their individual positions and suppressing our ability to sustain and respect a diversity of views.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Almost 400 apartments to be built on Dublin's Grand Canal
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 534 words
Byline: OLIVIA KELLY
Body


OLIVIA KELLY Dublin Editor  Almost 400 apartments, 65 per cent of which will be available to rent by low- and middle-income workers under the State s cost-rental scheme, are to be built along the Grand Canal in Dublin by the Land Development Agency (LDA) and Dublin City Council.
The Bluebell Waterways development will be located on the site of old water filtration ponds beside the canal s fifth lock, formerly used by the Guinness brewery when its stout was made using canal water.
The almost three-hectare site in Dublin 12 is approximately 6km to the west of the city centre, south of Ballyfermot, and west of Drimnagh and Inchicore. The area has been dominated by industrial sites and older city council housing, but is increasingly being developed for new apartment schemes due to its proximity to the city and good transport links, including the Luas Red Line.
The 389 apartments, in blocks of up to nine storeys, will include a mix of studios and one-, two- and three-bed apartments, as well as community spaces, a creche and allotments. The site, owned by the city council, includes 37 1950s social housing maisonettes which are earmarked for demolition. These tenants will be offered social homes in the new blocks.
Just over a third of the homes will house people on the council s social housing waiting list, with the remainder available for cost-rental tenants. Under the State-subsidised cost-rental system, rents are based on the cost of building, managing and maintaining the homes, not market rates. The scheme is aimed at workers who earn too much to qualify for social housing supports but who cannot afford to buy or rent on the open market. Eligible income limits for applicants were last year increased to EUR 66,000, after tax, in Dublin. Tenants also have long-term security, with leases running to several years available.
While the rents for the Bluebell scheme will not be confirmed until it nears completion, nearby cost-rental developments in west Dublin have offered apartments at rents 30 per cent below market rates.
The Grand Canal was built in the late 18th century as a transport route, but also to provide a reliable water source for Dublin and the Guinness Brewery at James s Gate, where there was a harbour, a city basin and the canal s original terminus.
Water was taken from the canal at the fifth lock into filter beds, brick-lined ponds which allowed sediment to sink to the bottom. The water was used to make Guinness into the 20th century.
The LDA will today begin consultation on the Bluebell Waterways scheme and intends to submit a planning application before the end of this year.
 This consultation provides residents, businesses and community groups with the opportunity to see the details of the proposed development   everything from a typical floor plan for the homes to a characteristic streetscape   capturing what the final neighbourhood could look like,  said Phelim O Neill, LDA head of property.
Dave Dinningan, director of housing delivery with the council, said the project would  revitalise the Dublin 12 area by supporting existing services while creating a safe and social environment, with new community amenities for existing and future residents .

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



An Irishman's Diary
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 784 words
Body


The existence of a concept known as  God in a Bottle  had somehow passed me by until this week. Then I found myself leafing through the catalogue for a forthcoming Dublin auction, wherein two examples of the phenomenon are for sale.
The auction, at Adam s of Stephen s Green, is of a random collection of furniture and effects gathered under the title  Irish vernacular .
Most of what that means will be familiar to anyone who grew up in the Irish countryside during the mid-late 20th century. The sale includes vintage dressers, meal bins, settle beds, súgán chairs, turf buckets, etc.
There are even two  milking stools , a four-legged and deluxe five-legged model, the likes of which I probably sat on as a child. But if  God in a Bottle  was part of the Irish vernacular back then too, we mustn t have spoken that precise dialect where I grew up.
As I now know, it s a variation on the ship-in-a-bottle theme, except with religious rather than maritime fittings suspended through the bottle-neck and assembled inside.
Typically, there was a cross and a ladder, along with other symbols of the crucifixion: a hammer, pincers, sometimes a soldier s lance.
Adam s suggests that although this form of folk art has roots in various cultures,  it is particularly associated with Ireland . But the catalogue adds:  These intriguing creations occasionally found their way to England, likely brought by Irish labourers working on roads and building sites .
Sure enough, during my researches, I have since found the website of an antiques business in York, where a sample dated 1937 turned up a few years ago.
The auctioneers there suggested that  these bottles were traditionally associated with the Irish living within mining communities . Mind you, their cross had been inscribed by its creator  To Miss M Bryant from T Prisk : not famously Hibernian names.
In any case, the phenomenon has travelled a lot farther than England. I have also found it mentioned on an entertaining blog called Don t Forget Your Shovel, complied by one Susan Arthure, an Irish archaeologist living in South Australia.
One day a while ago, she went  snorkelling with the cuttlefish near Whyalla , the way you do in Australia, and commented:
 That was glorious, but coming a close second was fossicking in a small antiques shop on the way home at Wirrabara (where) in the last room, I spied a magnificent God-in-a-bottle.
It was a big, old flagon bottle, more than 30cm tall. And it didn t have the usual crucifixion scene but featured instead both the Sacred Heart of Jesus and the Immaculate Heart of Mary, with the maker s name on a card:  Peter Coleman of Adelaide.
Nor was it the first example she had seen in South Australia. There was another in the museum of a winery established by Jesuit priests in the mid-19th century. That one did have the standard cross, ladder, hammer, and even a miniature jug ( possibly for the vinegar? ), all inside an old wine bottle.
Strange to say, when I look up the phrase  God in a bottle  in Irish newspaper archives, the results are few and recent   all but one from the last three years and mainly relating to a man in Roscommon who keeps the tradition alive.
The curious exception is an Evening Press GAA column from 1978. But on closer inspection, that had nothing to do with religious art.
It was headlined  The Myths of the Open Draw  and concerned the debate, then (and still) smouldering, about whether the GAA would be better abandoning the provincial championships and having a straight knock-out competition with all counties going into the hat equally.
In disagreeing that this would improve the competition s fairness, the writer reached for a phrase with which he was clearly familiar, even if the context suggests he didn t understand its precise, folk-art meaning.
Dismissing the case for an open draw, he wrote:  The whole outcry is suggestive of decadence; of a search for some  God in a Bottle  or  Deus ex machina  whose very appearance will transform the struggling into the powerful without as much as a hand s turn from themselves. That kind of thing went out with Cinderella.
It s not the main theme of this column, I know. But since the Evening Press writer brought it up, I feel bound to point that when an open draw format was tried out for the first time six years later, in the Centenary Cup of 1984, the established powers of the period   Kerry and Dublin   were both eliminated early.
My humble native county Monaghan, meanwhile   freed at last from the oppression of the Ulster Championship   blazed a trail through Limerick, Mayo, Offaly, and Derry to reach the final, in which they were narrowly defeated by Meath. No Gods in bottles  were invoked anywhere along the route.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



An unlikely lesson in white-knuckle thrillers
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 341 words
Byline: THE TEACHERS' LOUNGE HHHHH
Body


THE TEACHERS  LOUNGE HHHHH
Directed by Ilker Çatak. Starring Leonie Benesch, Eva Löbau, Michael Klammer, Rafael Stachowiak. 12A cert. 99 mins.
 It s an unusual set-up for a white- knuckle thriller. Ilker Çatak s nervy Oscar nominee follows an idealistic young teacher, Carla Nowak (Leonie Benesch, sensational), who is hoping to make a difference. She does just that, but not in the way that she had intended.
Carla, who is of Polish descent, is quick to come to the defence of her student Ali (Can Rodenbostel), the son of Turkish immigrants, when he is accused of a series of thefts at the school.
She understandably rails against heavy-handed tactics that include interrogation and student searches, and is especially dismayed when her colleagues Milosz (Rafael Stachowiak) and Thomas (Michael Klammer) encourage students to tattle on their classmates.
The escalating tensions, amplified by Marvin Miller s unnerving violin- based score, are compounded by sensitivities (and insensitivities) to race and class.
Carla is already marginalised by her high-mindedness and origins when she sets a trap in the hope of confirming the true thief s identity. The sleeve of a polka-dot blouse leads her to an office administrator, Ms Kuhn (Eva Löbau), who is irate when confronted. There are distinct echoes of Jean Vigo s Zero for Conduct when Kuhn s son Oskar (Leonard Stettnisch), a sensitive student in Carla s maths class, becomes increasingly disruptive. Thanks to her illicit recording, Carla then comes under investigation herself.
The script, by Johannes Duncker and the director, grabs the viewer from the get-go. Judith Kaufmann s urgent, claustrophobic cinematography tightens the vice-like grip, while dark, angular shifts in lighting and production design signal the heroine s unravelling.
It feels strangely appropriate that Benesch, who made her feature debut as an 18-year-old in Michael Haneke s The White Ribbon back in 2009, finds herself here at the centre of a dramatic knot of prejudice, complacency and institutional failings. TARA BRADY

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Ask not what you can do in the road race, but what it can do for you
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 14
Length: 966 words
Body


The now annual list of challenges faced by the Dublin Marathon organisers made for somewhat familiar reading this week. Trying to agree on some minor changes to the start and finish, then  re-measuring the 26.2-mile route, then how to best deal with the 22,500 entries to minimise the drop-off come race day.
These are some of the same challenges faced by every road-running event countrywide. Most of these are on a much smaller scale but still count as a mass participation event when it comes to running the numbers.
I get to experience some of this once every year, and last Sunday was at home in Cobh for the annual 10-mile road race, named in my honour five years ago. And like after the Dublin Marathon, every year we also come away with fresh learning and areas on which to improve.
The Cobh 10-Mile Road Race has a race entry limit of 1,000 runners and of those, there were 840 finishers on Sunday. That sort of drop-off is normal for any road race and there are plans to up the numbers further for next year, if possible.
In all those five years we have been blessed with fine weather. So much so that some people think we have a special way of making sure the day is dry and bright to welcome runners from all over Ireland and some international runners to take on the streets and hills of Cobh, where I put in many undulating miles in those early years. The weather is the one thing over which we have no control.
Whenever a race is named after you, you re also expected to run. This year I walked on a local shortcut route, so I could be at the start and then see the race unfold midway and still arrive in town to see most people finish.
In many ways, the Cobh-10 took over the mantle from the Ballycotton 10-Mile Road Race when they had their final event after 40 years in 2017. The final race around Ballycotton was won by Mick Clohisey in a time of 49:20. Our very first race in 2018 was also won by Clohisey, his time of 49:22 just one sign that we had something to build on and ensure the legacy of Ballycotton lived on in Cobh.
We didn t just inherit the fine tradition of awarding a race mug for every finisher. We also had a race that could deliver fast times if we could attract the runners to run as fast as they could.
Initially, we needed to ensure the men could get under 50 minutes and the women under an hour. That first year we also got our first sub-60 minutes when Lizzie Lee lined up and finished in 58:28.
We knew we were always going to need time to convince athletes that you could still produce fast times over an undulating course, and not just the speedy elites at the front of the field. Part of the challenge was to get all levels of runners to bypass a pancake-flat, guaranteed-fast course and instead embrace the hills of Cobh.
As our race slogan goes, it may be hilly, but  just get over it .
People sometimes forget that when you take on a hilly course like Cobh, you are also going to get some downhill. And also enough variety so that the challenging 10-mile distance passes by quickly, especially as you run through the countryside, distracted by the sea views and early spring flowering hedgerows.
Running beside the sea there is also the chance of a blustery wind, but up to this year, we ve also managed to wake up to a calm and almost balmy day.
The Ballycotton 10 was also an iconic race, in some ways in advance of its time that set the standard for road racing in Ireland. It was one of those races on the calendar that every runner wanted to sign up for and so popular that when the entries reached their limit of 3,000, the small fishing village in east Cork was struggling to manage the numbers and the logistics that went along with that. From parking to accommodation to traffic management, eventually, it just became too much for the handful of local volunteers that carried the race every year.
Vibrant club
 On Sunday, Michelle Finn from Leevale was the first woman home, the Olympic steeplechaser running well under the hour, clocking 57:08, with Tim O Donoghue from east Cork first home in the men s race in 51:37.
In Cobh, we have a vibrant club and we can spread the jobs across many hands. Still every year we see those areas to improve on, to attract more runners of all levels and create that iconic attraction that evolved in Ballycotton.
The big difference now is that there are so many different road races for runners to sign up for, over various distances. To take on a 10-mile you do need to set your mind to it and take the time to prepare so that you enjoy the event and are not overwhelmed by the distance.
One of the most important things for me is to see that look of satisfaction as the runners cross the finish line, happy with their run but knowing too there might be room for improvement. Because for many runners the finish line is just leading to the next start line.
For many of these road races around Ireland, it s also the chance to raise funds for improved facilities or simply extra resources.
One of the problems I see is that there is not really any hierarchy of races. Just like the World Athletics road racing rankings of platinum, gold, silver and bronze labels, we could in Ireland create a similar ranking order so that runners of all levels can make an informed decision when choosing where to race.
Some are after a good race experience, others may be chasing some prize money. All this should be collated in an easily accessible format so that there is a sort of catalogue of sanctioned races.
One of my ideas is to get the National Championships 10-Mile event to Cobh. Sometimes when you take a championship event out of the big city to a small town it is embraced more. That creates more challenges, but Cobh would welcome that. It s not simply what you can do in the road race, but what can the road race do for you.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Blackstone to take majority stake in Winthrop Technologies
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 2
Length: 539 words
Byline: CIARA O'BRIEN
Body


CIARA O BRIEN
 US private equity group Blackstone has bought a controlling stake in data centre business Winthrop Technologies in a deal that values the Irish company at more than EUR 800 million.
The deal sees Blackstone take a 50.7 per cent stake in Winthrop, with existing shareholders that include founder Barry English, group chief executive Anne Dooley, and managing director Bernard Keane retaining the remainder of the shares.
The company has not disclosed the financial details of the transaction, but previous reports put the valuation for Winthrop at more than EUR 800 million.
Winthrop Technologies has become one of the biggest construction companies focused on the data centre sector in Europe, with a portfolio of projects in Dublin, Warsaw, Amsterdam and Munich, among other locations. It operates across seven European markets.
 The partnership with Blackstone marks a new era of growth for Winthrop Technologies,  said Ms Dooley.  This is an investment in the company s leadership, and our team at all levels, who have achieved our strong current market position and will continue to drive Winthrop Technologies into its next phase.
With the backing of Blackstone, Winthrop expects to accelerate its growth and tap into the growing demand for data centres worldwide, fuelled by the shift to artificial intelligence and the increased adoption of cloud technologies, both of which increase demand for computing power.
 We are at an inflection point where we are seeing once-in-a-generation demand for data centres, and we believe Winthrop Technologies will be instrumental in powering this digital infrastructure revolution , said Raphael de Botton, senior managing director at Blackstone.  This transaction is an example of Blackstone s long-term conviction in investing in this megatrend, and we are excited to partner with Winthrop s management team as they embark on their next phase of growth.
Focus on Europe
Chairman of Winthrop Technologies Michael Cawley said the investment was a  strong vote of confidence  in the management and staff at the company.
The company will continue to operate under the Winthrop brand, and focus on the European data centre market. Data centres have proved a lucrative investment with major tech companies investing significantly in further capacity as the move to digitalisation continues in the wake of the pandemic. Amazon, Google and Meta are among the companies that have invested significantly in their infrastructure to support future needs.
Pretax profits at Winthrop increased almost sixfold to EUR 86.17 million last year, The Irish Times reported in September. Consolidated accounts for the Dublin-headquartered business showed the business achieved the sharp increase in profits in the year to April 2023 as revenues topped EUR 1 billion for the first time, surging 55 per cent.
Still, data centres have become controversial in Ireland in recent years given their electricity consumption   the International Energy Agency estimates they will consume about a third of the State s total electricity by 2026.
Blackstone has also been eyeing the data centre sector, with a $7 billion joint venture with US-based Digital Realty to develop a number of hyperscale data centre campuses.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Brady guilty of perverting the course of justice; Convicted killer accepted responsibility for recording footage of witness interview
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 432 words
Byline: EOIN REYNOLDS
Body


EOIN REYNOLDS
 Aaron Brady, who shot and killed Det Garda Adrian Donohoe, has pleaded guilty to perverting the course of justice during his 2020 murder trial.
An attempt by lawyers for the 33-year-old to prevent the media from reporting his admission of guilt, due to a potential prejudicial effect on any retrial he might face for the detective s murder, was characterised by the State as  fanciful  and was refused by the Special Criminal Court.
Brady, formerly of New Road, Crossmaglen, Co Armagh, accepted that he was responsible for recording footage of a Garda interview with Ronan Flynn, a witness who told gardaí he had heard Brady admit to shooting Det Garda Donohoe three times.
The video was later posted on social media accusing Mr Flynn of  touting  and calling him a  rat . Mr Flynn did not give evidence at Brady s murder trial and Mr Justice Michael White, who oversaw the case, described the release of the footage as  the most outrageous contempt of court  and a clear attempt to intimidate Mr Flynn and other witnesses.
Brady was convicted by a jury of the detective s murder during a robbery at Lordship Credit Union, Bellurgan, Co Louth on January 25th, 2013. He is serving a life sentence with a minimum of 40 years.
Michael O Higgins SC, for Brady, had argued that media coverage of his client s attempt to pervert the course of justice could prejudice a future trial if his murder conviction is overturned by the Court of Appeal. Brady appealed his conviction last November and is awaiting a decision.
Lorcan Staines SC, prosecuting, pointed out that the Constitution requires that justice be done in public and that principle should only be deviated from in exceptional cases.
Counsel said that Brady s father, Tony Brady, has conducted an online campaign which included  vitriolic commentary  regarding prosecution witnesses, gardaí, prosecution lawyers and the original trial judge. He said Tony Brady had created hours of commentary suggesting a State conspiracy against his son in relation to the murder conviction and the charge of perverting the course of justice, to which he has now pleaded guilty.
Mr Justice Burns said a retrial is  simply a possibility and no more than a possibility . He adjourned sentencing to May 29th. Brady is charged with a further count of conspiring with Dean Byrne to persuade a State witness not to testify at the murder trial. He did not enter a plea in relation to that count but Mr Staines said it should be taken into account at sentencing. Mr Byrne (30), of Cabra Park, Phibsborough, Dublin, remains on trial on the conspiracy charge.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Breaking 10,000 for the first time since 2007
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 5
Length: 273 words
Body


The Iseq All-Share index, comprised of all companies listed in Dublin, has breached the 10,000-point level this month for the first time since early 2007 when the then high-flying banking stocks began to teeter at the tail end of the Celtic Tiger era.
The rebound lagged by more than a decade that of most other Western markets from the great financial crisis. The FTSE 100 in London and Wall Street s S&P 500 had each breached to their pre-crash levels by late 2013, while the pan-European Stoxx 600 index had rebounded by 2015.
 While the composition of the Iseq is very different from 2007, it is a significant milestone for the index to have broken the 10,000 [level]after such a long period of time,  said Damian Roddy, head of capital markets at Davy Stockbrokers.
The Iseq All-Share has risen 16 per cent so far this year amid a wider advance by global markets, and hit a record high of almost 10,180 on Wednesday of last week.
It briefly rose above 10,000 during intraday trading on February 20th, 2007, but hadn t closed above that level until Wednesday last week.
Still, the number of companies on the Iseq has fallen by more than 50 per cent over the period to just 26 today.
Housebuilder Abbey, Aer Lingus and AGI Therapeutics, the first three in 2007 by alphabetical order, and the final three, UTV, Veris and Waterford Wedgwood, are among those to have long since exited the market.
While the departures of former market heavyweights CRH and Flutter have hit the values of the Iseq All-Share and Iseq 20 this year, they have not affected the actual calculations of the indices as adjustments are made to the so-called index devisors.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Breathing life into the story of a doomed diva
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 428 words
Byline: BACK TO BLACK HHH
Body


BACK TO BLACK HHH Directed by Sam Taylor- Johnson. Starring Marisa Abela, Jack O Connell, Eddie Marsan, Lesley Manville, Juliet Cowan, Jeff Tunke. 15A cert. 122 minutes.  There is reason to fret about halfway through Sam Taylor- Johnson s earthy study of Amy Winehouse s too-brief career. Managerial wonks, distressed at her substance abuse, press her in a corner and urge her towards a spell in rehab. She s not having it ( No, no, no! ). Her daddy backs her up. Everyone involved deserves credit for not cutting to a performance of the opening track from her second album. We ll give it that, among other things.
Too many people who haven t seen Back to Black have already decided this is a career-killing disaster. Blame some ropey trailers, the genre s unhappy history and sincere concerns about the tastefulness of such a project. Back to Black certainly entertains a few of the cliches satirised in Walk Hard: The Dewey Cox Story. Yes, before that rehab scene we do see her work out relationship concerns through spontaneous composition on a nearby guitar. But there is real grit to the performances and a fruitful desire to anatomise a relationship that brought so much grief.
Everyone who buys a ticket will probably already know the Winehouse story: a Jewish kid from Camden Town honed her skills belting out jazz classics before securing an unlikely deal with Simon Fuller s 19 Management. (The  I ain t no Spice Girl  line that generated derision in the trailer makes sense in that context.) Two hit albums followed.
The film is rooted largely in the singer s north London manor. Taylor-Johnson, who examined the young John Lennon in Nowhere Boy, draws a gorgeous performance from Lesley Manville as the granny Winehouse idolised. Eddie Marsan negotiates the (shall we say) diplomatically written role of her father, Mitch, with some grace. A convincing whiff of lager and pool chalk is everywhere.
Back to Black places the body of its chips on the relationship between Winehouse (Marisa Abela) and Blake Fielder-Civil (Jack O Connell), her sometime husband. The bet pays off. O Connell gets across the sticky-carpet appeal without making anything particularly likeable of that controversial character. Abela can t equal Winehouse before the microphone, but, away from the stage, she manages to be simultaneously adorable and exasperating. Sure, you will learn more in Asif Kapadia s great documentary Amy, but Taylor-Johnson does a decent job of making a tight drama from the same tragic yarn. A good deal better than that recent Bob Marley thing.DONALD CLARKE

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Brennan proving a vital safe pair of hands for Meath; After first-round win over Longford, goalkeeper is ready for Sunday's Leinster quarter-final against Dublin
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 14
Length: 730 words
Body


There is nothing unique in the first telling of Seán Brennan s rapid rise to the Meath senior goalkeeping position. Just 22, his breakthrough came with the Meath minor football team, winning the 2018 Leinster title, having previously played in goal for several soccer clubs, including in neighbouring Dublin.
He also comes from good football stock, his grandfather Tony Brennan was a forward on the Meath team that won the 1967 All-Ireland, later serving as a Meath selector alongside Seán Boylan.
What sets it apart is Brennan s telling of how he ended up in the goalkeeping position in the first place. When taking to competitive Gaelic football, at about age 13, he d already been diagnosed with an irregular heartbeat, which required a heart monitor as a precautionary measure.
 I had the heart monitor put in for two years when I was younger because I had an irregular heartbeat,  he says.  So I suppose I wasn t able to be running around too much out the field, so I was put in goals and kind of thought,  Yeah, I ll do a year or two here and be back out . But I just haven t seemed to leave the goals since. That s how it started in Gaelic football terms anyway. But no, it didn t affect me much. It probably affected my mother more because she couldn t look at the games knowing.
 To be honest, looking back, it s probably the best thing that could have happened to me because I don t think I would have been too good of an outfield player, so it s kind of a blessing in disguise really. And after two years, when they monitored it, they came back and said,  Listen, it s worked itself out . I wasn t getting irregular arrhythmias in it so, touch wood, it s been all good to this day.
After starting all seven league games for Meath during the Allianz Football League, Brennan made his first championship start in the first-round win over Longford last weekend, which set up Sunday s Leinster quarter-final showdown against All-Ireland champions Dublin.
Didn t see it coming
He did feature in the Tailteann Cup last summer, first given the number one jersey by manager Colm O Rourke after Meath lost to Offaly in the Leinster quarter-final.
 To be honest, I didn t see it coming at all. I think I got told maybe a week or 10 days beforehand that I was playing so it felt like the longest week or 10 days ever waiting for it to come around.
 But I just accepted it with open arms and just said,  Listen, just go at it with no regrets, they obviously have seen something in me to give me the shout . So I kind of never looked back since then, and thoroughly enjoying it.
He enjoyed his time playing soccer too, before giving first and now only preference to Gaelic football:  I played a good bit of soccer growing up. I would have played with the NEC, which was the Meath area for soccer. I played with Bohemians for a little bit, and I played for a team out in Coolock, called St Malachy s in the DDSL and really enjoyed my time.
Great characters  I come from a fairly small club in Meath in Dunderry, so coming up to Dublin and straight into Coolock was a good experience. I met some great characters up there, some lads I d still chat to today, but gave that up because I wanted to go with the Meath minors, so I haven t played soccer since. Loved my time playing it though.
Also known for his placed-kicking skills, Brennan has been embracing that ever- expanding and increasingly critical goalkeeping role.
 I love how important it has become, whether it s kick-outs or free-taking or influencing the game with the ball in your hands. I think it s a positive the way goalkeeping has gone. I know there s talk about rule changes with kickouts and stuff, but I think where it s at is good.
 Even the likes of Derry, the way Odhran Lynch plays or Ethan Rafferty, you take great enjoyment in seeing that, because you know it s not easy to do either.
Now in his final year of secondary school teaching at DCU, Brennan was only nine the last time Meath beat Dublin in the Leinster championship, in 2010.
 Unfortunately there hasn t been any more days like that since,  he says.  You d like to think with the current crop we have, that the next four or five years, you don t know where that could take us.
 Because you kind of see where we are at the minute, the kind of rough edge of everyone that s in that dressingroom, we know the quality is there and age is probably on our side as well.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Children's hospital to see patients from 2025; Donnelly expects hospital to be handed over to State in final quarter of this year
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 491 words
Byline: MARTIN WALL
Body


MARTIN WALL  The Government wants children to be treated in the new EUR 2.2 billion national children s hospital next year, Minister for Health Stephen Donnelly has said.
The Minister said the contractor said the hospital would be ready to be handed over to the State in the final quarter of this year and he fully expected that deadline to be met.
Mr Donnelly said once handed over to the State-appointed development board, Children s Health Ireland (CHI) would need six months to commission the facility. He said he and the Government wanted to see children being treated in the hospital next year.
The Minister said there was a  live discussion  under way between the development board and main contractor as to the final cost of the project as well as on the time for the building to be handed over.
He said the contractor had submitted claims for hundreds of millions of euro and the board was challenging those claims. A very small percentage of these had been agreed upon through a mediation process, he added.
 We can all see the difference this hospital is going to make for children,  the Fianna Fáil TD said.  This is transformative for healthcare for children in Ireland.
Mr Donnelly yesterday turned the sod on the Ronald McDonald House, which has capacity to provide accommodation for up to 52 families of children being treated at the new hospital. This is an increase of 160 per cent on the  facility at the  paediatric hospital in Crumlin. As well as bedrooms,  Ronald McDonald House will have a communal kitchen and  common areas.
Mr Donnelly said the start of construction on the facility marked  another positive milestone in the delivery of the new children s hospital project .
HSE chief executive Bernard Gloster said:  The proximity of this new family accommodation unit ...  will mean that families have direct access to their children whenever they are spending time in the new children s hospital.
Marian Carroll, chairwoman of Ronald McDonald House, a charitable arm of the fast food chain McDonald s, said its facility at Crumlin had  provided accommodation, care and support for over 5,000 families .
Anti-obesity expert Dr Donal O Shea previously questioned if it was appropriate to have a charity linked to a fast food company involved in a children s hospital project.
However, parents of sick children say they have benefited from having access to accommodation at Crumlin, including Rose Marie O Loughlin, mother of a seven-year-old boy treated at the hospital.
 Darragh was born in Wexford General Hospital and after only 24 hours it was clear he needed additional care and was transferred by ambulance to CHI Crumlin,  she said.  At two days old he had his first investigative cath lab procedure and was scheduled for open heart surgery. We were far from home, terrified and had not planned for this. We got a room in the Ronald McDonald House, and it is difficult to put into words what a difference this made to us.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Cinema great returns with a meditation on the self
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 365 words
Byline: CLOSE YOUR EYES HHHH
Body


CLOSE YOUR EYES  HHHH Directed by Víctor Erice. Starring Manolo Solo, José Coronado, Ana Torrent, Petra Martínez, María León, Mario Pardo, Helena Miquel, Antonio Dechent, José María Pou, Soledad Villamil, Juan Margallo. No cert. 169 mins.
  Miracles haven t existed in the movies since Dreyer died,  insists Max (Mario Pardo), a long-standing collaborator and friend to the hero of Close Your Eyes. And yet, here is a resurrection.
The Spanish auteur Víctor Erice established his reputation as one of the great directors of European cinema with just three feature-length projects: his masterpiece, The Spirit of the Beehive, in 1973; The South, in 1983; and his documentary The Quince Tree Sun, in 1992.
Close Your Eyes, Erice s fourth feature, premiered at Cannes film festival last May, after a gaping 31-year absence. Much to the dismay of critics and fans, however, the film was controversially relegated to an inauspicious sidebar. The 83-year-old film-maker refused to attend and subsequently sent an open letter to the Spanish newspaper El País, decrying the selection process and a lack of transparency.
Close Your Eyes, a languorous consideration of time, memory and cinema, was subsequently named the second best film of 2023 by Cahiers du Cinema, the French film magazine.
Utilising a matryoshka structure   and upcycling the director s unfinished works   the film opens in postwar France, where a wealthy Spanish emigre dispatches a detective to find his long-lost daughter in Shanghai.
She turns out to be merely the first of several missing persons and lost texts. The story is revealed to be a surviving fragment of a 1990 production abandoned when its lead actor, Julio (José Coronas), disappeared without a trace. Two decades later, spurred by a tabloid TV investigation, the director of this film within the film, and Erice substitute Miguel (Manolo Solo), renew the search.
Taking cues from the sleepy Almerian fishing community where Miguel lives, an unhurried mystery introduces jolly nuns, an estranged daughter and a charismatic dog.
The script, by Erice and Michel Gaztambide, tarries for singsongs, dinners and poignant conversations about cinema and the self. TARA BRADY

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Cork developer Michael O'Flynn gets green light for Kildare scheme
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 1
Length: 379 words
Byline: GORDON DEEGAN
Body


GORDON DEEGAN
 Cork developer Michael O Flynn has secured the green light for a mixed-use scheme in Co Kildare despite an entity operated by serial planning objectors, the Callaghan brothers, lodging a submission on the project.
In the case, Kildare County Council has granted planning permission to O Flynn Construction (Dublin) Ltd to proceed with the construction of 36 residential homes and two office/retail units on lands to the north of Caragh village.
The local authority has granted planning permission despite Michael Callaghan and John Callaghan s Mayo-based group An Lucht Inbhuanaithe making a submission on the scheme.
The council decision reverses a planning refusal it issued in April of last year to Mr O Flynn s firm for a housing development at the site which again followed the Callaghans  An Lucht Inbhuanaithe making a submission.
The Callaghan brothers were at the centre of RTÉ Investigates allegations concerning payoffs to objectors in the planning system last November.
Asked to comment on the O Flynn planning decision yesterday, John Callaghan declined to comment.
Asked if he continues to make submissions on planning applications, Mr Callaghan replied:  I don t have any comment to make   anything that is out there is on record.
Asked if he is still active in the planning arena in terms of making submissions, Mr Callaghan replied:  I am not going to answer that question   no comment.
In the An Lucht Inbhuanaithe submission, Michéal Ó Ceallacháin told the council that it must determine the application in accordance with all Irish and European Union law and policy. In the submission made before the Prime Time programme, Mr Ó Ceallacháin said,  it is obvious that adverse impacts on the environment arise cumulatively in relation to high carbon footprint materials and inappropriate heating technology .
A local farmer, Peter Robinson, objected to the housing scheme telling the council that the adverse effect of the scheme  will threaten the ongoing viability of my farming enterprise .
The council granted planning permission for the scheme after concluding that the development would not seriously injure the amenities of the area or property in the vicinity.
When contacted yesterday, a spokesman for O Flynn Construction declined to comment.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Court rejects bid to save planning permission for 1,593 apartments
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 3
Length: 572 words
Byline: ELLEN O'RIORDAN
Body


ELLEN O RIORDAN
 A developer s bid to save its planning permission for 1,593 rental apartments in north Dublin s inner suburbs has been rejected by the Supreme Court.
A partner fund of developer Hines received fast-track approval in November 2021 for the EUR 602 million scheme of 12 blocks, including one of 18 storeys, on the site of the former Holy Cross seminary on Clonliffe Road in Drumcondra.
The Supreme Court yesterday upheld the High Court s decision to strike down the approval, granted under a now-extinct fast-track process, in a challenge brought by Fionnuala Sherwin, a resident of Knocksinna Grove, Foxrock, Co Dublin, who describes herself as a practising Catholic.
Protected structures
Her case was against An Bord Pleanála, which did not seek to appeal the judgment itself, but was supportive of the developer s application.
Ruling for the five-judge Supreme Court, Mr Justice Séamus Woulfe said An Bord Pleanála s inspector did not properly assess whether the proposed development would cause harm to the curtilage of adjacent protected structures on the site.
Dublin City Council s conservation officer recommended refusing planning permission, saying the height, scale and massing of the 18-storey block is  excessive in this context  and will entirely dominate and seriously injure the architectural setting of the protected structures : the former seminary and the 18th-century Fortick s Alms House, known as the Red House.
The officer recommended omitting the tower from the development as he felt this block would injure the surrounding environs of Drumcondra and would be  clearly visible in long-range views from other parts of the historic city .
The board s inspector considered the 18-floor building could sit side by side with existing protected structures without detriment. However, Mr Justice Woulfe was satisfied that this opinion cannot be viewed as an assessment of compliance with the development plan s policy for protected structures.
The judge said there was no assessment of whether the tower, whose height is significantly above those permitted by the Dublin City Development Plan, would  relate to and complement  the special character of the protected structure.
The permission fell in the top court for different reasons than in the High Court. Its ultimate undoing was the board s failure to consider relevant provisions of the local development plan, said Mr Justice Woulfe.
Mature trees
While the board s inspector noted concerns raised by the council s conservation officer regarding the potential impact a proposed basement could have on mature trees on the grounds, she did not refer at all to the relevant policy in the local development plan, said the judge.
Therefore, he said, she failed to assess whether a grant of planning permission would contravene the local plan s policy of discouraging basement development next to protected structures, particularly having regard to potential effects on mature trees.
The court was also not satisfied that the board properly expressed its reasoning for its decision. The adequacy of its reasons must be tested in light of the  overwhelmingly negative view  of the council s conservation officer and of the relevant Government department on important aspects of the project, Mr Justice Woulfe said.
Mr Justice Woulfe s ruling was supported by Supreme Court colleagues Mr Justice Peter Charleton, Ms Justice Iseult O Malley and Mr Justice Brian Murray.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Court reserves decision in mother's appeal over full carer's allowance
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 441 words
Byline: ELLEN O'RIORDAN
Body


ELLEN O RIORDAN  The State is obliged to increase the carer s allowance given to a woman who provides a  profound  level of care to her adult son to the extent she cannot take up any employment, her lawyers have told the Supreme Court.
 My entire life is centred and structured around catering to [my son s] needs and this will not and cannot change.,  the woman said in a sworn statement to the court.
The woman effectively provides 24-hour care at home to her son, who has significant disabilities. Due to her partner, the son s father, earning EUR 848 per week, she was assessed in 2021 as being entitled to EUR 134 weekly. The son has since become entitled to receive a weekly disability payment.
In her appeal against the High Court s dismissal of her claim, the woman contends the Minister for Social Protection was obliged to introduce regulations under section 186(2) of the Social Welfare Consolidation Act of 2005 that would entitle her to the full allowance.
Failure to do so, she argues, breached her constitutional rights, including to equal treatment and under article 41.2, which references a woman s duties in the home.
Article 41.2, which the electorate voted via referendum last month to maintain, says the State shall  endeavour to ensure that mothers shall not be obliged by economic necessity to engage in labour to the neglect of their duties in the home .
The woman s senior counsel, Derek Shortall, said the article has received  such limited outing  in the Supreme Court, so there is no definitive determination as to what obligation it imposes on the State. However, he said the recent public approval it received in the referendum  has to mean something .
Whether the article applies directly or by analogy, it  at a minimum  recognises that a mother s work has a lot of meaning, he added.
Mr Shortall said carers only become entitled to the payment if they provide weekly care of at least 35 hours per week and are permitted to work for up to 18.5 hours per week. However, he said his client is  not able to take up employment  due to the needs of her son.
The Minister is obliged to make regulations increasing her entitlement because the woman has to care so much above and beyond the minimum 35 hours and has no means of her own, he argued.
Arguing on behalf of the State, Gerard Durcan SC submitted that article 41.2 is  not centrally relevant  to the issues. The article has been in place for almost 90 years, yet he is not aware of any case where it has been successfully invoked in support of an argument that the State is obliged to provide something.
Chief Justice Donal O Donnell said the court was reserving its decision.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Death sentence for Vietnamese businesswoman; Lan found guilty of embezzlement, bribery and violations of banking rules
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 8
Length: 450 words
Body


A court in Vietnam handed the death sentence yesterday to real estate tycoon Truong My Lan for her role in a 304 trillion dong (EUR 11.6 billion) financial fraud, the country s biggest on record, state media said.
Her trial, begun on March 5th and ending earlier than planned, was one dramatic result of a campaign against the corruption that the leader of the ruling Communist Party, Nguyen Phu Trong, has pledged for years to stamp out.
Lan, chairwoman of real estate developer Van Thinh Phat Holdings Group (VTP), was found guilty of embezzlement, bribery and violations of banking rules at the end of a trial in the business hub of Ho Chi Minh City, state media said.
 We will keep fighting to see what we can do,  a family member said, speaking on condition of anonymity. Before the verdict he had said Lan would appeal against the sentence. Lan had pleaded not guilty to the embezzlement and bribery charges, Nguyen Huy Thiep, one of Lan s lawyers, said.
 Of course she will appeal the verdict,  he added, noting she was sentenced to death for the embezzlement charge and to 20 years each for the other two charges, of bribery and violations of banking regulations.
Vietnam mostly imposes the death penalty over violent offences, but also for economic crimes. Human rights groups say the country has executed hundreds of convicts in recent years, mainly by lethal injection. The Thanh Nien newspaper said 84 defendants in the case received sentences ranging from probation for three years to life imprisonment. Among them are Lan s husband, Eric Chu, a businessman from Hong Kong, who was sentenced to nine years in jail, and her niece, who was sentenced to 17 years. Lan had started out as a cosmetics trader at the central market in Ho Chi Minh City, helping her mother, she told judges during the trial, according to state media. Later, in 1992, she founded her real estate company Van Thinh Phat, the year she got married, it added.
She was found guilty, with her accomplices, of siphoning off more than 304 trillion dong from Saigon Joint Stock Commercial Bank (SCB), which she effectively controlled through dozens of proxies, despite rules strictly limiting large shareholding in lenders, according to investigators. From early 2018 to October 2022, when the state bailed out SCB after a run on its deposits triggered by Lan s arrest, she appropriated large sums by arranging unlawful loans to shell companies, investigators said.
 The defendant s actions not only violate the property management rights of individuals and organisations but also put SCB under scrutiny, eroding people s trust in the leadership of the party and state,  state newspaper VnExpress cited the jury as saying.    Reuters

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Debenhams staff compensation cut by 50%
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 421 words
Byline: EMMET MALONE
Body


EMMET MALONE  A Workplace Relations Commission (WRC) award to former Debenhams staff has been halved on appeal by the Labour Court. About EUR 2 million was awarded to 800 staff for the failure of the company to properly consult
 them ahead of the closure of its stores four years ago.
The test case involved Jane Crowe, a former Mandate trade union shop steward at the chain s branch on Henry Street, Dublin, where she had worked for 24 years at the time of the company s liquidation.
Separately, it has emerged that more than two-thirds of the money allocated to a Government-backed retraining fund for all former Debenhams workers has been returned unspent by further education and training agency, Solas.
At the WRC, Ms Crowe was awarded two weeks  wages on the basis that Debenhams had been so late in starting the process of consultation with staff on its plans to close that no other options were realistic.
It awarded her a further two weeks  pay on the basis that liquidators Kieran Wallace and Andrew O Leary, then of KPMG, had failed to provide  relevant information  to Mandate on the profitability of the stores and online trading revenue.
In a decision sent to the parties, but not yet published, the Labour Court has upheld the first award but overturned the second, saying the company s actions had restricted the options available in the consultation process but that the liquidators had complied with their obligations.
In Ms Crowe s case, the decision means the compensation she receives will amount to EUR 900 rather than EUR 1,800. The total payable to the roughly 800 Mandate members who were employed by the company will now be in the region of EUR 1 million, rather than twice that.
Broadly in line
A separate claim was pursued by Siptu on behalf of a far smaller group and the Labour Court decision is broadly in line with the award Siptu member Breda Cox, a catering assistant, received at the WRC.
 It s disappointing but the fact that one of the claims was upheld is recognition that we were not treated properly and hopefully it is something that will benefit other retail workers who lose their jobs because the Government has still not brought in the proper protections that were talked about after what happened [to] the Clerys workers and ourselves,  said Ms Crowe.  It s good that we are going to get something [in addition to the statutory redundancy received at the time of the closure] because it means everything that we did afterwards, the picketing and the occupations, weren t all for nothing.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



DeChambeau makes up for lost time after rain-delayed start; LIV golfer shoots stunning opening 65 to set the early pace at Augusta
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 12
Length: 819 words
Body


Who knows? On a day which defied the forecast, the overnight storm doing less damage than anticipated in inflicting a mere two and a half hour s delay rather than a multiple of that timeframe, Bryson DeChambeau   a player who d flattered only to deceive in previous visits   contrived to sign for a stunning first round of seven-under-par 65.
How? Why? Who knows, truly? DeChambeau s efforts in the past around the hallowed, hilly terrain never suggested such a transformation. He shot an opening round 76 in 2021, ultimately finishing tied-46th. In 2022, he opened with a 76 and missed the cut. In 2023, he opened with a 74 and missed the cut.
Yet, here he was, one of those who took the LIV greenbacks, strategically working his way around a course in which the winds swirled through the towering cathedral pines.
And DeChambeau s beautifully-crafted round of eight birdies and one lone bogey, on the ninth, enabled the 30-year-old American to inveigle a way to the top of the early clubhouse leaderboard. From the get-go, the 2020 US Open champion was on song when, following a 5-wood opening tee-shot, he hit a 145 yards approach to two feet for an opening birdie.
Sense of surprise
And the sense of surprise wasn t confined merely to DeChambeau. In the case of Danny Willett, a favoured son who d won his only Major when donning a green jacket in 2016, the wonders of medical surgery   having undergone a shoulder operation six months ago   enabled him to play his first round since the BMW PGA at Wentworth last September.
Having been told the recovery period would likely be 12-18 months, Willett   who was required to spend six weeks in a 90-degrees cast that he could only remove to take a shower and four months doing extensive daily rehabilitation that included ice baths, saunas and gym work as well as visiting the medical specialists   marked his earlier than anticipated return to competition with a four-under-par 68, three adrift of DeChambeau.
 It s unexpected, isn t it?  remarked Willett of managing to produce such a comeback following his layoff.  Again, it was never an issue of whether or not the shoulder was strong enough, it was whether or not I could hit the shots I wanted to. I had no idea what to expect, so yeah, it s obviously always nice to come in having shot a decent score, and just give yourself that little bit of confidence inside and hopefully have a nice few more days.
He added:  We did a lot of pre-stuff before the surgery so we were as strong as possible after the surgery, and that kind of means that you don t fall too far off. I had some great people around me, and we did some great work and put the hours in, and again, I could have shot 80 but it was still nice to have the ability to peg up and not be in pain. From where I was seven, eight, nine months ago and previous, to be able to play pain-free is a pretty nice thing.
Patience
Both DeChambeau and Willett demonstrated patience, an enviable trait on a day where winds gusted at times and swirled at others. It had players and caddies second-guessing club selection, looking upwards to the swaying pines and then to fluttering flags in efforts to work out the puzzle posed by the wind s vagaries.
At least, principally for the earlier starters, those approach shots were to rather benevolent greens softened by more than one inch of overnight rain. But the tornadoes and the lightning stayed away, so that the only inconvenience of the opening round of the 88th Masters was a 150 minutes delay to the starting tee times.
For Gary Woodland, another player who has endured medical issues, in his case requiring surgery for a brain lesion, after starting with a double-bogey and suffering another double on the 11th, there was at least some consolation in three birdies late-on in ultimately signing for a 76.
For the 2019 US Open winner, there was however an up-close view of  the show put on by DeChambeau.  The thing about Bryson, people don t talk about it, he s always been one of the best putters in the world. When he drives it like he did today, and he makes putts, he s obviously very good.
 It was a clinic. It was impressive. He didn t get out of position hardly at all, and he rolled it very, very nice,  observed Woodland.  When he drives it like that, he makes this golf course a little bit different.
Woodland, admittedly, wasn t alone in enduring a tough day. Hideki Matsuyama, a winner in 2021, was among those to struggle while Jordan Spieth s opening double-bogey put him on the back foot.
Slow start
For Rory McIlroy, a player seeking the final piece in a jigsaw to compile the career Grand Slam, a slow start   one-over through two after pushing his drive wildly right into the trees on the second   was followed by a patient recovery that saw him grind his way to one-under on his card through 13 holes, while Shane Lowry opened with a birdie only to slip out to one-over through seven holes.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Dispute over Waterford's long-vacant Ard Rí Hotel due back in court
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 2
Length: 638 words
Byline: BARRY O'HALLORAN
Body


BARRY O HALLORAN
 Irish group Treacys Hotels will clash with US fund Cerberus next week in a High Court case that is key to the future of a landmark property that has been empty for several years.
Family-owned Treacys maintains it agreed to buy the Ard Rí Hotel overlooking Waterford city in November 2016 from Promontoria Aran Ltd, part of US investment fund Cerberus, for EUR 1.6 million.
It says Promontoria Aran subsequently agreed to sell the property to businessman Seamus Walsh for EUR 1.5 million, despite receiving a EUR 160,000 non-refundable deposit from the Treacy family, sparking a legal dispute.
Maria Keena, a member of the Treacy family, is due to ask the High Court on Tuesday to order Promontoria Aran, receiver Luke Charleton of EY and others to fulfil what the hoteliers say is a contract to sell them the Ard Rí, or pay damages.
She signed a receipt for the deposit, which she maintains is part of the evidence to support the claim that there was a contract to sell the hotel to her as the group s representative.
The High Court dismissed Ms Keena s claim in February 2019 on the grounds that she had not established an arguable case, but in October last year the Court of Appeal decided her case should be heard.
That ruling means the High Court must hear Ms Keena s and the Treacys  case that a receipt for the EUR 160,000 deposit, and emails between the parties, amount to evidence of a contract to sell the hotel to them.
Promontoria Aran and Mr Charleton maintain that this is not the case. They asked the High Court to dismiss the claim when it was first heard.
Once part of the old Jury s group, the 165-bedroom Ard Rí has lain idle for several years and was not in use at the time Treacys Hotels offered to buy it. Its state has prompted concerns locally about vandalism and antisocial behaviour around the property.
Treacys Hotels became interested in the Ard Rí in 2016, the same year that Cerberus acquired loans secured on the hotel through Promontoria Aran, and appointed Mr Charleton as receiver.
Approached Cerberus
Bob Lanigan, a close associate of the hotel group s head, Ms Keena s father Jim Treacy, approached Terry Byrne of Cerberus European Services Advisors (Ireland) Ltd in November 2016 to see whether the US firm would sell the property.
Mr Lanigan maintains that Mr Byrne told him he would  enforce the sale  at EUR 1.4 million to EUR 1.5 million, although the defendants dispute that he said this.
Mr Treacy authorised Mr Lanigan to offer Mr Byrne EUR 1.6 million. It has been claimed that while he did not name either Mr Treacy or the group, Mr Lanigan subsequently confirmed to Mr Byrne in phone conversations on November 21st, 2016, that the person he represented was prepared to pay that sum for the Ard Rí.
Mr Lanigan maintains that Mr Byrne told him to pay the non-refundable deposit of EUR 160,000 to Ernst & Young   now EY   at the accountants  firms  offices in Dublin that day.
It has also been claimed that Ms Keena, Mr Lanigan and Mr Treacy travelled to the offices and at 8.30pm handed over a bank draft for EUR 160,000 to EY staff member Chris Allen.
Mr Lanigan maintains that Mr Allen confirmed this was 10 per cent of the price for the Ard Rí. The EY staffer, according to the claims, then made out a receipt, using a copy of the draft, which he, Mr Lanigan and Ms Keena signed.
Another EY staff member, Ciara O Mongain, signed as a witness to all three, court documents show.
The High Court hearing focused heavily on the question of the buyer s identity, as Mr Lanigan did not say initially on whose behalf he was negotiating.
In her Court of Appeal ruling, Ms Justice Máire Whelan said that, applying common sense to the circumstances, a case could be made that Ms Keena, a member of the Treacy family, signed as the purchaser.
Neither the Treacys, EY nor Cerberus would comment.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Duff says crowd trouble 'has to stop'; Shelbourne manager says if fans do not feel safe they will not go to games
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 15
Length: 553 words
Body


People do not feel safe at some League of Ireland games. That has become an undeniable reality this season.
As the north Dublin clubs meet  tonight, Bohemians visiting Shelbourne at an ever-expanding Tolka Park, the latter s fans join the former s fans in having to swallow an away-day ban.
Both punishments stem from a supporter flinging flares on to the field of play. As a result Bohs fans were denied a trip to Drogheda recently, while Shels  travelling gang cannot attend the Galway United game at Eamonn Deacy Park next Friday.
 It s a Shelbourne problem at the minute,  said Damien Duff this week,  but I don t think anyone can argue that it s not rife around the league.
Rarely does a Dublin derby pass without the fire brigade being forced on to the grass to dose flames. Bohs  Cian Byrne was struck on the arm in February, hit by one of his own fans, and linesman Dermot Broughton was caught by a missile launched from the Shels end last Friday at Weavers Park.
 I ve had a young Shelbourne fan not feeling safe at a game and I had to give him a big hug:  here, you ll be all right, I ll look after you ,  said Duff.
  You want to feel safe, and if you don t feel safe you re not going to want to go to the game. It has to stop.
Apparently self-policing by supporters is not effective with Shamrock Rovers and St Patrick s Athletic promising a  zero tolerance  policy around pyrotechnic displays.
All eyes turn to the 4,700 crammed into Tolka tonight. On a brighter note the Drumcondra venue s capacity will increase to 5,700, with two small terraces to open before St Pat s visit in a fortnight.
If the best part of having Duff as a permanent fixture in the League of Ireland is his passionate outbursts, the second best part is his level headedness after the fact (he invited the young Shelbourne fan who hit Broughton to training this week so he could turn the incident into a teaching moment for the league s increasingly younger fan base).
Struggling
The former Ireland winger s coaching ability alongside Joey O Brien comes a close third.
Shels are top of the league, 11 points clear of Alan Reynolds  struggling Bohs who have slumped to one spot above a relegation play-off. Unbeaten in nine, with Will Jarvis just named the Soccer Writers  of Ireland player of the month for March, the wonder is how Duff s charges can maintain this pace for 36 games.
 Top teams, top players, they are top because they do it as the season wears on, in the business end.
 Being top of the league I don t feel added pressure, I put enough pressure on the guys already. Do they feel pressure? No, they ve felt pressure from day one off me.
 I haven t got into that side with them at all. I try to prod them emotionally from time to time. Here, I ve got relegated three times. That s a different pressure. Totally.
Dundalk, meanwhile, begin life after Stephen O Donnell at home to St Pat s, and while Duff clashed with him on plenty of occasions this week he messaged O Donnell.
 I have never actually texted a manager that left his post but I texted Stevie because A, I have his number, and B, I think he is one of the best this league has seen. Granted, I have had ding dongs with him   that was my opening line   but I felt I should text him because he is a proper manager, a brilliant coach. It s as volatile a profession as any.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



ECB could be first big central bank to reduce rates
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 1
Length: 470 words
Body


In July 2022, the European Central Bank (ECB) was the last of the big central banks (with the exception of the Bank of Japan) to start raising interest rates in the face of surging inflation.
Record energy prices had driven inflation across the euro zone to 8.6 per cent (it would peak at 10.6 in October) and Frankfurt was facing fierce criticism for being slow to act. It would go on to increase interest rates a further nine times, the fastest and biggest hike in interest rates ever undertaken by the bank.
Fast forward 21 months and it now looks increasingly likely that the ECB may be the first of the world s big central banks to start cutting rates, a reflection of the divergent inflationary paths now opening up between Europe and the United States.
On Wednesday, it emerged that US inflation had accelerated to 3.5 per cent in March, higher than forecast, leading financial markets to anticipate that the Federal Reserve would now delay cutting interest rates until September. In contrast, euro zone inflation fell to a lower-than-anticipated 2.4per cent in March.
While ECB policymakers, as predicted, kept rates unchanged at their meeting yesterday, their official policy announcement explicitly mentioned the possibility of cutting rates for the first time in the current cycle. This was seen as almost locking in a rate cut at its next meeting in June.
Spanner in the works
 Without being triumphant, and without celebrating anything yet, what we are observing is a decline of inflation, a disinflationary process that is in progress,  ECB chief Christine Lagarde said.
However, she stuck to her line that any future rate decision would be  data dependent . The potential spanner in the works is wage growth, which is currently running at 4.6 per cent, well above the 3 per cent level that Frankfurt considers to be in harmony with its 2 per cent inflation target.
Lagarde made it clear that first-quarter wage data, due out in late May, and updated ECB staff projections would inform the ECB s June decision.
Markets expect Frankfurt to implement a sequence of rate cuts in the second half of 2024, two or three or even possibly four, but to proceed with caution. That could mean incremental 0.25 per cent cuts. All of which could amount to a 0.75 or 1 per cent decline in rates by Christmas, partial relief for tracker mortgage holders here.
Lagarde s press conference in Frankfurt coincided with a warning from the head of the International Monetary Fund (IMF) Kristalina Georgieva that central banks should resist the temptation to cut interest rate cuts too early and that high inflation across advanced economies was  not fully defeated .
Several analysts are still predicting a possible sting in the tail for inflation, pointing to volatility in commodity markets, particularly oil. So the outlook could change.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



ECB maintains rates at record high but signals cuts may come in June; The ECB kept its key deposit rate at 4%, but noted that inflation has eased
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 1
Length: 675 words
Byline: JOE BRENNAN
Body


JOE BRENNAN
 The European Central Bank (ECB) kept its key deposit rate at a record high of 4 per cent yesterday, but laid a path for a cut in June.
The bank s governing council, led by president Christine Lagarde, noted that inflation is continuing to ease, led by lower food and goods prices, even if service prices remain high.
It said that if confidence increased that inflation is converging on its 2 per cent target  in a sustained manner, it would be appropriate to reduce the current level of monetary policy restriction . It is the clearest official signal yet from the governing council that rate cuts are likely on the way, even if many individual members, including Ms Lagarde, had previously pointed towards a potential June cut.
Ms Lagarde told a press conference that the 26-member governing council will have access to  a lot more data  and a fresh set of inflation projections from ECB staff by the time it sits down for its next monetary policy meeting on June 6th.
She added that  a few members  had pressed for a rate cut this month, but  agreed to rally to the consensus of a very, very large majority  to keep rates on hold.
 The ECB couldn t have been clearer: barring any big surprises in the data, a June rate cut seems highly likely,  said Simon Wells, chief European economist with HSBC.
The ECB currently expects that euro zone inflation, which was running at 2.4 per cent last month, will reach its target by the middle of next year. Still, Ms Lagarde said  there will be bumps on the road .
 We are not going to wait until everything goes back to 2 per cent to make the decisions that will be necessary,  she said.
The ECB hiked its deposit rate from minus 0.5 per cent to 4 per cent in the 15 months to last September as it belatedly joined other big central banks in tightening lending conditions in a fight against inflation.
Investors in short-term debt markets   or money markets   are pricing in an ECB cut for June and betting that the deposit rate will fall by 0.77 of a percentage point by the end of 2024, equating to slightly more than three quarter-point cuts.
 We think the ECB can continue to prepare the market for a rate cut at its June meeting,  said Des Lawrence, a senior investment strategist with State Street Global Advisors in Dublin.  Barring any significant surprises on the incoming wage and inflation data we believe it can probably deliver about 100 basis points (1 percentage point) of policy cuts this year.
Reduced lending-rate margin
The ECB s main lending rate, the benchmark against which about 180,000 Irish tracker mortgages are priced, currently stands at 4.5 per cent.
However, the Frankfurt-based institution plans to reduce the margin on its lending rate from 0.5 of a point over the deposit rate to 0.15 of a point in September, as a result of a recent rethink on the gap between both rates.
This will effectively result in an added reduction of 0.35 of a point for tracker borrowers, independent of any rate-cut decisions taken in the meantime by the governing council.
Euro zone headline inflation fell to an annual rate of 2.4 per cent in March from 2.6 per cent in February and a peak of 10.6 per cent in late 2022, according to Eurostat, the EU s statistics agency.
Food price inflation dropped to 2.7 per cent from 3.9 per cent on the month, while goods price growth eased to 1.1 per cent and energy prices dropped 1.8 per cent. Still, service price inflation remained high, at 4 per cent.
The ECB s latest meeting came a day after it emerged that US consumer prices increased more than expected in March, leading financial markets to anticipate that the Federal Reserve would delay cutting interest rates until September. Inflation climbed to an annual rate of 3.5 per cent from 3.2 per cent in February.
Ms Lagarde said that the ECB will take inflation developments across other large economies into account in its future assessments, but not base any monetary policy decisions on what other big central banks, like the Fed, do.  We are data dependent. We are not Fed dependent,  she said.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Eid in Gaza: ' Celebrating that we're still alive'; War has upended what should be a day of celebration in the territory
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 718 words
Body


Iman Abdelshafy al-Fayyad normally marks the end of the holy month of Ramadan with a feast surrounded by family and friends in Gaza.
But this year s Eid al-Fitr is dominated by  profound sadness  as she keeps vigil over her father s hospital bed and prays for loved ones scattered across the shattered strip.
 There isn t anything to celebrate,  al-Fayyad, a beautician in her 40s, said from the Egyptian city of Arish, where she fled after her father was hurt in an Israeli air strike.
 It s difficult to feel anything but sorrow and grief.
Arab and Muslim families worldwide typically mark the end of Ramadan by visiting relatives, exchanging gifts and preparing sweets such as maamoul pastries and date cookies. But six months of war has upended what should be a day of celebration in the Palestinian territory. Attempts to mark the occasion this year are muted   where they happen at all   as people struggle to survive in a territory now reduced to rubble.
Most of the strip s 2.3 million population have been forced from their homes, and more than 33,000 people have been killed since the start of hostilities, according to health officials in the enclave.
The war was launched in response to the October 7th assault on southern Israel by the Gaza-based militant group Hamas that killed 1,200 people, according to Israeli officials.
Despite the sombre atmosphere, there are still those in Gaza trying to keep spirits high. At a grassroots soup kitchen in the southern city of Rafah, Niveen Almadhoun and her all-women team of cooks spent Tuesday baking sweets to distribute to families living in tents, along with clothes they purchased with donated funds.
End of Ramadan On Wednesday, which
marked Eid and the official end of Ramadan, they planned to hand out gifts to children whose families have been left destitute by the war.
The head cook at the southern branch of a soup kitchen set up by her family, she has focused her efforts this week on trying to keep children entertained.  We re doing activities for them, like dancing and listening to songs,  she said, adding that the aim was to provide some respite from the misery of war. Almadhoun s family   including her brother Hani who lives overseas and crowdfunded more than $800,000 (EUR 745,000) for their efforts   started a small soup kitchen in northern Gaza two months ago, adding the southern outpost last month. Many of the patrons are children and the elderly.
 They re trying to just be together,  Hani Almadhoun said of his relatives  efforts to observe Eid amid the devastation.  Just because you re seeing them distributing cookies doesn t mean the war has ended.
Famine and disease stalk Gaza, and the United Nations has said that a third of infants in the north of the territory under the age of two are already  acutely malnourished .
Silence an d despair  So many children have died . . . my heart has been extinguished,  said Um Mousa, another of those who escaped to the Arish hospital.  We love to shower our kids and grandkids with gifts and sweets during Eid. But this year I m just praying they stay alive to see another day.
Instead of laughter, there is silence and despair, Um Mousa said. Instead of sweets and cakes, there is starvation.  The only thing to celebrate is that we re still alive,  she added.
In the refugee camps around Lebanon s capital Beirut, prayers have been centred on those in Gaza for months. Mariam Mahmoud Assad, a mother of three living in the Burj al Barajneh camp, said there might as well be no such thing as Eid this year.
 People are being buried in mass graves. How can you walk into a house and say happy holidays?  she asked.
Donated clothing and funds are directed to the enclave regularly, with residents feeling the war acutely. During a recent dinner, Assad s daughter asked her how they could eat while their people in Gaza starved.
As another Eid passes, Monther Shoblaq, who was director of Gaza s water authority before fleeing to Egypt to escape the fighting, lamented that a day that should have been a chance to create memories was now a bitter reminder of everything he had lost.
 My wife, my children and I are in Cairo while the rest of our family s in Gaza,  he said.  We woke up this morning with nowhere to go, and no one to visit.    Copyright the Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Europe hardens its approach; EU asylum policy
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 462 words
Body


With the election of a new European Parliament less than two months away, the current parliament this week approved what may turn out to be one of its most consequential measures. It has been clear for some time that EU policy on asylum seekers required reform. But division between member states and disagreement between rival political blocs meant progress had been painfully slow.
Now, faced with the prospect of a more fractured and probably more hardline post-election landscape, the EU has reached agreement on a package of sweeping new laws. These will see a hardening of the approach towards those claiming international protection, with faster processing of claims and swifter deportations of those who are unsuccessful. New measures were also agreed to share the burden which currently falls on the southern member states where most asylum seekers arrive, and for enhanced co-operation and information-sharing.
Some of these changes are contentious and have been criticised by human rights advocates, as well as by left and green parties, who predict they will lead to more miscarriages of justice. Criticism has also come from parties on the anti-immigration right, which is expected to increase its parliamentary representation in the elections, and which demands an even harsher approach.
The measures were supported by Fine Gael and Fianna Fáil representatives and opposed by Ireland s other MEPs. Sinn Féin s Chris MacManus felt it necessary to clarify that his party was against  open borders . This non sequitur has become a party mantra recently, suggesting Sinn Féin may be feeling under pressure on its right flank over immigration.
Alongside the new policies, EU Commission president Ursula von der Leyen and a number of national leaders are continuing to negotiate agreements with the countries along the southern shore of the Mediterranean from which most asylum seekers are arriving. A much-criticised deal with Tunisia s authoritarian government was followed last month by a similar agreement with Egypt. Negotiations with Morocco are reportedly continuing. This  offshoring  of the asylum process to regimes with dubious human rights records has been rightly criticised as a betrayal of the EU s stated values.
It is clear that the impetus for this week s developments is the surge in support for nativist and anti-immigrant parties across the EU in the run-up to June s elections. Whether the new measures will stem that tide, as the parties of the traditional centre hope, or whether, as some suggest, they merely play into the far-right s hands, remains to be seen. What is certain is that, driven by violent conflict, poverty and climate change, the flow of those making the dangerous journey to seek a better life in Europe is not going to stop.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Everyone gets paid at the Olympics except the athletes
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 14
Length: 911 words
Body


Who knows what the International Olympic Committee (IOC) are thinking after the first pawn was pushed across the board in World Athletics  opening gambit to change the system.
Earlier this week, Sebastien Coe s organisation announced that they will give $50,000 (EUR 46,600) to the winners of gold medals at this summer s Olympic Games in Paris, promising more in Los Angeles 2028 to silver and bronze medal winners. The move shattered traditional principles of no cash prizes for Olympic champions. More fundamentally, it has challenged the IOC s status as the world ministry for amateur ethos, an ideal that died decades ago.
Who knows, perhaps because of Coe s brash move the IOC are convening a summit meeting in a five-star hotel in Tierra del Fuego or in a luxury yurt on the Mongolian plains. Their habits are sometimes quaint, none more so than selling the notion of honor and sacrifice as a suitable reward in an increasingly professional world.  I don t believe this is remotely at variance with the concept that the International Olympic Committee often talks about, which is recognising the efforts that our competitors make,  said Coe.
To get to this point has been a long  sea swim event for athletics, not a  100 metre track sprint. And the IOC? Short of signing up television deals worth billions every four years, have they ever moved fast?
It wouldn t be too much of a stretch to say Coe has embarrassed the movement by beating them to the punch in rewarding Olympic champions in Track and Field for the first time with more than garlands and platitudes.
No athletes were awarded cash prizes at the Tokyo 2020 games, although various nations incentivise their teams by dangling all sorts of gifts in front of medal winners including cars, money and homes. Ireland do it with the carding scheme, where medals earn more funding.
Hardly short of money
At Tokyo, Indonesia offered the badminton women s double s team a cash prize and free meatballs for life. One of the athletes was also promised five cows and a house from the district head of her hometown. At the Rio Olympics in 2016, the Russian government gifted luxury cars, apartments and even a racehorse to medal winners.
The IOC are hardly short of money, although they would argue they distribute most of it in a different way through federations and bursaries.
According to the website, Inside the Games, the IOC s financial statements put 2021 revenue at $4.16 billion (EUR 4 billion) and the annual surplus for the year when the delayed Tokyo 2020 Olympics and Paralympics took place at $843.8 million (EUR 805 million).
A document called the Form 990, filed to the United States Internal Revenue Service (IRS) by tax-exempt organisations, put IOC revenue for that same year at $4.06 billion (EUR 3.87 billion) and  revenue less expenses  at  $856.8 million (EUR 817.4 million). However, differently various accountancy practices convey the numbers, they are big.
Incentive compensation
To keep the IOC functioning people must be paid. Director General Christophe De Kepper s base compensation is put at $764,134 (EUR 728,984) and with bonus and incentive compensation reaches $1,426,382 (EUR 1,360,768).
Chief operating officer Lana Haddad s total is put at $920,089 (EUR 877,765), executive director Christophe Dubi s total is $706,869 (EUR 674,353), sports director Kit McConnell s is $699,712 (EUR 667,525) and medical and scientific director Richard Budgett receives $529,427 (EUR 505,073).
IOC members are volunteers with more than sufficient travel, accommodation and expense accounts. For that, they may thank Ireland s Lord Killanin who introduced expenses when he was IOC president from 1972-80. Before that IOC presidents were largely multi-millionaires and expected to pay their own costs.
It was in 1932 that the Los Angeles Games connected the Olympics with the glamour and stardom of Hollywood, and in doing so harnessed the Games full commercial potential as an attractive commodity. Organisers provided the blueprint that transformed the event from a largely elitist sports festival into one of the world s most important entertainment vehicles.
The difference was Hollywood paid their actors for the box office success of films, whereas the architects and financiers among the IOC founding fathers and their allusions to antiquity carried on as they always had. With the Olympic Games, the IOC were the content providers and the athletes the content.
 Nature of the transition   I am probably the last generation to  have been on the 75 pence meal voucher and second-class rail fare competing for my country,  remarked Coe, a 1,500m gold medalist at the 1980 and 1984 Olympics in Moscow and Los Angeles.  I do understand the nature of the transition we ve been in and we re now operating in a completely different landscape, a completely different planet, from when I was competing.
There are 48 athletic events in the 2024 Paris Games, which will conclude with over 300 medals. In a sense, if the IOC were to give cash prizes for medals, those outside the podium athletes would likely suffer as the distribution of Olympic funds to federations would probably shrink. But long after the amateur ethos has perished a question of principle remains.
Should everybody involved in the Olympic Games, including those that run the IOC, the event organisers, the television companies, ticket sellers and hotdog vendors get paid but not the winning athletes? Coe s bold answer is a resounding no.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Ex-Aryzta CEO files lawsuit against group; Kevin Toland left the baked goods firm in 2020 with a pay-off of EUR 1.81m
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 3
Length: 476 words
Byline: JOE BRENNAN
Body


JOE BRENNAN
 Aryzta s former chief executive Kevin Toland has launched a legal case against the Swiss-Irish baked goods group almost 3½ years after leaving the company with a 1.77 million Swiss franc (EUR 1.81 million) pay-off.
Spokesmen for the company and for Mr Toland s lawyer, Donal Spring of Daniel Spring & Co Solicitors, each declined to comment on the nature of the case, which is at a preliminary stage. The defendant is listed as Aryzta Technology Ireland Unlimited.
Aryzta, owner of the Cuisine de France brand in Ireland, hired Mr Toland, a former chief executive of airport operator DAA and one-time senior executive with nutrition group Glanbia in the US, in 2017 to help stabilise the business, after a number of senior departures in the wake of a series of disappointing earnings reports.
He had been hired by then chairman Gary McGann, an Irish corporate world grandee, who had been brought in the previous year.
The group s customers range from McDonald s and Subway to Lidl, Aldi and Dunnes Stores.
Disposals
The duo would raise hundreds of millions of euro from disposals, including most of Aryzta s stake in Picard, its former La Rousse Foods unit in Ireland, two facilities in the US, and a 50 per cent stake in a UK flatbreads business. They also launched an EUR 800 million equity raise in late 2018.
In April 2020, a month after Covid-19 sent the western world into lockdown, hitting bread orders from quick-service restaurants and the catering industry, Aryzta attracted the unwelcome attention of a fresh activist investor, Zurich-based Veraison Capital.
Boardroom coup
Mr McGann signalled that August that he was stepping down ahead of an extraordinary general meeting (egm) the following month, at which Veraison orchestrated a wider boardroom coup.
Mr Toland left the company with immediate effect on November 19th, 2020, a month after a suitor for the group, hedge fund Elliott Management, which had been courted by the previous board, walked away.
Elliot had pitched a bid at 0.8 Swiss francs per share. The stock has since rebounded to 1.7 francs, helped by noncore asset sales, a recovery in earnings and reduction of its debt burden.
Swiss food industry executive Urs Jordi succeeded Mr McGann in September 2020 and took on the additional role of interim chief executive when Mr Toland left.
Mr Toland s remuneration during Aryzta s financial year through July 2021 amounted to 2.69 million francs, including a 1.77 million franc ex gratia payment. Total ex gratia payments to former executives totalled 4.06 million francs that year.
Mr Toland was appointed chairman of Gas Networks Ireland in late 2022.
His other current corporate positions include non-executive directorships at New York-listed Dole plc, Bewley s Limited and Invert Robotics, which has developed climbing robots often used in hazardous or hard-to-reach environments.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Fears for India's press freedom as Modi bids for re-election; NGOs accuse authorities of increasingly targeting journalists
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 8
Length: 654 words
Body


As campaigning gathers momentum across India in advance of the first round of voting in the general election on April 19th, there is widespread concern over the influence Prime Minister Narendra Modi s Hindu nationalist Bhartiya Janata Party (BJP)-led government exercises over the country s media.
According to the Paris-based Reporters Sans Frontiers (RSF) in May last year, India s press freedom ranking has dropped 11 places to 161 out of 180 countries it surveyed, lower than Afghanistan ranked at 152, Pakistan at 150 and Somalia at 141. RSF said that numerous journalists, critical of the BJP government after it came to power in 2014 and was re-elected for another five-year term in 2019, were victims of unrelenting harassment.
Targeting journalists Non-Governmental Organisations such as Amnesty International, Human Rights Watch and the Committee to Protest Journalists have claimed that Indian authorities are increasingly targeting journalists for questioning federal and state BJP governments by prosecuting them under
colonial-era sedition statutes.
Over the last decade several media organisations and their editorial staff, critical of the BJP, have been charged either by the Central Bureau of Investigation (CBI), the Enforcement Directorate (ED, responsible for fighting economic crimes) and the income tax department over assorted financial accusations which take years to adjudicate in India s notoriously slow judicial system. According to Rajdeep Sardesai, one of India s leading English language television news anchors, it is  almost demanded  of journalists now to take sides.
Speaking at a seminar in late March in New Delhi on media coverage of the elections, he said partisanship is rewarded by the BJP and that the space for objective journalism is  shrinking and shrinking .
Even six-time BJP MP Subramanian Swamy agreed, declaring on his Facebook page last June, that India s media had been  totally castrated .
A nationwide survey of 206 journalists in July 2023 by the Delhi-based Centre for Study of Developing Societies said fear of harassment had  persuaded  many television, print and digital media outlets to support the BJP.
The study said 82 per cent of the journalists surveyed admitted that their respective media organisations  generally favoured  the BJP and more than 50 per cent were fearful of losing their jobs if they did not.
The government s Information Technology Amendment rules, instituted in April 2023, empowered the federal authorities to constitute a  fact-checking unit  with powers to determine  fake, false or misleading news  with regard to reporting government matters and to take it down.
At the time the Editors Guild of India said the government had neither specified details of the fact-checking unit nor provided any judicial oversight in accordance with established legal statutes to withdraw news content or block social media handles.
In February 2023 Indian tax officials raided the BBC s offices in New Delhi and Mumbai, shortly after the channel had aired an investigative documentary on Mr Modi s involvement in the 2002 sectarian riots in western Gujarat state, when he was its chief minister.  More than 1,200 people, mostly Muslims, died in the violence.
In February this year, the Indian authorities compelled French journalist Vanessa Dougnac, who had reported from India for newspapers like Le Soir and La Croix back home for 25 years, to leave India after they withdrew Overseas Citizen of India status, a lifetime residency permit granted to foreigners married to an Indian person.
Earlier, in September 2022 they had cancelled her journalist s work permit, because as Dougnac declared in her open farewell letter in February 2024, she was accused by Indian officials of writing  malicious  articles that harmed the  interests of the sovereignty and integrity of India .
She was also censured for  prejudicing the interests of the [Indian] state .

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Five secrets of workplace success; There is no quick path to desk-based nirvana but there are things we can do to improve our experience at work
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 6
Length: 1032 words
Body


What is the secret of a happy and fulfilled working life? For most of us muddling through corporate careers as best we can, the answer remains elusive.
As host of the FT s Working It podcast, I ve talked to hundreds of experts about the question and I ve learned a lot from colleagues, which I have tried to distil in a book. It looks at how to navigate that messy world of work, covering everything from scoping out what shiny-sounding potential employers are really like to building your  brand  without the cringe factor and dealing with unpleasant team members or oblivious bosses.
There is no quick path to desk-based nirvana. But here are my top five insights about surviving at work.
 Look in the mirror before you criticise your boss In our minds, the workplace operates like a parallel, fantasy realm. Like a 1970s Dr Who episode, it is low budget but removed from Actual Life, a place where we are better versions of ourselves. The truth is less magical. We go to work trailing an unwieldy suitcase filled with recent emotional baggage, a lifetime of disappointments and a few childhood relics.
Some of that baggage is helpful neither to you, nor your colleagues. It could even sabotage your career. But you can do your best to get over it. Gabriella Braun, director of workplace relations consultancy Working Well, says a psychoanalytic concept called  the third position  can help. It involves stepping outside ourselves to view our interactions as an observer would.
I ve been adopting the third position and though results have been mixed, it is a huge, and useful, mindset shift. Focusing on your  behaviour as others see it , as Braun says, helps reveal what you, and your baggage, are bringing to tense or difficult encounters, so you can respond to them with more insight and understanding.
Everyone wants to be heard but no one wants to listen If you haven t been subjected to corporate guff about leaders listening to staff, where have you been for the past four years? The pandemic ushered in an era of more empathetic bosses. Or, rather, bosses who tried to be more empathetic.
It is sometimes hard to listen carefully in a work context, especially when there s a power imbalance. For busy managers, every meeting has an objective and when employees bring up other concerns, they re derailing the mission to meet it. Yet better listening could improve pretty much everything at work.
Make a start on listening better by refusing to think about what you are going to say next. Focus on what your team member or boss is saying. Take that in. And ask questions.
Charles Duhigg, author of Supercommunicators, recommends a technique called  looping for understanding . First you ask a question. Then you repeat back   in your own words   what you heard. Third, you ask your colleague if you got it right. Doing so, Duhigg says, gives your colleague permission to say  there s something you missed , and allows everyone to acknowledge they ve been understood. That, he says,  feels wonderful .
Gen Z are showing us the future of work The impact of Generation Z (people born between 1997 and 2012) in the workforce will be huge: probably the most significant shift for decades.
I m not dismissing the importance of AI here. I believe the human side of work will become more important as machines free people from administrative tasks. And Gen Z are different from the rest of us. Really different.
The popular idea that younger people want to cancel managers for wrong-think is simplistic, but many Gen-Zs do expect accountability for what they see as mistakes. They are also open about mental health struggles which are widespread: a recent report found one in three 18- to 24-year-olds report a mental health condition.
They also exert what Edelman s employee experience chairwoman Cydney Roach calls a  gravitational pull  on the workforce. Everyone else will adapt to Gen Z rather than the other way round, she says: old norms have to be retired.
Keeping younger workers well and engaged, then, is going to be a big investment, and the future for managers may be in overseeing personal wellbeing as well as professional development. Few employers have clocked the size, scope and seismic impact of this change.
 Managers are made, not born I regret to say that, before writing about work, I did not link good managers with training and support. I think I believed in a management  gene  that meant the naturally sympathetic and understanding became great team leaders, while dogmatic, less emotionally intelligent types became bad managers.
I was wrong. Anyone can become a good manager. But without the right preparation, backup and development, nobody can.
Despite this, about 80 per cent of the eight million managers in the UK have no formal training   they are  accidental managers  as the Chartered Management Institute coins it.
If that s you, you are not alone. But nor should you accept it. Demand training, support or a coach, or you will be floundering. And your team will miss out on the benefits of great management, something the institute has shown significantly boosts productivity and engagement.
 Take more chances: you ll regret it if you don t When big opportunities come along, you may have to do more work to make the most of them.
I knew writing a book would be a weekend project. I also knew that wasn t sustainable. But it didn t need to be: it was only for a limited time. You have to decide how much is too much but I suggest if the extra work is intrinsically fulfilling, for your own advancement, interest or enjoyment, then it s worth considering.
Doing a ton of extra stuff because someone asks, for no recognition or career growth? Just say no (although I realise this is not always possible).
You may do well to remember the advice of author Daniel Pink: as we age, we are most likely to regret what we don t do. Career regrets, Pink told the FT, show that  we should have a slight bias for action , to  just try stuff and be less worried about the risk .
I love that sentence. It might just be the best thing I ve learned.   Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024
The Future-Proof Career: Strategies for thriving at  every stage is published by Pavilion Books

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Former prime minister Wilson had secret Downing Street affair; Westminster gripped by recent revelation that was buried for 50 years
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 759 words
Body


He was the football-mad Labour leader from a working class background who made a pitch for Downing Street with a promise to modernise Britain and end  13 years of Tory misrule .
Not the current leader, Keir Starmer, but rather Harold Wilson, who served eight years as British prime minister in the 1960s and 70s.
Now, almost 30 years after his death, Westminster has been gripped by the revelation that the ostensibly happily-married Wilson had a long-running, secret affair with an aide who was more than two decades younger than him, during his final few years in Number 10.
The relationship with his deputy press secretary, Janet Hewlett-Davies, is said by one of Wilson s closest advisers to have brought him a little  sunshine at sunset  and a final burst of happiness as his premiership petered out before he eventually resigned in 1976, citing exhaustion.
For 50 years the affair was known only to two of Wilson s closest allies, his former press secretary and Hewlett-Davies s boss, the now 96-year-old Joe Haines, and also Bernard Donoughue (89), a Labour peer who served as Wilson s top policy adviser.
In an interview with BBC s Today radio programme, Donoughue also confirmed a decades-old rumour that Wilson had a second secret sexual relationship, years before he entered Downing Street, with Marcia Williams, his formidable political adviser who was said to have later bullied and harangued him as prime minister.
Wilson had always denied rumours of an affair with Williams and won a libel case against a magazine over a cartoon depicting him in bed with her.
The affair with the now deceased Hewlett-Davies, however, was suspected by nobody.
First revealed It was first revealed on Wednesday evening in the Times newspaper by Haines, who said he wanted the historical record of Wilson s time in office to be completely accurate.
Haines told the Times that he caught Hewlett-Davies sneaking up a staircase to the prime minister s room late one evening in 1974.
She confessed to him that she was having an affair with Wilson, who was the prime minister who first ordered British troops to Northern Ireland at the outset of the Troubles.
Haines said Wilson s affair with Hewlett-Davies  increased his morale in the last two years or so before he retired ; he was said to have been weary and paranoid about the security services throughout his final two-year spell in power, and may have been in the early stages of dementia.
 More than anyone could know, she was of significance to the last Wilson administration: she was Harold Wilson s mistress.
She died nursing a secret which never leaked from Downing Street, the most notorious leaky building in Britain,  said Haines.
The only other person he discussed it with was Donoughue, and they decided to never tell anybody else.
Donoughue told the Today programme that Wilson had also effectively admitted the affair to him on a stroll around Number 10 shortly before he left office.
Donoughue, who was a junior agriculture minister in Tony Blair s first government, said the former prime minister indirectly suggested  in a very Wilsonian way  that he was in a relationship with Hewlett-Davies.
 I added, in a very Wilsonian way, which I learned from him, that I was pleased his relationship with her was so close. He said she was a lovely person and he had never been happier,  Donoughue said.
 Stunning twist
 In a stunning twist, Donoughue also confirmed the accuracy of another old rumour: that Joe Stone, Wilson s doctor, had once suggested to him and Haines that Stone could kill the bullying Williams  with a bad pill  to free Wilson from her yoke.
 He made the worrying suggestion that he would dispose of her
 He was thinking only in the national interest.
 He d be doing it for the nation and the prime minister, because he thought Harold Wilson was a great man. But both Joe [Haines] and I said our view was, as a doctor, he shouldn t.
Donoughue said Wilson had had a sexual affair with Williams, who later became Baroness Falkender, and that she later used it to  exercise a lot of unpleasant control  over the prime minister.
Wilson, considered one of the great Labour prime ministers of Britain, died in 1995 at the age of 79 while suffering from cancer and Alzheimer s disease.
His long-suffering wife, the poet Mary Wilson, died in 2018 aged 102.
Hewlett-Davies, who was also married while she was having the affair with Wilson, died in October last year.
 [The affair] was a little sunshine at sunset,  said Donoughue.
 She obviously made him finally happy, [and] I had never seen him happy.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Garland dials up the tension in dystopian thriller; The director's latest offering imagines a bleak America of the future through a carefully ambiguous lens
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 660 words
Byline: CIVIL WAR HHHH
Body


CIVIL WAR HHHH Directed by Alex Garland. Starring Kirsten Dunst, Wagner Moura, Cailee Spaeny, Stephen McKinley Henderson, Sonoya Mizuno, Nick Offerman, Jessie Plemons. 15A cert. 109 mins.  Alex Garland has argued that his latest film began as an attempt to address the  nature of reporting without bias . That conversation certainly takes place here. Kirsten Dunst, never better, plays a photographer with an unstoppable urge to put herself in harm s way. There are many opportunities to interrogate the notion of the journalist as gin-addled crusader. That discussion is unfolding before a massive distraction, however, as if Marshall amps were blaring out next week s lottery numbers or the reconstituted Beatles were playing on the neighbouring field.
Civil War has, already, generated much thundering debate about how its imagined conflict relates to the political ferment playing out in the United States. One could fairly argue that, with references to a recent  Antifa massacre , Garland is dabbling in creative ambiguity. A massacre of anti-fascist forces or by anti-fascist forces? That question is never answered, but the former does feel more likely.
Nick Offerman (who turned up recently as a Maga plumber in Ava DuVernay s Origin) plays a third-term president who, after disbanding the FBI, finds himself fighting a civil war on more than one front. Further tricksiness manifests itself with a significant successionist force comprising an unlikely alliance between Texas and California, states that currently lean in different political directions. But let s not kid ourselves. You would have to work hard to read this president as anything other than a spectre from the right.
Anyway, rather than dealing in hard political allegories, Garland encases his drama in a multifaceted, only partially explained chaos. One is more often reminded of heroic-journalism films such as Salvador or Under Fire than of an imagined future America in Soylent Green or Escape From New York. There is a sense that the film is bringing some tropes home to the US. One is reminded of a tense sequence in The Killing Fields when, as here, the journalists are forced to plead pathetically for their lives before a fanatical guerrilla. The Khmer Rouge are now rural rednecks with a suspicion of darker-skinned urbanites.
There is something a little like commentary in those sequences. But, for the most part, the future history is there largely to facilitate a thrilling road movie packed with martial action. We begin with four markedly contrasting journos coming together for a journey to Washington, DC, where they hope to corner the president. Dunst plays Lee, a battle-weary Reuters op whose surname nods to the legendary Lee Miller. Stephen McKinley Henderson is Sammy, an ageing relic from  what s left of the New York Times . Wagner Moura as the slick Joel gets to work through all the Hunter S Thompson moves: booze, dope, fast cars, laddish joshing. Looking even younger than her years, Cailee Spaeny is well cast as Jessie, a fan of Lee who hopes to pick up tips on the way to the capital.
Setting his heroes on an odyssey into a new heart of darkness   January 6th vibes inevitably attend their eventual arrival on Pennsylvania Avenue   Garland, who turned to directing with Ex Machina close to a decade ago, employs all the techniques of the Vietnam movie as he ramps up his end-of-times bedlam. Rob Hardy s camera flits behind cover as it dodges bullets with the harried characters. The quirky soundtrack pounds its way to a closing number that could hardly be more appropriate.
For all the atrocities on display, dissenters can reasonably argue that there is less sociopolitical analysis here than in the average zombie film (a lot less than in a George A Romero flick). But the momentum is so relentless that, when you re actually watching the thing, it proves hard to care. Civil War is wan as satire. But it s an action stormer for the ages. DONALD CLARKE

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Government housing targets review plan criticised; Labour leader says autumn date for plan shows 'lack of ambition and urgency'
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 692 words
Byline: MARIE O'HALLORAN
Body


MARIE O HALLORAN  The Government s plan to publish revised housing targets in the autumn has been criticised in the Dáil for showing  a lack of ambition and urgency .
Labour leader Ivana Bacik said it was  extraordinary  that new goals would not be published until then because the Government had accepted that the targets were already too low.
Minister of State for Housing Malcolm Noonan had told the Dáil that a review of housing targets  is commenced, work is well advanced and refreshed targets will be agreed by Government and published this autumn . Current targets provide for an average of 33,000 homes a year, increasing to 40,000 by 2030. Mr Noonan said revised targets will be underpinned by research and modelling by the ESRI.
 It is very important to underpin this work with evidence-based research and that s what we re doing in partnership with the ESRI,  he said.
The Minister said a review of the targets was planned, particularly in light of the 2022 census. He said that  they will take into account population growth, migration, updated assumptions regarding housing obsolescence rates and household sized with smaller household sizes meaning more housing is required .
During question time on housing and local government, Ms Bacik asked when the revised targets would be published. She said that everyone knew the 33,000 homes a year target is unlikely to be reached  but we also know it is way too low .
Increased targets She said that the Housing Commission stated 60,000 will be needed, while Taoiseach Simon Harris announced that 250,000 homes would be needed over the next five years. That was an  absolutely clear acceptance of the need for increased targets .
But Mr Noonan said that  targets are being bandied about of 50,000, 60,000, 100,000 annually. It also requires capacity to be built into the system. We re looking at modern methods of construction, and all of these elements combined.
The Green Party Minister said  targets for 2024 will be met and by all accounts exceeded  and house commencements were at a record high. They are the only housing targets underpinned by  robust evidence  he said.
He added that the trajectory over the past four years  has taken time to build up capacity and that capacity is now delivering .
The research for the revised targets would take into account the right kind of housing in the right place and the right quantum of housing and the right type of housing mix.
 We anticipate that tenure-specific targets for social affordable, private rented and owner occupation will be published this autumn.
Expressing her disappointment that it will be this autumn before the revised targets are published Ms Bacik said  that s extraordinary, because your Government has accepted that the targets are simply too low .
But the Minister pointed out that housing output rose from 20,000 in 2021 to 34,000 this year and  that is a significant trajectory upwards .  That is going to continue, we can t put a figure on it until we understand and delve into the research that s carried out by the ESRI.
Earlier there were sharp exchanges between Minister for Housing Darragh O Brien and Sinn Féin housing spokesman Eoin Ó Broin over the housing targets.
Affordable housing Mr Ó Broin repeatedly accused the Minister of failing to meet housing targets, saying that in his Dublin Mid-West constituency the only affordable housing on sale cost more than EUR 400,000.
He said that in each of the four years since Mr O Brien took office  you ve missed all of your housing targets and missed them very significantly  including by 62 per cent for affordable houses and 59 per cent on cost rental housing.
But the Minister retorted that  I m very happy to stand over our plan and the delivery of it . He told Mr Ó Broin that  it stands in sharp contrast to your own lack of plan .
He said that last year more than 4,000 housing supports were delivered, a 128 per cent increase.
He said they had set an ambitious programme and almost 12,000 new social homes were provided last year,  the highest level of new build social homes in about 50 years  and had a record State investment of EUR 5 billion this year for housing.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Grisly killing sparks debate over 'left-behind' children of migrant workers; Schoolboy (13) beaten to death and three classmates held responsible
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 8
Length: 759 words
Body


Almost a month after the gruesome killing of a 13-year-old boy in the northern Chinese province of Hebei, prosecutors said on Monday that three of his classmates would be held criminally responsible.
The three boys are all aged under 14 but a change in the law in 2021 means that children between 12 and 14 can be prosecuted for intentional killing by extremely cruel means.
Police said the boys dug a hole in the greenhouse over two days before killing their victim, who has been identified only by his surname Wang. He was beaten to death and his father said the boy s body was badly disfigured, while his uncle said his face was severely damaged.  My child was alive on the afternoon of March 10th, but after 3.10pm, his phone went silent, and at 4.10pm, money was transferred from his phone, which was then turned off. He was brutally killed, with severe injuries to his face, and his body was buried,  his father said.
 I hope the government will be fair, open and just, impose severe punishment, and that the murderers will pay with their lives.
China retains the death penalty for murder but it cannot be imposed on anyone who was under 18 at the time they committed the crime.
The boy transferred 191 Chinese yuan (EUR 25) to one of his classmates just before his death. Zang Fanqing, a lawyer for the victim s family, said the three suspects had been bullying the boy at school for a long time, something other classmates noticed.
 He once wrote a note to the classmate sitting in front of him, saying he didn t want to go to class, he wanted to die,  one told Chinese state television CCTV.
Wang s aunt said he would often ask his grandfather for money before going to school and she had seen a social media post in which the boy said he thought about suicide.
 I thought he was under academic pressure, so I told him:  Don t feel any pressure about your studies. It doesn t matter whether you study well or not,   she told CCTV.
Extreme crimes The killing has sparked a debate in China about how to punish extreme crimes committed by minors and also about the circumstances in which such children grow up. It has cast a spotlight on the 67 million children, more than one in five of all those under 17, in China who grow up apart from their parents most of the time. The victim and the three suspects were all so-called
left-behind children, whose parents left their rural homes to work in cities. Some such children go to state-run boarding schools but most live with grandparents or other relatives.
Economic development China s rapid economic development over the past 40 years has seen a mass migration from rural areas into the cities in the greatest urbanisation project in human history. Many parents leave their children in their home areas, partly because they work such long hours that they struggle to take care of them and paid childcare is expensive.
Another factor is China s hukou system of household registration, which classifies citizens as agricultural and non-agricultural and limits the rights of migrant workers who move to the cities. The hukou system leaves most migrant workers registered in their rural hometowns or villages, a fact that determines their social welfare benefits and access to municipal services.
It also means that their children, who usually share their parents  hukou, are at a disadvantage in winning places at city schools. And when they finish school they have to sit the gaokao, China s highly competitive school-leaving examination, back in their home province.
Chinese researchers have been studying the health, school performance and incidence of delinquent behaviour among  left-behind  children for at least 20 years. But a number of incidents in the past decade have raised alarm among the public about the impact on children of growing up apart from their parents. In 2015, three sisters and a brother aged between five and 13 who were being cared for by their grandparents in the southwestern province of Guizhou took their own lives by drinking pesticide. Some studies suggest that  left-behind children  have higher rates of depression, substance abuse and delinquent behaviour than their peers.
A study by psychologists from Beijing, Dalian and Chongqing published last year in the journal Behavioural Sciences found that  left-behind children  often developed coping strategies that made them more independent than their peers.
But they were prone to depression and loneliness and adults who dealt with them described many of them as manifesting  sadness, inner tension and an inability to feel .

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Guinness bottles and stout hearts
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 410 words
Body


Sir,   Frank McNally s An Irishman s Diary (April 10th) on the origins of  Baby Guinness  reminded me of a time in the late 1970s when Hennigan s Bar on Wine Street in Sligo first introduced a cocktail list. This served a dual purpose, the double entendre names amused some of the regulars while the alcohol, fruit juice and fizzy concoctions catered to the tastes of visitors to the pub. I asked the proprietor, Hal Hennigan, what was a  Tourist Pint , featured on the list.  It s half a pint of Guinness for the price of a pint  he replied.  It s there as a joke,  he added. How prescient he was, as 45 years later the price of a  Tourist Pint  in Temple Bar is no joke.   Yours, etc,
JOE TAYLOR,
Irishtown,
Dublin 4.
Sir,   I remember the Baby Guinness very well. My father bottled Guinness for many years in John Clarke and Sons in Irishtown in Dublin. The measures available were the pint bottle (20 ounces), the half-pint (10 ounces) and the split or snipe (8 ounces). The reason for the eight-ounce version was that many of the doctors at the time recommended this to expectant and nursing mothers as a tonic! I must add that my mother, Tilly, ignored their and my father s advice and refused to drink it.   Yours, etc,
LIAM CLARKE,
Dublin 16.
Sir,   My grandmother used to consume a willow pattern cup of Guinness at noon most days for her health s sake. We also had small number of ladies who would sip a  whacker  of Jameson as their husbands drank pints. A whacker was a quarter of a glass of whiskey, the measuring of which was closely observed by both the dispenser and the consumer.   Yours, etc,
MICHAEL COLLINS,
Limerick.
A chara,   When my late father, Dr Daniel O Connell, was the head of the radiotherapy department of Charing Cross Hospital in London during the 1970s, he managed to introduce, for his ward only, a daily choice of a bottle of Guinness or Mackeson for each of his resident patients. His irrefutable logic was two-fold: stout contains many nutrients with calcium and iron being the most important. However, the most important benefit was the psychological effect of this  special treat , with his ward reported as the most positive and happiest in the hospital and,  given the relatively low survival rates in those days, this was no mean feat!
Certainly, when he brought us kids into the ward on Christmas Day to help serve the turkey, there was an undeniable buzz about the place!   Yours, etc,
DANIEL O CONNELL,
Winchester,
England.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Harris an 'unknown quantity' in Brussels; Whistle-stop series of meetings a dry run for Taoiseach ahead of EU summit next week
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 439 words
Body


As he made the rounds on his first foray on to the international diplomatic stage as Taoiseach, the perception of Simon Harris in Brussels is largely as someone who is seen as an unknown quantity.
The new leader met European Commission president Ursula von der Leyen yesterday afternoon, before heading to Warsaw to have dinner with a group of other EU leaders.
The meeting with Dr von der Leyen was down in the commission president s diary as a fairly standard introductory sit-down, without a set agenda.
Speaking afterwards, Harris said the pair discussed Ireland s plans to recognise the state of Palestine, a new EU overhaul on toughening the asylum system, agricultural policy, the war in Ukraine and relations with the UK.
The two spoke for a little over half an hour in what a commission source described as  very friendly  meeting.
Well-regarded
The 37-year-old Fine Gael leader is viewed as an  unknown quantity  by the Brussels bubble, according to several officials.  He is the new kid on the block,  another long-time Irish official said.
As a minister, he would have been over and back to the EU institutions for meetings, and when in the health portfolio co-ordinated with counterparts on Covid-19 during the pandemic.
The fact that Harris is being advised by Phil Hogan, the former EU trade commissioner who is still well-regarded within the Brussels circuit, is something that has been clocked by observers, one EU official said.
During his brief visit, the new Taoiseach also made time to meet Manfred Weber, the German MEP who heads up the European People s Party (EPP), the centre right grouping that includes Fine Gael.
The largest group in the parliament and around the summit table, the EPP will be an important constituency to cultivate connections within.
Horse-trading
Harris starts at a time when the business of policymaking has slowed down, and the political manoeuvring over the shape of the next commission is starting to ramp up.
Von der Leyen is seeking a second term as president and the coming months will see plenty of back room horse-trading over the allocation of EU commissioner portfolios.
Not long after the meeting with the commission president, Harris went to the airport for a flight to Warsaw to meet several EU leaders, including European Council president Charles Michel, followed by an informal dinner with the leaders of Poland, Spain, Greece, Finland, Estonia and Luxembourg.
The whistle-stop series of engagements served as somewhat of a dry run in advance of the full summit of EU leaders next week, where leaders from other countries will be looking to get the measure of the new Irish leader.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Harris rejects Israeli criticism that he failed to mention hostages
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 266 words
Byline: HARRY McGEE
Body


HARRY McGEE Political Correspondent  The Government has rejected a denunciation of Simon Harris by the Israeli foreign ministry over his first speech to the Dáil as Taoiseach for not specifically mentioning Israeli hostages held in Gaza.
The ministry also criticised  the intention of the Government to give formal recognition, along with several other EU countries and Norway, to a Palestinian State.
The foreign ministry issued a statement yesterday in which it contended Mr Harris neglected to mention the Israeli hostages captured by Hamas on October 7th during his maiden speech to the Dáil as Taoiseach.
A spokesman for Mr Harris told The Irish Times yesterday that the Taoiseach has been even-handed at all times in his response to the conflict, and that included condemning the taking of the hostages and calling for their release.
 By any fair analysis Ireland has always condemned the atrocity Hamas committed on October 7th and called for hostages to be released.  The Taoiseach has repeatedly said it,  said the spokesman.
In its statement, the Israeli foreign ministry claimed Harris  forgot  to  mention the 133 Israeli hostages who have been rotting in Hamas tunnels for the past six months .
It continued:  After the worst massacre of Jews since the Holocaust, there are those in Ireland who persist on being on the wrong side of history.
The denunciation of Ireland was one of a number made by Israeli in recent days, possibly as a response of an initiative, involving Spain, Ireland, Malta, Belgium, Slovenia and Norway to give formal recognition to a Palestinian State within months.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Henshaw admits Leinster's 'obsession' with winning a fifth European crown; Centre explains how his team hope to beat their bête noire, La Rochelle
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 13
Length: 966 words
Body


Since Leinster secured their fourth star in 2018, they have endured a tortuously anticlimactic search for a fifth. Beaten finalists, losing quarter-finalists in an empty Aviva, beaten semi-finalists, beaten finalists again and beaten finalists yet again last May.
And yet with each painful near miss Leinster have regrouped and vowed to return with even greater determination to win a fifth Champions Cup. Johnny Sexton may have retired, but that attitude hasn t changed. It has echoes of Munster s Magnificent Obsession of the Noughties.
 It is an obsession,  Robbie Henshaw freely admitted this week.  Within this club it is an obsession. It is huge. We are not shy about saying what we want to achieve and that definitely is the fifth star. So yeah, it is an obsession for everyone, from our head coach [down].
Despite his injury woes, Henshaw has accumulated as much Champions Cup despair as any Leinster player in the last five seasons. He started all five of those aforementioned defeats   ie three finals, a semi-final and a quarter-final. It makes you wonder if a team can want something too much.
 No, I don t think so,  he maintained, and having also played in the successful 2018 final in Bilbao against Racing 92, he spoke from experience when adding:  When you experience winning this competition it is all you really think about.
 Like watching it as a kid growing up, to experience winning it is like no other, literally. So, yeah, I think this one is the one to win. It definitely is for us and for me personally it is the one we are always chasing.
Leinster have played some wonderful rugby in the last five seasons, more consistently so than any other team in Europe probably. There were, at least, the three Pro14 titles that preceded the relative famine of two seasons without a trophy. In the eyes of many, and perhaps themselves, their season appears to be deemed a failure unless they win the Champions Cup, which seems almost cruel.
It s almost a relief that Henshaw wouldn t quite go that far.
 I wouldn t say  a failure . I d say probably a really good learning curve and probably opens our eyes as to how competitive teams are in this competition. How much teams are growing and getting better, you know. I remember Stuart Lancaster saying when you are sitting at the top you are always being hunted.
 That s the thing, you can see that teams have caught up and teams are getting better and better. It is great for rugby. It is great for the competition. But for us I think there has been a good bit of change within the group and I think it is great and I think we need to take those lessons now and we need to apply them and make sure we will do it this year.
Point of difference
No team epitomises this, of course, more than La Rochelle, who have replaced Saracens as Leinster s bête noire by winning those last two finals and the semi-final of three seasons ago, with Big Bad Will Skelton the common denominator. Now Skelton et al loom into view in Saturday s quarter-final at the Aviva Stadium.
 We know the likes of [Levani] Botia, Skelton, [Uini]) Atonio, [Jonathan]  Danty   they re all coming straight for us, and I think that s a challenge I relish and all the lads relish. We love getting stuck in and I think our point of difference this year is our defence,  said Henshaw.  Our defence will be tested but we re looking forward to it.
Henshaw speaks warmly of Jacques Nienaber s  energy and positivity , adding:  The work he does reporting on teams, reviewing, previewing teams is unbelievable.
Henshaw confirmed they will also be leaning on Nienaber s experience of winning tight knockout games in the last two World Cups with the Springboks.
Leinster s defence under Nienaber is still in its relatively early stages, and Leicester exposed more chinks last Saturday. But the heightened line speed was rewarded with Henshaw s key intercept try.
Despite being troubled by a hamstring issue for the third World Cup in a row, Henshaw has this season already played precisely twice as many minutes for province and country (1,264) as he did in the whole of the 2022/23 campaign (632 minutes).
Following his recent wedding to Sophie Marren in the aftermath of Ireland s Six Nations title success, Henshaw was back playing in the wins over the Bulls and Leicester.
His first game alongside Jamie Osborne was against the Bulls, and one ventures that if Garry Ringrose is ruled out of Saturday s match, Henshaw will be defending in the 10/12 channel where Danty will again come charging.
Although it was only a pool game, Leinster must derive some inner belief from withstanding the heavy bombardment of their line in sodden conditions last December that were ideal for La Rochelle s power game, to finally beat the French side.
 It is very important,  said Henshaw.  I think it was great for us to win that dogfight but I think we are under no illusions that that was the pool stages. They lost two games at the pool stage and have still come through.
 I think they are a great team and under their coach they are unbelievable at finding a way to grind out a win or to get through. That will be in our heads as well that they play to the final whistle.
It s an almost indefinable factor, the ability that some sides have to  find a way . Henshaw attributes this to La Rochelle s experience within a group, dealing with periods of pressure and then responding in kind, whereas Leinster need to better manage the periods either side of half-time and especially in the last 10 minutes.
 And then last year, looking back, we got a great start against them and let them back in and then probably sat back a little and didn t keep attacking them and that s probably in our minds that we probably have to stay attacking for the 80 minutes and not sit back and not try to contain them.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



How a far-sighted father opened the door to a varied life in the Big Apple; Galway native has had roles including teaching, community work for Irish immigrants, IT positions and consultancy
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 10
Length: 838 words
Body


Before Paul Finnegan was born in November 1965, his parents provided him with a gift that was to prove very handy some 20 years later. Finnegan s father was an Irish engineer who had worked back and forth between Ireland and the US and was about to leave his then base in Phoenix, Arizona, to take up a teaching post at University College Galway.
He deliberately delayed his return by a couple of months so that Paul was born in the US: the three-week-old baby arrived in Galway as a US citizen.
When he graduated with a mechanical engineering degree in recession-torn Ireland in the mid-1980s, his legal entry into the US was therefore secure.  I graduated from UCG on a Thursday, and I flew to New York on Sunday,  he says.  Galway is a very cosmopolitan place. New York is that on a gargantuan scale. I like to say I traded one great city for another.
Finnegan settled easily in New York, falling in with his tribe and enjoying the freedom and attractions of a large city. He has lived there ever since, working in roles that include teaching, community work for Irish immigrants, IT positions and consultancy.
While teaching in public school, he became increasingly involved in voluntary work with people helping Irish immigrants in the city. This eventually led to a position as executive director of the not-for-profit Emerald Isle Immigration Centre.
A key part of the centre s work is to encourage immigrants to take advantage of college opportunities in the US.  A lot of the Irish community here had never gone to college and never saw that as something they would ever do, so we set about changing that.
Letter of appreciation
Finnegan takes pride in the fact that his work has changed the course of people s lives. He recalls a letter of appreciation he received from a woman 20 years after she attended a career-focused seminar he organised. The woman had been inspired to undertake a nursing qualification and had gone on to have a very successful career in the profession. Her alternative path would probably have been a life of casual jobs, he says.
After going on to spend many years working in the IT sector, Finnegan returned for a second spell, heading up a community organisation, when he was asked to run the New York Irish Centre in 2011. The centre is a cultural hub hosting plays, music, dance and Irish-language classes with a strong social component. It places a strong emphasis on serving the needs of Irish seniors in the city.
 We got to know many people here who had come over in the 1940s and onwards. They were talented and smart, but they didn t always get the right opportunities. What was important is that they   and the people who came before them   provided a foundation for the people who came after.
 They created a positive brand for the Irish as people who contributed to this city in so many ways, providing others with a half-yard head start.
While being Irish is an advantage there s no free pass at the same time, he says.  Being Irish will get you the meeting but it won t get you the business. After the introduction, you have to shape up and talk American.
Another issue he has been concerned with over the years is the high rate of mental health issues and self-harm and suicide among parts of the expat community. Among the organisations tackling this now is Solace House, an initiative that grew out of a programme developed by Pieta House founder Joan Freeman.
 America is great in many ways but it doesn t have a strong safety net economically or in other respects. It s up to you to provide for yourself, and some people are not equipped for this. Some turn to drink and many are reluctant to ask for help when they are in trouble.
The Irish arriving in New York these days have many advantages over their predecessors. They are often better educated, can find the information they need to navigate the city on their phones, don t need to emigrate permanently and have options for relocation other than the US.
Achieving legal status remains an issue, however.  It s easy enough to get a short-term visa but staying longer term is harder. Many come over and fall in love with the place so that can be tough if things don t progress the way they want.
Finnegan and his wife Rosa live in Queens, where they have raised their two children. He has no plans to return to live in Ireland but enjoys visiting to catch up with relatives in Galway.
After 11 years at the New York Irish Centre, he returned to the private sector in 2020 and runs his own business consultancy, Shantalla, helping SMEs find their unique position in the market.
Finnegan has also been heavily involved over the years with New York s Irish Business Organisation, where he is president. He also joins in enthusiastically in celebrating Ireland s national holiday in New York every March.
 St Patrick s Day is the city s day as much as the Irish community s day here. They do the blarney and the shamrock. There s cliche and caricature but it s great fun too. You just go along with it and then you get into it in a way.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



HSE controls 183 vacant properties, Seanad told
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 593 words
Byline: MARIE O'HALLORAN
Body


MARIE O HALLORAN
 The HSE has 183 vacant properties under its control, of which 90 are in  various stages of disposal , according to Minister of State Joe O Brien.
He confirmed the 183 figure following speculation that the State health agency had up to 400 buildings in its possession, which are overseen by HSE Capital and Estates.
Mr O Brien said 32 of the properties are  under review and are being considered for retention and reuse by health care services or disposal . A further 61 of the properties  are retained assets, which means that the properties are vacant and have been retained for varying reasons related to the provision of health services , he said.
 Recently, the HSE has been very co-operative with the Department of Children and Integration in making a small number of properties available to us to help us with accommodation issues, but that is notwithstanding the large number, 183, that remain vacant,  the Minister of State with responsibility for Community Development and Charities told the Seanad.
He was responding to Fianna Fáil Senator Malcolm Byrne, who had said he had  no confidence in the HSE Estates. because there is no evidence of any strategy  to address the issue of vacant buildings.
Describing the HSE as  one of the biggest owners of derelict and abandoned buildings right around the country , he said some buildings required very little work to put them back in public use.
Raising the issue in the Upper House, Senator Byrne highlighted the case of the health centre in Camolin, Co Wexford, which closed in 2014, and said that  for 10 years, the HSE has left that building abandoned .
In 2018, the HSE said it was going to offer it to other agencies but nothing was done, he said.
In 2022, he was told  it was potentially going to be used to house Ukrainian families .
In November 2023, the HSE said it would act  as a matter of priority .
There has been some remedial work carried out at the building but there is still nobody using it, he said. Mr O Brien outlined the process involved when a HSE property has been vacated. He said the executive first had to establish if it was  surplus to health requirements .
Other HSE services are contacted to establish their interest and if the building is no longer required, properties are first offered to the Land Development Agency (LDA) and then to other State agencies.
 Finally, if there is no interest expressed by other State entities, the property is placed on the open market,  the Green Party TD said.
On the centre in Camolin, he said the HSE intends to dispose of the property and Wexford County Council has expressed an interest  and is actively seeking funding to bring this property back into use, with a decision expected in quarter two of this year .
If the council decides not to acquire the former health centre, the HSE will proceed to dispose of it on the open market, the Seanad was told.
But Senator Byrne said it was unacceptable that 183 derelict properties remained under the control of a State agency. He said that  for 10 years, we have been hearing these excuses .
The Camolin property was vacant for a decade and the situation  is just not acceptable . The last time he raised the case in the Seanad, he was told the county council was not interested in the property.
 Now, we are told it is. I really question how the Minister of State can have confidence in HSE Estates given that it continues to leave vacant so many properties throughout the country and is not treating this issue with urgency when there is such demand for property for so many services.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Inflation falls to under 3% in March
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 2
Length: 409 words
Byline: CIARA O'BRIEN
Body


CIARA O BRIEN
 The annual rate of inflation fell to under 3 per cent in March, the fifth month in a row that the rise in the cost of living was under 5 per cent. That compares with an annual rise of 3.4 per cent over the year to the end of February.
But when energy costs and unprocessed food are removed from the calculations, the consumer price index rose 4.1 per cent over the year.
The figures showed a significant rise in the cost of recreation and culture, which increased by 8.3 per cent over the year to the end of March, as the prices of package holidays increased almost 40 per cent, and costs at restaurants and hotels rose 5.5 per cent.
The latter was fuelled by higher prices for alcoholic drinks and food in licensed premises, along with restaurants, cafes and an increase in the cost of hotel accommodation.
The price of clothing fell, showing a 6.6 per cent decline year on year, while furnishings, household equipment and routine household maintenance fell 0.6 per cent.
On a monthly basis, consumer prices were 0.5 per cent higher compared with February, slowing from the 1 per cent recorded between January and February.
The largest increases were in transport, where prices rose 2.9 per cent driven mainly by a hike in air fares, and recreation and culture, with a 2.8 per cent rise.
Housing, water, electricity, gas and other fuels saw prices fall 1.8 per cent, and clothing and footwear prices declined 1.8 per cent over the month.
Earlier this month, Irish inflation fell below the European Central Bank s (ECB) target rate of 2 per cent for the first time in nearly three years, with the flash estimate for the harmonised index of consumer prices (HICP) indicating that prices rose by 1.7 per cent in the 12 months to March.
Daragh Cassidy, spokesman for consumer website Bonkers.ie, said the easing inflation was welcome, but cautioned that prices were still rising, just at a slower pace than last year.
 Many consumers are still feeling the pinch. Very little is getting cheaper. Despite recent drops, gas and electricity prices are still about 80-90 per cent above what would, until recently, have been considered normal levels, while food costs have increased by about 20-25 per cent over the past 2½ years,  he said.
 We ve also seen big hikes in health insurance costs over the past year. So it could easily take another two or three years for consumers to regain the purchasing power that they lost since the cost of living crisis began.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Iranian failure to respond to Israel would show weakness, but it may choose patience; Limited options open to Iran but breakthrough in Gaza could curb regional tensions
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 483 words
Body


Tensions have risen between Iran and Israel following last week s air strike on Tehran s consulate in Damascus. Israel has been blamed for the attack, which killed 12 people, including seven members of Iran s Islamic Revolutionary Guard Corps.
US and allied officials fear that Iran could launch a retaliatory strike and Iranian supreme leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei said on Wednesday that Israel would be  punished . Israel has called up air defence reservists and its foreign minister Israel Katz warned on X:  If Iran attacks from its territory, Israel will respond and attack in Iran.
Iran is in a difficult position. While failing to respond to the attack would signal weakness and undermine deterrence, commentators suggest Tehran may choose  strategic patience . Despite its considerable arsenal of long- and medium-range ballistic missiles, Iran would be reluctant to attempt a large strike on Israel. The Iron Dome anti-missile system used by Israel could destroy many if not most missiles before they hit targets, Israel s retaliation would be massive, and the US could join Israel in an attack. On Wednesday night, US president Joe Biden reiterated  ironclad  commitment to Israel.
Iran is unlikely to bomb Israeli embassies in Jordan, Egypt, the United Arab Emirates and Bahrain. Tehran recently restored relations with these countries. Oman has offered to mediate. US regional envoy Brett McGurk has asked Emirati, Saudi, Qatari and Iraqi foreign ministers to urge restraint during calls with their Iranian counterpart. They fear becoming embroiled in a regional war that could involve Iranian strikes on US bases in the Gulf.
Following the 2020 US assassination of Iran s military commander Qassim Soleimani, Iran launched missiles at an Iraqi base hosting US troops after warning Washington to protect personnel. There was damage but no casualties. Such subterfuge would be unlikely to work with Israel. For 20 years, prime minister Binyamin Netanyahu has declared Iran to be Israel s main regional adversary. Iran could stage cyber and data-wiping attacks on Israeli military and civilian infrastructure, including power plants and security facilities, although Israeli hackers could respond in kind. Iran s allies fear a devastating response if they strike Israel on behalf of Iran. Lebanon s Hizbullah would not risk its pre-eminent political position in Lebanon. Israel s defence minister Yoav Gallant has repeatedly warned:  What we are doing in Gaza, we can do in Beirut.  Washington s Quincy Institute think tank executive vice-president Trita Parsi has cited Iranian media outlet Jadeh Iran, which reported Tehran would not strike Israel if the US secured a ceasefire in Gaza. This has not been confirmed by mainstream Iranian media and has been denied by the US, but Jadeh Iran argued that the Biden administration could curb regional tensions by achieving a breakthrough in Gaza.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Judge jails farmer for possessing drugs
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 280 words
Byline: DAVID RALEIGH
Body


DAVID RALEIGH
 A Co Limerick farmer who admitted possessing more than EUR 500,000 of cocaine, heroin and tablets has been sentenced to six years in prison with the final 18 months suspended.
Charles Magill (61), with addresses at Knockainey and Rivers, Lisnagry, told gardaí he was delivering drugs for unnamed criminals  to pay off a drug debt his then partner had accrued.
Magill and convicted drug dealer Vincent Collopy were arrested during a Garda operation which resulted in the seizure of EUR 1.4 million of cocaine, heroin and tablets on May 29th, 2022.
He pleaded guilty to 16 charges, including two counts of possessing almost EUR 600,000  of drugs for sale or supply, as well as to having EUR 49,000 in cash, contrary to money laundering legislation.
Judge Tom O Donnell said gardaí observed Magill delivering a drugs package in Corbally, Co Clare and later saw a vehicle arriving to retrieve it. As gardaí pursued this vehicle, they observed one of the occupants throwing the package from the car.
Package
Collopy (44), of St Ita s Street, St Mary s Park, Limerick, who gardaí told an earlier hearing had thrown the package from the car and tried to impede a garda in the course of his duties on the day, was jailed for six years with the final 18 months suspended in January of last year after pleading guilty to possessing cocaine worth about EUR 10,000 for sale or supply.
In follow up searches at Magill s addresses, gardaí recovered EUR 385,000 of cocaine, EUR 130,000 of heroin, EUR 81,000 of tablets and EUR 49,000 in cash. Magill told gardaí he was  coerced  by others, who the judge said were involved in the  organised sale and distribution of drugs in Limerick city .

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



June referendum in doubt amid Coalition fears; Government reluctance to hold poll follows defeats in family and care votes
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 401 words
Byline: CORMAC McQUINN
Body


CORMAC McQUINN
 There is doubt over whether the referendum on the Unified Patent Court (UPC) will go ahead in June as planned amid the continued fallout from the heavily defeated family and care referendums last month.
There are strong indications that the vote will be postponed with the Government due to make a final decision on how it will proceed next week.
It is understood that  lessons learned  from the unsuccessful referendums have been part of the considerations on whether  the UPC referendum takes place on the earmarked date of June 7th, the same day as the local and European elections.
One source said enthusiasm for holding the referendum is  less than stellar  while another said there is a  reluctance  to go ahead with it in June given the outcome of the referendums in March.
Another Government insider said the decision on the UPC referendum proceeding or not has not yet been taken but highlighted how the required legislation has not yet been passed the Oireachtas.
It is currently at committee stage in the Seanad.
The Cabinet is expected to decide next week on whether  to proceed with the referendum in June.
The UPC is designed to provide a one-stop shop for litigation on patents whose decisions will be binding on participating European Union member states.
A Yes vote in a referendum would mean Irish patents would be valid in the 17 EU member states that have signed up to the UPC system.
The move has been long called for by business groups and individual sectors of the economy, such as the pharmaceutical trade.
Transfer of jurisdiction
In 2013, Ireland signed an agreement providing for the establishment of the UPC between contracting states, but an amendment to the Constitution is needed as it entails a transfer of jurisdiction in patent litigation from Irish courts to an international court.
Newly appointed Minister for Enterprise Peter Burke will bring a memo to Government next week on  the next steps  according to a statement from his department. It said:  He will outline the Government s position at that stage.
Fianna Fáil senator Malcolm Byrne said:  It is in Ireland s competitive interest to join the European unified patents system to make obtaining and protecting inventions much easier for Irish inventors.
Mr Byrne, who has been selected as his party s director of elections for the UPC referendum, told The Irish Times he hopes it proceeds in June as planned.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Killing of IRA men by soldiers justified, coroner rules
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 637 words
Body


The use of lethal force by British Special Air Service (SAS) soldiers in an ambush which killed three IRA men in Co Tyrone in 1991 was justified, a coroner has ruled.
Delivering his provisional findings in the Coagh inquest, coroner Mr Justice Michael Humphreys said he was satisfied that the use of force was  reasonable  as the soldiers had an honest belief it was necessary in order to prevent loss of life.
However, the coroner also concluded that the operation was not planned in a manner which minimised to the greatest extent possible the need for recourse to lethal force.
The inquest into the deaths of Lawrence McNally (38), Peter Ryan (37) and Tony Doris (21) in Coagh on June 3rd, 1991 opened in 2022. The three men were intercepted as they travelled in a stolen car through Coagh by the SAS soldiers, who suspected they intended to murder a member of the security forces.
All three were shot dead in a hail of gunfire and the inquest was told that up to 150 rounds were fired.
Delivering his verdict in the legacy case, Mr Justice Humphreys said Mr McNally died as a result of gunshot wounds to the head and heart, Mr Doris as a result of wounds to the head and Mr Ryan as a result of a wound to the chest. He ruled that Mr McNally and Mr Ryan were shot by Soldier G, while Mr Doris was shot and killed by Soldier B.
The coroner said the three men were members of the East Tyrone brigade of IRA and were on  active service  when they were shot. He said the background to the case was a  surge of activity  in the area by the East Tyrone IRA.
Murder
Setting out the events, Mr Justice Humphreys said the security forces had received intelligence that the East Tyrone IRA intended to murder a former member of the UDR at a public car park in the village.
He said a specialist military unit was tasked to mount a  hard arrest  operation, which included a  reaction group  to effect the arrests and a  cover group  hidden in a modified flatbed truck to provide protection.
The coroner said that when the stolen car came to a halt at the car park entrance, the rear passenger door opened and a man wearing a balaclava armed with a rifle started to get out, pointing the weapon in the direction of Soldier L. After an order was given, the side of the the lorry was lowered and shots were fired.
The man with the rifle fell back into the car, which travelled on and crashed into another car around 30 metres away. Several further shots were then fired.
Mr Justice Humphreys was highly critical of actions by soldiers to destroy a video of the events from a surveillance location.
 If this had been available, it would have rendered the task of the inquest on many of the issues straightforward,  he said.  It would also, of course, have been of central importance to the RUC, whose role it was to assess whether any crime had been committed by the soldiers.
He said the soldiers who gave evidence to the inquest about the destruction of the video had  demonstrated a clear and unequivocal willingness to subvert the rule of law  and that the response of senior officers in the British army  has been to excuse, justify and support such reprehensible conduct  rather than condemn it.
Turning to the original RUC investigation, Mr Justice Humphreys said police had failed to challenge accounts given by soldiers, to interview the soldiers promptly after the shootings and to investigate the planning of the operation at all. He said the RUC investigation was  woefully inadequate .
He concluded, on the balance of probabilities, that no IRA member had discharged his weapon.
He added:  In each case, the use of lethal force was justified as the soldiers had an honest belief that it was necessary in order to prevent loss of life.The use of force by the soldiers was, in the circumstances they believed them to be, reasonable.
 - PA

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Liverpool's Dublin dream in tatters as Atalanta run riot; Italians stun Europa League favourites will emphatic win on Merseyside
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 15
Length: 1027 words
Body


Anfield was shorn of its flags and Liverpool lost all of their powers. A comprehensive first home defeat of the season, against a highly accomplished and effective Atalanta, has left the Europa League favourites with an almighty task to ensure Jürgen Klopp s reign ends with a final in Dublin. A manager responsible for so many unforgettable European nights with Liverpool is at risk of exiting quietly.
Gianluca Scamacca, the former West Ham disappointment, scored twice as the Italians displayed the cutting edge and defensive fortitude that Liverpool sorely lacked all night. It was Liverpool s first home defeat in 26 matches this season and they will need another famous comeback to preserve their hopes of bidding farewell to Klopp at the Aviva Stadium next month.
Flags were conspicuous by their absence on the Kop as fans staged a simple but effective protest against Liverpool s decision to raise ticket prices by 2 per cent next season.
The displays, organised by supporters group Spion Kop 1906, have become an established feature of European nights at Anfield and create an image that is a marketing dream for the club. This was an exception. Only one banner was unfurled before kick off after Spion Kop withheld its services for the night. It read:  No to ticket price increases .
Apprehensive and vulnerable The lack of colour, but not noise, was not the only unusual aspect of a European quarterfinal at Anfield. Liverpool were apprehensive and vulnerable in the first half against an Atalanta team that took them on at their own pressing game. The Italians, unbeaten in their previous 10 Europa League away fixtures, a sequence stretching back six years, were the more dangerous side from the start. With midfielders Mario Pasalic and Teun Koopmeiners fixing on Alexis Mac Allister and Wataru Endo respectively, the visitors disrupted Liverpool s attempts to play out from the back and starved Klopp s forward line of service as a result. The frequency and ease with which Atalanta exploited gaps in the home defence added to Liverpool s worries.
Pasalic should have put Gian Piero Gasperini s side ahead in the opening minutes when Virgil van Dijk s awkward clearance struck Charles De Ketelaere and rebounded into his path. The midfielder was five yards out and unmarked in front of goal but his snap-shot struck Caoimhín Kelleher in the face and deflected out for a corner. A busy, mixed night for the Liverpool goalkeeper was under way.
Liverpool responded immediately with Darwin Núñez testing Atalanta keeper Juan Musso on a counter-attack from the resulting corner. Mac Allister sent a good chance over the bar from a Harvey Elliott pull back and Núñez, sent clean through by Curtis Jones, poked an even clearer opportunity wide with only Musso to beat.
 That was wasteful, but there was also misfortune for Liverpool when Kostas Tsimikas  free-kick landed at Elliott s feet on the far side of the penalty area. The attacking midfielder started in place of Mohamed Salah and produced a Salah-esque curler that sailed over the Atalanta keeper only to strike both the underside of the bar and the inside of the far post before bouncing clear.
The chances did not signify any Liverpool dominance, however. Atalanta continued to cut through with wing back Davide Zappacosta a constant outlet on the right. Having created a decent opening for De Ketelaere, which the forward squandered with an unnecessary back-heel towards Koopmeiners when he should have shot, Zappacosta found himself in acres of space again following a cute pass from Koopmeiners. With time and room to pick his spot, the wing back found Gianluca Scamacca arriving unmarked in the Liverpool penalty area and the former West Ham striker swept a low finish under Kelleher. The keeper appeared to have Scamacca s shot covered only to allow the ball to slip under his arms.
Crucial save Kelleher atoned for his lapse with a crucial save to prevent Koopmeiners doubling Atalanta s advantage when played through on goal by Scamacca on the stroke of half-time. Klopp delivered his judgement on Liverpool s tame first half display at the interval. Tsimikas, Elliott and Jones did not reappear for the second half and were replaced by Andy Robertson, Salah and Dominik Szoboszlai respectively. The trio instantly injected some much-needed urgency and bite into Liverpool s game. Salah forced Musso into a sharp save from close range after Núñez kept the ball alive on the by-line. The Uruguay international, soon to be replaced himself by Luis Díaz, lofted another effort over as Atalanta finally came under exerted pressure.
Just as it appeared another Liverpool recovery was on the way, Atalanta struck again. Their second goal, like the first, came from creating space on the right and another precise cross. This time De Ketelaere was the provider with a first time delivery that exposed the home defence. Scamacca, left completely alone by Ibrahima Konaté inside the area, cushioned a delightful finish into the bottom corner.
Koopmeiners could have put the game and perhaps the tie beyond Liverpool when released inside the box moments later by De Ketelaere. He dragged a shot wide with Scamacca, unmarked yet again, pleading to be set up for his hat-trick. Klopp went for broke when introducing Diogo Jota into a four-man attack but a mistake by Szoboszlai presented Atalanta with a third late on. Scamacca seized on the midfielder s loose pass and played in Ederson. Kelleher saved the midfielder s first time shot but the rebound fell perfectly for former Chelsea midfielder Pasalic to convert and point Liverpool towards an unexpected European exit.
LIVERPOOL: Kelleher, Gomez, Konate, van Dijk, Tsimikas (Robertson 46), Jones (Szoboszlai 46), Mac Allister, Endo (Jota 76), Elliott (Salah 46), Nunez (Diaz 60), Gakpo. Subs not used: Adrian, Gravenberch, Clark, Bajcetic, Alexander-Arnold, Quansah, Bradley. ATALANTA: Musso, Zappacosta, Djimsiti, Hien, Ruggeri, Ederson Silva, De Roon, Pasalic, Koopmeiners, Scamacca, De Ketelaere (Miranchuk 90). Subs not used: Toloi, Holm, Toure, Lookman, Bakker, Adopo, Carnesecchi, Rossi, Hateboer, Bonfanti, Miranchuk. Referee: Halil Meler (Turkey).

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Maestros lament the fractured state of modern golf; Honorary starters at Augusta National preach theme of togetherness amid traditional quips
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 12
Length: 576 words
Body


The three maestros cracked the jokes before turning serious on the state of men s professional golf, each one   Jack Nicklaus, Gary Player and Tom Watson   quipping wisecracks on the first tee and playacting just how much their bodies ached before later burrowing frows at how fractured the game has become since LIV s arrival.
On the first tee, the camaraderie of old was showcased in the tradition   since Arnold Palmer s passing   of the trio with 11 green jackets between them and 140 Masters appearances hitting ceremonial shots down the first hole.
 I can hardly put the ball on the tee anymore,  quipped Gary Player, the fittest 88-year-old on the planet who still does hundreds of press-ups to start his day.
 Here s the hard part . . . ahhh, ahhhh!  croaked Jack Nicklaus,  watch out on the left . . .  and the right!
 Ah Jack, you would never hit a hook off the tee in your life,  came Watson, the young buck, on walking up to take the Golden Bear s place on the complex.
Polite applause
All done, to polite applause and nodding approval of those who had managed to gain a place around the first tee box, the trio   ages 88, 84 and 74   then cast aside the jokes to reminisce about their past deeds at Augusta National, Pebble Beach, Turnberry and other places and other times where green jackets and claret jugs and Wanamaker trophies and US Open trophies were placed into their hands.
The clear and obvious friendships of the three men   two Americans, one South African   were forged in the white heat of battle where, once the final putt dropped, the handshakes were genuine and the winner and the loser moved on to the next battle.
Times have changed. Nowadays, there are those LIV players   among them Masters champions Jon Rahm, Phil Mickelson, Patrick Reed, Dustin Johnson, Charl Schwartzel and Bubba Watson   who don t rock up to PGA Tour events any longer and where shared locker space only comes at the Major championships.
This is the first of the year, the next will be the US PGA at Valhalla, then the US Open at Pinehurst and then The Open at Royal Troon.
At Rahm s Champions Dinner, Watson had effectively finished affairs with words on what had been a lovely social experience.  Ain t it good to be together again?  he said to those gathered, then wondering if his words would impact. Ray Floyd used that point to get up from his chair to close proceedings on that note:  And, in a sense, I hope that the players themselves took that to say,  you know, we have to do something. We have to do something .
Secret talks
Whatever secret talks are ongoing between the PGA Tour   and also the DP World Tour, by extension   and LIV s paymasters show no sign as yet of any healing or constructive pathways forward and the three wise men were each hoping that there would be a coming together again at some point.
 We all know it s a difficult situation for professional golf right now. The players really kind of have control I think in a sense. What do they want to do? We ll see where it goes. We don t have the information or the answers. I don t think the PGA Tour or the LIV Tour really have an answer right now.
 But I think in this room, I know the three of us want to get together. We want to get together like we were at that Champions Dinner, happy, the best players playing against each other. The bottom line; that s what we want in professional golf, and right now, we don t have it,  said Watson, to nodding heads on either side.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



McEntee welcomes EU pact on immigration; New rules would allow for faster processing of applicants. says Minister
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 507 words
Byline: VIVIENNE CLARKE
Body


VIVIENNE CLARKE
and HARRY McGEE
 Minister for Justice Helen McEntee has said the planned overhaul of the asylum system is a  game-changer  for Ireland, allowing for faster processing of applicants and making it easier to  remove  those who don t have a right to be here.
Ireland is to overhaul the system to deal with immigration after the European Parliament approved a new policy to harden the bloc s borders after years of deadlock.
Ms McEntee said that the policy was  an absolute game-changer  under which the International Protection Act 2015 will be repealed, and new, legally binding time frames for making decisions on international protection applications and appeals will be introduced.
There will be a greater focus on efficient returns for unsuccessful applicants and accelerated processing for those from safe countries or those with no documents or false papers.
Speaking on both Newstalk Breakfast and RTÉ radio s Morning Ireland, Ms McEntee said there was nothing in the new EU migration package that did not benefit Ireland.
The European Parliament vote, which was opposed by Sinn Féin, allows for more people to be detained in facilities at borders and allows countries to make financial contributions in lieu of taking in asylum seekers.
The Minister pointed out that as an island it was known that more than half of the people who come to Ireland seeking asylum come from another European country.
 If we do not opt into this pact, the idea that we could tell other countries to take back those who have already protection in their countries, again, it s absolutely ludicrous.  We wouldn t benefit from the financial assistance which we will benefit from when we join the pact, but also we re going to have a greater ability to understand who is coming into our country. So there will be enhanced checks and there will be enhanced systems so that when people do arrive, we will understand who they are, where they come from, that will help us understand exactly who s here.
 But also if there are any risks, we would be able to deal with that as well. We have actually helped to make this pact, to get it to where it is here and generally there s nothing that doesn t benefit Ireland. So why we would go to try and deal with this on our own. It s absolutely crazy.
The new system will ensure that people who genuinely need help will get it and if there is the same system throughout Europe it will be more effective, she added. The overall objective was ensuring that the system was fair, but there also needed to be rules that had to be enforced.
With regard to Sinn Féin s opposition to the pact, Ms McEntee said that Sinn Féin had opposed  every single good thing that has come out of Europe.
Sinn Féin has disputed the assertion by Ms McEntee that it opposed all seven of the measures in the new asylum deal.
However, Sinn Féin s spokesman on foreign affairs, Matt Carthy, said that it supported two of the measures, but opposed the other five.
He said the vast majority of the measures in the pact were not in Ireland s interests.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Menopause support must tread a fine line between awareness and stigma; More employers are offering help but they need to avoid the risk of 'meno-washing'
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 6
Length: 733 words
Body


Should the menopause be classed as a disability or natural life stage? The argument arose last month when Britain s Equality and Human Rights Commission warned employers to make  reasonable adjustments  for menopausal employees experiencing serious symptoms or risk being sued for disability discrimination.
The Lancet medical journal fanned the flames by suggesting  it is time for a sensible conversation about menopause    words that could be viewed as tantamount to telling women to calm down.
Menopause has risen up employers  agendas, encouraged by a growing acceptance that once-private issues, such as mental health, have an impact on working life. It is also part of what Deborah Jermyn, an academic at the University of Roehampton, calls a  menopausal turn  in the broader culture, whereby campaigners, including celebrity activists, have sought to break taboos, highlight gaps in healthcare, guide others to identify their problems and seek help.
Perimenopause and menopause (which begins a year after periods have stopped) are triggered by declining progesterone and oestrogen levels, typically experienced by women between the ages of 45 and 55, but it can happen earlier.
Increasing numbers of employers are offering help through menopausal ambassadors, apps and professionals who can give advice on hormone replacement therapy (HRT), and help to identify and alleviate symptoms that include brain fog, hot flushes and sleeplessness. A report by Mercer, the consultancy, published this year, found that 22 per cent of employers are offering menopausal support, and 54 per cent plan to do so in the next two years.
Workplace advice and accommodations, such as temperature control, flexible working and quiet rooms, can make a difference to menopausal women, who, according to the human resources body CIPD, say the most common symptoms are feeling  less able to concentrate and an increased amount of stress .
Healthcare advisers
Talking about the issue is illuminating not just to those experiencing symptoms but also to those supporting colleagues, friends and family. This may plug gaps in public healthcare provision.
Some employers offer healthcare advisers who can prescribe HRT; Timpson, the UK retailer, reimburses staff for it. Tesco allows time off for symptoms outside sick leave calculations. Bank of Ireland offers up to 10 days  menopause leave.
But some initiatives amount to  meno-washing : the posters in the canteen will not do anything if a line manager is hostile.
According to the CIPD, 41 per cent of those missing work failed to cite menopausal symptoms because they worried it would affect how their performance was viewed, while 34 per cent said their manager would not be supportive. A report by Bank of America found that  many [US] employers say they offer menopause-related benefits while only one-third of employees say they are aware of the benefits .
Open culture
It also highlighted the gulf between the 76 per cent of HR benefit managers who say they discuss menopause-related issues with employees and the 3 per cent of women employees who say they have talked about menopause with HR.
There is a fine line between creating awareness, which is positive, and exacerbating stigma, which is not. Belinda Steffan, chancellor s fellow at the University of Edinburgh business school, says for every three women she speaks to, one, typically working in a male-dominated sector, worries about menopause becoming  another stick to beat them with .
 Increasing awareness about what menopause does to bodies  can unintentionally reinforce stigma, warns Steffan.  Not all women want to talk about menopause in the workplace,  she adds. Senior women and those in male-dominated industries are often reluctant.
The workplace, Steffan says, is generally designed around the ideal worker  unencumbered by physical or domestic needs. The menopausal body doesn t necessarily fit with that .
It is further complicated by the  messiness of midlife , she says, when women may be juggling work, children and ageing parents.
She suggests employers encourage an open workplace culture.  This opens the door for people with other health and wellbeing concerns to reach out for help, taking the focus off menopause. A menopause-friendly employer tends to be a good overall employer in terms of supporting a range of health and wellbeing concerns.    Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Modi's grip tightens; India's election
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 342 words
Body


When India s 490 million voters go to the polls next week for an election due to last 41 days, there will be little doubt about the result: Narendra Modi will sweep easily to a comfortable third term as prime minister and his Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP) seems set for an even greater parliamentary majority than in 2019.
Modi s undoubted personal popularity and economic success   the value of India s stock market has grown threefold since he first took office, its economy is almost twice as big   will play the major part in his victory in what he has repeatedly called  the mother of democracy . But he has also leaned heavily on a crackdown on free speech and opposition parties, with hundreds of politically targeted corruption and tax cases filed against opposition MPs and leaders. India s democratic credentials have been severely tarnished.
Most recent was the arrest of Arvind Kejriwal, leader of the Aam Aadmi party and chief minister of Delhi since 2015, over an alleged  scam  involving alcohol sales. He is now languishing in jail. And Congress, India s largest opposition party, has seen the tax authority freeze millions in its bank accounts, crippling its ability to campaign.
The BJP denies any role, with Modi insisting the federal agency conducting most of the investigations, the Enforcement Directorate (ED), is independent. Yet 95 per cent of its political cases have been filed against the opposition.
Modi s embrace of Hindu nationalism in this 80 per cent Hindu nation has stoked anti-Muslim tensions and violence and seriously eroded the traditional Nehru-inspired secularism of its politics. An intolerant Hindu-first majoritarianism is the order of the day, sustained by a BJP populist welfarism that has a strong appeal among the country s poor. A recent Pew poll reported 67 per cent of respondents expressing support for a  strong leader  who  can make decisions without interference from parliament or the courts .
The age of strongman leaders like Viktor Orbán and Recep Erdogan, and their  illiberal democracies , marches on.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Moloney named on bench for Wales clash; Flanker McMahon, who missed Italy match, returns to the backrow
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 13
Length: 690 words
Body


Clíodhna Moloney s imminent return to Test match rugby after two-and-a-half years was the primary topic of conversation ahead of Saturday s Six Nations match against Wales at Musgrave Park (4.45pm, Virgin Media).
Ireland head coach Scott Bemand made one change to the starting team from the one that lost 26-21 to Italy at the RDS, flanker Edel McMahon   she is a co-captain alongside Sam Monaghan   who missed the Italian match returns to the backrow with Aoife Wafer reverting to blindside flanker. Grace Moore drops out of the matchday 23.
Moloney s last game for Ireland, her 31st cap, was in November 2021 as she was dropped for comments made criticising former IRFU director of women s rugby Anthony Eddy ahead of the 2022 Six Nations Championship.
Galway native Moloney, currently playing with the Exeter Chiefs in the English Premiership, returned to the wider squad for this match and has now been promoted to the 23, a decision prompted by the shoulder injury sustained by Sarah Delaney.
There is a first cap in the offing for Ealing Trailfinders Shannon Ikahihifo, who came through the Irish Qualified (IQ) system and is named on the bench. Fullback Lauren Delany, stretchered off in the RDS, has recovered to take her place.
Role reversal
Irish defence coach Declan Danaher was asked about Moloney s return at the media briefing. He said:  She has got her head down, worked hard, obviously had to learn new lineout calls and then a couple of bits and pieces around how we are going to attack against Wales this weekend. She has just got on and done her job. It s been a good week. We have enjoyed having her in.
Moloney s return strengthens the group and instigates role reversal as when she was first choice Neve Jones was her understudy, a situation that s been flipped over. Danaher continued:  We have been keeping an eye on her [Moloney].
 We had an injury to Sarah Delaney so then there was a need to bring a hooker in and it was an opportunity to bring Clíodhna in. The first two days was getting her head around what the learning would be like for her in terms of her lineout, attack, and defence, point of view. Would she be in a place to be involved? She definitely did that.
Danaher agreed that making just one change to the starting team was a vote of confidence per se for the group that took on Italy and several positive aspects of the performance despite the defeat. He said:  We have looked back this week, reviewed on Monday as a group on how we take some of the lessons from that Italy game and make sure that we apply them against Wales.
 I think we had a pretty decent first 20 minutes, we probably just didn t come away with enough points for the territory and the possession we had.
Ireland will need to clean up their attack in handling and passing terms if they are to make the most of the threat that wings Béibhinn Parsons and Katie Corrigan can pose. Danaher said:  That s definitely something that we have spoken about. The days are gone of just hanging out on your wing. You see the best wingers are constantly looking for work.
Meanwhile Wales head coach Ioan Cunningham has made four changes from the team that lost 46-10 in Bristol against England a fortnight ago. Jasmine Joyce returns on the wing, Keira Bevan at scrumhalf, Sisilia Tuipulotu starts at tighthead while Kate Williams comes in at blindside flanker.
IRELAND: L Delany (Sale); K Corrigan (Leinster), E Higgins (Railway Union), E Breen (Munster), B Parsons (Connacht); D O Brien (Leinster), A Reilly (Connacht); L Djougang (Leinster), N Jones (Gloucester-Hartpury), C Haney (Leinster); D Wall (Munster); S Monaghan (Gloucester-Hartpury); A Wafer (Leinster), E McMahon (Exeter), B Hogan (Ulster). Replacements: C Moloney (Exeter), N O Dowd (Leinster), S McGrath (Ulster), F Tuite (Ulster), S Ikahihifo (Ealing), M Scuffil-McCabe (Leinster), N Fowley (Connacht), A Dalton (Leinster). WALES: J Hesketh; J Joyce, H Jones (capt), K Lake, C Cox; L George, K Bevan; G Pyrs, C Phillips, S Tuipulotu; A Fleming, G Evans; A Butchers, A Callender, B Lewis. Replacements: M Reardon, A Constable, D Rose, N John, G Hopkins, S Jones, K Powell, C Keight.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



More focus on generic medicines will save HSE cash, says industry report
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 2
Length: 471 words
Byline: DOMINIC COYLE
Body


DOMINIC COYLE
 Ireland s health system is wasting money on medicines by hindering access to generic drugs, according to an industry group.
Medicines for Ireland says health policy decision-makers need to recognise how  increased penetration of generic, biosimilar, and value-added medicines offers significant savings to the State  as well as a chance to treat more patients earlier when they are ill.
 This year, the Department of Health has projected that almost EUR 3 billion will be spent on medicines, representing nearly EUR 1 in every EUR 8 spent by the State on healthcare,  said Paul Neill, chairman of the group which represents the interests of generic drug producers in Ireland.
 Formidable challenges
 It s well documented how Ireland s healthcare system is facing formidable challenges underscoring the urgent need for reform to ensure affordability, efficiency and sustainability for patients and the State,  he said.
 In the context of these challenges, the significance of a resilient and sustainable generic, biosimilar and value-added medicines industry cannot be overstated.
His comments came as the group unveiled a new five-year strategic plan for the sector.
Currently, generics account for 58 per cent of all prescribed medicines in Ireland, according to the industry, that it says is well behind the European average of 70 per cent.
Mr Neill said several factors contributed to Ireland s  lag  in the area. These include the low price at which generics are permitted to enter the Irish market in competition with branded products which have lost their patent protection and pricing structures designed only to lower prices further thereafter.
He said the process to secure a rise in price for a product that may no longer be viable to supply at existing rate involved lengthy timelines.
 These factors have an overall impact on the attractiveness of the Irish market for manufacturers,  he said.
Medicine shortages
Irish doctors and pharmacists have been struggling to secure supplies of certain medicines over recent years, with the Health Product Regulatory Authority, which regulates the supply of medicines in Ireland, saying that shortages currently affect 274 medicines, many of them common generic products.
Similar problems exist in markets across western Europe and in the United States where generics makers argue that ultra-low prices make production unsustainable.
 To fully realise the potential of enhanced patient access and affordability through increased penetration, it is pivotal that we foster a market ecosystem which promotes fair competition and availability of medicines over the next five years,  Mr Neill said.
 From the perspective of our members, key to this must be the delivery of a coherent framework agreement on the supply and pricing of medicines with the Department of Health.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



More than one in 10 who lost loved ones say their end-of-life care was fair to poor
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 518 words
Byline: JADE WILSON
Body


JADE WILSON  More than one in 10 people said their loved one received  fair  to  poor  end-of-life care, according to the first national National End of Life survey.
Bereaved people were asked in the survey, published yesterday, about the care provided to a family member or friend in the last days and months of their lives.
While a significant majority (74 per cent) felt their loved one received  very good  end-of-life care, respondents said there were areas that could be improved. Some 15 per cent rated the care provided as  good , but 11 per cent said it was  fair  to  poor .
In total, 4,570 bereaved family members and friends participated in the survey, conducted by the National Care Experience Programme, a joint initiative of the Health Information and Quality Authority, the Health Service Executive (HSE) and the Department of Health.
Some of the participants included comments as to how they experienced care, with a number pointing out a lack of communication as an issue.
 I wish I could have been given more information about the end of life pain relief,  said one participant.  My partner was sedated while I wasn t there, so we didn t really get to say goodbye while he was conscious. I don t think we got enough information towards the end.
Another said:  I felt communication between doctors, nurses and myself was minimal.
However, a majority of respondents praised the care provided and compassion shown by staff.
 If everyone receives this level of care at the end, it is to be commended. It felt like a coordinated mission by all to give my mother the most comfort and dignity during the toughest period of her life,  said one participant.
Another said:  He was treated with dignity and respect during his time. All his wishes were considered from the time he entered the [nursing home].
The most common place of death was a hospital (39.4 per cent), followed by a nursing home, at home and in a hospice. Those who died experienced a variety of care, involving multiple settings and services, in the their last months and days.
Differences were seen in the types of deaths that took place across settings. For example, those who died in hospitals typically had shorter illnesses.
The survey found most participants had confidence and trust in the healthcare staff who were caring for their relative or friend. They felt conditions and care were explained in a way they could understand.
It also identified several areas where care could be improved with issues such as the continuity, availability and responsiveness of care; timeliness of care; and support for emotional needs highlighted.
Some 23.9 per cent of survey participants answered  no  when asked if there was good co-ordination between the different services and staff that cared for their relative or friend in the last three months of their lives. Some also felt help was not provided from healthcare staff as soon as their loved one needed it.
The most positive ratings of overall care at the end of life were from bereaved relatives of people who died in a hospice, with almost 94 per cent rating the overall care as  very good .

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Mullins has momentum in British title race; Impaire Et Passe survives stewards' enquiry to hold on to Aintree Hurdle
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 17
Length: 742 words
Body


Momentum behind Willie Mullins  tilt at a historic British trainer s championship extended from the track to the steward s room when the Grand National festival opened at Aintree yesterday.
Trailing his cross-channel rivals Paul Nicholls and Dan Skelton by almost EUR 800,000, Mullins immediately narrowed the gap in the opener with Il Etait Temps successful in the Grade One Manifesto Novices Chase.
Both he and jockey Paul Townend subsequently secured a top-flight double with Impaire Et Passe in the Aintree Hurdle but only after a desperate three-pronged finish and a prolonged stewards enquiry.
The evens favourite just beat Bob Olinger by a nose with Langer Dan between the Irish pair just a short head back in third.
Impaire Et Passe looked to have the race in safe keeping on the run-in but appeared to idle significantly under an increasingly desperate Townend and only the nod of his head got him the verdict.
Despite Rachael Blackmore s eloquent argument to the stewards that Bob Olinger should get the verdict, there was no alteration to the places.
 It was a long wait but I was pretty confident we d keep it once I d seen the overhead angle, I thought that gave us a great chance,  Mullins said.
 When Paul and Harry [Skelton on Langer Dan] crossed after the last hurdle there was never any interference and I thought it would be hard to change it. On balance, it was a hard result to change as Paul thought he was idling in front, which is a legitimate excuse,  he added.
Not surprisingly, Bob Olinger s trainer Henry De Bromhead took a different tack and commented:  I thought we were unlucky to be fair. He got bumped at the second-last, crossed at the last, and bumped after the last. But that s the way the stewards looked at it and we just have to accept that.
Eight-strong team
The near EUR 163,000 first prize to the winner could yet prove a crucial factor in Mullins  attempt to become the first Irish-based trainer since Vincent O Brien 70 years ago to land the British title.
Most important of all in that contest will be the outcome of Saturday s Grand National which is worth half a million pounds to the winner and in which Mullins has a massive eight-strong team.
In comparison, Skelton has a single National runner, Nicholls has none, and some firms were prepared to only go 15-8 about their Irish rival landing the big race with one of his powerful team.
Mullins  title odds were also slashed after yesterday s results, and he is a 7-4 second favourite in some lists with Nicholls still odds-on to ultimately secure a record-equaling 15th cross-channel championship when the season ends at Sandown later this month.
Nicholls  cause was helped when his Sans Bruit landed the Red Rum Chase from Mullins  4-1 favourite Saint Roi.
 I think Dan Skelton was £44,000 in front earlier on, and we ve won some money, we were a grand in front at one point, then he won some money, and I think that ll have put us back in front. It will be a close battle between us two between now and the end of the season, and if Willie wins the National, then it will get really interesting,  Nicholls said.
Gordon Elliott also has eight National hopefuls   the same as the entire home team    after a maximum 34 runners were declared yesterday.
A huge Irish team of 26 runners equals last year, when there were 39 runners. They also include the 2022 winner Noble Yeats and a trio from the De Bromhead camp. Scotland s Corach Rambler is still favourite to defend the National crown he secured a year ago.
Elliott also got his Liverpool eye in early as the Cheltenham Gold Cup runner up Gerri Colombe returned to action with a gutsy victory in the Aintree Bowl.
Jack Kennedy didn t think the 9-4 favourite was at his best, but he still had a half a length in hand of Ahoy Senor with the novice Corbetts Cross in third.
Favouritism
 Believe it or not, I actually think he could be a bit better on better ground. All roads lead back to the Gold Cup next year, we ll probably go the same route again and keep dreaming,  said Elliott.
The fourth Irish winner on the day was Its On The Line who justified 3-1 favouritism in the Foxhunters under veteran jockey Derek O Connor.
 We gave him a speculative entry and once it turned up heavy ground it was always going to bring stamina into play. That was the biggest sway into running him,  trainer Emmet Mullins said.
Even in this race though, Willie Mullins kept the prize money ticking over with Annamix finishing third.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



National's appeal intact despite potential for more animal rights protests
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 17
Length: 919 words
Body


For each of the last two years, ITV s terrestrial coverage of the Randox Aintree Grand National has recorded viewing figures in Britain of 7.5 million. That s a million more than watched England s dramatic late victory over Ireland in last month s Six Nations rugby match. So, it s safe to assume the public s social contract with the world s most famous horse race is signed, sealed and delivered.
On top of that 7.5 million are those who watch the Grand National differently, either on specialist racing channels, streaming, or even perhaps on an annual risqué expedition to a bookies shop for a once-a-year flutter. Overall, an estimated global audience of 500 million tunes in for one of the most immediately identifiable events in sports.
They are numbers that underline how the National simultaneously provides the sport with its greatest and most fraught shopwindow. With the spotlight comes scrutiny on jump racing s most uncomfortable reality; that with thrills come spills and the statistical inevitability that some of them at some point will result in fatal injuries.
British Horseracing Authority statistics show a percentage of fatalities to runners in cross-channel jump racing of just over 0.4 per cent. The rate in the Grand National has been more than double that. There have been 16 deaths in the National since 2000 including the unfortunate Hill Sixteen who broke his neck at the first fence a year ago.
Frantic atmosphere
That was after a 15-minute delay to the start of the race due to animal rights demonstrators who tried to glue themselves to a fence. Hill Sixteen s trainer was convinced the frantic atmosphere that arose on the back of that contributed to the horse, normally a reliable jumper, not concentrating properly and paying the ultimate price.
Inevitably, the Animal Rising group dismissed that and enthusiastically made the most of the sort of platform any fringe organisation dreams of. From the point of view of piggybacking one of the sport s most high-profile events to further an agenda   one that in this case wants not just racing banned but animals to be rewilded and an end to keeping domestic pets   it was a huge  spectacular .
Animal Rising has said it won t be demonstrating tomorrow. But it is the zealot s privilege to change their mind since their actions are always right. Even if one group does what it says it will do, the payoff in exposure from last year s disruption could encourage another. And there is always the chance of freelance opportunism. It means the authorities will still be on high alert come 4pm.
Once the race begins, however, is when it becomes obvious how charged with risk the National shopwindow is.
It is impossible to make racing safe. Even in flat racing there is risk. The thoroughbred as a species can be both remarkably resilient and frighteningly fragile. Potential injury is always just a step away, never mind at the other side of each of the National s 30 fences. But if it can t be made completely safe, it must be as safe as possible, and be seen as such.
The National challenge is a different creature to the one that legends such as Red Rum and Aldaniti faced in their heyday. The old line about  Rummy  was he loved the massive fences because he got a rest in the hang-time over them. But while the spruce fences look the same, after decades of alterations they are vastly easier to jump.
In 2013 the timber cores were removed from the fences and replaced with plastic. If the trick had been for horses to get back on their hocks and gain altitude, it is now almost an exercise in hurdling, brushing through the tops and not wasting time in the air. Tiger Roll specialised in it and became a modern-day National legend. Over the old fences he d hardly have got past the first.
There are fresh new changes to try and improve safety this year. Placing the first fence 60 metres closer to the start might slow the runners down early. Putting the start time forward to 4pm looks little more than cosmetic. A standing start may cut out the false varieties. But the most significant change is cutting the field from 40 runners to 34.
It will encourage traditionalists to further argue that the National has been changed beyond all recognition and that the lottery element that captured the public imagination for nearly two centuries has mostly gone. The first National winner of all in 1839 was called Lottery and the assumption that even the biggest outsider might upset the odds has been crucial to the race s appeal.
That requires the uncomfortable acknowledgment that risk is part of the attraction. Might a National with no fallers even lessen its allure? Not up for discussion is how extremists eager to see the end of the race are vastly outnumbered by a public who continue to sign up for a spectacle that now looks just about as safe as an inherently risky but thrilling event can be.
Something for  the Weekend
As for what wins, that s easy: Mahler Mission (4.0) finished runner up in the Coral Gold Cup despite losing shoes during the race, is still on a career upswing, stays all day, loves the mud and might even be still ahead of the handicapper. A slight worry is John McConnell s recent stable form but both he and jockey Ben Harvey can be first-time lucky in the National.
After Rachael Blackmore mistakenly presumed a false start, pretty much everything else went wrong too for Quilixios (5.0) in the Arkle at Cheltenham. Presuming he has fully recovered, Henry De Bromhead s runner is worth another shot in the Maghull.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Next election will herald an age of Independents; If Sinn Féin can't speak clearly for themselves how can they speak for us?
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 838 words
Body


Fine Gael reshuffled this week under a new leader, and the Fianna Fáil ardfheis begins tonight. The political centre is still above water but not seaworthy.
It is legacy politics that gets disproportionate attention, partially because it is the mainstay of government. Its former hinterland is now a patchwork of Independent TDs and small parties. More Independent TDs will stand at the next election than Fine Gael can muster. That is what the tide going out looks like.
Irish politics is about to become more complex. Independents and small parties   unless one of the big three parties surges   will be kingmakers in the next Dáil. If Sinn Féin s rise has abated and it doesn t have the numbers or alliances to form a government, Fianna Fáil-Fine Gael will likely be better positioned to do so. They would, however, fall far short of the number of seats required.
If it is crystallised on election day the flattening of the upward curve for Sinn Féin changes everything. It puts Independent TDs and smaller parties centre stage in what will be a much more complicated scenario in a Dáil of 174 seats, 14 more than now.
There is a tipping point for Sinn Féin in terms of its future hegemony. Anything below that point means it is unlikely to form a government. It must on its own command sufficient seats to ensure it is the centre of a future coalition that Fianna Fáil/Fine Gael cannot match. That requires a string of second seats in constituencies across the country.
On current opinion poll numbers Sinn Féin is not set for government. The other two of the big three have the advantage on a bad day, with intraparty transfers keeping them alive. That they have neither momentum nor purchase in the wider society won t matter. They just need enough dead wood to stay afloat to be reused as a life raft one last time.
In terms of mood change, the series of policy flip-flops by Sinn Féin on hate speech, the Nature Restoration Law, and the recent referendums leave a sense of uncertainty and cynicism. If they cannot speak clearly for themselves, how can they speak for us? People are looking for an authentic voice, and are prepared to go further to find it.
The public mood is dour, especially in rural areas. That is not based on empirical fact in an economy that is doing well. But there is angst and a sense of abandonment which, if hard to tally, nonetheless exists. There is a general sense of precariousness and insecurity. Farmers feel beset by changed policy that has reversed direction in terms of what is expected of them. The Green Party and its leader Eamon Ryan, mild mannered people, are bogey men. They are certainly scapegoats locally and for their partners in Government on the ground in rural constituencies.
On climate change the three larger parties represent the worst of all worlds. They pay lip service to what must be done, but don t embrace the consequences. The  reticence of many of their TDs fuels a sense of climate change being used to bludgeon rural communities.
Having never embraced the issue and signed up for the consequences solely to cobble together a government in the aftermath of their electoral debacle in 2020, Fianna Fáil and Fine Gael are now victims of their own evasiveness. As we saw in the referendums people won t co-operate with change that even the politicians who advocate for it don t believe in.
At the fringes of rural disaffection is climate denial and anti-immigrant sentiment that bleeds into outright racism. This is where the metropolitan snobbery comes in. It is reminiscent of Hillary Clinton s infamous accusation in 2016 that half of Donald Trump s supporters belong in a  basket of deplorables  characterised by  racist, sexist, homophobic, xenophobic, Islamaphobic  views. She lost every rural county in the US. People who feel alienated won t be spoken at or spoken down to. It is not effective politics and won t work.
There is no homogeneous band of Independents that we can choose or reject, but that might be changing. Three TDs   Michael Fitzmaurice, Michael Collins and Richard O Donoghue   have formed Independent Ireland, a new party. In Wexford Verona Murphy is running candidates for the local elections. There is a template in what the Independent Alliance achieved in 2016. Headed by Shane Ross, it put him into cabinet and two others became ministers of state.
What matters is whether Sinn Féin can win second seats in constituencies across the country. If they can t it will be a reprieve for smaller parties and Independents on its left. These will not support any process of government formation but will add to the numerical complexity of doing so in circumstances where Fianna Fáil and Fine Gael then have a pathway back.
From Social Democrats to Aontú, and canny players like Fitzmaurice and Murphy, the void left behind by underperforming larger parties will be filled in a larger Dáil. The rules of a campaign that keeps them off the main stage in television studios may mitigate against them. But for now a pivotal position is theirs to lose.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



OJ Simpson's 'trial of century' left US riveted; Media circus as American football player acquitted of ex-wife's murder
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 930 words
Body


OJ Simpson, the American football player and actor who was acquitted in a 1995 trial of murdering his former wife but was found responsible for her death in a civil lawsuit and was later imprisoned for armed robbery and kidnapping, has died at the age of 76.
Simpson, cleared by a Los Angeles jury in what the US media called  the trial of the century , died on Wednesday due to cancer, his family posted on social media yesterday.
Simpson avoided prison when he was found not guilty in the 1994 stabbing deaths of former wife Nicole Brown Simpson and her friend Ronald Goldman in Los Angeles. Simpson later served nine years in a Nevada prison after being convicted in 2008 on 12 counts of armed robbery and kidnapping two sports memorabilia dealers at gunpoint in a Las Vegas hotel.
Nicknamed The Juice, Simpson was one of the best and most popular athletes of the late 1960s and 1970s. He overcame childhood infirmity to become an electrifying running back at the University of Southern California and won the Heisman Trophy as college football s top player. After a record-setting career in the NFL with the Buffalo Bills and San Francisco 49ers, he was inducted into the Pro Football Hall of Fame.
Simpson parlayed his football stardom into a career as a sportscaster, advertising pitchman and Hollywood actor in films including the Naked Gun series.
All that changed after Nicole Brown Simpson and Goldman were found fatally slashed in a bloody scene outside her Los Angeles home on June 12th, 1994.
Simpson quickly emerged as a suspect. He was ordered to surrender to police but five days after the killings, he fled in his white Ford Bronco with a former team-mate   carrying his passport and a disguise. A slow-speed chase through the Los Angeles area ended at Simpson s mansion and he was later charged in the murders.
What ensued was one of the most notorious trials in 20th century US and a media circus. It had everything: a rich celebrity defendant; a black man accused of killing his white former wife out of jealousy; a woman slain after divorcing a man who had beaten her; a  dream team  of pricey and charismatic defence lawyers; and a huge gaffe by prosecutors.
Simpson, who at the outset of the case declared himself  absolutely 100 per cent not guilty,  waved at the jurors and mouthed the words  thank you  after the predominately black panel of 10 women and two men acquitted him on October 3rd, 1995.
Prosecutors argued that Simpson killed Nicole Brown Simpson in a jealous fury, and they presented extensive blood, hair and fibre tests linking Simpson to the murders. The defence countered that the celebrity defendant was framed by racist white police. The trial transfixed the US. In the White House, president Bill Clinton left the Oval Office and watched the verdict on his secretary s TV. Many black Americans celebrated his acquittal, seeing Simpson as the victim of bigoted police. Many white Americans were appalled by his exoneration.
Simpson s legal team included prominent criminal defence lawyers Johnnie Cochran, Alan Dershowitz and F Lee Bailey, who often outmanoeuvred the prosecution. Prosecutors committed a memorable blunder when they directed Simpson to try on a pair of bloodstained gloves found at the murder scene, confident they would fit perfectly and show he was the killer.
In a highly theatrical demonstration, Simpson struggled to put on the gloves and indicated to the jury they did not fit.
Delivering the trial s most famous words, Cochran referred to the gloves in closing arguments to jurors with a rhyme:  If it doesn t fit, you must acquit.
 Greatest legal blunder  Dershowitz later called the prosecution decision to ask Simpson to try on the gloves  the greatest legal blunder of the 20th century.
 What this verdict tells you is how fame and money can buy the best defence, can take a case of overwhelming incriminating physical evidence and transform it into a case riddled with reasonable doubt,  Peter Arenella, a UCLA law professor, told the New York Times after the verdict.
After his acquittal, Simpson said that  I will pursue as my primary goal in life the killer or killers who slayed Nicole and Mr Goldman . . . They are out there somewhere . . . I would not, could not and did not kill anyone.
The Goldman and Brown families subsequently pursued a wrongful-death lawsuit against Simpson in civil court. In 1997, a predominately white jury in Santa Monica, California, found Simpson liable for the two deaths and ordered him to pay $33.5 million in damages.
 We finally have justice for Ron and Nicole,  Fred Goldman, Ron Goldman s father, said after the verdict.
Simpson s  dream team  did not represent him in the civil trial in which the burden of proof was lower than in a criminal trial   a  preponderance of the evidence  rather than  beyond a reasonable doubt.  New evidence also hurt Simpson, including photographs of him wearing the type of shoes that had left bloody footprints at the murder scene.
After the civil case, some of Simpson s belongings, including memorabilia from his football days, were taken and auctioned off to help pay the damages he owed.
On October 3rd, 2008, exactly 13 years after his acquittal in the murder trial, he was convicted by a Las Vegas jury. These stemmed from a 2007 incident at a casino hotel in which Simpson and five men, at least two carrying guns, stole sports memorabilia worth thousands of dollars from two dealers. Simpson said he was just trying to recover his own property but was sentenced to up to 33 years in prison.
Simpson was released on parole in 2017.   Reuters

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Pets from Ukraine cost State EUR 1m a month
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 356 words
Byline: MARIE O'HALLORAN
Body


MARIE O HALLORAN  Tánaiste Micheál Martin has defended the State paying up to EUR 1 million a month for the transport and accommodation of pets from Ukraine as a  humanitarian  and  compassionate  response at the time.
He said nobody realised at the outset that the war in Ukraine would last more than two years and it was only one aspect of Ireland s response to the conflict.
It was a  decent response that reflected the best of what we are as a people , he told the Dáil.
Mr Martin was replying to Independent TD Michael McNamara who said that  in addition to the moneys being spent by the Department of Agriculture transporting pets from Ukraine, the Department of Integration was paying for their accommodation, up to EUR 20 per pet per night, but it varied from centre to centre .
Mr McNamara highlighted a report in the Irish Daily Mirror that at the peak of provision in November 2022, more than 1,800 cats, dogs and other pets that travelled to Ireland with their Ukrainian refugee owners and were accommodated by the State.
Mr McNamara said it was  not possible to establish actually how much money was spent because there is just one invoice covering everything from various accommodation providers, and they do not differentiate between the cost of accommodating pets and accommodating humans, which, obviously, we are required to do under international law .
Ireland, unlike other countries, seemed to have had no policy at the time, he said.  Some had a policy of  absolutely no pets - we cannot take your pets . Others had a policy of  Yes, you can take your pets with you, but you pay for them yourself .
 Ireland was paying for them, but we do not know how much money was spent. Based on the number of pets in the country, which was seven times more than the Department of integration knew about, it could have been up to EUR 1 million a month.
He asked if the Tánaiste was happy with  the oversight of spending in that Department when you were Taoiseach and are you happy with the oversight of spending now?
Mr Martin said  we all responded in a humanitarian way at the time. No one believed the war would go on for two years.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Player happy to weigh in on the future direction of the game
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 12
Length: 256 words
Body


Did you know that Rory McIlroy can dead lift 400lb?
He can, apparently. And we know this because McIlroy showed Gary Player a video of him doing so.
All of which was used by Player   no stranger to the gym himself, even at the age of 88    to argue that there should be some way to claw back the distance on how far players can hit the golf ball.
 (If) you look at the tour, in 30 years, plus, minus, they will all hit the ball 400 yards because there s such great incentivisation.
 They are going around the college, gyms now doing weight training . . .  and this is where we need the R&A and the USGA and the PGA to get together wisely in making a decision about a golf ball because nothing about the game today, not one single thing, is the same as when we played.
 Not one single thing.
 They have to cut that ball back, I don t know what s going to happen. They talk about making golf courses longer. The world is running out of  water, seriously, and the  costs of the machines, the  mowers, fertiliser,  labour. Why do that? It s  so simple, cut the ball  back. Very, very simple.
Player also believes  players who were loyal to  the PGA Tour will have to  be compensated for the current split  in men s professional golf to end.
 It s a big problem because they paid all these guys to join the LIV Tour fortunes, I mean, beyond one s comprehension,  said Player.
 Now (if) these guys come back and play, I really believe the players that were loyal should be compensated in some way or another, otherwise there s going to be dissension.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Premier League to introduce semi- automated offside
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 15
Length: 294 words
Byline: PAUL MacINNES
Body


PAUL MacINNES
 The Premier League is to introduce semi-automated offside technology from next season, in the hope of reducing the time it takes to make VAR decisions.
The system will use camera footage and tracking software to calculate the position of players at the moment of a potential offside, replacing the need for VAR teams to do so. In trials, this process has been shown to reduce the average length of a VAR decision by 31 seconds.
Clubs voted unanimously to introduce the technology at a Premier League shareholders  meeting yesterday, with its first use expected in the autumn but not at the season s start. The league had previously expressed reservations over adopting the technology but it has received the full backing of the referees  chief Howard Webb, who said he was  delighted  by the news.
Complexity
Semi-automated offside technology was used successfully during the 2022 World Cup in Qatar. It eliminates the need for VARs to manually add lines to camera images and will produce graphics that can be shown to fans in stadiums. VARs may still be required to assess offside decisions in the event of a goal being scored, depending on the complexity of the assessment.
Webb and the referees  body PGMOL are in discussions over allowing fans to see the footage examined by referees at VAR monitors at the same time as officials. There is the expectation that short messages on the outcome of VAR decisions will be announced by referees in stadiums next season.
In a statement the league said:  The technology will provide quicker and consistent placement of the virtual offside line, based on optical player tracking, and will produce high-quality broadcast graphics to ensure an enhanced in-stadium and broadcast experience for supporters.    Guardian

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Protektorat still in prime condition for tilt at Melling Chase
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 16
Length: 459 words
Body


Dan Skelton s Cheltenham hero Protektorat has the Melling Chase in his sights at Aintree. The nine-year-old comes into the meeting off the back of a triumphant Cheltenham Festival, where he was the winner of the Ryanair Chase by a convincing four lengths.
There was subsequently some talk of him stepping back up in distance in Liverpool but, as the ground is set to be testing, connections have decided to stick at the two-and-a-half-mile trip over which he won the Manifesto Novices  Chase on Merseyside in 2021.
Skelton said:  We decided we d stick to two-and-a-half on this ground.
 I think if the ground was really decent, we d have made a different decision but when the ground is like this, the decision is almost made for you.
 We ll go and give it a whirl and I m very happy with him at home   he flew up the hill on Tuesday morning.
 For some reason, he s taking his racing better than he ever has, I don t know whether that s age, strength or a combination, but he s in good form.
Paul Nicholls has Pic D Orhy in the race, last year s winner and a horse enjoying a good season so far, having won twice in three runs. He took both the 1965 Chase and the Ascot Chase either side of finishing second in the Silviniaco Conti Chase at Kempton in January behind Joseph O Brien s Banbridge.
Nicky Henderson s Jonbon missed his Cheltenham engagement as the stable was in ill health but he returns to action for this race for a step up in trip, having been a two-miler to date.
His most recent run came in the rerouted Clarence House Chase, held at Cheltenham as the Ascot meeting was abandoned due to frost, where he finished second to an outsider in Joe Tizzard s Elixir De Nutz.
Never got into a rhythm
 The Clarence House was disappointing, he never got into a rhythm on the day to be fair,  Henderson said.
  He hadn t settled into it as one would have liked and he got untidy.
 Having said that, you felt he was still a little bit unlucky not to win really, but it would have been a messy performance.
 I m looking forward to running him over two and a half (miles) for the first time because I think that really will suit him. He s a horse that wants to be going forwards, and then he can really enjoy himself. He s been in very good form and Nico (de Boinville) has been schooling him every other day and he loves it.
Elsewhere in the race is Envoi Allen, Henry de Bromhead s 2023 Ryanair Chase winner who finished second in the contest this year. Gordon Elliott will saddle Conflated, a Gigginstown House Stud-owned 10-year-old who took the third-place spot in the Ryanair and has been chosen for this contest over the Grand National. Willie Mullins has a single runner in Easy Game. Donald McCain runs last season s Melling third in Minella Drama.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Rebels push Myanmar troops out of key town
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 8
Length: 316 words
Body


About 200 Myanmar military personnel withdrew to a bridge to Thailand yesterday after a days-long assault by the anti-junta resistance, which declared it had won control of the critical border town of Myawaddy, the latest in a string of rebel wins.
Myanmar s military-run government is battling insurgencies on several fronts and has suffered a series of defeats in frontier areas since last October, when rebel groups launched a co-ordinated offensive near the Chinese border.
The impoverished Southeast Asian nation has been in turmoil after the military deposed an elected civilian government in a 2021 coup, sparking a nationwide armed resistance that is now operating alongside some long-established ethnic rebel groups.
 Today KNU-led joint resistance forces captured the remaining military base in Myawaddy , Kyaw Zaw, a spokesman for Myanmar s National Unity Government, told Reuters. The body is a shadow administration of ousted politicians and anti-junta groups.  This is a crucial victory for our revolution since Myawaddy is an important border town for the junta, one of the main [sources of] income from border trade,  he said. The retreat of junta troops in Myawaddy, adjacent to the Thai town of Mae Sot, signals the potential loss of another key border trading outpost with direct highway access to parts of central Myanmar.
Fleeing soldiers
Yesterday about 200 fleeing Myanmar soldiers gathered at a border crossing into Thailand, said Saw Taw Nee, spokesman for the Karen National Union (KNU), an anti-junta group leading the assault on Myawaddy. News outlet Khit Thit said Thai authorities were in talks with the soldiers to decide whether to grant them refuge.
The assault  began last week after the KNU said it had attacked a junta camp near the town, forcing some 500 security personnel to surrender, along with their families.
Thailand remains neutral in the conflict.    Reuters

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Recognition of a Palestinian state
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 300 words
Body


Sir,   The Israeli ambassador Dana Erlich, in her critical piece on Ireland s position on the current conflict ( Ireland s planned unilateral recognition of a Palestinian state sends a dangerous signal , Opinion & Analysis, April 11th), highlights some justifiable concerns on how criticism of Israeli action in Gaza can easily be used as cover for anti-Semitism.
Criticism of Israel, and any country, should always be objective, based on their adherence to international law, and on their treatment of populations under their control. No right-minded person believes that Hamas, in its horrific actions of October 7th, was acting in the interests of the Palestinian people. It certainly committed a war crime, for which it should be held accountable under the processes of international law.
However, as is usual in communications from the Israeli embassy, there is no acknowledgement of the underlying factors in play for many decades, and exacerbated under the leadership of Binyamin Netanyahu. The ambassador makes no mention of Israel s flagrant and repeated violations of international law over many years, and looks to perpetuate the illusion that the Hamas actions, barbaric and genocidal in their intent, happened in some vacuum.
The Israeli ambassador would do well to reflect on the fact that as a direct result of its actions, famine has entered Gaza and that most of the area has been left in ruins. She should also answer   why during this period the death toll of West Bank Palestinians and the destruction of their homes have reached a new high.
I think the Irish people would also be interested in what the Israeli government plans for Gaza in the aftermath of the current onslaught.
I don t expect to hear anything on those points anytime soon.   Yours, etc,
BARRY WALSH,
Blackrock,
Cork.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Report sought on cause of sinkhole
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 222 words
Byline: TIM O'BRIEN
Body


TIM O BRIEN
 Dublin City Council has been asked for an immediate report on the nature and extent of a sinkhole which appeared in Sandymount Green.
The sinkhole appeared on the roadway just at the edge of the footpath outside the Mace shop on Sandymount Green at about 4pm on Wednesday.
The collapse took away a section of road about two metres long, in an area where double yellow lines had been painted.
Staff in the shop  put a flower container and barrel and tape around the hole in a bid to keep people away before gardaí arrived.
Dublin City Council carried out temporary repair works on the sinkhole which is now filled in and covered with temporary tarmac.
Immediate report
Investigations are continuing in a bid to determine the cause of the sinkhole and the potential for further holes to appear in the area.
Local councillor Dermot Lacey has asked the council to issue an immediate report on the sinkhole, and if necessary hold a briefing for councillors at the City Council s South East Area Committee meeting scheduled for Friday 19th.
 People are concerned,  Mr Lacey said.  I would like the council to allay fears that there might be a reoccurence, or if they can t do that, to tell people what can be done about it.
 I have asked for the report first and then a briefing at the southeast Area Committee, if necessary,  he said.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Sex abuse scandal damages Orbán's reputation; Cover-up at a Hungarian orphanage turns into political liability
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 1204 words
Body


Viktor Orbán has showered his home village with money and favours in a display of what his patronage can deliver.
But the cover-up of sexual abuse at an orphanage in Bicske, a town next door, has turned into one of the biggest political liabilities for Hungary s longest-serving prime minister   and led to the rise of an internal rival.
Accusations of paedophilia were first brought against the head of the orphanage, Janos Vasarhelyi, in 2011, when authorities decided the evidence was insufficient to prosecute.
Vasarhelyi is a long-standing supporter of Orbán. He had worked with children for 25 years, including in Orbán s home village, where the prime minister had built a football stadium and a dedicated train line and where sports clubs had been founded by members of Orbán s family. After a child who lived at that facility died by suicide in 2016, Vasarhelyi was forced out and prosecutors brought charges against him. As the trial unfolded in 2017, Endre Konya, deputy director at the Bicske orphanage, tried to persuade one of the teenage victims to withdraw his testimony against Vasarhelyi, according to Hungary s top court.
Konya  used his power as deputy director and wanted to help [Vasarhelyi] avoid punishment for sexual assault against a vulnerable minor, while also concealing the fact that the withdrawal [of the testimony] was coerced , the court said.
In the end, both men were sentenced to prison. Vasarhelyi is still serving his eight-year sentence for sexually abusing a minor, but Konya, who was found guilty of witness intimidation, was released last year after being pardoned in secret by the country s president, Katalin Novák, an Orbán ally.
That pardon implicated Orbán s allies, severely damaging the prime minister s own reputation and that of his right-wing Fidesz party ahead of European Parliament elections in June. It also fuelled the popularity of a splinter movement from Fidesz s own ranks.
Discovered the par don A barrister discovered the pardon by accident in a court journal in February and sent it to local media. Soon afterwards, Novák stepped down over the affair along with Judit Varga, another Orbán ally and former justice minister, who withdrew her bid as Fidesz lead candidate in the European Parliament elections. On the day Varga resigned, Peter Magyar, her ex-husband, started a vocal campaign against what he calls the hypocrisy and graft of the Fidesz establishment. A former diplomat and executive of state-backed companies, Magyar had rubbed shoulders with the very elites he now rails against.
 Not for a minute longer do I want to partake in a system where the real culprits hide behind women s skirts,  he wrote on Facebook, in reference to Orbán s two female allies taking the fall. He has since struck a chord with Hungarian voters, with tens of thousands taking to the streets of Budapest last week to show their support.
Opinion polls indicate that his party, once formed, could become third-largest   chipping away at Fidesz in the upcoming European Parliament elections and positioning Magyar as a serious contender in general elections in two years. Magyar told the Financial Times last month that his ex-wife and the president had been sacrificed to  shield the premier at any costs from the adverse effects  of the scandal.
Orbán s spokesperson called Magyar s campaign  a desperate move of a man in a hopeless situation  and said the government would ignore him.
A police report has since been leaked about an alleged domestic dispute between Magyar and Varga dating back to 2021. Varga has reaffirmed her allegiance to Orbán and accused Magyar of verbal violence. Magyar has not disputed details about their fights, but denied being involved in physical violence.
In Bicske, some locals seem certain about who requested the pardon in the first place.
 We may never know who told the president to sign the pardon, but we are pretty sure it wasn t her idea,  said Zsolt Jozsa, proprietor of the pub in Bicske, a few steps from the care home.  It tells you a lot about Orbán, who has posed as a protector of our kids.
While the premier has condemned the events at Bicske as  simply unacceptable  and something that  cannot happen in a decent country like Hungary , neither he nor his party have explained the reasons for the pardon.
A March survey by pollster Median shows two-thirds of Hungarians, including a fifth of his own voters, believe Orbán had known about the pardon and therefore was responsible for it. Although it is still far ahead of other parties, Fidesz has lost more than 10 per cent of its supporters, Median wrote.
In Bicske, where the premier has often been seen out and about and many people know his family, Fidesz voters are defensive. Some Orbán supporters deny the crime took place   despite the court verdicts.  We just wish this whole thing washed over already,  said a pensioner named Marika, who lives across the road from the gilded iron gates of the orphanage.
Innermost circle Locals remember ties between the prime minister s innermost circle and Vasarhelyi and Konya. Hungarian media have reported extensively about those connections, which the Financial Times has verified.
A wrestling club founded by Orbán s brother held regular training sessions at the orphanage, according to the Hungarian social services  website. Bicske orphans also participated in a football academy founded by the premier in his hometown, Felcsút, where Konya and Vasarhelyi were often seen accompanying the children, according to the academy s website.
National election records show Vasarhelyi was elected as a local councillor in Bicske in 2002 on behalf of a political grouping that had Fidesz s backing. That year, according to a video unearthed in February by a local news website, Orbán, at the time in opposition, personally campaigned in Bicske alongside Vasarhelyi.  I m glad to come here, after all Felcsút is just a short hop away,  a young-looking Orban says on the grainy VHS recording.  It seems you have found very serious candidates who have earned the respect of the public with their life before politics . . . Everyone should knock on a dozen doors and tell people, please support the candidates sitting behind me,  he says, while on the same stage as Vasarhelyi.
In 2016, when Orbán was back in office as prime minister, he put Vasarhelyi s name forward for the Hungarian Bronze Cross of Merit. The country s president later awarded the medal to the orphanage director  in recognition of his exemplary dedication to the education of underprivileged children and their preparation for independent life , according to the Hungarian official journal.
The award came despite an ombudsman s report in 2012 examining the inquiry against Vasarhelyi   including complaints as far back as 2007   which was reviewed by the FT.
Dániel Molnár, a liberal opposition member of the Bicske city council, said he spent several summers in his youth at the orphanage, which set up holiday camps for local children.
 This area is where Orbán s relatives and friends live and where their business interests are rooted,  he said, adding that the convicted men, Vasarhelyi and Konya,  have connections to Fidesz .   Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Shares fall as ECB points to rates cuts
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 2
Length: 576 words
Byline: LAURA SLATTERY
Body


LAURA SLATTERY
 Europe s benchmark stock index fell to a one-month low yesterday as banks took a hit after the European Central Bank (ECB) held rates steady but signalled imminent cuts, while Deutsche Telekom dropped to a five-month low after trading without entitlement to a dividend.
The ECB maintained interest rates at a record high as expected, but signalled it may soon start to cut them, although investors questioned whether stubborn US inflation rates would stop the Federal Reserve from following close behind.
 DUBLIN The Iseq index closed 1.6 per cent lower as bank stocks declined in line with the trend across Europe after the ECB hinted at interest rate cuts from June. Bank of Ireland shed 2.6 per cent to close at EUR 9.82, while AIB finished 3.3 lower at EUR 4.83.
Ryanair was also a drag on the index, easing back 3.3 per cent to EUR 20.84, having advanced 1.1 per cent in the previous session.
Kingspan edged 0.5 per cent lower to EUR 83.20, but Kerry Group was among the climbers, posting a 2.75 per cent gain in the session to close at EUR 80.35. Packaging group Smurfit Kappa rose 1.1 per cent to EUR 41.65.
LONDON The UK s FTSE 100 edged 0.5 per cent lower as investors awaited Britain s economic figures for hints on the path of domestic monetary policy after the ECB indicated it may soon start to cut rates.
British banking and insurance stocks fell the most, echoing a weak mood among European financial stocks. The UK banks index fell 2.7 per cent, recording its biggest percentage drop in almost two months.
Several heavyweights including Aviva, Lloyds Banking Group and Reckitt Benckiser also fell as they traded without entitlement for dividend.
EUROPE The pan-European Stoxx 600 closed 0.4 per cent lower in volatile trade, with the banking sector taking the biggest hit, falling 2.4 per cent and notching its steepest one-day drop in over eight months.
The indexes of top economies in the euro zone such as Germany, France, Italy and Spain were also down between 0.3 per cent to 1.2 per cent.
The telecoms sector also shed 2.1 per cent, dragged down by a 6.2 per cent drop in Deutsche Telekom as the company traded ex-dividend.
Equities were also dented by higher euro zone bond yields as expectations for a higher-for-longer scenario for US interest rates more than offset the ECB s remarks.
Ambu climbed 4.6 per cent after the Danish maker of single-use endoscopy solutions hiked its full-year outlook and posted preliminary second-quarter financials.
Lufthansa dropped 2.7 per cent after the German carrier extended a suspension of its flights to Tehran, with the Middle East on alert for Iranian retaliation for a suspected Israeli air strike on the country s embassy in Syria.
 US The benchmark S&P 500 and the Dow were muted in early trading after long-dated Treasury yields remained elevated following the latest economic data as well as commentary from Federal Reserve policymakers.
New York Federal Reserve president John Williams said that, while the US central bank had made considerable progress in lowering inflation, it did not yet need to move to an easier monetary policy setting given the recent uneven price pressure movements.
Gains across chipmakers and mega-cap growth stocks such as Nvidia and Alphabet helped the Nasdaq rise 0.5 per cent.
Globe Life slumped 19.5 per cent after Fuzzy Panda Research disclosed a short position in the company, alleging multiple instances of insurance fraud.   Additional reporting: Reuters

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Sheffield United docked two points by EFL for defaulting on payments
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 15
Length: 252 words
Body


Sheffield United s board has accepted the club must kick off its next season in the Championship on minus-two points after reaching a  negotiated settlement  with the English Football League.
An independent EFL disciplinary commission has imposed the sanction after United defaulted on a number of payments due to other clubs during the 2022-23 season, when they won promotion to the Premier League.
Given that the defaults totalled more than 550 days, a two-point penalty was triggered under the league s rules.
A further two-point penalty has been suspended and will be triggered in the Blades  next EFL season should they fail to fulfil any financial obligation to another club under a transfer or compensation agreement for more than five business days.
With United bottom of the top tier and nine points short of the safety line with seven games remaining, the team will almost certainly begin next season with the two-point deduction.
Although that could hamper their hopes of promotion, the club will not appeal against the decision and has admitted culpability, albeit caveated by various mitigated reasons.
Minimised the risks
In a statement United said:  The club took the view that it was better to reach an agreement which minimised the risks of a higher deduction or further transfer embargos being imposed, and being distracted by lengthy and costly legal proceedings.
 The club is now in a position to close this matter and concentrate on the future.
United agreed to pay the EFL s legal costs of £310,455.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Slump in sales of electric vehicles
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 523 words
Body


Sir,   The slump in electric vehicle (EV) sales in the first quarter of the year follows a softening in demand at the end of 2023 ( Switch to electric cars hits speed bump with further decline in sales , Business, April 10th).
This pattern has been replicated in Europe and the US. Adoption of new technologies tends to follow a well-established pattern.
There is an initial surge in demand due to early adopters followed by a lag period before there is mass-market take-up.
The key challenge for developers and promoters of any new technology is to minimise this lag period.
There are three separate issues contributing to the lag period in mass-market adoption of EVs in Ireland.
First is the cost. Many motorists simply cannot afford the higher prices that EVs are sold at.
Chinese EV manufacturers are rolling out more affordable models and this is challenging established manufacturers to match these prices.
These lower prices will give a considerable boost to EV uptake, but there are indications that the EU is not happy with what it sees as state-subsidised EV manufacturing in China. As a consequence the benefits of these lower-priced EVs may take time to materialise.
Second, the resale value of EVs is perceived to be much lower than petrol or diesel cars. As car and battery technology continues to develop, there is less demand for second-hand EVs that are seen as having older technology, leading to poorer resale prices.
The perception that batteries may have to be replaced, at considerable cost, soon after buying a second-hand EV, is a related issue.
Manufacturers and suppliers need to do much more to highlight the long and guaranteed lifetime of EV batteries to reassure motorists who see this is a possible issue.
Third, there is still a problem with charging infrastructure. A significant proportion of early adopters were those with off-street parking who could install home charging points.
This allows for charging at night, which is both cheaper and more convenient than using the public charging network.
Public charging infrastructure is not widespread or reliable enough for EV owners that do not have the luxury of off-street parking to install a home charger.
The Zero Emission Vehicles Ireland (ZEVI) office set up by Minister for Transport Eamon Ryan is involved in developing infrastructure schemes to support publicly accessible charging points in both urban and rural areas.
One of the key schemes is the Residential Neighbourhood Charging Scheme (announced by Mr Ryan in the Dáil in July last year), aiming to provide charging for residents without off-street parking. This scheme is designed to mimic home charging by incentivising off-peak charging in a location convenient to the resident s home.
However, there is little detail so far on how this scheme will work or when it will be in place.
Both the Government and the car industry have a big job to do to address these issues so as to minimise the lag period before mass market adoption of EVs.
Otherwise the Government s 2030 EV targets, already extremely challenging, will be impossible to meet.   Yours, etc,
BRIAN KELLEHER,
Ballinteer,
Dublin 16.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



South Korea's 'Luke Skywalker' strikes election blow against President Yoon; Convicted former minister's victory leaves president looking a lame duck
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 8
Length: 881 words
Body


A convicted former minister vowing revenge against conservative President Yoon Suk Yeol has helped deliver a resounding defeat to the South Korean leader in parliamentary elections.
Former minister for justice Cho Kuk, convicted on corruption charges after he was investigated by Mr Yoon during his time as prosecutor-general, campaigned on an end to Mr Yoon s  prosecutorial dictatorship .
Mr Cho s newly formed Rebuilding Korea Party is projected to win between 14 and 16 seats, according to results released early yesterday, helping the country s left-wing alliance across a 180-seat threshold that will allow it to fast-track legislation.
The main opposition Democratic Party of Korea (DPK) is projected to win 176 seats in the 300-seat National Assembly, against 109 seats for Mr Yoon s ruling People Power Party (PPP), as voters voiced their anger at the rising cost of living. While the country s cabinet is appointed by the president, legislative initiatives require parliamentary support.
 The people have clearly shown their hopes for a verdict on the Yoon administration,  said Mr Cho after the release on Wednesday night of exit polls indicating a left-wing victory.
 Yoon should humbly accept the outcome and apologise to the public for his wrongdoings and corruption.
Mr Cho received a two-year prison sentence last year, which he is yet to serve as he is appealing against the ruling, on corruption charges relating to the forging of documents to help his daughter gain a place at a top medical school.
If a higher court confirms the conviction, he faces disqualification from the National Assembly.
The prosecution, which was overseen by Mr Yoon in his capacity as prosecutor-general during the previous left-wing government, led to Mr Cho losing his professorship, his daughter losing her medical licence and his wife being sent to prison.
Korean conservatives It also made Mr Yoon a hero among Korean conservatives, who anointed him as their candidate for the 2022 presidential election which he went on to win.
Now, however, Mr Cho is back and calling for Mr Yoon and PPP leader Han Dong-hoon   himself a former prosecutor who was involved in Mr Cho s indictment   to face prosecution for what he alleges are their abuses of prosecutorial power.
Lee Sangsin, a research fellow and polling expert at the Korea Institute for National Unification (Kinu), noted Mr Cho s  compelling backstory  as a famous student protester jailed in the 1980s under the country s former authoritarian regime. Mr Cho went on to be a star professor at the country s most prestigious university.
 Cho was like the original K-pop idol, with looks, intelligence and morality on his side,  said Mr Lee.
 Now he is presenting himself as the country s Luke Skywalker, with Yoon cast in the role of Darth Vader   it s a narrative that many liberal Koreans find hard to resist.
Mr Lee said that while the Rebuilding Korea Party will remain a minor player in the South Korean National Assembly, Mr Cho s criticism of Mr Yoon had struck a chord with voters unhappy with the president s strongman governing style.
Since his election two years ago by a margin of less than 1 per cent over DPK leader Lee Jae-myung, Mr Yoon has picked a succession of battles with adversaries ranging from labour unions, striking doctors, domestic media outlets and past and present political opponents.
But his image as a graft-buster was badly undermined by a scandal surrounding his wife, first lady Kim Keon Hee, over her acceptance of a Christian Dior bag worth about Won3million (about EUR 2,000) from a Korean-American pastor.
Mr Yoon has refused to apologise or explain the episode, which was caught on hidden camera and widely circulated on social media.
Ms Kim has not made a public appearance since mid-December. They have both denied any wrongdoing.
 Yoon doesn t care about people s livelihoods,  said HA Han, a 53-year-old housewife from the city of Anyang, who voted for the DPK.
 Inflation has gone up so much but he is out of touch with what s going on. He is so dogmatic and doesn t listen to what others say.
 Chosen confrontation   Koreans expect their presidents to compromise, but Yoon has consistently chosen confrontation instead,  said Kinu s Mr Lee.
 He has alienated moderate voters and they have punished him at the ballot box.
Meanwhile, Mr Cho is already being spoken of as a potential left-wing candidate in the 2027 presidential election. But to do so he will have to defeat DPK leader Lee, who recovered from a knife attack in January to lead his party to a resounding victory.
Mr Lee also noted a sharp generational disparity in attitudes towards Mr Cho, with older left-wing Koreans recalling his past as a student protester and younger Koreans   who experienced fierce competition for a small number of places at elite universities   resenting his intervention to support his daughter s medical school application.
The left-wing alliance fell short of a 200-seat threshold that would have allowed them to circumvent a presidential veto. But with South Korean presidents limited by the country s constitution to one five-year term, Mr Yoon  now faces more than three years as a lame duck, while the country faces more than three years of stalemate .   Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



State must do the right thing by health workers with long Covid
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 1071 words
Body


Remember when we emerged en masse from behind our front doors, flung open our windows, and stationed ourselves on our balconies and at our garden gates to applaud the heroism of frontline workers during the Covid-19 pandemic. While most of us were cocooning or confined within walking distance from home, nurses, doctors, paramedics, hospital porters and caterers were risking contagion in the bravest demonstration of solidarity ever witnessed in this State.
During the first month of the lockdown, at 8pm on Friday, March 27th, 2020, we streamed forth to show them our gratitude. In Dáil Éireann, the Ceann Comhairle interrupted a debate on the Emergency Measures in the Public Interest (Covid-19) Bill for TDs to join in the gesture of  thanks and respect to the workers on the front line . Politicians rose from their seats and clapped till their hands were raw.
Now, just two years since the Government began lifting the restrictions, that respect has vanished. What has replaced it smacks of contempt. Urgent care hospital workers are expected to perform the daily high wire act of balancing their duty to do no harm in overcrowded conditions reminiscent of war movies. That is not the worst of it though. To add insult to injury, the Government has terminated a special sick pay scheme for the tiny proportion of staff who have developed long Covid and who are so incapacitated that they can no longer work.
An intensive care nurse identified as Siobhán told her story on RTÉ radio last month, on the weekend the scheme was stopped. She recalled that, in late February 2020   when Ireland had yet to enter lockdown   she was looking after  the first patient  with Covid. This was before personal protective equipment became standard issue and long before vaccines became available.
Siobhán said she developed symptoms of the virus on March 3rd. Compared with the 23 healthcare workers who have died from Covid, according to figures published by the Health Protection Surveillance Centre (HPSC), Siobhán was lucky to survive but, more than four years later, her life is stagnated by long Covid.
She suffers from brain fog, extreme fatigue, nausea and vomiting. She struggles to find words and her heart races wildly after the mildest exertion, such as taking a shower. She cannot play with her three-year-old son who is too frightened to leave home for school because he is convinced she is going to die.
She is attending six consultants because of the variety of her illnesses and paying them EUR 150-EUR 300 per visit, in addition to her GP bills. Her medicines cost more than EUR 200 a month. She thinks it s  ironic  that  we were looking after the sickest of the sick while everyone else was told to stay at home , and now she is at risk of losing her home due to her medical expenses and lost income.
 It s gone from a round of applause to a middle finger from the Government,  Siobhán said.
Payments
The special sick pay scheme for healthcare workers with long Covid was introduced as a temporary measure in July 2022 and was extended for six months last October. It ended on March 31st, leaving them dependent on the normal public service sick pay scheme. By last December, 143 healthcare staff had been receiving payments for more than 28 months. By crude calculation, the annual cost is roughly EUR 1.5 million. A State that cannot afford to pay that to its heroes is a State, in the immortal words of Oscar Wilde, that knows the price of everything and the value of nothing.
Some trade unions, including the Irish Nurses and Midwives Organisation (INMO), have referred the termination of the scheme to the Workplace Relations Commission. A hearing is imminent. The optics of workers acclaimed by Dáil Éireann having to resort to the industrial relations court for sick pay evoke a stingy and mean-spirited State. That impression is compounded by the previous tardiness in disbursing the Covid bonus payments to nurses, the continuing failure to establish the long-promised Covid inquiry, and the fact that Ireland   along with Greece   is one of only two EU countries that do not recognise Covid as an occupational illness for patient-facing workers.
The Department of Health is not the culprit here. Minister for Health Stephen Donnelly is believed to be disposed to resuming the scheme. The problem lies with the Departments of Social Protection and Public Expenditure. The latter ruled that the six-month extension last October would be the final one. This was followed in November by a report from the Department of Social Protection stating that long Covid should not be added to the list of occupational diseases, meaning that sufferers of the chronic condition cannot claim occupational injury benefit.
One of the reasons given in the report is a difficulty in proving that someone contracted the disease in the workplace, especially after the summer of 2020 when community transmission became dominant. This is a tacit admission that frontline workers infected in the first six months of the pandemic were most likely to have become ill as a result of their work. The special payment scheme provides a similar acknowledgment because, in order to qualify for it, applicants had to prove they had been at work during the 10 days before they got sick. The implicit apprehension that chancers and malingerers would exploit the scheme is utterly distasteful considering the heroism those workers showed throughout the global crisis.
The report also suggests that the prevailing uncertainty about long Covid and its potential longevity in individual cases is another prohibitive factor. Whatever about the effect that may have on the State s coffers, it is nothing compared with the terrifying uncertainty facing anyone who zipped up body bags in hospitals, held the hands of the lonely dying and bore witness to unrelenting death, and who now contemplates the unknown duration of their own illness.
Simon Harris was the minister for health when Siobhán fell ill. Now he is the Taoiseach and two of his Fine Gael Party Ministers   Paschal Donohoe and deputy leader Heather Humphreys   have the power to do the right thing for those who sacrificed their own health for the greater good. This is their opportunity to show the nation s sincere appreciation.
For the rest of us, the pandemic is retreating into history but for Siobhán and her child and for many of her colleagues, its silent aftershock continues to reverberate.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Support grows for recognition of Palestine; Israeli ministry expresses 'fury' at Ireland's intention to recognise state of Palestine
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 558 words
Byline: JACK POWER,HARRY McGEE , MARIE O'HALLORAN
Body


JACK POWER,
HARRY McGEE and MARIE O HALLORAN
 Ireland is working with Spain and a number of other countries to build support for the formal recognition of the state of Palestine, with Taoiseach Simon Harris saying it was  highly likely  more countries in Europe would back the move.
The new Fine Gael leader discussed Ireland s plans to  recognise Palestine in a meeting with European Commission president Ursula von der Leyen in Brussels yesterday.
Mr Harris was also expected to discuss the proposals with Spanish prime minister Pedro Sánchez at the sidelines of an informal dinner he attended in Warsaw with a number of EU leaders yesterday evening.
Speaking yesterday, Mr Harris said it was  highly likely  more countries would follow Ireland and Spain in planning to recognise the state of Palestine. There was a  very clear view emerging  among European leaders that there needed to be  an immediate cessation of violence  in Gaza.
The introductory meeting with Dr von der Leyen, which was described as  very friendly  by a commission source, also discussed EU-wide reforms of the asylum system.
Mr Harris said Ireland would opt in to all of the measures in the recently approved migration pact, which he said would create a  firmer  asylum system. The reforms will lead to quicker decisions being made on asylum cases and deportations of unsuccessful applicants.
In a series of engagements ahead of a summit of EU leaders next week, Mr Harris discussed the war in Gaza, as well as the priorities of the European bloc for the coming years.
During his meeting with Dr von der Leyen, Mr Harris said he outlined the Government s view that there needed to be an immediate halt to Israel s war in Gaza, which started following attacks by Hamas militants on October 7th.
Mr Harris said he did not believe the EU would take a united approach to the proposed recognition of Palestine.
 I believe different member states will adopt different positions in relation to recognising the state of Palestine. But Ireland won t be waiting for that to be a European approach,  he said.  Ireland wishes to recognise the state of Palestine, I d like to do that with a number of other countries,  he said.
Denunciation
Earlier, the Government rejected a denunciation of Mr Harris by the Israeli foreign ministry over his first speech to the Dáil as Taoiseach for not specifically mentioning Israeli hostages held in Gaza. The ministry also expressed  fury  over the intention of the Irish Government to give formal recognition, along with several other EU countries and Norway, to a Palestinian state.
The foreign ministry issued a statement in which it contended that Mr Harris had neglected to mention the Israeli hostages captured by Hamas on October 7th during his maiden speech to the Dáil as Taoiseach.
A spokesman for Mr Harris told The Irish Times that the Taoiseach has been even-handed at all times in his response to the conflict, and that this included condemning the taking of the hostages and calling for their release.
 By any fair analysis, Ireland has always condemned the atrocity Hamas committed on October 7th, and called for hostages to be released. The Taoiseach has repeatedly said it,  said the spokesman.
Meanwhile, Tánaiste Micheál Martin rejected suggestions that US military aircraft may be carrying weapons through Shannon Airport en route to Israel.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



TDs, scrolling and mobile etiquette
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 284 words
Body


Sir,   Tuesday marked an important day with the election of our Taoiseach and new Ministers. However, what followed in the Dáil was rather disappointing. After the confirmation, it is customary for Opposition parties to make comments about the Taoiseach and the team. However, I was disheartened to witness that over half of the members of parliament left before all the comments were made, leaving the chamber nearly empty. Even more concerning was the fact that many were preoccupied with their mobile phones, showing a lack of respect and interest in what the Opposition had to say. This behaviour is not an isolated incident and seems to happen all too frequently, not just in our country but in many others too.
The dismissive attitude toward opposing viewpoints is concerning and undermines the principles of democracy. How can we expect progress and effective governance when there is no willingness to listen to differing perspectives?
Surely, the Government party can learn valuable insights and perspectives from the ideas put forth by the Opposition. It is through healthy debate and a diversity of opinions that better decisions can be made for the benefit of the country as a whole. Dismissing or ignoring the voices of the Opposition only serves to hinder progress and create further division.
It is crucial that all members of parliament, regardless of party affiliation, show respect for the democratic process and actively engage in discussions that contribute to the betterment of our nation. Let us strive for a political environment where all voices are heard and valued, and where decisions are made through informed and inclusive dialogue.   Yours, etc,
PETER MALBASHA,
Blackrock,
Co Dublin.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



The cost of Irish unity
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 683 words
Body


Sir,   In his thoughtful and balanced article on the financial implications of Irish unity, Bobby McDonagh underlines the value of  well-researched, clearly-presented reports by distinguished academics  ( When it comes to the cost of Irish unity, maybe it s okay if the heart overrules the head , Opinion & Analysis, April 10th).
Such work is being published and disseminated by Arins (Analysing and Researching Ireland North and South), a joint project of the Royal Irish Academy and the Keough-Naughton Institute for Irish Studies at the University of Notre Dame. Arins was established in the aftermath of Brexit.
Over the past three years, it has   published a large number of high-quality, non-partisan academic articles on a wide range of topics   constitutional, political, economic, social, cultural, international   relevant to the debate on relationships in Ireland and in these islands. These articles are supplemented by monthly podcasts and in-person discussions with political and other leaders. Arins also collaborates with The Irish Times in the production of high-profile opinion surveys, the most recent of which probes attitudes to the economics of unity. All of this work is available at arins/ria.ie.
In 2021, John Doyle of Dublin City University published  Why the Subvention Does Not Matter . In 2023 Esmond Birnie offered a response,  The Subvention Matters . Last month s Arins podcast brought the two authors together with Edgar Morgenroth of Dublin City University, the co-author of the Institute of International & European Affairs research paper ( United Ireland could cost EUR 20 billion a year for 20 years, says new study , News, April 4th).
In a calm, informed and respectful discussion all three agreed on the scale of the current UK subvention, how it has evolved and indeed increased over time, the elements which make it up, and the variables which might affect the fiscal impact of unity on the Irish exchequer.
What was clear is that for the foreseeable future there would continue to be transfers to Northern Ireland, but that the range of possible costs is vast. They would depend on factors including diplomatic negotiations, policy decisions and economic growth,  none of which can be confidently predicted.
The major new element highlighted in the IIEA paper is the enormous cost of levelling up pensions, social welfare payments and public sector pay. I find it hard to imagine that a situation in which a clerical officer in Newry would be paid markedly less than their counterpart in Dundalk, or an unemployed person in Coleraine far less than someone in Clonakilty, would be politically sustainable for long, even if the case for a slow transition is strong.
However, apart from the financial implications for the Irish exchequer, such a change would surely cause huge difficulties for the private sector in the North.
While I agree with most of what Bobby McDonagh says, I would query any expectation of really substantial EU support. The current, very welcome, EU contribution to the Peace Plus programme averages out at about EUR 35 million a year. Germany paid in full for its unification, and may ask why one of the richest countries in Europe should not do the same. Again, US support for peace in Northern Ireland has been valuable, but the absence of any sustained boost to the Northern economy after the 1998 Belfast Agreement raises questions about a foreign investment-led post-unity boom.
I agree that while practical issues will be important in any referendum, questions of identity and allegiance will probably dominate   but this may not be true of middle-ground swing voters in the North.
One final point: most of the debate on the impact of unity assumes that the Northern economy will remain weak, and the Southern one strong. The former seems likely, unfortunately. As for the latter, past experience points to the need for some caution.
These are just a few of the issues on which I am sure the Arins project will continue to promote research and debate.   Yours, etc,
RORY MONTGOMERY,
(Member of the Arins
Steering Group),
Blackrock,
Co Dublin.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



The eight people you meet in the posh hospital emergency department
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 680 words
Body


The opening sequence of the Channel 4 docuseries 24 Hours in A&E once showed a harried receptionist telling a phone caller that the department is open  24 hours a day, 7 days a week, 365 days a year .  I love that question,  What are your opening hours? ,  she joked to a colleague. She was right. The very idea that a facility designed to treat unforeseen calamities might have a schedule is amusing . . . unless you re planning to go posh.
I had reason recently to attend the emergency department of one of Dublin s private hospitals, and was tickled to find that it keeps civilised hours. Opening and closing times within which to have one s emergencies feels very illustrative of our two-tier health system.
Only mannerly catastrophes occurring between the hours of 10am and 7pm and likely subsidised by private health insurance, please. Everything else to the 24-hour drop-in shop.
I spent 10 hours there, which immediately contradicts the idea that the IVs are shut off and the ECGs are packed away on the dot of seven, or that you might be in and out in a jiffy. Doctors were overworked, queues were long, the staff were blue in the face telling everyone the hospital had no beds, and everyone was at their nosiest, including me. Here s who I saw.
The Phone Lady
Every emergency department has at least one Phone Lady. She s ringing everyone she knows with minute-by-minute updates. She has a Bad Leg and they think it might be vascular and she hasn t been able to walk further than the gate since Friday. It s desperate altogether.
The No-Nonsense Triage Nurse
I could almost hear her eyes rolling in her head after she gave me a form to fill out and I remained luxuriating in the bay with my pen ready and my shoes off.  You can go back to the waiting area, we have more patients to see.  That was me put in my place. And yet, I would die for her.
The Concierge
 I m not sure  Concierge  was their actual title but there was a team of snazzy staff checking people in and warning them of the cost (between EUR 200 and EUR 695 regardless of insurance cover. I know. I was scandalised too). They brought a bit of glamour to an otherwise deeply unglamorous situation.
The Helpful Porter
When I was about 14, I had my tonsils out and a glorious hospital porter allayed my fears on the way to theatre with some daring swerves of the bed and jokes about what they might do with the tonsils once removed. I ve been a porter fan ever since and was intercepted by one on this occasion on my way to a scan.  You look lost,  he suggested brightly. And he was right, I was.
The Frail Old Man
The emergency department was awash with posters and flyers warning about the dangers of having A Fall. I was right beside an older gentleman when he tried having a fall, but staff and patients alike were able to intercept his glacial stagger before he hit the ground. He later admitted that he was on his way to the tea trolley.
The Minor Irish Celebrity
After about five hours of waiting came a brief ripple of excitement when a sports- adjacent celebrity arrived into the emergency department. I was sure they d be whisked away to some sort of suite but they were duly informed of a minimum six-hour wait and thus began eyeballing the one available socket from which to charge your phone, just like the rest of us.
The Overworked Doctor
The same doctor I had seen at 11am apologised for the wait when discharging me at 8pm. Having once spent 15 hours on a metal chair in Tallaght Hospital emergency department with kidney stones, her apology was unnecessary. She was kind and thorough and gave me one of her precious MRI slots. An angel.
The Immigrant
 Almost everyone I met seemed to have come to work in Ireland from a different country of origin, as is the case with so much of the healthcare system here. We owe so much to these people.
There was potentially a cultural barrier when I received my paperwork to go to the MRI scanner and pointed out with juvenile delight that it was called a  ticket to ride . I deserved the blank stare. The nurse had some more important things to do.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



The privatisation of monopoly public utilities can lead to losses for the State
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 1
Length: 809 words
Body


Margaret Thatcher s government undertook a raft of privatisations of the UK s public utilities, which included the rail system, the electricity system, the gas system and most of the water system.
The logic was that the privatised firms would be operated much more efficiently, at lower cost, while the sales of these bodies would net substantial sums for the government.
In 1992, the Tories also privatised Northern Ireland Electricity. To raise the sale price achievable for the government, long-term contracts were agreed before privatisation that guaranteed the new investor good returns by allowing them to charge a very high price to consumers.
This exceptional burden on Northern Ireland consumers lasted for over a decade.
In some cases, where the new businesses operated in competitive markets, the hopes of efficiency gains were realised.
In both Ireland and Britain, electricity generation saw lower costs after markets were opened to competition from private operators.
However, where utilities were natural monopolies, as with the UK water and rail networks, the experiment has ended very unhappily both for households and for the UK taxpayer.
In principle, privatised utilities are subject to a regulator to ensure that charges for services by monopoly networks are reasonable and that the businesses are well run.
However, UK regulators allowed the new owners to borrow heavily while extracting huge dividends, rather than maximising important investment. This left the companies highly indebted and, in some cases, needing some form of a bailout by the taxpayer.
The UK rail network had to be taken back into public ownership in 2002 because of mismanagement, inadequate investment and major operational and safety failures resulting in a number of fatal accidents.
The latest casualty is the largest water utility in the UK, Thames Water.
Under the ownership of the Australian firm Macquarie, Thames Water and its associated companies borrowed heavily between 2006 and 2017. Sums raised against the utility s assets were used to increase dividend payments to shareholders rather than to invest in its primary purposes of providing clean water and treating sewage.
Rowing through raw sewage
Now the Thames Water companies have total debts of over £33 billion (EUR 38.6 billion) and cannot repay a small tranche of debt that has just become due, having paid out dividends of £7 billion since privatisation.
Inadequate levels of investment over many years have resulted today in major pollution discharges into the river system.
The annual Oxford-Cambridge boat race attracted big headlines about rowing through raw sewage.
Thames Water now faces big fines. To try to stay afloat, the company has requested that the fines be waived, and that consumers  bills be increased by more than 50 per cent by 2030.
Even those measures may not be enough to save the business.
The outcome could be that Thames s lenders and shareholders, including Irish bank AIB, could lose heavily. The UK government may have to step in.
Fortunately in Ireland, with the exception of telecommunications, we have maintained key networks in State hands, avoiding the worst mistakes seen in the UK.
Parlous position
Our one major privatisation was Telecom Éireann. It netted the government more than EUR 6 billion in 1999. But over the following decade, the owners leveraged the company by borrowing heavily, while taking out dividends.
This left the company in a parlous position so that when nationwide broadband needed to be developed, the company couldn t finance it, and the State had to pay for this key investment.
The privatisation of monopoly networks does not make sense. But, if it does take place, the regulator needs the power to prevent the owners of companies such as Telecom/Eircom/Eir or Thames Water from borrowing heavily while paying themselves large dividends.
However, the State just owning a key network is not enough.
To keep costs low, and protect consumers, inputs should, wherever possible, be sourced competitively.
For example, major construction work should generally be put out to tender, ensuring downward pressure on costs, rather than handled in-house.
But it is also essential that public utilities have access to adequate capital.
The decision to finance Uisce Éireann through domestic water charges was abandoned in the face of public pressure. This means the company s debt is treated as government debt, and it is totally dependent on the Government to finance a vital investment programme to serve our growing population, and replace a 19th-century pipe network.
The Government is on the hook for any failures arising, including EU fines for continuing pollution of our waters.
And as households are not charged for their excess water consumption, there is no incentive for those who have major leaks on their side of the network to get them fixed.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Two men dead after crashes in Cork and Kerry
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 261 words
Byline: BARRY ROCHE
Body


BARRY ROCHE  Two men have died in road crashes in counties Kerry and Cork, bringing the total number of fatalities on the State s roads so far this year to 63.
Road deaths so far this year are running some 25 per cent higher than at the same point in 2023, which was the deadliest year on Ireland s roads for some time.
A man in his 20s died when the car he was a passenger in and  another vehicle collided  on the N69 at Banemore, Listowel, Co Kerry at about 9pm on Wednesday. He sustained serious injuries  and died at University Hospital Kerry yesterday afternoon.
Three others involved in the incident were also treated in hospital but their injuries are not life-threatening.
Gardaí appealed to anyone who witnessed the incident or who was on the N69 between Listowel and Tralee between 8.30pm to 9.15pm on Wednesday to come forward.
Meanwhile, another man died in a two-vehicle collision on the N25 near Midleton in east Cork early yesterday.
The man, aged in his early 20s, was pronounced dead at the scene following a crash involving a car and a truck at Ballyedekin between Midleton and Castlemartyr at around 7.30am.
It is believed that the car and truck were travelling in the same direction when the collision happened.
Anyone who was travelling on the N25 at Loughaderra at the time who may have witnessed the collision or have dash cam footage is asked to contact Midleton Garda station.
The fatality is the second to happen in the Midleton area in the space of the week. A pedestrian died after being struck by a car on the N25 in the early hours of Sunday.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Two more candidates enter race for mayor
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 314 words
Byline: CORMAC McQUINN
Body


CORMAC McQUINN Political Correspondent  Two more politicians have entered the race to become the first directly elected mayor in Ireland.
Councillors from Fine Gael and Labour have announced they are running in the June election for mayor of Limerick.
Daniel Butler, a Fine Gael councillor, is seeking his party s nomination.
Taoiseach Simon Harris is due to attend a selection convention in Limerick this evening.
Mr Butler is expected to be selected unopposed unless another Fine Gael candidate enters the race.
He said the new role of directly elected mayor is  a huge opportunity to drive an agenda that puts Limerick first  an he would  fight for everyone in the city and the county  if he is elected.
Former Fine Gael leader, minister and Limerick City TD Michael Noonan endorsed Mr Butler, saying he would  make a fine mayor for all of Limerick , adding that he has  worked tirelessly  as a councillor since 2014.
Powers
Mr Butler was previously the mayor of Limerick between 2021 and 2022, though this was the existing ceremonial role, not the new office which has powers in the areas of finances and planning.
Meanwhile, Labour councillor Conor Sheehan vowed to be the  mayor for homes  if he is elected as he announced he is seeking his party s nomination.
He said he wants to fight for  a generation of people who are being locked out of the chance to buy or rent affordable housing .
He said that during the campaign he plans to talk to communities about their housing needs and promised to publish a plan on  how I will deliver a future Limerick where everyone has a safe and secure place to call home .
The Labour Party selection convention is on April 22nd.
The mayoral election is happening on June 7th, the same day as the local and European elections.
The job comes with a salary of about EUR 154,000 and a budget of EUR 8 million a year to be spent on projects and initiatives.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



UK government mounts legal challenge over inquest into murder of GAA official
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 395 words
Byline: SEANÍN GRAHAM
Body


SEANÍN GRAHAM Northern Correspondent  The UK government has mounted a legal challenge over the inquest of murdered GAA official Seán Brown in a move that could effectively delay a public inquiry into his killing.
In a statement, it confirmed yesterday that an  application for leave for judicial review  had been made relating to the inquest into the death of the 61-year-old.
The Brown family said the development had retraumatised them and they expressed concerns that it could put back an inquiry by  years .
Mr Brown was locking the gates at Bellaghy Wolfe Tones GAA club in Co Derry in May 1997 when he was abducted and murdered by loyalist paramilitaries. No one has been convicted for the murder.
An inquest into his killing began last year, but coroner Mr Justice Patrick Kinney last month said his ability to examine the death had been  compromised  by the extent of confidential state material being withheld on national security grounds.
He wrote to Northern Secretary Chris Heaton-Harris requesting that a public inquiry be held. A decision was expected on Wednesday.
A solicitor for Mr Brown s family said the UK government s legal action has had a  retraumatising effect on a family but most specifically an 86-year-old widow .
 The Brown family are gravely concerned that this is a concerted attempt to tie them up in legal processes that could take years and that they are being used as pawns in a wider attempt by the British government to defend its indefensible approach to legacy,  said Niall Murphy, of KRW Law.
 Far from abiding by the express direction of the high court and convene a public inquiry, they have decided to attack our local judiciary and are ignoring the request.
The Irish Times understands that the judicial review proceedings are linked to the disclosure of sensitive information about state agents at the inquest.
Before it ended, the inquest revealed that up to 25 people, some of whom were state agents, had been linked through intelligence to the murder of Mr Brown   the first time the family s suspicions of collusion were officially confirmed. The details were disclosed in public-interest immunity hearings, which were held behind closed doors.
In a  statement on its legal action, a UK government spokesman it would be  inappropriate to comment further at this stage given the matter is now the subject of judicial consideration .

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Ukraine workers in race to repair power grid; Russia has intensified air attacks on power stations
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 988 words
Body


Russia hit Ukraine with 4,000 bombs, missiles and drones last month, renewing its onslaught against its neighbour s energy grid with strikes that wrecked power stations and other infrastructure and left millions of people without heat, light and running water.
It will take well over a year and hundreds of millions of euro to fix all the damage and replace destroyed facilities, leaving energy firms racing to be ready for the freezing months of next winter, and their workers facing a daunting task knowing that a repeat attack could endanger them and reduce their vital repairs to rubble at any moment.
 This is probably the first time since the beginning of the full-scale war when the Russians have managed to destroy and damage so many facilities in one or two attacks,  says Dmytro Sakharuk, executive director of Ukraine s biggest private energy firm, Dtek, which lost 80 per cent of its generating capacity in the March strikes. Moscow s military has repeatedly targeted Ukraine s power grid since launching its full invasion in February 2022, but the recent attacks were particularly intense and precise and may have exploited the country s lack of air defence ammunition at a time when Republicans have blocked US aid to the country for several months.
Largest power plant In the latest attacks on Wednesday night, Russia destroyed Kyiv s largest power plant, the Trypilska thermal power station 50km south of the city. The plant provided electricity to millions of people in Kyiv, Cherkasy and Zhytomyr regions. Ukraine s energy ministry also said two facilities in the south had been targeted in Russian strikes, causing power outages in two regions.
The recent Russian bombardment targeted thermal and hydroelectric power plants, crucial parts of the electricity distribution network and even solar facilities. Five of Dtek s six power stations were damaged or destroyed, depriving Ukraine of what Sakharuk describes as  a lot  of its overall electricity output. He will not be more specific, because energy production is a sensitive wartime subject that could affect the work of everything from hospitals to ammunition factories.
Reports say Dtek facilities meet about a quarter of Ukraine s energy needs. Three nuclear power plants on Kyiv-controlled territory supply most of the country s electricity, even as an atomic station in Zaporizhzhia   the biggest in Europe   remains under Russian occupation.
 The destruction was significant . . . We still do not understand the scale of damage as many facilities are still in rubble and we can t reach them,  Ukrainian energy minister Herman Halushchenko told Bloomberg.  Today the situation is even more complicated, compared with last year, as we have lost a lot of hydropower production and have to conduct planned repairs of nuclear units.
With energy production and therefore sales sharply reduced, and amid a war-induced economic crisis in Ukraine, Dtek faces a battle to fund the repairs. It may also be hard to find manufacturers with the capacity to produce specialised hardware and Ukraine is asking other countries with ex-Soviet infrastructure to supply parts.
 The Russians hit equipment like turbines, transformers and generators . . . some of which have very limited availability now. We used many spare parts doing repairs to prepare for last winter, when we managed to restore 10 units that had been damaged the previous winter. We spent almost $110 million (EUR 102 million) on those repairs, and two-thirds of those restored units have now been destroyed,  Sakharuk says.  We estimate it will cost $300-$400 million to repair the damage done to our facilities ... Some units that can be repaired could be back on-line in nine months or a year. Others will take 18 months at least,  he adds.
 We will not be in time for winter. It s just physically impossible. Maybe we could speed up if we put all possible resources in this direction, but we [as a country] are still too slow and bureaucratic . . . If your house is burning, you have to run very quickly, but in our case it s too slow.
Ukraine will need external help to finance the reconstruction and should look at reforming a long-standing system of large subsidies for all consumers, Sakharuk says.  We have people and the ability to do it, plus we have experience from earlier in the war of repairing damaged equipment,  he adds, noting that Dtek, with some 50,000 staff, is one of Ukraine s biggest employers and taxpayers.
Heavy toll Russia s invasion has taken a heavy human toll on the company: four Dtek employees have been killed and 63 injured while at work, and 264 employees who joined the military have been killed and more than 750 wounded while serving. More than 60 are missing and 11 are in Russian captivity.
 The probability of being killed for someone working at a power station is much higher than for most people in Ukraine. It is very disciplined and responsible work, because energy is a vital resource. People who do this are like soldiers on the energy front,  Sakharuk says.
 The job they do is crucial for the whole country. A lack of energy can undermine the country s ability to defend itself. That s why they keep going and keep risking their lives, because they know that if they stop, then who else will do it?  he adds.  The most difficult thing is to repair a power station and then see it attacked again. And to have to repair it again, knowing that another missile strike may come and destroy all your work yet again in a second. Psychologically, that is very tough.
Kyiv s top officials and diplomats are trying to secure more weapons from allies that will help shield rebuilt facilities from new attacks.  The parallel strategy [alongside reconstruction] has to be putting more air defence in place,  Sakharuk says.  Air defence is key, because the task is not only to recover, restore or build new sites, but to protect them and save them from being destroyed again.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Undermanaged employees get just as frustrated as overmanaged ones; Timing is critical as intervention by a manager on a given task only late in the day is seen as less than helpful by workers
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 6
Length: 881 words
Body


Ask employees what drives them nuts about their bosses and micromanagement usually gets mentioned as a pet peeve.
There is a fine line between keeping tabs on people and breathing down their necks, and one of the most frustrating aspects of the lockdowns for those working from home was being constantly checked up on.
So, people don t like to be overmanaged. But it turns out they don t like being undermanaged either and their dissatisfaction with a more remote approach often manifests itself as a reluctance to accept what is being said when the manager finally gets around to discussing their work.
 Many managers who take a more hands-off approach are surprised when employees push back at any feedback they do eventually receive,  says Bruce Tulgan, author and founder of management research and workplace consultancy, Rainmaker Thinking.
 These employees, particularly younger employees, are often labelled as overly sensitive. However, their resistance is typically less about the feedback itself and more about the timing of that feedback.
Why give a direct report the freedom to create their own plan and timeline only to derail that plan with your thoughts and opinions late in the process? That information would have been more valuable before the employee started going in the wrong direction.
 This type of leadership comes off as careless at best and manipulative at worst.
Tulgan adds that while the goal for many managers is to have self-starting employees, the reality is that this is something of a pipe dream. There will always be a cohort who are very good at managing themselves but they are in the minority. And at some point all employees will require input from someone who is closer to the top of the business and more privy to its priorities.
 Vacuum
 It s not feasible to have everyone making their own decisions when there are overarching business decisions to be made,  says Tulgan.
Employees need someone more experienced to guide them and remind them of the goals, deadlines and ground rules applying in that business.
 Self-managed employees may feel they are the authority on their own work but if they exist in a vacuum of self-accountability, they will struggle to feel engaged. Employees today want to know that their efforts are effective and will result in a final product that is valuable to the right people   not just themselves.
Some employees have turned avoiding their boss into an art form because they fear an interaction will add to their workload or undermine a task they have already completed.
However, while someone can run, they can t hide as the boss will always have a level of power, control and authority that can affect an employee. As such, it s better to bite the bullet and talk to your boss to make sure you know what they think should take priority and what are the concrete actions expected of you. If you don t, there s a good chance you ll end up totally frustrated when you discover later on that you ve been singing from what, in your manager s eyes, is the wrong hymn sheet.
 If you re not getting direction from your manager, you should go ask for it and, in turn, your manager should be asking what support, resources and guidance you need so you don t run into unnecessary problems,  says Tulgan.
As the debate about remote versus in-person working rumbles on, Tulgan says one of the myths about having everyone together is the assumption of an alignment of purpose that may not in fact exist.  There can be an illusion that because people are sitting together and working the same hours, they share common goals and priorities. That s a pretty lazy way to look at things from a managerial perspective,  he says.
 A good manager is actively interested in what everyone is doing and how they can help them to do it better. In my view, managers who say  I don t want to hold their hands or to micromanage them  is fooling themselves. We re working in a complex environment. Everything is going faster than ever before and even the simplest of jobs is now more complex than it used to be.
 Keeping it together means managers talking to their people regularly   every day, every few days or once a week   to make sure they re aligned. If they don t, they will end up doing most of their managing when things go wrong and they have to step in to fix problems that shouldn t have arisen in the first place. At least that s my take on it after 30 years of talking to half a million people in the workplace and working with over 400 organisations.
 Moving target
Tulgan says hovering over someone while they work is not good management and if a manager is telling someone to dot this i and cross this t, that s effectively two people doing the one job. Where the manager s skill comes in, he says, is in how they calibrate their interventions.
Some people simply need more guidance than others. Some tasks require more oversight than others. When someone is new to a job, they will need more input than when it s a familiar routine.
 What the manager needs to figure out is how much direction and feedback someone needs with the task in hand right now because it s often a moving target,  says Tulgan.
 Managers should make decisions based on what people need and if you re not talking to your people, how do you know what that is?

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Unity question should not be solely dictated by finance
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 867 words
Body


In dealing with the stubbornness of Northern Ireland prime minister James Craig in November 1921, UK prime minister David Lloyd George sought to appeal to unionists  pockets. He wrote a letter to Craig decrying the idea of a partitioned Ireland that would involve  cutting the normal circuits of commercial activity ... When such frontiers are established they harden into permanence . Failing to convince Craig to sign up to an All-Ireland arrangement, Lloyd George and his colleagues opted instead for the idea of a boundary commission that would, as part of an Anglo-Irish settlement, review the Border. As recorded by Lloyd-George s secretary, Thomas Jones, the impression given to Sinn Féin negotiators about such a commission, just before they signed the Anglo-Irish Treaty, was that it would involve  so cutting down Ulster that she would be forced in from economic necessity .
Such hopes were of course dashed. The Border did indeed solidify and the British treasury contributed handsomely to the Northern Irish economy. It was hardly something British chancellors of the exchequer enjoyed doing. In late 1923 Neville Chamberlain, as the occupant of that position, was irritated about the mounting bills, hoping  very much  in correspondence with Craig, that  you will not have to ask a harassed chancellor for any further aid not hitherto contemplated . Politics, however, would continue to trump economics. Richard Hopkins, British treasury controller in 1939, memorably described financing Northern Ireland as involving  fudges, dodges and wangles  to provide the interventions needed to preserve parity with the rest of the UK.
Pondering the cost of a united Ireland in 1954, GC Duggan, the former comptroller and auditor general for Northern Ireland, noted both the North s  imperial contribution  to the British exchequer and the various, secretive and sometimes  devious ways  in which the UK government provided subvention in social services and agriculture. It was money that  in a united Ireland would not be available from outside sources .
In the late 1960s, TK Whitaker, secretary of the Department of Finance, advised the then taoiseach, Jack Lynch, on his policy towards Northern Ireland and was also a member of the constitutional review group established in 1967 that examined constitutional barriers to greater North-south co-operation. Whitaker reminded Lynch in 1968 that Westminster was paying an annual subsidy for the upkeep of Northern Ireland of more than £90 million. Reunification, he suggested, without  a good marriage settlement  would involve  imposing on ourselves a formidable burden which many of our own citizens, however strong their desire for Irish unity, may find intolerable .  After the Troubles intensified, some ministers, including Charles Haughey, spoke of the  fast-tracking  of unity, but Whitaker, in September 1969, was sober in his assessment, as noted by his biographer Anne Chambers:  One of the crucial elements in any possible solution is how to keep the British £100 million a year for the North and to work this requirement into a constitutional arrangement . As he saw it, most in the North, Catholics and Protestants, would not contemplate a unity  entailing a loss of material advantages  and citizens of the Republic  do not desire unity strongly enough to undertake the subsidisation of Northern standards now financed by Britain .
Whitaker s observations remain pertinent. For over 50 years, opinion polls in the Republic have suggested roughly two-thirds of respondents desire to see a united Ireland, but that wish can be heavily qualified when supplementary questions of financing and taxation are asked. Taoiseach Simon Harris has said he  instinctively  wants to see a united Ireland and that cost should not be the  overbearing factor . He was reacting to the findings of a new study from the Institute of International and European Affairs (IIEA) that suggests unification could cost EUR 20 billion a year for 20 years, with a 25 per cent increase in taxation potentially needed. But Harris maintains now is not the time to consider this.
Since Brexit, a raft of studies have homed in on the practical considerations of unity. In 2017 Edgar Morgenroth, one of the authors of the recent IIEA report, looked to the example of German reunification ( the gap between east German per capita GDP and that of the reunified Germany was similar to that which would apply to a united Ireland ) as well as the cost of public sector pension liabilities. A substantial majority in Germany considered unity a success, despite its costs.
An Analysing and Researching Northern Ireland (ARINS) paper from 2021 suggested, taking into account differences in prices in both areas, household disposable income in the Republic was about 12 per cent higher than in NI and identified other gaps, generally favouring the Republic, in relation to poverty risk and advancement through education.
Harris is correct that questions of unity should not be primarily dictated by finance, but the questions raised by the recent research, though much of it is accompanied by significant caveats, should be welcomed in order to avoid updated  fudges, dodges and wangles .

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



West and Arab nations urge Iran to avoid military retaliation against Israel; Biden stresses America's 'ironclad' support for Israel in event of any attack
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 537 words
Byline: JAMES SHOTTER
Body


JAMES SHOTTER in Jerusalem, BITA GHAFFARI in Tehran,  HENRY FOY in Brussels and  FELICIA SCHWARTZ in Washington  Western and Arab governments are rushing to convince Iran to show restraint as the US warned allies that Tehran was close to military retaliation against Israel over an attack on its Damascus consulate.
The diplomatic push yesterday came as concerns rose in western capitals that Iran is preparing to respond directly against Israel, rather than through proxies, to avenge the assassination of several Iranian top generals last week.
Washington has recently informed allies that Iran s retaliation could be imminent as it urged them to put pressure on Tehran to hold back, according to a person familiar with the discussions.
A second diplomat familiar with the warning added that the US said a direct strike by Iran on Israel was possible, an action that would significantly escalate six months of hostilities in the region.
Israeli prime minister Binyamin Netanyahu yesterday warned that Israel would retaliate against any attack on its interests, saying his forces were  prepared  for any external threats to the Jewish state.  Whoever harms us, we will harm them,  he said.
German foreign minister Annalena Baerbock phoned her Iranian counterpart Hossein Amirabdollahian yesterday to discuss the rapidly worsening security situation.
 Regional escalation   Nobody can have any interest in regional escalation,  the German ministry said in a statement.  All players in the region are called upon to act responsibly and exercise restraint.
Mr Amirabdollahian also held phone conversations with his counterparts from Saudi Arabia, Iraq, the United Arab Emirates and Qatar on Wednesday night, with Iran s foreign ministry saying the consequences of Israel s attack on the Iranian consulate were among the topics discussed. He also spoke to his Turkish counterpartyesterday. Iran s supreme leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei said on Wednesday that the attack last week, which killed several senior Iranian commanders, was equivalent to an attack on Iranian territory, and that Israel must be  punished . Responding to Ayatollah Khamenei s statement, US president Joe Biden stressed his  ironclad  support for Israel, pointedly saying the US would do  all we can  to protect the security of its ally.
 Our commitment to Israel s security against these threats from Iran and its proxies is ironclad,  he said after a meeting with Japan s prime minister, Fumio Kishida.  Let me say it again: ironclad.
Hamas leader Ismail Haniyeh said yesterday his Palestinian militant group was still seeking a deal for a ceasefire and hostage release after Wednesday s Israeli strike which killed three of his sons in Gaza. Speaking in Qatar while receiving condolences, Mr Haniyeh said  the interests of the Palestinian people are placed above everything  when asked if the strike would affect the talks on a truce and hostage release.
Israeli forces carried out the attack without authorisation from top commanders or senior leaders, Israeli media said yesterday, raising fears among families of hostages it would derail efforts to secure their release from Gaza.   Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024. Additional reporting: Reuters

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Wild Atlantic Way worth EUR 3bn in annual revenue   Fáilte Ireland
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 3
Length: 446 words
Byline: MARK HILLIARD
Body


MARK HILLIARD
 Ireland s Wild Atlantic Way, the 2,600km stretch of rugged coastline along the Atlantic seaboard, is now worth EUR 3 billion a year in tourism revenues, according to new economic analysis.
To mark the route s tenth anniversary, tourism body Fáilte Ireland published a report showing almost two million more people visited the Wild Atlantic Way last year than a decade ago, with related spending up 59 per cent.
Launched in 2014 as a tourism-focused response to the financial crash, Fáilte Ireland said the scenic route has become a globally recognised tourism brand and  an economic engine for the west .
Created 35,000 jobs
That appears to be borne out by the numbers. As well as increased spending and visitors, the Wild Atlantic Way is estimated to have helped create about 35,000 jobs, according to the report.
It is considered Ireland s  most popular region , with just over half of all domestic tourism revenue generated there.
 When we compare this internationally, based on the most recent data available, we see that inbound travel to Ireland grew by 45 per cent between 2013 and 2019, well above the Northern European average of 25 per cent,  said Fáilte Ireland chief executive Paul Kelly at the publication of the findings during the industry body s annual Meitheal trade event in Killarney.
 The Wild Atlantic Way was a key contributor to this success, with overseas visitor bed-nights in the region growing by 60 per cent across this period.
A portal into Ireland s often dramatic landscape, the coastal route has been marketed as one of the longest in the world, stretching from the Inishowen Peninsula in the north to Kinsale in Cork s south.
It is a veritable where s-where of postcard Irish tourism, linking Ferris Head, Achill Island and Clew Bay, the Burren, Dingle Peninsula and the Ring of Kerry among a long list of attractions.
Speaking at the Meitheal event, Minister for Tourism Catherine Martin said that, 10 years ago, the launch of the west coast brand had represented a  vision for the future of tourism .
 Household name
 This is now a household name and cements Ireland s reputation as a must-visit tourism destination,  she said.
Its success among foreign visitors has been helped by its background role in various film productions, from the Star Wars franchise to the Banshees of Inisherin.
Tourism Ireland, which markets the country overseas, has been keen to capitalise on its popularity, co-producing more than 20 food and travel TV shows highlighting the coastal attraction, and reaching 450 million viewers in the process.
Its promotional push will be stepped up in 14 overseas markets via various media to mark the 10-year anniversary.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Alonso signs new 'multi-year' deal to stay at Aston Martin
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 17
Length: 137 words
Body


Fernando Alonso will remain with Aston Martin beyond this season after signing a new  multi-year  deal with the British-based Formula One team.
Double world champion Alonso, who will be 43 in July, had been linked with Mercedes and Red Bull   as possible replacements for Lewis Hamilton and Max Verstappen respectively.
But Aston Martin announced yesterday that Alonso, whose current deal had been due to expire at the end of the year, has agreed a contract extension.
 I am here to stay,  said Alonso via an Aston Martin press release. The team did not mention the length of the new deal.
Team principal Mike Krack said:  Securing Fernando s long-term future with Aston Martin is fantastic news. We have built a strong working relationship over the last 18 months and we share the same determination to see this project succeed.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Devine signs first pro deal with Connacht
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 17
Length: 88 words
Body


The talented Connacht scrumhalf Matthew Devine has signed his first professional contract with the province and will become a senior squad player after completing his second season in their academy in the summer.
 Devine came through the ranks at Ballinasloe RFC and Garbally College, where he won two Connacht Senior Schools Cups in 2019 and 2020.
Devine also played a major role in Ireland winning a Grand Slam in the 2022 Under-20 Six Nations, playing in all five games and scoring in each of the four matches which he started.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Dublin to Belfast train service
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 134 words
Body


A chara,   Louis O Flaherty is right to be dubious about the delivery date of the highly publicised promise to improve the 180 km Dublin to Belfast train connection (Letters, April 11th). We can also be modest about what is being improved. The comfort and the frequency perhaps, but not the journey time. The current best of two hours and five minutes remains unchanged since the 1960s. The much-heralded 2029 improvement will be one hour and 55 minutes, but this is only a modest gain of 10 minutes after 60 years. Here in France, a similar 180km distance in a TGV takes a mere 40 minutes, but enough time to have your coffee, your croissant, and read a few pages of The Irish Times.
We can do with some French savoir-faire to put the  fast  back into Belfast.   Is mise,
CIARÁN Mac GUILL,
Clichy,
France.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Image of the week Eclipse tourism
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 4
Length: 99 words
Body


$50,000
Prize-money for gold medal winners competing in the 48 athletics events at this summer s Olympic Games, following a move by World Athletics to break with Olympic tradition. It has become the first sport to guarantee such a prize.
$0
Prize-money for silver- and bronze-winning athletes in Paris, but World Athletics president Sebastian Coe said the plan was to introduce monetary reward for these positions from Los Angeles 2028.
$12,500
Sum that each member of a gold-winning relay team will receive, as they will share the $50,000 prize   just a bit of extra pressure not to drop the baton.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Nothing new under the sun
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 34 words
Body


Sir,   Wasn t the solar eclipse exciting! You can get the same effect every night or when you close your eyes.
What next? The World Undercoating Championship?   Yours, etc,
EUGENE TANNAM,
Firhouse,
Dublin 24.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Ohtani's translator in plea deal over alleged $4.5m theft
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 17
Length: 152 words
Body


Shohei Ohtani s former translator plans to plead guilty to federal crimes related to the alleged theft of money from the Los Angeles Dodgers star, the New York Times and ESPN reported.
Ippei Mizuhara was fired by the Dodgers last month after admitting that he stole at least $4.5m from Ohtani, the biggest star in baseball, to pay off gambling debts.
According to the Times and ESPN, Mizuhara s plea agreement would include an admission that corroborates Ohtani s version of the events   that the player never wagered on sports, had no idea that Mizuhara did so and was the victim of a  massive theft . A source told ESPN that Ohtani s story around the events is accurate.
MLB players are forbidden from betting on baseball, and face a lifetime ban if found to have placed a wager on their own team. They are allowed to bet on other sports in the nearly 40 US states where gambling is legal, but not in California.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Puberty blockers and children
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 188 words
Body


Sir,   Dr Aidan Kelly, quoted in  Thousands of children unsure of gender identity  let down by NHS , report finds  (World, April 10th), is incorrect when he says that the NHS move away from the use of puberty blockers to treat gender-related distress in children is  out of step with the rest of the world .  Finland, Norway, Sweden, France and Denmark have all restricted or banned the use of puberty blockers in the treatment of gender-related distress in children because, as the Cass review makes plain, there is no reliable, long-term evidence base to support their use. The NHS and WPATH (World Professional Association for Transgender Health) protocols have been cited by Irish politicians, NGOs and the HSE as the gold standards of care for the treatment of children with gender-related distress.
These standards of care have been shown to be neither scientific nor medically appropriate.
Will we learn our lesson or will the State Claims Agency be faced with a deluge of actions in years to come because, in spite of the evidence, we continued to cause irreversible damage to children?   Yours, etc,
SANDRA ADAMS,
Dublin 13.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



Semi-final Croke Park could stage first rugby match in 15 years
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 13
Length: 173 words
Body


Croke Park will host a rugby match for the first time in 15 years should Leinster manage to beat La Rochelle in this weekend s Champions Cup quarter-final.
With the Aviva Stadium unavailable due to preparations for hosting this year s Europa League final, GAA headquarters has been confirmed as the venue should a Champions Cup semi-final be played in Dublin.
As the highest seed remaining on their side of the draw, Leinster would be granted a fixture on Irish soil if they reach the competition s last four.
Leinster and La Rochelle two sides have met four times previously in European action, La Rochelle winning on three occasions while Leinster earned their first win during December s pool stages. The province has never beaten the French side in a knockout game.
The last time Croke Park hosted a rugby match was also a European semi-final. In 2009, Leinster beat Munster in front of a then world record crowd for a club match.
Should Leinster reach this year s semi-finals, the match will take place on the weekend of May 4th.
NATHAN JOHNS

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 2
Length: 355 words
Byline: LAURA SLATTERY
Body


LAURA SLATTERY
 Irish Independent publisher Mediahuis Ireland has reduced its employee headcount by 50 people in its publishing division, with the total including a number of compulsory redundancies, it has confirmed.
Peter Vandermeersch, chief executive of the Irish subsidiary of the European media group which has its headquarters in Antwerp, said compulsory redundancies had been kept  to a minimum , but did not specify the total. Some new roles were also being created, he said.
Mediahuis Ireland, which employed close to 550 people at the start of 2024, announced in January that it would seek to shrink the size of the workforce across its publishing division in the Republic and Northern Ireland by about 10 per cent, with the aim of splitting the cuts 50/50 between editorial roles and non-editorial roles.
Hiring for new roles
This has now been realised through a mix of voluntary redundancies, natural attrition, a shift to part-time working and compulsory redundancies, with some  internal mobility  also taking place.
Mr Vandermeersch said that, while Mediahuis Ireland was reducing the number of people it employs in traditional   mainly print   publishing, the company was hiring for new roles, including six positions in its growing podcasting unit.
As well as the Irish Independent, Mediahuis publishes the Sunday Independent, Sunday World, Belfast Telegraph, Sunday Life and nine regional titles.
EUR 4m cost cuts target
Its non-editorial roles cover activities such as advertising sales, HR, technology, support, marketing and finance.
The company had warned of potential compulsory redundancies if a EUR 4 million cost cuts target was not met, prompting the National Union of Journalists (NUJ) to express  grave concern  at the threat.
This was its second redundancy scheme in less than a year, with an earlier scheme announced in March 2023.
Mediahuis closed its last remaining Irish printing plant   in Newry   and moved entirely to contract printing in January 2023, with Mr Vandermeersch later confirming that the company planned to move away from printed news products and pursue digital growth over the next decade.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 12, 2024 Friday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 10
Length: 1238 words
Body


At one of the last cabinet meetings chaired by Leo Varadkar, the Cabinet agreed to publish draft legislation drawn up by Minister for Finance Michael McGrath to establish two funds to save some of the massive inflow of corporation tax for future use. It is a prudent plan, given the unpredictability of these revenues.
But as the legislation wends its way through the Oireachtas, the penny will start to drop on the Government benches. Some EUR 6 billion is being effectively taken off the table for October s budget and saved for the future.
And that is going to leave less for spending rises and tax cuts in what   if the Government lasts that long   will be the last budget day before the general election.
On the forecasts made in the last budget in October 2023, the Government will still have enough room for a generous budget, even allowing for the EUR 6 billion being put aside into the two funds next year. The budget predictions were for a general government surplus of more than EUR 14 billion in both 2025 and 2026.
This leaves plenty of leeway, though not as much as the headline figure suggests, because the European Union (EU) borrowing measure does not count in the money being put into the funds, as it is moving from one part of the State coffers to another.
However, putting money into the funds reduces the amount of cash available to the exchequer and thus the room for budget measures.
These forecasts will be revised in the Department of Finance Stability Programme Update, due to be published shortly, when the point about the reduced room for budget measures   and the ongoing uncertainty about corporation tax   are both likely to be underlined.
A significant part of the budget leeway in the years ahead will go towards putting cash into the two funds. But the forecast for the cumulative surpluses over the next few years will be significant.
In last year s update, the forecast for the 2023-2026 period was for a total surplus of EUR 65 billion, and there appears no reason to expect that the 2024-2027 period to be included in the new update will be any less than this.
So what about Budget 2025? Counting in all permanent and temporary measures, Budget 2024 delivered cost the exchequer EUR 14 billion, but it is clear that there will not be the leeway to do something on that scale this October. The Stability Programme Update will have an updated official estimate of what might be available.
This leads to one awkward political question: are the temporary measures announced to support living standards during the cost of-living crisis to be repeated? Or, with the rate of inflation falling, but prices still high, will the Government try to phase out giveaways such as the energy credit?
Remember that much of the leeway will be used up by the annual pressure to spend more in areas such as health   and there is no guarantee that corporation tax will again outperform.
Windfall tax
And judging by the ardfheis motions, Fine Gael will want to also be able to afford tax cuts aimed at middle earners. Although Varadkar may be gone from Government, the idea of a 30 per cent middle income tax rate lives on, as does the target   mentioned by the new Taoiseach   of ensuring single people do not enter the higher 40 per cent tax net on incomes of less than EUR 50,000.
The idea for the funds emerged due to concern about the sustainability of the surge in corporate tax revenues and has been brought through cabinet by McGrath.
The Department of Finance has estimated that not far off half of all corporate tax collected here may be windfall in nature, meaning it does not relate directly to economic activity here and is thus vulnerable to decisions made by big companies.
The narrow corporate tax base   with three or four companies paying more than 40 per cent of all corporate tax   is an additional risk.
To combat this, the Department proposed the creation of a long-term vehicle   the Future Ireland Fund   which could build up to a significant sum of EUR 100 billion by 2035, on its calculations.
The interest from this would then help to support the exchequer in the years ahead, reducing the need to raise taxes to pay for longer-term bills relating to an ageing population, or climate change.
The funds would also   as we have seen   reduce the scope for politicians to spend excess corporation tax receipts over the coming years; using them to prop up day-to-day spending would be particularly dangerous, due to their potential volatility.
In the subsequent discussion, there was some pushback to the idea of locking money away for such a long period   the plan is to pay into the fund for 12 years. That is why, as well as the Future Ireland Fund, the longer-term vehicle, the Government announced a second vehicle, the Infrastructure, Climate and Nature Fund.
Money is due to go into this fund up to 2030 and it is designed to be available in the event of an economic downturn, to ensure that the State could continue to invest; slashing investment spending after the financial crash has had a huge economic cost for Ireland. This fund, as its name suggests, is also to help pay for future climate and nature investment from 2026 on.
Contributions to the Future Ireland Fund are set by legislation at 0.8 per cent of GDP, which is about EUR 4.1 billion at the moment. The Minister for Finance of the day can halve this to 0.4 per cent of GDP if he or she judges there has been a  deterioration  in the economy, and can reduce it to zero in the event of a   significant deterioration .
Complicated structure
How these benchmarks would be met is, of course, debatable. And as we saw with the old National Pension Reserve Fund during the financial crash, new legislation can always lead to things changing: the bulk of that fund was diverted to help pay for the bank bailout. A new minister for finance can thus always propose a change of the rules.
Some EUR 2 billion a year is due to go into the Infrastructure, Climate and Nature Fund. It can be deployed to help support State investment in the event of a   significant deterioration  in the economy. And in any case, a portion of the cash will be available to support projects in areas such as climate, water and biodiversity.
It is a complicated structure. But its net effect, in terms of the budget, is clear. It leaves less money for measures over the next few years   potentially the final budget of this government and the early budgets of the next one. If the corporate tax bonanza continues, then this may not matter. But with pressure on spending, any wobble on the tax front could quickly reduce the room for manoeuvre.
Putting money aside is a positive move as we know that additional bills are coming down the tracks. From an intergenerational point of view, it is also the right thing to do   otherwise those now starting out on their working lives may face significantly higher taxes to help pay for the pensions of the older members of the workforce. Given their currently disadvantaged state in the vital area of housing, this hardly seems fair.
But politics goes from one year to the next, and from one election to the next. So it will be interesting to see the forthcoming committee stage debate on the funds legislation and the attitude of the main Opposition parties. Not to mention the attitude of the Government backbenchers. Money taken off the budget table might be the correct strategy, but politically this one could get interesting.

Load-Date: April 11, 2024


End of Document



'Floating' beachfront house hovering over water in Howth; Four-bedroom property cantilevered over lake with direct access to Burrow beach
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 3
Length: 700 words
Byline: MIRIAM MULCAHY
Body


MIRIAM MULCAHY
 Hovering over the water, like an apparition, the Lake House in Howth has quite the story behind it. The owner saw the site listed for auction in The Irish Times in 2011 and bought what was a dilapidated seaside bungalow overlooking a lake on the site of an old limestone quarry.
The owner knocked the bungalow and started afresh. She chose Max O Flaherty of AOF architects and Smithcon builders for the job, who were faced with many challenges along the way, not least the extremely narrow footprint, of a site bordered by the lake in front and hemmed in by the protected dunes of Burrow beach behind. Ten years on, the house is softening into the landscape, yet still displays a stunning clarity of vision.
Located on the north side of Howth on Claremont Road with outstanding views extending to the west, north  and east to Lambay Island and Ireland s Eye, the sea calls from every window at the rear of the 267sq m (2,874sq ft) house.
A kink in the house s centre improves the already stunning views and maximises the light fall throughout the day, building on the owner s wish that the sun would track her, from rising on the east side of the house to setting on the covered deck at the far end, in the west.
The front door opens on to a vestibule with a bench. On the left is a bootroom leading to the garage and storage area, a swimmers  bathroom lies to the left of a door opening on to the dunes and gated access to the beach. On the right are a set of sharply angled stairs leading to the split-level floors above.
Solar gain
 In the living area on the first floor the roof, tilted to maximise solar gain and to reduce the visible shape of the house from the beach side, slopes towards the huge picture triple-glazed windows, with American oak frames, all overlooking the sea. To the right of the living area with tall, built-in shelving clustered around a stove, lies a covered deck where the owner s sailing days are captured by incorporating the shape of a yacht s keel into the roof of the deck, a sailor s signature wrought in stone.
The kitchen, sourced from Porter & Jones, is a mix of the same American light oak used throughout the house and Italian Snaidero cabinetry. Silestone counters on the island extend into a small breakfast bar. Appliances include a Britannia range, Liebherr pantry fridge and a Quooker tap. A tiny outdoor coffee nook is tucked away to the right of the kitchen with views over the lake.
Four bedrooms and four bathrooms are split over two levels on the right of the house; the first level has a guest WC, a utility room and a bedroom with a Jack and Jill bathroom connecting to a livingroom with stove. A kitchenette here creates a self-contained suite. As the house is cantilevered over the lake, there is stunning light here and in the principal bedroom above, with windows over both sea and lake.
A study is built into the top of the stairs leading to the second level with bedroom and en suite bathroom and the principal bedroom, which has an en suite, dressingroom and staggering sea vistas.
With comprehensive insulation and an A3 Ber rating, the first time I hear the Dart running on the far side of the road is when we step outside to examine the lake in front of the house, built as a private harbour by F W Higginbotham in the 1930s.
The owner has landscaped the lake surrounds in a natural, woodland style, with two huge Monterey pines giving welcome shade to the fish within. She uses a floating pontoon to maintain the gardens, and when the mood strikes her, to punt out on to the lake with gin, tonic and neighbours. A limestone wall is deep and high enough to provide privacy and security on what can be a busy road during the summer.
Vantage points
 There are simply extraordinary views and vantage points in the back garden overlooking the beach, she has designated two seating areas as the beer garden and the gin garden, in between the chestnut groins that twist through the dunes, maintaining them.
 Living in this house has been an absolute joy,  the owner says, noting she will miss her daily swim, but is moving abroad to live closer to family. Lake House is now on the market with Sherry FitzGerald Malahide, seeking EUR 3.6 million.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



A blood test for dementia
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 556 words
Body


Sir,   Many people if asked how they d feel about living a life wholly dependent on others, needing to be spoon-fed, being immobilised or requiring help with bodily functions, will declare the prospect unacceptable. Stating they d sooner die is not unusual. If you then point out that they were in exactly such a state before   for the first several years of life, in fact   they feel tricked. Most will admit they went through it and are glad they did so. While there is no deceit in this line of questioning, it s worth considering why it feels like there is.
The version of  you  that existed prior to your gaining autonomy, reasoning, continuous memories and a sense of self, seems altogether removed from the remembered one. What indignities you then experienced cannot affect you much nor do they even feel part of your identity. This is of some relevance if one tries to contemplate a future with dementia. The version of you that will be that individual or patient is not the person you are in your prime or in your years of independence.
Outlining the issues that a blood test for dementia raises, Muiris Houston applies the logic of medical screening programmes to the matter ( Blood test for dementia represents an ethical issue , Health, April 9th). This is in a sense logical enough. If a screening programme is to be improve outcomes, it simply has to be the case that earlier identification of the disease helps. Forewarning ought to improve life expectancy, minimise the treatment burden and preserve quality of life. There is literally no point screening for diseases simply to tell people they have them and offer nothing in the way of therapy. And yet dementia is arguably different.
There are a plethora of mid- to late-life decisions that might be profoundly influenced by being told of future dementia. Many might choose not to have children beyond a given age for fear of burdening them with care, or even to have any at all for fear of passing on the condition. Others might wish to have bigger families to distribute the same burden. Plans to continue working or to retire, live closer to towns, develop or expand businesses or pursue endeavours that may defer the condition   learning languages or musical skills   might be considered more urgent or essential. Participation in contact sports, or indeed taking part in high-risk behaviour could be influenced in either direction quite logically by such a preemptive diagnosis. Some might feel in a  carpe diem  way inclined to maximise current enjoyment, while conversely others might try every approach to delaying the condition.
The fundamental difference though between screening for various cancers and for dementia is that the latter will, like your infancy did, place you in a scenario where you cannot make important decisions using the logic and values you now hold. Whatever about the other things we screen for, whether they are prevented, or missed by screening and then develop, you can at any point consider your options and make a choice. A preemptive diagnosis of dementia gives you the chance to make decisions in advance for a completely other manifestation of yourself, one that you probably have no desire to be but that might be oddly content in ways that are to an intact mind, literally, unthinkable.   Yours, etc,
BRIAN O BRIEN,
Kinsale,
Co Cork.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



An Irishman's Diary
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 784 words
Body


Among the latest acquisitions at the Little Museum of Dublin   now in temporary exile pending refurbishment of its Stephen s Green headquarters   is a thumb of Fr Mathew.
Not an actual relic, no. The earthly remains of Ireland s Apostle of Temperance (1790-1856) still repose in their entirety, as far as I know, in a cemetery in Cork.
This is just a stone thumb, from the statue on O Connell Street.
 But the story of its amputation is an amusing sub-plot in the social history of modern Ireland.
It happened back in July 1990, during the great homecoming reception for Jack Charlton s Republic of Ireland soccer team after the heroics in Italy.
When the open-top bus from the airport crawled through dense crowds in the city centre, statues and trees were highly prized as vantage points.
The lapidary Fr Mathew stood as usual with arms outstretched, as if still preaching about the evils of drink   as well he might have done during Italia 90, which had been a big setback for his life s cause.
Down at street level, meanwhile, a lady watched some local youngsters clamber onto and about the statue s person. One grabbed the thumb which broke off and fell to the ground.
So she picked it up and brought it home, meaning to return it to the Office of Public Works eventually. Instead, it spent the last 34 years as her souvenir of that time of national euphoria, before she finally donated it to the museum.
There must be a few similar mementoes on Dublin sideboards still, because when I took a stroll past him earlier this week, I noticed that poor Fr Mathew has barely a single finger left intact.
Whether by Italia 90, Stephen Roche s Tour de France, Barry McGuigan s world title, or one of the other causes for mass gatherings on Dublin s Main Street in the 1980s and 1990s, he has been digitally disenhanced to the tune of about 90 per cent.
We can hardly blame his sculptor, Mary Redmond, for not foreseeing this risk back in 1893. But contrast the more modern, and cannier, statue of Big Jim Larkin nearby.
Even as it exhorts the poor of Dublin  let us rise , its giant upraised hands are so far aloft as to be beyond the reach of anyone without specialist climbing equipment. Also, they re made of metal.
So too, luckily, is the statue of Parnell, which seems to be directing traffic to turn left at the end of the street. Its outstretched right arm, capable of seating two or three street urchins in comfort, would long ago have gone the way of the Venus de Milo s if it had been stone.
Parnell s traffic policing role aside, the statues of O Connell Street are like a straggling bus queue. They all face the same direction, standing at irregular distances, as if waiting for the 7A on O Connell Bridge.
With his extravagant hand gestures, Fr Mathew must once have looked as if he was complaining to the man immediately in front of him   Lord Nelson, as was   to close the gap on Larkin and the others before somebody cuts in.
As for the two at the top, William Smith O Brien and John Gray, not only do they have a better chance of catching the bus when it finally turns up, they are also less likely to lose limbs while waiting.
Both are stone. But Gray s right hand is clenched in a fist while his left is wrapped around a scroll. The even more sensible O Brien, meanwhile, has his arms folded.
Exhibits at the Little Museum of Dublin also include a piece of what used be the Nelson statue, although which piece is debated. It s certainly a chip off the old block, separated by the 1966 explosion or the resultant high-speed collision with O Connell Street.
The curators prefer to believe it s his nose. And there is support for this theory in the rest of the Nelson head, now residing in Pearse Street Library and clearly the victim of a rhinectomy.
I heard about the Father Mathew thumb on Saturday last, when attending one of the Little Museum s final tours prior to the six-month shut-down.
The most exciting bit, personally, was when our very funny guide Emma mentioned the first two Dubliners to be awarded the Nobel Prize for Literature and then, walking across the crowded room and grabbing me by the shoulders, said:  And here is the third.
I m not the first Irish Times writer to be wrongly told he has won a Nobel, although the last time it happened   to my former colleague John Banville   may have been somewhat more credible.
Still, I enjoyed the brief, deflected glory, before Emma revealed me to be standing in front of a portrait of the person she actually meant: Samuel Beckett.
Speaking of stand-ins, the Little Museum will relocate for its  sabbatical to No 33 Pembroke Street, near Matt the Thresher s restaurant. An exhibition has already opened there as the  History Factory and Pop-up Shop .

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Arizona reinstates abortion ban law dating from 1864
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 419 words
Byline: STEFANIA PALMA , LAUREN FEDOR
Body


STEFANIA PALMA  and LAUREN FEDOR  in Washington  Arizona s highest court has upheld a 160-year-old law banning nearly all abortions, a radical move in a critical swing state that could decide who wins the White House in November.
The state supreme court on Tuesday ruled that an 1864 ban on all abortions, except those aimed at saving a woman s life, is now enforceable.
The law does not include exceptions for women s health, or for victims of rape or incest. It carries a penalty of up to five years in prison for providers.
 Physicians are now on notice that all abortions, except those necessary to save a woman s life, are illegal,  wrote the justices, who voted 4-2 to revive a law that was written before Arizona was a state and women could vote. The state had previously banned abortions beyond 15 weeks of pregnancy.
Abortion rights have become a divisive issue in American politics since the US supreme court struck down Roe v Wade, the 1973 decision that had enshrined a constitutional right to an abortion. Several states have enforced laws that prohibit abortions almost entirely or with limited exceptions, after six weeks of pregnancy, when many women do not realise they are pregnant.
Arizona is an electoral battleground state where voters could tip the scales in November s election. Joe Biden defeated Donald Trump there by a margin of less than 11,000 votes in 2020. A Wall Street Journal poll out last week showed Mr Trump, the presumptive Republican nominee, leading Mr Biden by five points in the state, outside the margin of error.
On Monday Mr Trump said individual states, rather than the federal government, should have the power to regulate abortion. He did not comment on Tuesday s decision.
Central issue  Mr Biden has made support for reproductive rights a central issue in his campaign. On Tuesday he described the Arizona ruling as  a result of the extreme agenda of Republican elected officials who are committed to ripping away women s freedom .
Kris Mayes, Arizona s Democratic attorney general, suggested she would try to block prosecutions under the 19th century law, which she called  draconian . Voters in Arizona may have the opportunity to over-rule the decision. Arizona for Abortion Access, a coalition of abortion rights groups, said it had gathered enough petition signatures to put a constitutional amendment on the state ballot in November that would ensure access to the procedure up until approximately 24 weeks of pregnancy.     Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Augusta confines itself to minor course tinkering this time around; Tweaks unlikely to affect the longest hitters but may cause a change of approach for some
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 17
Length: 332 words
Byline: PHILIP REID
Body


PHILIP REID at Augusta National  Have we seen the end to mass changes to the course at Augusta National? Perhaps.
After the grand scale Tiger-proofing, which added more than 500 yards to the course over the years following Tiger Woods s first Masters win in 1997, only minor tinkering has taken place for this 88th edition of the tournament.
The Par 5 second hole has been increased by 10 yards to a length of 585 yards, making the already longest hole on the course a tad longer. The tee box on the hole has extended back and to the left in an effort to bring the right fairway bunker more into play.
There have been many changes over the years since Woods s dominant performance in  97, notably when 60 yards were added to the 18th in 2002 and 40 yards to the fifth in 2019. Last year, the Par 5 13th was extended by 40 yards after the club bought land from the neighbouring Augusta Country Club.
It came as no surprise that the second hole got toughened up: it has played as the easiest hole for the past three tournaments, playing to an average of 4.562 in that period.
Will it impact players?
Maybe not the longest hitters, with the likes of Rory McIlroy, Ludvig Aberg, Jon Rahm and Scottie Scheffler still able to fly the traps.
For others, it will cause a change of approach.
As Shane Lowry observed of his need to rein back:  I remember there was a couple of times last year when I could carry that bunker but I definitely can t this year. I might go back to where I played it a couple of years ago, where I lay back short and hit a 5-wood down there and try and make birdie that way.
The second hole, of course, witnessed Charl Schwartzel s albatross two in 2012 but has also on occasions shown its teeth with David Duval (2006) and Sam Byrd (1948) running up quintuple bogey 10s.
And of the need for any further change, there is one old master who thinks the time has come to call a halt.
 I don t know if there s any holes they need to lengthen. I really don t,  said 1992 champion Fred Couples.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Barcelona recover to produce another big night in Paris
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 608 words
Byline: BARNEY RONAY
Body


BARNEY RONAY at the Parc des Princes  On a gripping, frantic night at the Parc des Princes, Paris Saint-Germain and Barcelona produced a game that felt like the opposite of the  Barca DNA  Xavi had spoken about in the build-up.
Never mind control, patterns and a fight for space. This was an increasingly wild game, building from a mannered start into a second half of sweeping mob-handed attacks, feather-light defending and chances that simply came and went. By the end Barcelona had probably done enough to deserve their 3-2 first leg  lead. But nobody who watched the wilder parts of this game would see anything other than more goals on both sides there. Frankly, this could have been anything.
Inside its brutalist concrete walls the Parc was rocking at kick-off,The home team set out to stretch the pitch early on, wingers staying very wide, trying to disrupt the central yellow box.
PSG kept the ball for long periods, but this was stodgy possession, always funnelling the ball towards the two obvious outlets, Kylian Mbappé and Ousmane Dembélé.
Barça looked a far more supple attacking unit.  They duly took the lead on 35 minutes. Yamal s pass on the right. His cross was deflected back towards Raphinha, who finished beautifully, lofting the ball into the top corner. With De Jong and Ilkay Gündogan starting to take control in midfield, a 1-0 half-time lead was deserved.
Luis Enrique rejigged during the break, bringing on the jet-heeled Bradley Barcola for Asensio and shifting Dembélé to a roving No 9 role. It worked almost immediately, Dembélé drifting out to combine with Mbappé on the left, cutting inside and lashing a thrillingly powerful left-footed shot high into the net past Ter Stegen.
Within five minutes of the restart the game had turned on its head completely. This time the goal was beautifully constructed, Fabián Ruiz playing a lovely little delayed pass to meet Vitinha s run through the inside left channel who slid the ball into the corner of the net without breaking stride to make it 2-1 to PSG.
Faced with this sustained aggression,  Barcelona were clinging on. Xavi responded by sending on João Félix and Pedri, and just as quickly  they were level again. This was a beautiful goal, albeit one conceived and executed under zero pressure. Pedri had time to look up and loft a delicate pass right down the centre. Raphinha s volley into the corner on the run was a dreamy, high-craft piece of finishing.
By this stage Barcelona had Gündogan playing up front with Lewandowski, with Félix and Pedri just behind, and a hugely engaging sense of mild chaos in the air. Dembélé clipped a shot on to the post. But with 76 minutes gone it was 3-2 to the visitors, Andreas Christensen (having only just sneaked on to the pitch) heading straight in from a corner with his first touch of the ball, again unmolested by any kind of obvious defensive attention.
Barça hung on to their lead at the death, but only just. This one still has plenty of road left to run.   Guardian
PSG: Donnarumma, Marquinhos, Hernandez, Lucas Beraldo, Nuno Mendes, Lee (Zaire Emery 61), Vitinha, Fabian (Goncalo Ramos 85),Dembele, Asensio (Barcola 46), Kylian Mbappe. Subs not used: Navas, Ugarte, Danilo Pereira, Muani, Carlos Soler, Skriniar, Mayulu, Zague,Tenas. Booked: Vitinha,Lucas Beraldo. BARCELONA: ter Stegen, Kounde, Araujo, Cubarsi, Joao Cancelo, Gundogan (Lopez 86),Sergi Roberto (Gonzalez 61), de Jong (Christensen 76), Yamal (Joao Felix 61), Lewandowski, Raphinha (Torres 76). Subs not used: Martinez, Pena, Alonso, Romeu, Vitor Roque, Astralaga, Fort. Booked: Sergi Roberto, Cubarsi, Christensen,Lopez.  Referee: Anthony Taylor (England).

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Blind internet users struggle with error-prone AI aids; Unreliable software installed to comply with rules to help disabled people navigate online has prompted thousands of lawsuits
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 15
Length: 1036 words
Body


Jakob Rosin, a prominent member of Estonia s blind community, recalled browsing a sports club website with the help of audio software that reads out a description of the text and images shown on a screen.
Rosin listened to the screen reader, a tool to help him go through an online list of upcoming events at the club. However, he was confused when the audio described a toilet as it went through the schedule. He discovered later that the image of bullet points used for the list had prompted the mistake.
He told the club, which had installed AI-driven software on its website that automatically creates image descriptions for screen readers, about the slip. The club had  no idea  the software, set up with no manual intervention, was that unreliable, Rosin said.
The misleading readout, however, is not unusual and exposes weaknesses in the AI-generated software that many believe still needs fine-tuning.
In fact, such errors have sparked a bigger backlash worldwide, with a rise in the number of lawsuits over poor accessibility to websites for disabled people.
In the US, for example, lawsuits against companies  weak compliance with accessibility regulations have increased every year to more than 4,500 cases in 2023, data from UsableNet has shown. That is up 13 per cent from 2022.
More than 900 companies, including American department store JCPenney and luxury fashion label Prabal Gurung, last year faced legal action from individuals over claims of an alleged failure to provide equal digital access for disabled people in violation of the Americans with Disabilities Act.
The actions have come as hundreds of thousands of companies around the world   as many as 360,000, according to a Financial Times analysis of website data from internet research company BuiltWith   have turned to artificial intelligence-powered tools to comply with rules intended to ensure those with disabilities such as blindness can browse the internet easily.
Screen readers
At least 45 countries have some governmental policy in place related to making the internet accessible. This can mean providing image descriptions for blind users, removing animations that trigger epilepsy and delivering content in a way that assistive technologies, such as screen readers, can understand.
However, those businesses that rely on accessibility code assistants and  overlays    software that transforms a website so that it can be understood by assistive technologies   appear to have exposed themselves to more liabilities as the tools still need improving.
Software companies have begun to push AI-driven products to comply with European legislation that comes into force in June 2025, say several businesses that provide their clients with a bespoke service, rather than automated, to create more compliant websites.
Many of these software companies promoting AI say that one line of code will be enough to ensure compliance. These overlays are displayed on sites as varied as Mexico s state oil company Pemex, LVMH and London-listed outsourcing group Capita.
But there are questions about that claim, with the EU, for example, warning last year that companies cannot rely solely on AI to be compliant.
 Claims that a website can be made fully compliant without manual intervention are not realistic,  Brussels stated in a guide for European developers.
Some features of the overlays may help those who want to customise their digital experiences. However, disability advocates say that these software companies make promises they cannot deliver.
When they say  they re going to save you from being prosecuted or [that they re] going to fix accessibility 100 per cent, it s where it all falls apart , said Léonie Watson, who is blind and cofounded TetraLogical, a consultancy that creates bespoke accessibility solutions for their clients.
Blind users often say that overlays can make websites harder to navigate or that they interfere with assistive technologies.
An EqualWeb overlay for Inditex-owned fashion retailer Zara slowed the online experience for a screen reader user, for instance, when dealing with social media links, Rosin said.
 The product isn t ready,  added Rosin, who founded his own accessibility consultancy and chairs Estonian Blind Union, an organisation based in the Baltic state that advocates for partially sighted and blind people.
Anat Cohen, vice-president of business development at EqualWeb, said the issue on Zara s website was not related to the accessibility technology but  stems from the website s structural design .
 EqualWeb does not manage the website structure, but ensuring accessibility is our responsibility,  she added.
Mark Riccobono, president of the National Federation of the Blind in the US, said that, though lawsuits are needed to protect disability rights, his association tries to work with companies to improve their digital products first.
In addition to overlays, some companies are promoting generative AI  code assistants . These tools are meant to help developers by providing compliant code that they can copy or point out mistakes in existing code. But accessibility advocates have criticised the quality of these products too.
Progress is likely as AI technologies improve. In the meantime, many companies seen as reputable among disability advocates aim to be more transparent about the limitations of AI.
Level Access, an accessibility provider, has just bought UserWay, an overlay maker. Its founder and chief executive Timothy Springer has addressed some of the criticisms of UserWay s technology and has promised accuracy and transparency in Level Access marketing.
 We don t expect AI to fix all accessibility issues in the foreseeable future,  Springer said, adding that he recognises its limitations.  However, we are optimistic about AI s potential  in enhancing  the accessibility of digital content as part of a broader, integrated approach .
 We still have so many drawbacks,  added Rosin.  Maybe one day we will have AI which can help us and which can fix many issues, but definitely not today.
Rosin, in the meantime, has helped the Estonian sports club fix the software issue on its website that so confused him. It chose not to use AI.   Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Bovine breathalyser aims to keep cattle under emission limit; Capturing and analysing samples of a cow's exhaled breath help gauge concentration of methane and carbon dioxide
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 14
Length: 654 words
Body


Enteric ruminant emissions (also known as cattle belching) account for an estimated 68 per cent of total agri emissions in Ireland.
Jack Pilkington and Alan O Donovan, co-founders of Offaly-based Agri Data Analytics, are not disputing the figure but they believe it would be a lot more accurate if enteric excretions could be measured more precisely.
Cue their answer to the problem: a breathalyser for cows.
 Our aim is to provide agri-focused researchers with data they can use to identify high- and low-emitting ruminants, test methane-reducing supplements and determine ways of cutting carbon dioxide and methane output through genetic, dietary and supplementary means without compromising dairy and beef yields,  says Pilkington.
He adds the bovine breathalyser will also play a role in determining if the farming community is being  disproportionally blamed for the global climate crisis .
Hands-on testing is highly stressful for livestock so this was something the founders wanted to avoid from the get-go. What was needed was a way of encouraging the cattle to comply voluntarily and as feed is always a big attraction, the founders are using bait food to entice cattle to the trough.
As the animals move towards the food, the system will automatically read their identity tags and the breathalyser technology will start drawing air from the feeding tray once they begin to eat.
 Samples of the cow s exhaled breath are captured and processed using specialised gas sensors that can accurately determine the concentration of methane and carbon dioxide present,  O Donovan says.
 After an adequate amount of testing on a herd has taken place, we analyse all of the emissions data along with other performance and health parameters to determine the grams per day of methane and carbon dioxide emitted by each animal.
If Ireland is to achieve its COP26 methane targets by 2030, the agricultural sector here must reduce methane emissions by 25 per cent. One proposed solution is a national cull. Pilkington says this is not the answer as it would result in big job losses and price hikes.
 We felt there had to be another way and that data, and specifically the accurate measurement of emissions, had a role to play in finding an alternative solution,  he says.
 Genetics and diet both play their part in the level of methane emitted by any animal and agri-researchers believe it is possible to significantly reduce enteric bovine emissions through selective breeding programmes and supplementation.
 That s where we come in. The bovine breathalyser will provide the research community with both the hardware and the data it needs   at scale   to make these changes.
Both founders come from backgrounds in agribusiness engineering and fabrication and had seen researchers struggling with the limitations of existing measuring systems at first hand. After a period of R&D, they set up Agri Data Analytics in January last year and are testing their initial prototype.
The build of a second prototype is under way with more comprehensive field trials planned for this summer and the commercial unveiling of the device slated for the end of the year. The unit will be made in-house and will cost in the order of EUR 100,000 (a lot less than existing systems on the market) with a recurrent annual software licence fee of EUR 6,000.
The company s primary customers will be research organisations, meat processors and genetic/breeding services worldwide, with New Zealand and Australia as key potential markets.
 We re not targeting individual farmers at this time   that may come   but bodies such as the Irish Cattle Breeders Federation, Teagasc and researchers at UCD, who are focused on reducing bovine methane emissions,  Pilkington says.
Agri Data Analytics is a recent graduate of the Nova UCD AgTech accelerator, and investment in the business to date is roughly EUR 150,000 between founder equity and support from Enterprise Ireland.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Bringing the voices of 16th century Irish women to life; Trinity project will use AI and ChatGPT to transcribe documents from period
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 641 words
Byline: RONAN McGREEVY
Body


RONAN McGREEVY  History was, until recently, predominantly the stories of men, their deeds and misdeeds written by men for men.
This is particularly true the further you go back in time. Recovering women s voices from the past, when they had very little autonomy or power in comparison to men, is something that has eluded many scholars.
Voices: Life and Death, War and Peace, c1550-c1700   Voices of Women in Early Modern Ireland is a EUR 2.5 million, five-year European Research Council Advanced Grant project led by Prof Jane Ohlmeyer in the Trinity College Dublin School of Histories and Humanities.
It started in September and is using artificial intelligence (AI) to recover the voices of Irish women who lived in the 16th and 17th centuries.
These were the women who witnessed the Plantations, the overthrow of the old Gaelic order, the 1641 rebellion, the coming of Cromwell and the Williamite War.
Wills, court records, surveys, censuses and the 1641 depositions which followed the Catholic rebellion of that year have been word-checked for the voices of women whose records have been erased from the public memory.
They reveal the voices of strong-willed women attempting to navigate a world in which the odds were constantly stacked against them.
Eleanol Dardiz, of Jeffrystown, Co Westmeath, complained about her philandering husband Edward Nugent who had  forsaken  her and  estranged himself from herr (sic) and taken another woman to wife .
He had taken the things that she brought with her through her dowry into his new abode.
Give evidence She appealed to the Chancery Courts as she was legally unable to give evidence against her former husband at Common Law.
She asked the chancellor  to restore unto your suppliant all such goods as she brought him .
This, she felt, would relieve her current travails  until God shall work with him .
A wealthy Co Roscommon widow, Margaret Kavanagh, died without children and directed that her nephew, Moyler Bermingham, when he marries, can only do so with the consent of appointed members of her family and only marry a woman approved by them.
Businesswoman Catherine Strong was the personification of the old adage that  where s there s muck, there s money .
She was Dublin s town scavenger, whose role was to clean up the human and animal waste from the city centre, a dirty but lucrative job.
Documents show she made a fortune and became a creditor on the Dublin circuit at a time when banks were in their infancy. Eventually the merchants of Dublin complained that she was not a very good scavenger.
She was fired, along with her husband, Thomas White, in 1635, but by that stage Strong had her money made.
Extract the testimonies Prof Ohlmeyer said Irish women are  hiding in plain sight  in many of the documents from this time period. Machine learning and ChatGPT will be used to extract the testimonies of women in the historic documents.
 Women are largely absent from historical narratives, with the historical record privileging the perspectives of elites and elite men in particular,  she said. In many cases, women are better known in death than in life as wills are a valuable source of information.
 This is especially true in an Irish context when they are dominated by the political, by the military and by men.
 Their legal status is very compromised. A woman is effectively a chattel of her husband, but that does not mean that they don t get to exercise agency in marriages,  she said.
Fortunately, women make up a third of the cases taken in the Chancery Courts, the civil courts of that period, which has yielded a large amount of interesting information.
 Often they are business partners and where we see that is during times of war when men are taken off to fight and women are left minding the shop,  Prof Ohlmeyer said.
 It is at times of crisis that we see women very clearly.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Can management service charges be claimed as an expense against rental income?; Your queries answered
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 13
Length: 1274 words
Body


Q I was reading a previous Property Clinic query about management fees and have a related question. I have a rental property in Cork with 10 other landlords and we each pay about EUR 2,400 in an annual management fee (essentially it covers insurance, landscaping, presenting financial accounts, general repair and maintenance for the complex). It s a separate fee from the property management company who deal with individual unit issues (as distinct from the development complex) and generate a 10 per cent or so fee to identify tenants, deal with Residential Tenancies Board (RTB) forms, rental payments and so on.
Is the annual management service charge an allowable expense to offset rental income? I did open the allowable expenses link that you referenced in the article, but upon opening it, it didn t specifically address this fee, although it seemed to suggest that as long as it wasn t reimbursable from the tenant, it should qualify.
A You can claim certain expenses against your rental income to reduce the amount of tax you pay. Generally speaking, you may be able to take a full deduction for the annual costs of the service charges charged by the owners  management company (OMC). On its website, Revenue set out what expenses are allowed. It is important to consult a tax expert on the matter of what is allowed and what is not. The annual service charge is normally made up of several items on the service-charge budget which are the running costs of the development for the year. Sometimes in budgets, there is a sinking-fund item and, in this regard, it will be important to understand what the service charges are made up of to assess what may be allowed.
According to Revenue allowable expenses include:
                     nRates you pay to a local authority for the property;
                     nRents you pay for property such as ground rents;
                     nInsurance premiums against fire and public liability;
                     nMaintenance of your property such as cleaning, painting and decorating;
                     nProperty fees before you first rent out your property such as management, advertising, legal or accountancy fees;
                     nCost of any service or goods you provide that are not repaid by your tenant (such as electricity, central heating, telephone, service charges, water and refuse collection);
                     nCertain mortgage protection policy premiums;
                     nExpenses between lettings provided the landlord did not occupy the property before a new lease was signed;
                     nCapital allowances;
                     nRepairs such as rot treatment, mending windows, doors or machines;
                     nCertain pre-letting expenses on vacant residential property;
                     nThe cost of registering with the RTB.
You must keep full and accurate records of all expenses for each property you rent out.
 Although the sinking fund may be somewhat capital in nature, it is usually used and saved for future larger capital expenditure projects such as roof replacement or lift replacement and Revenue has set out what expenses are allowed. In many cases, it is the amount on the service charge invoice which is received from the OMC that is claimed against the rental income in a rental income computation.
 In addition to this, you can claim capital allowances on the cost of furniture and fittings in your property. This is known as a  wear-and-tear allowance  or  depreciation . The current rate for these allowances according to the Revenue website is 12.5 per cent of the cost per year for a maximum of eight years. Further information on all issues relating to tax allowances is available on revenue.ie and property owners must check this also.Aisling Keenan is a property managing agent and consultant and an associate member of the Society of Chartered Surveyors Ireland
We re over 70 and can t get a loan to improve our new home
Q My wife and I are retired and aged 71 and 72 respectively. We own two residential properties, neither subject to any debt, and wish to sell our current home and move to the smaller property having first refurbished and updated it. An issue arises in that we need to source short-term finance to carry out the refurbishment   what would historically have been classified as a  bridging loan .
Despite having more than adequate capital security to offer, together with a clear exit strategy through the sale of our current home we now find that the mainstream banks do not in principle offer bridging loans nor are they prepared to lend in any form to over-70s.
Where else might we source such funding?
A Before I address your question, I wanted to say congratulations on having two debt-free properties. This must have taken enormous planning, not to mention sacrifice, over the years. I m sure it will all be worth it when you finally downsize and realise your long-term plan of moving into the smaller home. Then it will be time to enjoy the nest egg that selling the second property brings. If I were a lending agency, and you came to me, I d certainly back you all the way with your money-management capabilities.
I m sure you looked in all the obvious places but, your local credit union may be willing to give a loan for upgrades. There is also the Housing Aid for Older People Grant for those aged 66 and over (see gov.ie).
You can use this grant for some essentials such as repair or replacement of the roof, upgrading the electrical wiring, the repair or replacement of doors and windows, and for the installation of central heating (where there is no central heating, or it is broken beyond economic repair). This grant is means tested and is aimed at those living in the home, so you may not qualify but perhaps some other readers may.
Another source of funding might be the Sustainable Energy Authority of Ireland (SEAI). It offers a range of thermal and energy-upgrade grants. You might also look at an equity-release plan on your property. This is outside my area of expertise so you will have to seek advice from a financial adviser.
You are likely to have drawn down your pension but if not, I believe you must do so by 75 years so there may be an opportunity here to avail of money not yet utilised. Again, this is not my field, but it might be worthwhile for you to speak to your pension broker or to get advice from the National Pension Helpline.
But let s take a step back for a moment. Do you know how much money you need to do your refurbishment? Have you had someone throw a professional eye over it? Is it cosmetic or something more? Did you know that if you improve more than 25 per cent of the thermal envelope of the dwelling that your works may fall under what is defined as  major renovations  for purposes of the home energy grant?
To meet the requirements of this scheme you may have to look at solutions you had not previously considered? Perhaps you have looked at all of this already. Perhaps you know exactly what it is that is needed, as well as what you d like.
It is just as important, however, to consider what impacts your chosen upgrades may have on your property s health. It is always advisable to consult a construction professional, such as a chartered building surveyor to conduct an analysis of the upgrade requirements.
They will be able to cross-check the suitability of the upgrade with the building s ability to function properly and advise you on the best way to achieve your requirements without negatively impacting the performance of the building.
 Brigid Browne is a  chartered building surveyor and a member of the Society of  Chartered Surveyors Ireland

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Classic elegance with modern comforts
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 10
Length: 644 words
Byline: KEVIN COURTNEY
Body


KEVIN COURTNEY
 Milliner and jeweller Tahnee Morgan loves old things and her passion is evident in the fine furnishings and details in the bay-fronted home in Frascati Park, Blackrock, where she lives with her husband, Shane, and their three teenage children.
The house, nestled in a quiet street behind the Frascati Centre, was built in the 1920s but inside it looks positively Georgian with sash windows, period-style doors, ceiling coving and centre roses installed by the Old Mould Company. There are old wrought-iron radiators and lovely stained-glass windows on either side of the front door.
Add in the beautiful pieces of furniture that Morgan picked up at markets and auctions over the years   including a wonderful stained-glass hall lantern bequeathed by her mother   and you ve got a home that exudes old-world elegance while providing a cosy, modern living space in one of south Dublin s most sought-after locations.
The original house might have been a tad small for a family of five, but when Tahnee and Shane bought it, they put in a new kitchen/breakfast/ diningroom extension to the rear, creating a warm and welcoming family hub. They installed a Newcastle Design kitchen with a huge centre island, plus a Belfast sink and marble worktops. Hardwood flooring gives the area a solid feel underfoot.
Morgan was adamant that she wouldn t put modern glass doors to the back, instead putting in huge multi-paned floor- to-ceiling sash windows with window seats, and big double doors leading out to the pretty, private back garden. Rooflights in the ceiling bring in even more light.
The couple also converted the attic to a spacious room which runs the width of the house. With the added attic room, the overall floor area extends to a generous 197sq m (2,120sq ft). Number 31 Frascati Park has a Ber of C3 and is for sale through Sherry FitzGerald, asking EUR 1.35 million.
The house is ideally located on a quiet terrace close to Blackrock village, nestled behind high hedgerows and sliding gates. The private, landscaped front garden has mature hedging and railings, a mix of paving and gravel, and space for two cars.
Behind the Georgian-style front door is an entrance hall with ceramic tiled floor and ceiling cornicing. To the left is the drawingroom, which has a bay window overlooking the front garden and a feature marble fireplace with black granite hearth. Morgan has added tasteful pieces of old furniture in the drawingroom and hallway, nicely complementing the cornicing and ceiling rose.
To the right is a small study/home office with timber-panelled walls and fitted cupboards, ceiling coving, wall lights and window seats. Behind the drawingroom is the TV/family room with ceramic tiled floor, fitted display shelving, ceiling cornicing and centre rose, with glazed panelled doors leading to the kitchen/dining extension. The guest WC downstairs is a real Victorian-style loo, with tiled floor and vintage-style wallpaper.
Completing the downstairs is a large utility room behind the kitchen and understairs storage in the hall.
Upstairs, the spacious landing is almost a room unto itself, with windows and door leading to the balcony. This is currently being used as a music room, but could also be a peaceful space for reading or doing yoga. For Morgan, peace and tranquillity are a priority, and the house certainly reflects that relaxed atmosphere.
The main bedroom is a large double with bay window overlooking the front and a fully tiled shower room en suite with rain showerhead, washbasin with mirror and a heated towel rail. To the back is a large dressingroom/walk-in wardrobe with lots of fitted shelving, shoe storage racks and storage for all your woollens, plus a large chest of drawers and a dressing mirror.
There are two more double bedrooms overlooking the back garden, and a fully tiled family bathroom looking out to the front.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Connacht have a 'point to prove' as they travel to Treviso
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 18
Length: 505 words
Byline: LINLEY MacKENZIE
Body


LINLEY MacKENZIE  Connacht have a  point to prove  when they travel to Treviso to face Benetton in Sunday s European Challenge Cup quarter-final.
As well as losing to Benetton in the URC last month, Connacht were heavily beaten when they visited the Italians in the competition s last-16 in April 2023.
 Any time you lose a tight game, you want to have a crack at that team as soon as possible,  says head coach Pete Wilkins.  When we looked at the draw and realised we could be playing Benetton or the Lions, I think we would have welcomed either, and for similar reasons. We felt like we hadn t done ourselves full justice in both games, but in very different ways.
Connacht s recent record against Benetton is not the best. But having lost to the Italian outfit in the URC just two weeks ago by 18-14, Wilkins is looking on the bright side.
 As much as a home game would be great for us and our supporters, to be going back to the same venue, the same hotel and a similar assignment, it helps focus minds for us. The important bit is that we build on that previous game through those lessons learned, and maybe one or two things Benetton haven t seen from us before.
Last Sunday s 30-40 win away to Pau has certainly boosted Connacht confidence, particularly the growing physicality of his players since that Lions  loss.
 Physicality and energy in my mind should be a trademark of any Connacht team and every Connacht player, and it has been historically so crucial to all games, not just games we have won, but games in which we have been really competitive.
 We have seen a consistency of delivering that physicality and energy against some really good teams away from home, and that will need to continue this week.
Last weekend s victory in France   the first outright knock-out game the club has won at this stage of the competition   is significant for Connacht, he says.  Any time you are in knock-out rugby, you see the attention that grows on the back of it. To win that game in Pau is huge for us.
 For me personally it s important because we are on the right track   not the finished article and nor am I as a coach   but I think we are getting better all the time collectively. You have to win games and pressure games to prove you are moving in the right direction, so it gives me confidence we are on the right track, but we are hungry for more.
And in a rare move, Connacht are chartering a plane to Treviso for this cup clash.
 It s massive for us.  Wilkins says.  We can travel Saturday morning and do the captain s run. There is not a huge waiting around airports trying to get flight connections.
Wilkins says the move by Connacht CEO Willie Ruane to charter is important for the team.  It shows the confidence the club has in the team at the moment, for which I m really grateful.
Two key players in Connacht s win over Pau, Jarrad Butler and Shayne Bolton, will be missing from action for this week s quarter-final. Butler (head) is undergoing return to play protocols while right wing Bolton suffered a thigh injury.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Court told of Quinn Group link to search; Search of premises of late gangster's brother part of inquiry into Cavan attacks
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 606 words
Body


A retired Garda superintendent has told the High Court that a search of the business yard of a brother of the late gangster Cyril  Dublin Jimmy  McGuinness was part of a major investigation into millions of euro in damage to former Quinn Group property.
Fergus Treanor said a search carried out at the Swords, Co Dublin, premises of Fran McGuinness (62) in August 2014 arose specifically out of the sighting of a Jeep Cherokee at the yard shortly before the vehicle was used in an arson attack on the Quinn Packaging Plant in Ballyconnell, Co Cavan, on March 13th, 2014.
Mr McGuinness, a truck dealer originally from Pinnock Hill, Swords, currently living on the Dublin Road, Newry, Co Down, claims he has been the victim of Garda harassment over several years because Cyril McGuinness, who was the suspected mastermind behind a series of attacks on former Quinn premises in 2013/14, is his brother.
The court heard Operation Larissa was set up by gardaí to investigate those behind the attacks. Cyril McGuinness died in 2019 of a cardiac arrest shortly after he collapsed during a police search of his home in Derbyshire, England. Fran McGuinness told the court he had been estranged from his brother for many years.
Mr McGuinness is suing the Garda Commissioner and the State over what he says was the unlawful search in August 2014 of his truck-dealing business premises next door to the house where he grew up. He claims gardaí wrongly associated him with the Quinn attacks and that information used to swear the warrant for the search was untrue.
He claims gardaí caused unnecessary damage to two gates at the premises by using an acetylene torch and seized important documents for his UK truck-trading companies. They also took envelopes containing £2,000 and EUR 1,800 which he said were commission payments for other traders that he later had to make up for. The defendants deny the claims, say the search was lawful, that there were no envelopes containing money and that copies of other documents seized were returned to Mr McGuinness.
Giving evidence yesterday, Mr Treanor said some EUR 600,000 worth of damage was done to the Quinn Group packaging plant and the lives of 30 employees there were put in danger in 2014. Mr Treanor, who was the lead officer on the investigation into the Quinn attacks at the time, said this incident was one of a number that happened almost every fortnight around that time.
The attacks ultimately caused some EUR 6 million of damage to property and put people s lives at risk, Mr Treanor said. The frequency and nature of the attacks would suggest they were done by highly organised criminals, he said.
The attack involving the Jeep Cherokee saw the roof of the vehicle cut off, it being packed with burning tyres and driven into the lobby of the packaging operation. Gardaí were able to establish the vehicle had been seen in Fran McGuinness s yard in Swords at a specific time and date, he said.
A warrant was obtained for the premises to search for any evidence that might develop towards a criminal prosecution, he said.
Asked by Gerard Clarke SC, for the defendants, if he apprehended any danger at the Pinnock Hill search, Mr Treanor said he had been aware of the McGuinness family for more than 30 years. He briefed Det Sgt James Fraher, who led the search, of potential dangers including the risk of violence, obstruction and the possibility for a major confrontation.
Under cross-examination by Eanna Mulloy SC,  Mr Treanor rejected the suggestion that gardaí were heavy handed in their approach to the search.  He was quite satisfied the search was carried out properly.
The case continues today.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Create a home that delights the senses
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 2
Length: 970 words
Body


When planning the design of our homes, aesthetics typically take centre stage. We can get caught up in choosing the right colours, furniture, and decor to make our rooms look good. But to make your home feel good, you ve got to think about more than just how it looks. That s where the idea of multisensory design comes in. It s about creating a space that engages all your senses   sight, touch, sound, smell and even taste. So, if your home feels like it s missing something, here are some ways to make small adjustments to transform it into an inviting and harmonious space that will delight all five of your senses.
Sight: colour and light The two most important considerations for appealing to the sense of sight are colour choice and lighting. The paint colours you choose can profoundly impact the mood and atmosphere of a space, while lighting can alter those colours depending on the orientation of the room and the type of bulbs you use.
When selecting paint colours, start by deciding the mood you want to create in the room. Warm colours will tend to create a stimulating effect, while cooler colours, such as blues, soft greens and greys, will produce a more calming and relaxing atmosphere.
When it comes to lighting, the trick is to balance artificial and natural light. Too much artificial light will result in a space that feels clinical. But if it is under-lit, everything will appear gloomy and uninviting. Always try to maximise the amount of natural light in your rooms. Window dressings like curtains and blinds can contribute to blocking natural light. Pull back curtains clear from the windows to maximise daylight. Remove items on windowsills that might obstruct light, such as plants or bulky ornaments. Avoid pelmets or decorative blinds that can block sunlight and make a room feel dark.
When tackling artificial lighting, make sure you use warm- toned light bulbs. This will make the room feel cosy, and where possible, swap your switches for dimmers so you can control the light level in the room, be it low ambient light to relax and entertain or brighter light to read and work.
Touch: texture and comfort Mixing fabrics in different textures is a great way to add depth and interest to a room while encouraging interaction and enhancing comfort. Incorporate tactile materials like plush throws, soft cushions and textured upholstery in spaces where you like to relax and unwind.
Pay attention to everyday touchpoints such as door handles, stair handrails, and taps. Choose high-quality fittings that feel good and function well, making daily interactions more enjoyable.
Introduce rugs to hard flooring such as wood or tiles to add warmth and texture underfoot. Consider fitting wall-to-wall curtains in living spaces and bedrooms. Not only are they a practical investment helping to insulate against drafts, but they also help to make the space feel more comfortable and luxurious.
Smell: fragrance and air quality
 Our sense of smell significantly impacts our emotions and memories, making it essential to creating a comfortable and inviting home environment.
Proper ventilation is crucial, especially in areas prone to moisture build-up, like kitchens and bathrooms. Open windows regularly for fresh air and install ventilation systems that expel air outdoors to prevent the accumulation of harmful fumes and maintain air quality throughout your home.
Be aware of potential sources of harmful chemicals, such as harsh cleaning products or volatile organic compounds (VOCs) released from furnishings. To maintain a healthy environment, choose natural cleaning products whenever possible and prioritise chemical-free, VOC-free options for items such as carpets, flooring, upholstery, and paint. This will help keep your home smelling fresh while promoting a healthier living space.
House plants are a wonderful addition to any room; not only do they look beautiful but they have a wealth of health benefits both mental and physical   from purifying the air  to reducing stress levels.
Taste: culinary delights Although taste might not be an immediate consideration in home design, it plays a vital role in our culinary experiences and overall enjoyment of food. Thoughtfully designing your kitchen can stimulate your sense of taste and foster a more engaging environment.
Our perception of taste begins with visual presentation. We  eat with our eyes , so investing in visually appealing crockery and glassware can help to elevate mealtime enjoyment. Store food in a way that creates visual appeal, using attractive containers and organising your pantry and refrigerator for easy access.
Extend the culinary experience beyond the kitchen by creating inviting dining spaces that foster connection and conversation. Comfortable seating, ambient lighting, and tasteful decor elevate the atmosphere, ensuring that every meal shared with family and friends is memorable.
Sound: harmony and tranquillity Sound plays a significant role in shaping our mood, wellbeing and perception of our surroundings. By thoughtfully managing acoustics within your home, you can create a serene environment that nurtures tranquillity.
To reduce external noise from traffic or alarms, invest in quality windows. Upgrading from single to double glazing can significantly diminish unwanted sounds. For apartments or terraced homes, install a layer of soundboard on shared walls to maintain privacy and tranquillity. Opting for solid internal doors instead of hollow ones will minimise sound transmission between rooms.
Strategic layout planning is crucial. Position quiet spaces away from noisy areas and consider floor insulation to minimise sound travel. Additionally, enhance your living space with soothing sounds such as gentle music or nature recordings and invest in quality sound systems for an immersive auditory experience.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Dairygold sees fall in revenue and profit; Cork-based dairy processor says turnover was down 15% to EUR 1.4 billion last year
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 16
Length: 551 words
Byline: EOIN BURKE-KENNEDY
Body


EOIN BURKE-KENNEDY
 Cork-based dairy processor Dairygold has reported a significant fall-off in revenue and profit for 2023 on the back of lower milk output, weaker global demand and ongoing cost pressures linked to the inflationary crisis.
In its latest set of annual results, the group also warned that retaining Ireland s current derogation from the European Union s nitrates directive was  absolutely critical  for farmer and processor viability.
The State s third-largest milk processor said turnover fell by 15 per cent to EUR 1.4 billion last year, a decrease of EUR 254.7 million compared with 2022, which it said reflected  the significant fall in market returns over the course of 2023 .
Operating profit fell by more than 40 per cent to EUR 23.9 million.
The group said the weaker results also reflected   in part   the board s decision to pay stronger milk and grain prices to suppliers to  minimise the impact  at farm level. The co-op s average quoted milk price for 2023 was 38.4 cents per litre, down 16.5 cents on the previous year.
After a strong 2022, dairy market conditions globally deteriorated last year on the back of softer Chinese demand, driven by a weaker Chinese economy and Beijing s drive for greater dairy self-sufficiency.
Significant inflationary pressures also impacted consumer spending with sales volumes being  adversely affected .
Dairygold interim chief executive Michael Harte said: 2023 was a difficult year for the dairy and tillage sectors, as market returns declined significantly from the unprecedented highs of 2022.
Weather conditions
 Unfavourable weather conditions, combined with continued high input and processing costs, created a perfect storm for farmers and processors alike,  he said.
Dairygold said it processed 1.41 billion litres of milk last year, a 4.7 per cent decrease  on the previous year, making the third-largest dairy processor on the island. Cheese accounted for over 40 per cent of its product. It sells about 90,000 tonnes of dairy products through export agency Ornua.
The group s largest division Dairy Ireland saw turnover fall to EUR 795 million, a decrease of EUR 239 million on 2022, primarily reflecting a year-on-year decrease in market returns but also a reduction in milk supply.
 The level of future milk volumes will largely depend on how the sustainability challenges are addressed by the dairy industry and this is a critical focus for the society,  Dairygold said.
Mr Harte said it was  absolutely critical  for the Irish dairy industry that the current nitrates derogation is retained at 220kg organic nitrogen per hectare when the current four-year derogation is reviewed at the end of next year.
Ireland is one of three EU member states that has a derogation to enable some farmers to work with higher nitrate levels but the derogation is coming under pressure as a result of declining levels of water quality linked to a massive expansion in dairy since the lifting of EU milk quotas in 2015,  he said.
 If the 220kg disappears and we re back to 170kg (the standard level allowed across the EU) that s going to have an impact on future milk volumes across the industry, which will have an impact on farmer viability which will have an impact on processor viability and will have a significant impact on the rural economy as well.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Davy seeks EUR 26.5m for MetLife's Dublin office
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 371 words
Byline: RONALD QUINLAN
Body


RONALD QUINLAN
 A fund managed by Davy Real Estate is seeking EUR 26.5 million for a prime office investment on Lower Hatch Street in Dublin city centre.
While the sale of  20 on Hatch  at that level would provide a purchaser with a net initial yield of 8.07 per cent according to selling agent Savills, the figure represents a 34 per cent drop in the EUR 40 million valuation the Davy Irish Property Fund ascribed to the building in 2018. The fund paid EUR 27.5 million to secure ownership of 20 on Hatch in 2014.
The subject property comprises a six-storey-over-basement office building of 44,735sq ft (4,156sq m) and is leased in its entirety to the medical-device specialist Medtronic and to the global financial services provider MetLife.
MetLife is the majority occupier at the property with five floors taken up by its operations. In 2018, the company extended its existing lease term for 10 years, at an agreed rent in excess of EUR 50 per square foot. 20 on Hatch serves as Metlife s operational office headquarters for western and central Europe. The company expanded its Irish presence further in 2017 when it opened a global technology campus in Galway.
While Medtronic s operational headquarters are in Minneapolis, Minnesota, the company s principal executive offices are located at 20 on Hatch. The company occupies the remaining floor of the building.
The weighted average unexpired lease term (Wault) is about three years according to Savills. The building has a C3 Ber rating at present, and as such, would require investment to bring its sustainability credentials up to the standards typically found in the latest generation of office buildings.
20 on Hatch occupies a much sought-after location in the heart of Dublin s central business district. Employers in the immediate area include blue-chip law firms Arthur Cox and Eversheds Sutherland, and Big Four accountants and consultants Deloitte.
Commenting on the sale, Fergus O Farrell of Savills said:  This is a prime opportunity to secure a prestigious office investment in a sought-after Dublin location. With a strong tenant base and the advantage of significant repositioning potential, this property represents a strategic acquisition for discerning investors.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Diocesan downsizing only the start as attendance falls; Six Catholic dioceses in Connacht are to reduced to three
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 791 words
Body


So it begins. The West of Ireland s six Catholic dioceses in Connacht are reduced to three, with the Archdiocese of Tuam taking over Killala; Elphin taking over Achonry; and Galway already  running  Clonfert.
There is every reason to believe a similar pattern will soon manifest itself in the island s three other Catholic Church metropolitan areas, corresponding to the other three provinces of Ulster, Munster and Leinster, respectively the Archdioceses of Armagh, Cashel and Dublin.
Driven by a declining number of clergy, whose average age is now in the early 70s (priests and bishops retire at 75), declining attendances at Masses and other liturgies, an increase in civil marriages, and declining income generally, necessity has become the mother of invention where a restructuring of Catholic Ireland is concerned.
Predictably, some would say, Wednesday s announcement at Tuam s Catholic Cathedral in Co Galway happened without the knowledge of a majority of clergy in either Achonry or Killala dioceses and without any consultation whatsoever with the laity in either.
It was made by the new papal nuncio to Ireland Archbishop Luis Mariano Montemayor, an Argentinian who arrived in Dublin from Colombia less than a year ago after service in Ethiopia, Brazil, Thailand, Rome, Senegal, Guinea-Bissau, Cape Verde, Mauritania and the Democratic Republic of Congo.
That said, the reorganisation makes sense as the total Catholic population of the six Connacht dioceses, for instance, is approximately 462,000 compared to the 1.12 million in the Archdiocese of Dublin alone. Bishop of Achonry Paul Dempsey (52) is to be transferred to Dublin as its second Auxiliary Bishop alongside Bishop Donal Roche (65), appointed last month to assist Archbishop of Dublin Dermot Farrell (69).
Bishop Dempsey grew up in Athy, Co Kildare which is in the Dublin Archdiocese. As Archbishop Farrell said yesterday, his new Auxiliary is  no stranger to these parts  and whose  fresh ideas, and deep motivation, his personal warmth and evident closeness to people on the ground, and his experience of ministry in the west of Ireland, will be of service in the deepening the unity of the Church in our land .
In Ulster, or the Armagh metropolitan area of the Catholic Church on this island, two of its nine dioceses are currently without bishops. Archbishop of Armagh and Catholic Primate Archbishop Eamon Martin has been Administrator of the small Co Down Dromore diocese since 2018 when then Bishop of Dromore John McAreavey resigned following controversy around the late child sex abuser Fr Malachy Finnegan.
Last month former Bishop of Raphoe in Co Donegal, Alan McGuckian, became Bishop of Down and Connor in Belfast, with Msgr Kevin Gillespie appointed Administrator in Raphoe. It has been speculated that Raphoe and the diocese of Derry may be amalgamated on the retirement of current Bishop of Derry, Donal McKeown, who will be 75 in April of next year.
Also coming up to retirement is Bishop of Clogher (mainly Monaghan) Larry Duffy who will be 75 in 2026.
In the Munster, Cashel Archdiocesan metropolitan area, the Bishop of Cloyne (mainly Co Cork) diocese William Crean will reach retirement age in 2026. Before Bishop Crean s appointment in 2013, then Archbishop of Cashel Dermot Clifford had also acted as Administrator of Cloyne following the 2010 resignation of Bishop John Magee in a controversy over his dealings with clerical child sex abuse allegations.
Most other Catholic bishops in Ireland are still some years from retirement so the amalgamation of other dioceses is likely to be a gradual process over the coming decades. Meanwhile, and following yesterday s announcement, Ireland s 26 Catholic dioceses have 21 bishops, with an additional two Auxiliary Bishops in Dublin and Auxiliary Bishop Michael Router in Armagh.
The Church of Ireland, which had the same diocesesian structure,  established at   the Synod of Ráth Breasail in 1111 AD and the following Synod of Kells in 1152, has reduced its dioceses to 11 with just two Archbishops, in Armagh and Dublin.
Its United Dioceses of Tuam, Limerick and Killaloe came into being in 2021 when the United Dioceses of Limerick and Killaloe, and the United Dioceses of Tuam, Killala and Achonry, were amalgamated under one bishop.
Far and away the biggest Irish diocese geographically, it covers almost a third of the island of Ireland, including areas of the midlands, the west and southwest.
Bishop of the new United Dioceses of Tuam, Limerick and Killaloe is Michael Burrows or, to give him his full title, Bishop of Tuam, Killala, Achonry, Limerick, Ardfert, Aghadoe, Killaloe, Kilfenora, Clonfert, Kilmacduagh and Emly. Between April and May 2022, he was enthroned in all the United Diocese s six cathedrals.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Dispute over number of aid trucks entering Gaza
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 500 words
Byline: MICHAEL JANSEN
Body


MICHAEL JANSEN  Muslims yesterday began Eid al-Fitr, the three-day feast which ends the fasting month of Ramadan,
but it was overshadowed by the war in Gaza, which faces widespread famine.
In advance of the feast, US president Joe Biden urged Israel to increase the amount of food aid to Gaza. Israel responded by announcing that 322 aid trucks entered Gaza on Sunday, 419 on Monday, and 458 on Tuesday. These were the highest figures for trucks admitted on a daily basis since the war began in October.
However, Egyptian Red Crescent officials said 258 trucks had crossed from Egypt into Gaza on Sunday and 350 on Monday. The UN agency caring for Palestinian refugees, Unrwa, said 223 trucks had entered Gaza on Monday. Unrwa said:  There has been no significant change in the volume of humanitarian supplies entering Gaza or improved access to the north.  Unrwa commissioner general Philippe Lazzarini told the BBC that the number of aid trucks entering Gaza daily has been between 150-180, far below the 500 that crossed each day before the war began.
 We have been warning for months about looming famine in the Gaza Strip,  said Mr Lazzarini.  We need to flood Gaza with aid.  On the discrepancies between Israel and aid groups on the number of aid trucks crossing into Gaza, Jens Laerke, spokesman for the UN Office for the Co-ordination of Humanitarian Affairs, said Israel  typically counted the half-filled trucks going through an initial screening process [which can exclude 20-25 trucks daily], rather than [counting] repacked full trucks which enter Gaza .
 The reality  Mr Laerke said UN food deliveries in Gaza are  much more likely to be impeded or denied compared to other humanitarian aid, and aid for northern Gaza   where 70 per cent of the people face famine  s three times more likely to be denied.
In a statement to The Irish Times, Médecins Sans Frontières Palestinian mission chief Leo Cans said:  We can also see differences between the Israeli announcements of trucks coming in and the reality in the field.
Recent plan He welcomed Israel s recent plan to open the northern Erez terminal for aid deliveries but said:  We haven t seen any concrete action [there] or any substantial aid going through Erez.  Mr Cans said  the north is a siege within a siege .
Commenting on risks to relief workers, he said:  We lost five colleagues since the beginning of the war.  Mr Cans said general insecurity and the lack of respect for aid workers make it extremely challenging to deliver aid,  even if we manage to get it inside Gaza .
Despite differences between Israel and aid agencies, US national security adviser Jake Sullivan commended Israel s withdrawal from the city of Khan Younis and said it provides  a greater opening for the movement of humanitarian goods around Gaza at a critical moment when there is a real humanitarian crisis there .
Israel denies it is obstructing aid, contends supplies for civilians are not limited and blames UN inefficiency for delays and shortages.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



ECB expected to hold fire on rate cut
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 314 words
Body


The European Central Bank (ECB) is not expected to lower interest rates at its meeting today but investors will be looking for confirmation that a June rate cut is on the cards.
The potential fly in the ointment is wage growth which is pushing inflation in the services sector, now seen as the stickiest part of the equation.
ECB policymakers have repeatedly highlighted first-quarter wage data, due out in late May, as a key reference point that will inform June s rate decision.
Compensation per employee declined to 4.6 per cent in the fourth quarter from 5.1 per cent three months earlier but remains well above the 3 per cent level that Frankfurt considers to be in harmony with its 2 per cent inflation target.
The ECB doesn t offer clear guidance on the timing or the size of rate changes, leaving market analysts to read the tea leaves. In practice that means parsing ECB chief Christine Lagarde s (pictured) post-rate announcement commentary.
If she admits that rate-cutting discussions are under way in response to further signs of disinflation, this will be interpreted as laying the groundwork for a rate cut at its next meeting in June, according to Matthew Ryan of financial services firm Ebury.
 This week s meeting will be an exercise in rhetoric for Lagarde. We think that she ll proclaim that the bank has higher conviction that inflation is returning to target, while repeating that policymakers will have more information in June,  he said.
 She will probably also say that the first discussions on lower rates were had this week, which markets should perceive as a clear indication that a cut is almost certainly on the way at the next meeting.
Markets expect Frankfurt to implement a sequence of rate cuts in the second half of 2024, two or three or even possibly four but to proceed with caution. All of which would amount to a 1 per cent decline in rates by Christmas.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Elevated five-bed on edge of Clonakilty
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 12
Length: 534 words
Byline: MIRIAM MULCAHY
Body


MIRIAM MULCAHY
 A spacious, detached five-bed called White Rock lies in Gallanes, a quiet country area to the north of Clonakilty in west Cork. It was built in 2002 and remodelled by the owners in 2010. The property is now on the market through Charles McCarthy Estate Agents, seeking EUR 945,000.
Ideal for a family looking for a lifestyle change, and who can work remotely, it offers country living just a 10-minute walk from the bustling market town of Clon, as the locals call it, and the unsurpassed beauty of wide open beaches such as Inchydoney, Owenahincha or Long Strand.
Set on a lush, elevated site with well-tended gardens, it s a house of many windows, sloping eaves and surprises. The front drive is asphalt with parking for multiple cars   a two-storey garage is linked to the house by a decorative stone arch, it has parking for two cars and also contains a shower and WC, so could be  converted to extra living, working space or even a home gym.
The front door opens into a large, hexagonal-shaped hall with high ceilings. Double doors open on to a livingroom with a stove to the front of the house.
Behind this room lies another livingroom, connected to a kitchen and a bedroom with en suite that could serve as guest accommodation for a family or an au pair.
No expense has been spared in the materials put into the renovation, with solid wood floors in cherry and oak, and triple-glazed Aluclad windows, that rise to double height at the back of the house.
The owner doubled the house in size, bringing the overall area to 400sq m (4,306sq ft). The Ber is B3 and the house has five bathrooms, along with a guest WC off the hall.
A large, glazed living area runs from the front to the back of the house on its left-hand side; it benefits from the sun all day long, the owners are often sitting outside on the sheltered deck at 10pm enjoying summer sunsets.
The kitchen sits in the centre of this space; it has an island, granite worktops and terracotta-tiled floors. There s a stepped-down dining area with conservatory off it that one of the owners is using from which to work, but when their children were young they say they had a table-tennis table here.
Towards the back of the house, there is a large living area with dining table, doors leading outside to the covered deck and outdoor terrace.  This is one of those homes where the outside comes easily in and both blend. There s a stove here, and more doors out to the garden.
There are four bedrooms on the first floor. The large principal bedroom lies to the back of the house with another big  window built into the apex of the roof, with beams running down its length.
There is a well-appointed en suite beside it with a free-standing, claw-footed bath looking out over the countryside. Two more bedrooms also have en suites.
In the garden, as well as the usual tropical plants that thrive in the southwest such as cordyline, hydrangea and montbretia, the owner has planted Holm oak threes, maples and birches. Right-sizing, the owners are staying in the area, saying it is a paradise for families, with great schools in Clonakilty, all kinds of sports, including rugby and GAA and any amount of watersports to be enjoyed on the coast.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



EUR 420,000
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 6
Length: 208 words
Body


Address: Apartment 8, Earlsfield Court, 79-87 Francis Street, Dublin 8 Agent: Auctioneera Situated in a well-maintained development with landscaped communal gardens   including a roof terrace   this three-bedroom apartment extends to 90sq m (969sq ft). With a designated parking space, the unit which has two bathrooms lies in the antique quarter of Dublin city, so is accessible to an array of shops, eateries and colleges.  Three bedrooms, Ber of B3, a car space and a short stroll to the city centre  Some rooms appear dark due to navy paint   but it s an easy cosmetic fix Address: Ahaguilla, Clonakilty, West Cork Agent: Sherry FitzGerald O Neill West Cork Standing on almost three acres about four miles from the town of Clonakilty, this extended farmhouse extends to a considerable 298sq m (3,200sq ft). As it was enlarged to become a retreat centre, it currently has 12 bedrooms but could easily be reduced to a more manageable number. As it has lain idle for a number of years, it should qualify for the vacant property refurbishment grant according to its selling agent. It has a Ber of D2 and retains considerable road frontage and level, fertile land   so has lots of possibilities.  Large house and site
  Ber of D2 will need addressing

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Exclusive new development near sleepy Portuguese village beloved by Louboutin
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 2
Length: 550 words
Body


When you close your eyes and think of luxury, what comes to mind? If it s the tap of a credit card at a designer boutique or the clink of bottles at a trendy nightclub, the Spatia development in the small Portuguese village of Melides may not be your ideal holiday location. If, however, you imagine quiet, pristine sandy beaches and birds singing in the trees as you lounge by a private pool, Spatia Melides offers just that.
Melides is an otherwise sleepy village, a 10-minute drive from the development, known internationally as the location of French shoe-designer Christian Louboutin s five-star hotel, Vermehlo   Portuguese for red, no doubt in reference to Louboutin s signature soles   which opened in 2023. Condé Nast Traveler described it as  eclectic, extravagant, and curious, much like the man himself .
With high-net-worth buyers escaping hectic lifestyles no doubt a target market, Spatia Melides - with its name derived from the Latin for spaces - offers residents of its luxury villas plenty of room to breathe, with large floor areas, private pools and outdoor space.
The villas have been designed to blend in harmoniously with the natural woodlands of the area, with the use of natural wood and earthy tones inside and out. Cork oak and olive trees have been planted in and around the properties, and these are sure to provide further privacy when mature. Extensive glazing has also been employed to  make for an indoor-outdoor  lifestyle, according to the developer s literature.
Three- and four-bedroom holiday villas within the scheme are being brought to the market by Savills, and are being sold off plans. The discerning well-heeled Irish buyer looking for an exclusive sanctuary in the sun within an 80-minute drive of Lisbon need look no further. There are usually six direct flights from Dublin to Lisbon on a Friday, operated separately by Air Portugal, Aer Lingus and Ryanair, which take about three hours.
The V4 four-bedroom villa offers about 526sq m (5,662sq ft) of gross private area with a 15m by 5m pool. The architecturally impressive structure features a vast kitchen, dining and livingroom with a high ceiling at its centre, off of which are two double-bedroom suites, each with a private terrace, and two further doubles that share a third terrace. It also features a 140sq ft pavilion room and plunge pool to the front as well as a generous terrace area, mirrored swimming pool and fire pit to the rear of the property. The asking price for this unit is EUR 5.89 million, with just one remaining to be reserved by a prospective buyer. The three-bedroom V3 villas, extending to about 315sq m of gross private area, four of which remain available, are seeking EUR 3.99 million apiece.
Each villa has a parking space, and residents at the developer s other resort in Comporta (a 20-minute drive away) have chosen to buy second-hand cars to get around while they spend time in the area, according to the local selling agent.
A golf-buggy shuttle service is planned to whizz residents from the development to the breathtaking expanse of the nearby Praia do Pinheirinho beach. Shielded by high dunes, this sandy beach on the Atlantic is something of a hidden gem, and Spatia developer Eurosuez RE  is aiming to capitalise on the location by erecting a beach club close by.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



FAI set new deadline to announce manager
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 453 words
Byline: GAVIN CUMMISKEY
Body


GAVIN CUMMISKEY
Soccer Correspondent  The FAI have set a new deadline of next week to announce the next men s Republic of Ireland manager.
It is 140 days since the association parted company with Stephen Kenny. The previous record, between the departure of Steve Staunton and hiring Giovanni Trapattoni in February 2008, was 112 days.
Following a  robust  recruitment process conducted by director of football Marc Canham, John O Shea took the position on an interim basis for last month s friendlies against Belgium and Switzerland at the Aviva Stadium.
Despite Ireland s failure to score a goal in the scoreless draw with Belgium and 1-0 loss to the Swiss, the former Manchester United defender remains in contention to receive a four-year contract from the FAI. O Shea was not initially interviewed for the position due to his lack of experience.
In December, chief executive Jonathan Hill said that the FAI aim to appoint a manager before the Nations League draw in Paris on February 8th. They subsequently pointed towards an  early April  announcement, with Canham noting their preferred candidate had  existing contractual obligations .
This suggested that moves were afoot to entice either Greece manager Gus Poyet or Georgia coach Willy Sagnol. However, budgetary constraints seemingly scuppered talks with Poyet.
Lee Carsley was the initial favourite for the job but the England under-21 manager recently revealed that he only had one conversation with the FAI back in November.
Neil Lennon, Chris Coleman and Chris Hughton were also connected to the role while Shelbourne manager Damien Duff received an indirect approach which he labelled a  box ticking  exercise.
Anthony Barry was the latest man to be reportedly approached but the current Bayern Munich and Portugal assistant coach is being linked to Sporting Lisbon if their manager Ruben Amorim replaces Jürgen Klopp at Liverpool.
Gleeson replacement
Meanwhile, the FAI have appointed Hannah Dingley as their head of women and girls  football, replacing Eileen Gleeson who was made Ireland women s head coach in December. Dingley leaves her current job as Forest Green Rovers academy manager on May 20th.
 Following a very thorough process that involved many excellent candidates, we are excited to have Hannah come in as our new head of women and girls  football to continue the excellent work that is being done to develop the game at all levels,  said Canham, via a press release.
 Hannah is an experienced coach with a background in the development of women s football and is someone who will bring fresh ideas and expertise to an important role in the football division that will help the association to fulfill the full potential of women and girls  football.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Fertility clinic blames losses on IVF tourism
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 384 words
Byline: GORDON DEEGAN
Body


GORDON DEEGAN
 The directors of fertility services clinic The Sims Clinic have blamed a slump in revenue on in-vitro fertilisation (IVF) tourism   where patients travel overseas for treatment.
Accounts filed by The Sims Clinic Ltd show that the company recorded a EUR 3.2 million pretax loss after revenue declined by 21.5 per cent or EUR 2 million from EUR 10.16 million to EUR 8.07 million in the 12 months to the end of June 2023.
The 2023 pretax losses are a fourfold increase on the losses of EUR 787,868 the previous year.
In a note with the accounts, the directors said  performance is being managed closely due to market conditions and reintroduction of IVF tourism having a negative impact on volumes in full year 2023 .
The Sims Clinic operates facilities in Cork, Carlow, Limerick, Dundalk and two in Dublin at Swords and Clonskeagh.
A spokeswoman for The Sims Clinic yesterday said:  The reintroduction of patients from Ireland travelling overseas for IVF treatment resulted in a reduction of patient numbers during the period covered under these accounts.
 This followed a turbulent period for the sector during the pandemic, with travel restrictions and other factors resulting in higher volumes attending the clinic.
The accounts said that the company  has sufficient liquidity and other resources to support its ongoing operations through the support provided by its intermediate parent company Virtus Health Pty Ltd .
The Sims Clinic s biggest cost is staff costs, which reduced last year from EUR 6.03 million to EUR 5.8 million, though numbers employed increased from 88 to 100, made up of 73 clinical staff and 27 in administration.
Passive income
The firm s revenue was made up of EUR 7.38 million in IVF revenue and EUR 687,055 in diagnostic revenue.
Its losses last year take account of combined non-cash depreciation and amortisation costs of EUR 422,725.
At the end of June last, the company s shareholder funds totalled EUR 3.09 million, while cash funds decreased from EUR 565,795 to EUR 186,023.
On future developments, the directors state that they  are exploring possibilities for passive income through rental of consulting rooms in addition to the current nature of the business .
The directors state that the company s activities are governed by the Health Products Regulatory Authority.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



FF regains Gaeltacht portfolio; Sources say FG ministers were unwilling to take on the job, or lacked language skills
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 456 words
Byline: HARRY McGEE
Body


HARRY McGEE Political Correspondent  Responsibility for the Gaeltacht in Government has been transferred back to a Fianna Fáil Minister as no Fine Gael Minister was willing, or sufficiently proficient in the language, to take on the portfolio.
The Government confirmed that Thomas Byrne, the Minister of State for Sport, will take over the role, which was previously a Fine Gael responsibility. It formed part of the remit of Patrick O Donovan when he was the junior minister for the Office of Public Works.
There was some confusion yesterday afternoon following the Cabinet meeting as to the identity of the new Minister. Some sources on the Fine Gael side were of the view that the Chief Whip, Hildegarde Naughton, would take on that responsibility and had been offered the role.
However, the Government spokesman later clarified that Mr Byrne would in fact become the Minister of State for the Gaeltacht.
The Meath East TD was educated through Irish, speaks fluently, and is educating his own children through Irish. He also has connections with the Ráth Chairn Gaeltacht in Co Meath.
The Gaeltacht came to be within the remit of Fine Gael after the change of the role of taoiseach between both parties in late 2022. In the first period of government, Fianna Fáil chief whip Jack Chambers had the responsibility but his successor as Chief Whip, Ms Naughton, did not take on the role. Instead it went to Mr O Donovan.
Sources told The Irish Times that the Gaeltacht portfolio posed a problem for Fine Gael Ministers because of insufficient command of the language, or an unwillingness to take on the job. Fianna Fáil welcomed the return of the responsibility to the party.
When contacted, the vice-chair of the Coiste na Gaeilge in the Oireachtas, Senator Lorraine Clifford-Lee, said she was delighted with Mr Byrne s appointment.
 He has a deep knowledge of the language, minority language issues, Irish-medium education and the opportunities and challenges faced by Gaeltacht communities. He s a regular contributor on Irish language media and when he was minister for European affairs he frequently delivered his statements and speeches in Irish when in Brussels,  said Ms Clifford-Lee.
 Thomas is committed and hard-working, and I look forward to engaging with him on a wide range of issues we are working on.
The Gaeltacht portfolio has posed a headache for Fine Gael taoisigh in the past. When Donegal TD Joe McHugh was appointed by Enda Kenny as minister of State for the Gaeltacht in 2014, he was criticised for having only a basic command of the language. However, Mr McHugh subsequently attained a good fluency during his term as minister having attended several intensive courses and employing a driver who spoke to him only in Irish.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Flying taxi notions distract from real transport solutions
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 833 words
Body


The Jetsons have so much to answer for. Thanks to that opening sequence of the 1960s space age cartoon in which George Jetson takes the kids to school and heads to work, a generation grew up thinking that by the time they were adults, they too would drive a flying car.
But only a certain kind of guy, generally a certain kind of Silicon Valley guy, seems to remain obsessed with the notion. Sorry, but it is mostly about guys. This fetish is a big roll-eye topic for just about all women I know who either work in the tech industry or write about it. The majority of us do not care about flying cars.
If you re old enough, you might remember how breathless Silicon Valley got about the Segway, the giant two-wheeled self-balancing scooter. Until the big product reveal in 2001, the serious speculation   based on promises of a breakthrough innovation that would revolutionise transport and solve traffic problems   was that some sort of flying or levitating vehicle was coming.
It turned out to be a dorky-looking terrestrial scooter, which is nifty, but revolutionise transport it did not, and it s not the imagined Segway Star Wars flying motorcycle many predicted.
Flying cars are again popping up in the news as a  just around the corner  development, either in the form of drone-based human transport, or in old school, James Bondian wings-bolted-to-sports car formats, with a touch of Marty McFly.
Last month, the UK government launched a Future of Flight action plan   yes, it s actually called an  action plan , in an intrepid Boys  Own vibe that says much about the adult Conservative party   that envisions the first flying taxis taking off in two years with a full national service by 2028. This, in a country with a crumbling underground in London and a national rail network that has grown increasingly dismal, expensive and disconnected ever since the Conservatives (them again) had the great idea to privatise it in 1994. The answer to this transport mess is apparently flying taxis.
Silicon Valley is, of course, full of such plans. The congested Valley motorways are regularly cited as the reason everyone needs air taxis   why sit in a snarl of traffic on Highway 101 when you could be whizzing aloft between Santa Clara and San Francisco in 15 minutes?
This proposition has been floated by Valley-based electric flying sports car company Alef, for its Model A flying car, and by another Californian company, Joby Aviation, both of which have received very limited FAA permission.
Security challenges
Joby calls this  electric aerial ride-sharing . In a 2021 interview with consultancy McKinsey, a Joby executive (a woman! A rare exception to prove the mostly boys rule) said:  Imagine waking up in the morning and thinking you could drive your car to work   but that might take an hour, an hour and a half. Instead, you just open up an app. A car picks you up and brings you to a heliport five minutes away. You ride in one of our aircraft. The flight takes 10 minutes. At the other end, there s a car waiting for you. The entire ride is seamless, convenient and affordable.
This commute involves three different vehicles, two of them still being cars, on roads. How is this going to be affordable? Or efficient? Or not another buzzing sound irritant for those of us below?
The UK plan envisions a mere 10 minutes will be needed from arrival at an air taxi port to take off. Oh, please. Look at airports!
Presumably safety screenings and some sort of identity check will be required, as being aloft with rideshare strangers offers a different set of security challenges than hailing a ground cab.
It s hard to see flying commutes as a prospect for anyone but wealthy tech guys irritated by regional traffic caused by the rest of us trying to get to work, often at the companies they own.
By the way, that Joby interview was predicting an aerial commuting service could be operating by . . . 2024. Nope.
In 2018, Uber s former air taxi division Uber Air was planning for a 2023 service. Uber Air, though, is no more, having been offloaded in 2020 to Joby. Then there was Google offshoot KittyHawk, the special baby of Google cofounder Larry Page, which spent years and hundreds of millions on its Flyer vehicle before the company was wound up in September 2022. One employee described the Flyer as a costly  solution looking for a problem , as executives struggled to brainstorm feasible use cases.
I m left thinking about the interview I did in the Merrion Hotel in late 2008 with a Virgin Galactic executive who confidently told me the company would be offering commercial space tourism by 2010. Fifteen years later, space tourism is available only in extremely limited form, primarily to tech millionaires and billionaires.
How about this action plan: better global government investment in national public transport, in funding research on greener transport and in restructuring cities towards greater liveability. More boring than flying cars, yes, but actual solutions for real problems.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Four homes near remote hubs
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 10
Length: 526 words
Body


This three-bedroom detached home comes to the market in excellent condition in the gorgeous bucolic setting of Skibbereen, Co Cork. For remote workers, the modern Ludgate Digital Hub, which offers high-speed broadband, 54 desks, and five meeting rooms, is an 18-minute drive away.
Extending to 184 sq m with a C1 Ber, the property sits on approximately 1.26 acres of mature landscaped gardens a mile from Caheragh village and 7 miles from Skibbereen town.
The 20-year-old home features a modern kitchen/diningroom, a utility room and downstairs bathroom, as well as a lovely mezzanine viewing spot overlooking the rolling green hills. It is on the market through Sherry FitzGerald O Neill, seeking EUR 369,000. This three-bedroom bungalow plus converted attic comes to the market in move-in-ready condition, asking EUR 345,000 through Fran Grincell Properties. Number 16 Rosemount is in an excellent location, walking distance from Kilkenny s charming city centre. Two remote working hubs are also within walking distance: New Work Junction is a 15-minute walk away while We Do Work Spaces is 20 minutes on foot toward the city centre.
Extending to 137 sq m with a D1 Ber, the interior of the property is well presented with fresh white walls and wood-effect floors in the living areas. The converted attic room offers plenty of space and would make a great workspace or playroom. The garden to the front and side of the house offer plenty of potential for gardening enthusiasts and there is also a paved back garden with storage sheds for bikes and equipment. This three-bedroom midterrace home in immaculate, modern condition comes to the market just a short walk from the Lawlor s Strand at Dunmore East in Co Waterford. On the market seeking 449,000 through Palmer Auctioneers, this home offers a bright south-facing aspect, a good-sized rear garden and a driveway to the front.
The accommodation at number 16 Pine Cove consists of a livingroom with a wood-burning stove, a dual-aspect diningroom that opens on to the galley kitchen, which has stylish units offering plenty of storage and quartz worktops. There is also a shower room and utility space on the ground floor.
For those looking for a remote working hub in the area, Boxworks CoWork Space in Waterford city is a 20-minute drive away. This four-bed semidetached home in the Co Clare town of Ennis comes to the market in turnkey condition with a good-sized back garden and parking to the front.
For remote workers looking for space to work outside of the house, the DigiClare Ennis hub is an eight-minute drive away, offering desks, coworking spaces and conference rooms.
Extending to 120sq m (1,292sq ft) with a B2 Ber, number 38 the Maples is likely to fulfil the needs of most families with a sittingroom, a kitchen/diningroom, a reception/playroom, a WC and a utility room on the ground floor, and four bedrooms, one of which is en suite, and the main bathroom upstairs.
It is within walking distance of the Roslevan Shopping Centre and a five-minute drive from the amenities of the vibrant town centre. It is for sale through Arthur & Lees Estate Agents, seeking EUR 300,000.
     JESSICA DOYLE

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Garda arrested in connection with fatal hit-and-run
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 292 words
Body


A member of An Garda Síochána has been arrested and questioned in relation to a fatal hit-and-run in Co Louth on St Patrick s Day.
Gardaí in Drogheda have appealed for witnesses to the incident, which occurred in Drogheda shortly after 2.30am, to come forward.
Gardaí and emergency services were alerted after a pedestrian was found unresponsive on Rathmullen Road.
The man in his 40s was pronounced dead at the scene. The vehicle involved failed to remain at the location.
The dead man has been locally as Niall McEneaney, who was a former Louth hurler.
As part of inquiries, investigating gardaí recovered a vehicle of interest, which has undergone technical and forensic examination.
The scene of the incident was also examined by Garda forensic collision investigators.
In a statement yesterday, the Garda Síochána Ombudsman Commission (Gsoc), which investigates allegations of disciplinary or criminal wrongdoing by Garda members, said it received a referral from a Garda Superintendent on March 17th following the incident.
 The matter is now under investigation by Gsoc further to section 98 of the Garda Síochána Act, 2005,  it said.
 As part of the investigation a person has been arrested and interviewed. Gsoc s investigation remains ongoing. As such, no further comment will be made at this time.
Mr McEneaney s club, St Fechin s in Termonfeckin, Co Louth, said it was  absolutely devastated  by his death.
  Niall was loved and revered by every hurler with whom he worked,  it said.
 His contribution to St Fechin s hurling was immeasurable. His passion for hurling was infectious and his commitment to hard work and high standards on the field of play was inspirational. He is irreplaceable but his extraordinary legacy will live on.  COLIN GLEESON

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



German politicians backtrack on unequivocal support for Israel; Growing concerns for German public and media over Gaza offensive
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 693 words
Body


The easiest way to unsettle Germans these days is to ask them what they understand by  nie wieder    never again.
Over the last decades, those two words have served as elegant shorthand for German memory politics on the Holocaust.
But is the understanding, and promise, behind  nie weder  that mass murder of Jews must never happen again? Or is  nie wieder  a solemn vow by Germans not to carry out, or permit, the mass killing of any group of people, simply for belonging to that group?
After the October 7th Hamas-led attack on Israel, the phrase was updated to  nie wieder ist jetzt    never again is now.
Amid growing concern over Israel s response in Gaza, the nebulous  nie wieder  hung over Germany s response to Nicaragua s complaint at the International Court of Justice (ICJ) that, as a big supplier of arms to Israel, Berlin is complicit in genocide.
Arms supplier Germany denies this, pointing out that genocide has yet to be proven and that, even as Israel s second-largest arms supplier, it examines all deliveries closely and has been reducing deliveries in recent months amid growing concerns over the Gaza offensive.
But the  nie wieder  dilemma is not going away from the German debate over whether Israel s end   to eliminate Hamas once and for all   justifies all means.
As German politicians backtrack on last October s unequivocal support for Israel, the  nie wieder  dilemma lingers in the public debate and media coverage. Germany s Bild tabloid carried nothing at all in its print or online editions on the ICJ hearings in The Hague.
A week ago it reported that Nicaragua s  crazy dictator  was  suing Germany , without exploring the filing s arguments.
As with other titles in the Springer media group, Bild journalists sign up to its five-point editorial statute which, in point two, states:  We support the Jewish people and the right to exist of the state of Israel.
Bild s support for Israel has been vocal and strident since October 7th, and the word  Jew-hater  has appeared in 46 articles. It used that term to describe some participants at illegal pro-Palestinian marches   at one a marcher wished for Hitler s return to  gas the Jews    and university discussion participants who accused Israel of genocide, apartheid and  permanent breaches of law .
Die Welt, another Springer title, has published a picture and short profile of an Israeli hostage daily since October.
Its edition yesterday carried nothing on the ICJ hearings. Its Tuesday edition carried a 100-word brief that Germany rejected the claims of the  authoritarian-ruled Nicaragua .
Editors of Bild and Welt were not available for comment.
Unlike these newspapers, the centre-left Süddeutsche Zeitung has printed images of skeletal Gazan children and, this week, gave considerable coverage to hearings at The Hague.
In a lead article on Wednesday it said a  democratic constitutional state such as Germany, which is committed to the rule-based order, must be measured by the standards of the international obligations that it has entered into   no matter who the plaintiff is .
Find against Germany Even if the newspaper thinks it unlikely the court will find against Germany,  Nicaragua is using the world public for a political tribunal in which the indictment already achieves the [desired] effect.
On Tuesday evening Germany s main ARD evening news bulletin led with two court cases   the Swiss climate case in the European Court of Human Rights and a paternal rights ruling at the Karlsruhe constitutional court   but had nothing from The Hague.
The Tagesthemen news magazine carried Nicaragua s arguments on the Monday evening, including the German side s promise of a full rebuttal the following day.
But it made no reference to this on Tuesday, though it found space for a report on the new Amy Winehouse biopic.
Over on ZDF public television, talkshow host Markus Lanz shattered a taboo over Israel by wrapping in a rhetorical question whether Germany s ambition to be a  moral superpower  is falling victim to its own contradictions.
 There is now an accusation of double standards,  he said.  And there is the question: how do we deal with a certain hypocrisy?

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Girl settles case over burn for EUR 320,000
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 292 words
Body


A girl who suffered a chemical-type burn as a newborn baby after, it was claimed, a wipe was left in her incubator at a Dublin maternity hospital has settled a High Court action for more than EUR 320,000.
Jonathan Kilfeather SC, for the now seven-year-old girl, told the High Court his client has been left with scarring on her left hip and abdomen area as a result of the alleged 2017 incident at the Coombe Women and Infants University Hospital.
It was claimed that she suffered a burn to her left flank, abdomen and thigh when the wipe, containing a preparation of 2 per cent chlorhexidine gluconate, was not removed from the incubator. It was claimed this was first noted by nursing staff at about 1am, nine hours after the baby was born prematurely.
Exposure
In the proceedings, it was claimed these types of wipes are designed for use as wipes and not for prolonged exposure to the skin. It was alleged the wipe had been left attached to the baby s thigh for too long and left under her nappy. It was further claimed that there was a failure to adhere to the product guidelines and advice for the use of such wipes. All of the claims were denied.
The newborn was treated with antibiotics for seven days and was later transferred to another hospital for further treatment including dressings and a review by a plastic surgeon.
Counsel told the court that the girl s muscular-skeletal development had not been affected but she may require scar-releasing surgery when she is older. He said her family was satisfied with the offer.
Approving the settlement, Mr Justice Paul Coffey said the action involved a very severe case of scarring, but he was satisfied to approve the fair and reasonable settlement.
He wished the girl and her family well for the future.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Golf struggling to capture the public imagination in the post-Tiger era
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 18
Length: 891 words
Body


Brian Jack served as hype man at a Republican presidential campaign rally in Rome, Georgia last month. One-time political director of Donald Trump s White House turned candidate for a Congressional seat in his home state, he unfurled quite the yarn.
 I m not sure if I should say this,  said Jack.  But, just a few weeks ago, president Trump put to shame two professional golfers. I ain t gonna mention their names but just know he shot a 70 on 18 holes.
Not long after, Trump declared he had won both the club championship and the senior club championship at his eponymous course in West Palm Beach, Florida.
To lend credibility to his braggadocio, Jack Nicklaus, who you would wrongly assume might know better, was on hand to present the 77-year-old with the Trump International 2024 most improved golfer of the year award. Like former Roman emperor Commodus once claiming to have a record of 12,000 wins and 0 defeats as a gladiator at the Colosseum, it s true because he says it is.
The most famous golfer in America (a boast Trump can legitimately make since Tiger Woods  decline) certainly got the star treatment when he turned up at Doral last Sunday. Spontaneous rounds of applause from adoring fans and some of the sport s biggest names taking time out to chat with him on the putting green and driving range.
Proffering obsequious handshakes and simpering smiles, the likes of Dustin Johnson, Bubba Watson and Bryson DeChambeau slobbered all over him as if he isn t the same man daily spewing so much hateful bile and racist rhetoric into the political atmosphere.
Just like strangely gullible 27-year-old Rory McIlroy when he chose to golf with him back in 2017, perhaps they remain somehow ignorant of what he truly stands for. They haven t heard him comparing people to animals, accusing immigrants of poisoning the blood of the country, or saying African Americans love him because of his mug shot.
Maybe DeChambeau et al were all just relieved Pele, his nickname for kicking the ball so much when nobody s looking, wasn t teeing it up at the LIV event in case he d embarrass them with his prowess.
Last time their Tour swung through one of his courses he took on the same tough Bedminster track a fortnight later and managed a 67. His score bested 47 of the 48 pro cards in the final 18 holes of that competition. Indeed, only six of the 144 rounds played by the LIV roster that week were better than his. A statistic to make the late Kim Jong-il (of 11 holes-in-one in a single outing fame) blush. Surely the charming Saudis must soon consider paying Trump to play in as well as to host their Potemkin tournaments.
Recognition factor
Given there s a good chance he will be elected to a second presidential term next November, it shouldn t be a surprise that many from the most Republican of sports still lickspittle around him. No matter how extreme his political positions are getting. The right side of the green is always far more important to these lads than the right side of history. But this is only part of golf s ongoing Trump problem. The other is the recognition factor. He s more box office than anyone else in the game right now.
Most casual sports fans can tell you the 45th president won two club championships the other week and have seen the photos of him and Nicklaus. The same people couldn t name the winners of many PGA Tour events so far this year.
Austin Eckroat? Jake Knapp? Chris Kirk? Mathieu Pavon? Fine players. Incognito champions.
The Masters represents the one weekend in the calendar when golf has the undivided attention of Americans. March Madness has finally ended, the NFL is in hibernation, baseball is only sputtering into gear, and the endless NBA play-offs haven t started.
With Rae s Creek dyed with food colouring, various other botanical sleights of hand, and Stalinesque television coverage, Augusta National looks sumptuous on screen and, to many, the familiar theme music represents the sound of springtime. People want to be lured in. Yet, beyond the existence of rival tours, the game has a major identity crisis as it rounds Amen Corner.
Many of those drawn to the sport by Woods, and, to a lesser extent, Phil Mickelson, have no rooting interest in the crop who came after them. Generation beige doesn t move the needle. Scottie Scheffler has been the number one player in the world for nearly a year, and he can walk down the streets of New York city unrecognised.
Storylines
A wonderful talent, too milquetoast to impact beyond the cognoscenti. Most casual fans couldn t tell you the difference between Scheffler and Xander Schauffele. And, elsewhere in the top 10 rankings, they d struggle to pick Jon Rahm, Patrick Cantlay, and Wyndham Clark out of a line-up either.
As it tried to come to terms with the inevitable post-Tiger swoon in interest, the splintering of the sport could not have come at a worse time. And herein lies golf s true major problem. This is why the PGA Tour created the mortifying $100m Player Impact Program (PIP) to reward those who generate most interest in it through, among other criteria, Google searches and media mentions.
A desperate measure but they need characters and storylines to capture the imagination that badly. If only there was one larger-than-life, headline-generating golfer in America who relishes feuding and relentlessly self-promotes.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Guinness bottles and stout hearts
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 223 words
Body


A chara,    Guinness used to send crates of small bottles for nursing mothers at the maternity hospital in Dublin in 1963  (An Irishman s Diary, April 10th). Guinness also used to supply bottles of beer to the Blood Transfusion Service to give to donors post-donation. Perhaps a reintroduction of this strategy might help their ambition of increasing donor numbers!   Yours, etc,
BRENDAN
FITZPATRICK,
Clontarf,
Dublin 3.
Sir,   In Wednesday s An Irishman s Diary, there is much reference and discussion about  Baby Guinness .
Frank McNally speculates that it referred to a half-pint bottle. My blood group is O negative, so I found myself called to the blood bank quite frequently in the Fifties and  Sixties.
Having donated my pint, I was always offered a snipe of Guinness, which was a third of a pint. These were donated to the blood bank by Guinness, as far as I know, and not available for sale elsewhere.
Could these be the  Baby Guinnesses  in question?  Yours, etc,
TONY GREANY,
Mornington,
Co Meath.
Sir,   I do remember a bottle of Guinness, slightly smaller than the usual bottle, that was recommended for those believed to be deficient in iron. It was referred to as an invalid stout, and may well have been given to pregnant women also.
This was in the 1950s and 1960s, and possibly earlier.   Yours, etc,
WILLIE KEALY,
Navan,
Co Meath.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Harris criticised for absence from Dáil on first day
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 460 words
Byline: MARIE O'HALLORAN
Body


MARIE O HALLORAN  The Opposition has trenchantly criticised Taoiseach Simon Harris for his failure to attend the Dáil on his first full day in office, accusing him of being a  no show .
Sinn Féin leader Mary Lou McDonald said Mr Harris s last words in the Dáil on Tuesday had been  let s get to work . But  in his first day on the job he s a no show. He s as lathair [absent].
Government Chief Whip Hildegarde Naughton said that Mr Harris was unavailable to take Leaders  Questions  because he s speaking with the UK prime minister. He also has calls with the Northern Ireland First Minister, the Deputy First Minister, and also the president of Ukraine. Tomorrow, he is in Brussels as well as Warsaw and he will be back to take Leaders  Questions next week.
But Ms McDonald asked for clarification  that the Taoiseach is not with us because he has to take three phone calls, or four . When Ms Naughton confirmed it was four calls the Sinn Féin leader said  that s not acceptable .
Ceann Comhairle Seán Ó Fearghaíl intervened and said they could not get involved  in how many telephone calls somebody is making . They had important parliamentary business to do.  Exactly,  shouted Sinn Féin finance spokesman Pearse Doherty.
At the start of Dáil business Ms McDonald said there was a lot of work to do and the Government had a lot of questions to answer  and yet the Taoiseach hasn t shown up. This is wholly unacceptable  and it showed his contempt for the Dáil.
Disgrace
She said Government TDs  waxed lyrical yesterday about the incoming Taoiseach and he was apparently going to do in 10 months what you failed to do in 13 years. It was all about moving mountains and getting straight to work. And today he has not shown up. That is an absolute disgrace.
Labour leader Ivana Bacik said an extensive schedule of business was originally planned for this week but this had all been changed.
 It s simply unacceptable that we have business not ordered properly and what looks if I may say somewhat like made up business over the next two days when there s so much important work to be done.
 And indeed the new Taoiseach outlined a very ambitious programme of his own promises and commitments over the next barely over 11 months. We should be starting more quickly. We should be starting today.
Social Democrats TD Catherine Murphy said  I think it s start as you mean to go on. I hope this is not going to be the way we are going to continue with the business.
She said  we have a business committee that has become a facade  when  this is all dictated by Government . The Kildare North TD noted that when there was a minority government  there was an awful lot of things achieved by that. This is this is not the way to start with a new Taoiseach, with a new regime .

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Harris to raise case for Palestinian recognition in Brussels; Group of EU states will put statehood on agenda of foreign ministers' meeting
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 566 words
Byline: CORMAC McQUINN, MARIE O'HALLORAN , HARRY McGEE
Body


CORMAC McQUINN, MARIE O HALLORAN and HARRY McGEE
 Taoiseach Simon Harris will raise Ireland s intention to formally recognise the state of Palestine when he meets European Commission President Ursula von der Leyen in Brussels today. Government sources said yesterday that Ireland believes it is best to take the step in concert with other countries, and not unilaterally.
A group of like-minded states including Spain, Slovenia and Malta plan to put the matter on the agenda of both the next European Council meeting in April and also on the agenda of the next meeting of foreign ministers.
 We want to keep the momentum up. There is a growing determination to do this tied to the peace initiative. We want a concrete proposal for recognising Palestine to be put,  said the sources.
A spokesman for Mr Harris said the situation in Palestine and the Middle East is  high on the agenda  for today s meetings. He said both Mr Harris and Tánaiste Micheál Martin have expressed Ireland s views on recognising the State of Palestine but have also called for a ceasefire and the need to get aid flowing into Gaza.
He said Mr Harris will ask Ms von der Leyen what progress she and the EU s foreign affairs representative Josep Borrell have made on peace talks.
The formal EU position is that it will recognise the Palestinian state when it is established as part of the two-state settlement set out by the Oslo Accord three decades ago. This would provide for two states within the territory, with the borders being those that were there pre-1967, the year Israel occupied the West Bank, East Jerusalem and Gaza during the Six-Day War.
The situation in Gaza is also expected to come up during meetings with European Council President Charles Michel and the prime ministers of six EU counties, including Poland s Donald Tusk, at a gathering in Warsaw later in the day.
Yesterday Mr Harris had phone calls with Rishi Sunak and Volodymyr Zelenskiy, while also completing the reshuffle of his Cabinet.
But his first full day in office was dominated by Opposition criticism for his failure to take Dáil questions.
With no Leaders  Questions scheduled in the Dáil, Sinn Féin leader Mary Lou McDonald accused Mr Harris of being a  no-show  and  as láthair  [absent] on his first full day as Taoiseach.
Government Chief Whip Hildegarde Naughton said that Mr Harris was unavailable to take Leaders  Questions citing phone calls with British prime minister Mr Sunak, Northern Ireland s First and Deputy First Ministers, and Ukrainian president Volodymyr Zelenskiy.
A spokesman for Mr Harris later defended the Taoiseach saying he had been in his office from 7:50am; attended pre-Cabinet meetings and Cabinet when junior ministers were appointed a week earlier than usual; and had briefings in advance of a phone call with Mr Zelenskiy and his Brussels meetings with Ms von der Leyen and European Parliament President Roberta Metsola.
Mr Harris unveiled his new Ministers of State  yesterday afternoon with three Fine Gael backbench TDs, Alan Dillon, Emer Higgins and Colm Burke,  promoted to the ranks of junior ministers
Mayo TD Mr Dillon has been appointed as junior housing minister with responsibility for local government and planning. Ms Higgins, a Dublin Midwest TD, is now Minister of State for Enterprise, replacing Dublin Rathdown s Neale Richmond who has been appointed as junior minister in the Department of Finance.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Housing starts surge 67% in first quarter to 12,297 units
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 16
Length: 307 words
Byline: EOIN BURKE-KENNEDY
Body


EOIN BURKE-KENNEDY
 Housing starts, the strongest indicator of future supply, surged to a new post-crash high in the first quarter of 2024, according to Goodbody Stockbrokers.
In its latest housing commencement tracker, the brokerage said new home starts jumped by 67 per cent to 12,297 units in the first three months of the year, taking the total over the past 12 months to almost 38,000.
 This is ahead of our expectations and current Government targets,  the company said. The Government s Housing for All strategy targets 34,600 completions this year, 36,100 in 2025 and 36,900 in 2026.
 The surge in Q1 is likely to be related to the proposed ending of a temporary waiver on development contributions that was introduced by the Government for a 12-month period and is due to end on April 24th,  Goodbody said.
Incentivised supply
 This particular measure has clearly had a positive impact in reducing the cost of development and has incentivised supply. This may have resulted in builders bringing forward their construction plans,  it said.
The company called on the Government to consider extending the levy waiver  beyond its planned end later this month given its impact .
In its report, Goodbody noted the increase in commencements in the first quarter was aided by  big contributions  coming from both scheme housing (up 56 per cent year on year) and apartment building (up 107 per cent year on year). The numbers, which were based on the Building Control Management System, showed apartments accounted for 41 per cent of the quarterly total.
The greater Dublin area (Dublin and mid-East) accounted for the majority (59 per cent) of new housing commencements in the first quarter.
More than two thirds (68 per cent) of the commencements in the capital were apartments, but there was a strong increase in scheme housing commencements also.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



How big business is undermining our health and environment'; Is corporate PR duping us and preventing effective solutions to global warming and chronic diseases from taking hold?
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 8
Length: 1358 words
Body


One of the standout aspects of the Cop28 global summit in Dubai in December 2023 was that there were almost 2,500 fuel lobbyists given access to the climate change conference whose mission is to reduce global greenhouse gas emissions   mainly through phasing out fossil fuels. The climate change coalition Kick Big Polluters Out said that the number of representatives of some of the world s biggest polluters at the annual UN negotiations was unprecedented.
The problem with corporate lobbyists jostling for space to influence everyone from politicians to policymakers, financiers to innovators and even some non-governmental organisations (NGOs) is that they are good at what they do.
It can be easy to be seduced by arguments for carbon capture and storage as a viable solution to global warming when deadlines to reduce emissions are closing in on us when the technology is hugely expensive and unproven at scale. It can also seem comforting to hear how big fossil fuel industries are  electrifying  their production processes, until you stop and think that this allows them to continue selling the fuels that caused global warming in the first place.
Grant Ennis, author of a new book, Dark PR   how corporate disinformation undermines our health and the environment (Daraja Press) tackles head-on some of the key strategies used by the corporate world to dupe people into thinking they are doing the right thing while the real solutions to problems such as global warming and chronic diseases don t take hold.
Ennis was in Trinity College Dublin (TCD) recently to explain what he describes as the  nine devious frames  which deter political action to solve global warming, chronic diseases and road deaths. These include normalisation (eg accepting road accidents will happen, accepting that people will be obese and become diabetic), victim-blaming (shifting the blame for obesity, road deaths and global warming on to the individual rather than the environment and infrastructure) and focusing on complexity narratives (eg lung cancer is also caused by air pollution, genetics, viruses as well as smoking).
 All of these devious frames dilute support for political action,  he says. These narratives encourage us to act as individuals, thereby reducing the drive to act in groups to collectively protest.  We need to go back to basics to organise ourselves in groups, to have clear political objectives and to demand change .
Status quo
But Ennis, who lectures part-time on public health policy at Monash University in Melbourne, Australia, while working as an NGO manager in trouble spots around the world, also points out some of the key concepts that we have come to accept in these debates were developed by the very companies who want to maintain the status quo.
 British Petroleum invented the carbon footprint calculator and corporate focus groups in the US worked out that people were less likely to be politically active if we start calling global warming climate change instead,  he explains, adding that Republican politicians in the US switched immediately to calling global warming climate change en masse once this was pointed out to them.
He also says the plastics industry lobbied to stop using glass bottles, then sponsored plastic recycling while blaming people for causing plastic pollution.
Ennis draws attention to how governments around the world continue to subsidise the fossil fuel industries. In Ireland, subsidies to fossil fuel companies for 2021 were EUR 2.9 billion, up from EUR 2.5 billion in 2020. This compared to EUR 0.7 billion spent on environmental subsidies in 2021.
He also questions why governments subsidise the ultra-processed food and beverage industry by allowing them to classify marketing as a tax-deductible expense.
In his book, he writes:  These structures are not held in place by a cabal of evil doers; rather they are maintained through incentives that lead mostly indifferent stakeholders to carry out innumerable small bad acts.  But, he adds,  many corporations want to keep the conversation around individual responsibility not systemic change or corporate culpability .
He adds:  We need sustained and organised movements always putting pressure on politicians to counter the corporate lobbies,  he says. The best country is not the one which adapts best to pollution but the one that prevents environmental destruction, he contends. Similarly, an over-focus on treating obesity and diabetes will never prevent it.
Ennis notes research has shown that educational campaigns to prevent obesity   often sponsored by the food industry   don t work. He cites esteemed Cochrane reviews from 2002-2019 which found that education programmes don t lead to population weight loss. He says that researchers haven t found a beneficial impact from nutritional food labelling, carbon labels and alcohol labels.  These media campaigns haven t been found to change behaviour. Instead, I suggest banning advertising of harmful industries,  he says.
Put succinctly, he says the real determinants of what makes people healthy are price (eg making alcohol and tobacco prohibitively expensive), proximity (what you can or can t buy near where you live) and temporality (eg opening hours of off-licences).
Ennis s book is full of statistics and study references to back up his theories. One stand-out figure is that annual individual consumption of sugar rose from 10lbs in the 1820s to 150lbs in 2019.  The world became saturated with cheap sugar in the last number of years. In the 1950s, about one per cent of the population had diabetes and now about 11 per cent of people have it,  he says, suggesting that increasing the price of junk food would be far more effective than healthy eating campaigns to prevent obesity.
Difficult to digest
While these messages about the deviousness of corporations and their public relations companies might seem difficult to digest, Ennis is not alone in his view that citizens (when you call us consumers, we are also less lightly to be politically active) and politicians are easily taken in by these strategies. The result is that hard decisions such as banning fast food outlets close to schools and hospitals, reducing speed limits in urban areas, and building high-density housing so people can take public transport and walk to work become mired in debate.
Dr Sheila Gilheany, chief executive of NGO Alcohol Action Ireland, is clear about the power of the drinks industry lobby in Ireland and how it circumnavigates bans on advertising on playing fields, buses and billboards close to schools.  They advertise zero-alcohol products in these spaces. Zero-alcohol products are 1.5 per cent of the market, yet the alcohol marketing spend in these [banned] spaces is 25 per cent of the entire alcohol industry spend,  she explains.
Janis Morrissey, chairwoman of Health Promotion Alliance Ireland, says charities remain small organisations against the might of industry and that knowledge about the commercial determinants of health remains low among Irish politicians.  There is so much messaging about lifestyle, diet and exercise and being better parents, but we need to highlight the impact of harmful tactics by vested interests that are used to delay adoption of health policy and tackle the structural drivers of chronic disease.
Morrisey says that just four industries   tobacco, unhealthy foods, fossil fuels and alcohol   are responsible for at least one-third of deaths globally.  The workplace smoking ban of 20 years ago proved the government s ability to stand up to the big tobacco lobby. Now the Government needs to repeat this brave action with other sectors who all use the same corporate playbook to oppose any progressive health policy,  she says.
At his talk in TCD, Ennis suggested a charter for a healthy and more sustainable Ireland would include an end to tax subsidies for marketing, advertising and public relations; to all subsidies for fossil fuels, sugar, alcohol, driving and other harmful industries; and to industry influence loopholes such as informal coffee meetings that render conversations between lobbyists and Government officials undocumented.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



HSE to study report on UK gender healthcare; Report finds thousands of vulnerable children questioning had been let down
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 449 words
Byline: FIACHRA GALLAGHER
Body


FIACHRA GALLAGHER  The HSE will review a new landmark report on gender healthcare for children in the UK as part of the development of an updated clinical programme for gender healthcare services in Ireland, it has said.
The Cass Review, published yesterday by Dr Hilary Cass, found that thousands of vulnerable children questioning their gender identity had been let down by the NHS providing unproven treatments and by the  toxicity  of the trans debate.
The HSE said in a statement yesterday that the development of an updated clinical model of care for gender healthcare services will be  informed by the best evidence on clinical care for individuals who express gender incongruence or dysphoria .
The executive said that  emerging and evolving international evidence , including Dr Cass s report, will be  reviewed  as part of this work.
While the updated model of care is being developed, individuals expressing  gender incongruence or dysphoria  will continue to receive care in the community, and under the endocrinology service in the adult and paediatric centres in Ireland East Hospital Group and Children s Health Ireland, the HSE said. The HSE said fewer than 10 patients at Children s Hospital Ireland are receiving puberty blockers.
In her report, Dr Hilary Cass found the UK s only NHS gender identity development service used puberty blockers and cross-sex hormones, which masculinise or feminise people s appearances, despite  remarkably weak evidence  that they improve the wellbeing of young people and concerns that they may harm health.
Dr Cass, a leading consultant paediatrician, stressed that the findings in her report were not intended to undermine the validity of trans identities or to challenge people s right to transition, but rather to improve the care of the fast-growing number of children and young people with gender-related distress.
She said this care was made even more difficult to provide by the polarised public debate and the way in which opposing sides had  pointed to research to justify a position, regardless of the quality of the studies .
NHS England commissioned the Cass inquiry in 2020 amid rising concerns over care provided by the Tavistock and Portman NHS mental health trust s gender identity development services (Gids). The inquiry led to the NHS s closure of Gids, the banning of puberty blockers and a switch to a new  holistic  model of care in which under-18s experiencing confusion about their gender identity routinely receive psychological support rather than medical intervention.
Belong To, the Irish LGBTQ+ charity, said it will conduct an  analysis  of the Cass Review  to better inform our understanding of care for trans young people .

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Ireland one of six states willing to recognise Palestine; The idea has gained momentum since the Tánaiste hosted a dinner of like-minded foreign affairs ministers in Brussels last month
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 867 words
Body


Last month in Brussels, Tánaiste Micheál Martin hosted a dinner on the margins of the EU meeting of foreign ministers.
Ministers from Spain, Belgium, Slovenia and Malta attended the dinner. The subject matter was the ongoing Israeli assault on Gaza and what these five like-minded EU countries could do to help the peace initiative talks in the Middle East progress to achieve a ceasefire.
There was another item that was to the forefront of the politicians  minds at the dinner, and one which Martin wanted to push. That was to act in concert to push for formal EU recognition of the State of Palestine.
The formal EU position is that it will recognise the Palestinian state when it is established as part of the two-state settlement set out by the Oslo Accord three decades ago. This would provide for two states within the territory, with the borders being those that were there pre-1967, the year Israel occupied the West Bank, East Jerusalem and Gaza during the Six-Day War.
However, this group of EU countries is now of the view that they can no longer wait for the Oslo Accord to be implemented and that Palestinian statehood should be recognised even in the absence of a two-state solution.
That view is beginning to gather pace within the European Union and the European Economic Area.
In what turned out to be co-ordinated moves on Tuesday, Mr Martin told the Dáil that further delays in recognising the Palestinian state was  not credible or tenable any longer .
He said he would bring proposals to Government on this matter soon.  But be in no doubt recognition of a Palestinian state will happen,  he said.
At around the same time, the Spanish prime minister Pedro Sánchez announced that he would hold separate discussions this week with Norway, Ireland, Portugal, Slovenia and Belgium to try to recognise Palestine. He said he wanted recognition for Palestine by July.
The Tánaiste s disclosure of these moves effectively stole some of the thunder from Simon Harris  big day on Tuesday but needed to be done on that day. He also said that the talks on this specific change have been ongoing for about six months.
There have been signs for some months that this will happen. At the Summit meeting in March, the leaders of Ireland, Malta and Spain said they  stood ready  to recognise Palestinian statehood.
Peace
Their argument was that the recognition of the State was necessary for any future peace process. A month earlier then taoiseach Leo Varadkar had confirmed that a group of member states were in talks to give formal recognition to Palestine. He said that with Palestine having the status of a state, it would allow  a more equal negotiation to happen .
In a wider context, this forms part of participation by some of these countries in the overall peace initiative in the Middle East designed to bring the conflict in Gaza to an end. Ireland s engagement began with its efforts to get Irish citizens trapped in Gaza through the Rafah Crossing. The Tánaiste has met senior Government figures in Jordan, Israel, Egypt, Saudi Arabia and Qatar in recent months and he and the department have contributed to the wider peace efforts.
Martin told the Dáil last month that Ireland was actively engaged with regional partners on the finalisation of a peace plan currently being developed by a core group of Arab states.
 I discussed this with the Jordanian and Palestinian foreign ministers in the Munich security conference and senior officials from my department have travelled to the region in recent weeks at my request to further consult key partners on the details of this plan and how Ireland, with a number of European partners, could support this initiative,  he said.
Martin s move on Tuesday was also giving effect to a Programme for Government commitment to recognise the State of Palestine  as part of a lasting settlement of the conflict, or in advance of that, when we believe doing so will progress efforts to reach a two-State solution or protect the integrity of Palestinian territory .
Government sources said yesterday that Ireland believes it is best to take that step in concert with other countries, and not unilaterally. This group of states will put the matter on the agenda of both the next European Council meeting in April and also on the agenda of the next meeting of foreign ministers.
 We want to keep the momentum up. There is a growing determination to do this tied to the peace initiative. We want a concrete proposal [for recognising Palestine] to be put,  said the sources.
Strong supporters
The sources concede that some EU countries will not be willing to recognise the Palestinian state. Countries like Germany, Austria, Hungary and Greece remain strong supporters of Israel notwithstanding the substantial toll of deaths and casualties caused by its bombardment of Gaza. It is more likely that a subgroup of EU countries will move of their own volition to recognise Palestine by July.
The political difficulties caused by this issue within the EU is not evident in most other parts of the world. Of the 193 members of the United Nations, 139 recognise the State of Palestine, while nine of the 27 EU member states already recognise the Palestinian right to statehood.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Is it time to ban foreigners buying homes in Ireland?
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 857 words
Body


Ireland is overdue a debate on banning overseas buyers of residential property. This is very much a live debate elsewhere - EU countries are even wondering if they can ban citizens from other members states. Last year, a Mallorcan MEP asked if this was possible. The European Commission response, delivered by Fine Gael s Mairead McGuinness, was a heavily qualified yes.
 Such restrictions may be justified [on] grounds of public policy or public security, or on overriding reasons of general interest recognised in the case law of the Court of Justice of the European Union, provided that they are not discriminatory and are proportionate to the aim pursued.
The government of the Balearic Islands wants a ban due to a housing crisis and  ghost villages  of holiday homes. It believes the EU would grant it a regional exemption from rules on free movement of capital and acquisition of property. This has support from the left within national Spanish politics.
Last year, Portugal s small Left Bloc party presented a bill for a nationwide ban on all foreign buyers to  combat rising house prices . It modelled this on 2022 legislation in Canada, introduced as a two-year emergency measure, but extended in February until 2027. Portugal has experienced a surge in American homebuyers since the pandemic. A quarter of all house sales in the Algarve are to foreigners.
Like Ireland, Portugal abolished its  golden visa  for non-EU investors last year. Spain is about to do the same. All three countries have acted under pressure from the European Commission, which considers golden visas a security risk. However, Portugal only abolished golden visas for property investors, while the Spanish government has been specific it sees this as a domestic housing issue, despite banning golden visas for all investors.
On Monday, prime minister Pedro Sanchez said:  Ninety-four out of every 100 such visas are linked to real estate investment ... in major cities that are facing a highly stressed market and where it s almost impossible to find decent housing for those who already live, work and pay their taxes there.
Spain has issued fewer than 5,000 golden visas since its scheme opened in 2013, mainly to Chinese and Russian citizens. It is revealing that Sanchez chose to make a major political point out of a marginal factor - banning sales to foreigners is popular.
Potential loophole
At the back of many minds are the 300,000 Britons resident in Spain. Although almost none have obtained or could qualify for a golden visa, it had been seen as a potential loophole in post-Brexit residency restrictions. Spain s move made headlines in the UK this week, bringing the concept of a ban to wider attention. A ban in the UK itself has been increasingly discussed in recent years, inspired by a ground-breaking 2018 policy in New Zealand and concerns about Russian money following the invasion of Ukraine.
Foreign house-buyers, as distinct from overseas property investors, are only a noticeable phenomenon in affluent parts of London, where they own 3 per cent of the city s housing stock. This is said to affect the entire housing market, but its true impact is the resentment of the British social elite at being priced out of their own capital. Labour has promised a crackdown when it gets into office by raising stamp duty for foreign buyers, although it has stopped short of proposing a ban.
Other international models are available. Australia limits overseas buyers to new-build dwellings to encourage construction, while levying consent fees and vacancy charges. Switzerland has a national quota of holiday home sales to foreigners, capped at 1,500 a year, in addition to regional restrictions.
An evidence base is also building up on how these policies work. Economists have struggled to discern any impact on house prices from New Zealand s ban. It has been a political success, however, and for politicians that is what counts.
Ireland will become involved in any British debate on property restrictions because Irish citizens would have to be exempt to protect the Belfast Agreement and the Common Travel Area. The reverse would apply should Ireland initiate a debate of its own. The Republic s property market is one of the most open in the world, with effectively no limits on overseas buyers. This is only beginning to become contentious, following recent reports that Chinese multimillionaires were using Irish-based property agents to buy homes in south Dublin  sight unseen , particularly those close to fee-paying schools. But although second-home ownership causes market and social problems, most owners are still Irish.
Spain, New Zealand and the UK show how low numbers of wealthy overseas buyers can still become symbols or scapegoats in a housing crisis. Two years ago, estate agents reported that foreign buyers accounted for half the  country homes  sales in Ireland, with 85 per cent paying cash.
This is a tiny segment of the market, with average prices over EUR 1 million. But they are the type of houses Ireland s social elite dream of owning. As in London, pricing them out may be what puts this issue on the political agenda.here

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Kingspan investors urged to vote against chairman amid concerns; Proxy advisory company Glass Lewis cites 'paucity of disclosure' on ESG issues
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 516 words
Byline: JOE BRENNAN
Body


JOE BRENNAN
 Kingspan shareholders are being urged by an influential investor advisory firm to vote against the re-election of the insulation maker s chairman, Jost Massenberg, amid concerns about a lack of clear board oversight of environmental, social and governance (ESG) issues.
Glass Lewis, a proxy advisory company that makes voting recommendations to large investment groups, said Kingspan is not providing enough disclosure on the board s involvement in governance of environmental and social matters.
 We note that such disclosure is common among the company s peers and, in light of the recent ESG controversies involving the company, we find the relative paucity of disclosure particularly concerning,  Glass Lewis said in a report in advance of Kingspan s annual general meeting (agm) on April 28th.
 Given the lack of progress with regards to the company s disclosure in this area, we believe director Massengberg, as chair of the nominations and governance committee, should be held accountable for these failings.
Proxy advisory firms have become more focused on  ESG matters in recent years, as investors globally take a greater interest. At Kingspan, the firms continue to monitor the fallout from the Grenfell Tower fire in London, which killed 72 people in 2017.
The Cavan-based group s K15 insulation board was used on about 5 per cent of the insulation layer of external cladding of the block, unknown to the company.
However, in late 2020 an inquiry set up by the UK government into the disaster uncovered emails from Kingspan UK staff dating back to 2009 that joked about the fact that fire safety tests on K15 were flawed. The company maintains that tests on K15 have since been repeated and provided evidence to support the original safety claims for the product.
The final report on an inquiry into the disaster is expected to be published this month.
 Science-based targets
Kingspan has pushed back against Glass Lewis s call that investors vote against its chairman at the agm, saying its ESG strategy  is overseen by the whole board of directors in a holistic manner .
 Kingspan s industry-leading 10-year  Planet Passionate  programme sets measurable targets for our business in the areas of carbon, energy, circularity and water,  it said.  The externally verifiable science-based targets we have set for the business to reduce emissions, in both our operations and our value chain, are among the most ambitious in our peer group.
Meanwhile, another leading investor advisory company, Institutional Shareholder Investors (ISS), has given a  qualified support  to the re-election of Kingspan chief executive Gene Murtagh for the second year running, pending the publication of the final Grenfell report.
Kingspan confirmed in early February its involvement in a £150 million (EUR 175.8 million) out-of-court settlement with the UK government related to the Grenfell Tower fire but declined to comment on reports that it had agreed to pay about £4 million as part of the deal. The borough of Kensington and Chelsea and builders Rydon were said to be the two largest contributors.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Langer Dan tackles Grade One company for first time at Aintree
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 20
Length: 428 words
Body


Dual Coral Cup winner Langer Dan takes a step into the unknown as he tackles Grade One company for the first time in the William Hill Aintree Hurdle today.
The eight-year-old had struggled for form during the winter but trainer Dan Skelton reported the gelding had suffered from stomach ulcers over that period.
He was right back to his very best at Cheltenham, however, winning by 3½ lengths to become the first dual winner of the ultra-competitive handicap and he now faces top-level scorers Bob Olinger and Impaire Et Passe in a field of eight.
 He s up in class, running in a Grade One for the first time I think, which is very exciting,  said Skelton.
 I ve got a lot of respect for first two in the betting [Bob Olinger and Impaire Et Passe] and they re not going to be easy horses to beat, but our horse is in great form and put up a career-best in the Coral Cup last time.
 I think he s a player anyway, but whether he can beat the two fancied ones or not we ll see.
Henry de Bromhead s Bob Olinger missed the Cheltenham Festival having finished second in the Irish Champion Hurdle as this has been his main target all season, over his ideal trip of 2½ miles.
 I m really looking forward to riding Bob Olinger in the Aintree Hurdle,  said Rachael Blackmore.
 He was really good in the Relkeel Hurdle at Cheltenham on New Year s Day.
 It was great to feel the old Bob Olinger spark again this season. He really felt back to himself.
 When you have ridden a horse who has the ability that he has, it s great when you get that feeling from him again.
 He ran very well then in the Irish Champion Hurdle at the Dublin Racing Festival at Leopardstown, he did well to keep on to finish second to the champion hurdler State Man.
 He s in great form at home, and hopefully he can continue running like he has been running all season. We couldn t be happier with him, we re really looking forward to him.
Nicky Henderson s Luccia ran a massive career-best to finish third in the Champion Hurdle when many of her stablemates were under a cloud, with her trainer eager to try a longer trip.
 The line of thought with stepping her up in trip is that we haven t really got anywhere else to go other than Punchestown for the two-mile mares  hurdle where you d expect Lossiemouth to turn up,  Henderson told Unibet.
 We were third in the Champion Hurdle so it would be interesting to find out where we compare with Lossiemouth to find out whether Lossiemouth would have been fourth or first in the Champion Hurdle.
Beacon Edge, Mahons Glory, Nemean Lion and Marie s Rock complete the field.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Leinster need to keep Botia quiet if they want to win; If the Fijian flanker gets his hands on the ball, it could all break down for Leinster again
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 18
Length: 828 words
Body


Levani Botia is known to the supporters of La Rochelle as Le Démolisseur, or  the demolition man , in homage to his destructive capacity at the breakdown and corrosive tackling. But it doesn t quite cover all his attributes on a rugby pitch. He is a fearsome ball carrier too.
To his team-mates he is Leps, a self-effacing and hardworking player with a high rugby IQ, that goes way beyond being a physical specimen. He possesses the grit and skills to match the squat power. Botia is the embodiment of a team player. He views it as a necessity rather than a sacrifice, to do everything in pursuit of victory.
He s spoken about his on-pitch persona before.  What I do in the field, people say it s hard, but nothing s hard. Anyone can do that. If you play rugby, you can do it, it s not difficult. I just look at what s in front of me. I just look at what s good for the team, I choose whatever is right in the field.
 When the game is on, people are tired, the right time is going to come. It s not just me, I work with the team, I don t work alone every time,  Botia says.  That s what the people say. For me I just focus on how teamwork brings everything together.
To better understand that philosophy, it s germane to delve into his background. Born on the largest Fijian island of Viti Levu, in the province of Naitasiri;  From the bush and mountains,  as he would describe it.
Without access to a rugby ball, he and his friends played using a water bottle or coconut. In an interview with English media ahead of last year s World Cup clash between Fiji and England, Botia explained:  When I was a kid, we did not have electricity, but we had a generator.
 So, we took it to the mountain where we tried to find a reception to watch the TV. Rugby is like something that goes through our blood, it does not matter your age. We just climbed the mountain. They are always behind the players when there s a Fiji game.
Prison officer
Botia moved to the Fijian capital of Suva from where he walked the 14 kilometres back to Nakasi after lunch for training because he d only enough bus fare ($1.20) for one journey. To supplement his income while playing rugby he took a job as a prison officer.
He recalled:  I think that s what rugby gave to me. It took me somewhere I didn t expect to be, working in a prison. It was not my call. Working in a prison is not simple, as we can see from the outside. But working inside is a little bit difficult. . . It s one of my memories, it s something that helps me on the rugby field. I know when things are hard, I think about when I start. Life inside is different. Sometimes it encourages me, it s difficult.
Botia played for the Wardens Sevens team where he came to the attention of the legendary Waisale Serevi and from there was seconded to the national side   one of his favourite memories is playing in the Hong Kong Sevens   first in the abbreviated game and then for the Flying Fijians in 15s, for whom he played in the 2015, 2019 and 2023 World Cups.
In March 2014 former Fijian wing Sireli Bobo who was playing with La Rochelle contacted Botia with an offer of a three-month medical joker placement with La Rochelle, a French ProD2 team at the time, for the injured Italian centre Gonzalo Canale.
Botia removed the safety net, quit his job in the prison and headed for France for what was essentially a five-match trial. After a month the club offered him a contract. His two tries in the semi-final win over Pau saw Les Maritimes promoted to the French Top 14. Botia and tighthead prop Uini Atonio are the two surviving members in the current squad from that promotion campaign.
Winner s medals
In 2021 he was sent off for a high tackle on Maxime Medard as La Rochelle lost the final to Toulouse but erased that memory with a couple of winner s medals, on both occasions against Leinster, who they will face once again at the Aviva Stadium on Saturday.
Botia, who has also played in two Top 14 finals, played left wing, right wing, and centre in his first four seasons in France but started getting starts as a flanker from 2017 on and has been largely ensconced in that position in recent years.
La Rochelle head coach Ronan O Gara speaks glowingly about Botia, the person, the player, and the leader; the feeling is reciprocated.
 There are a lot of things I have learned from past coaches, but Ronan is a little different from all of them. It s more specific and across all different areas.
 Sometimes we will try to get something done and think it is right, but he ll say,  no, it s still wrong . He gives us a lot of time, and work, to learn everything, especially most of us who have played a long career, but we still have more to learn from him. He believes in me.
And so do his team-mates. Leinster know all about the Fijian, their hopes demolished in three painful European defeats with Botia a primary contributor. If he gets his hands on the ball it ll all break down for the home side again; they must keep him quiet.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Magnier's Coolmore pays EUR 8.925m for 591 acres
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 3
Length: 281 words
Byline: RONALD QUINLAN
Body


RONALD QUINLAN
 He may be locked in litigation in an effort to enforce an alleged deal for his EUR 15 million purchase of Tipperary s 751-acre Barne Estate, but billionaire horse breeder John Magnier continues to hoover up vast swathes of the so-called premier county.
While others might pause to catch a breath in similar circumstances, Magnier s Coolmore has added another 591 acres to its already-extensive Tipperrary land portfolio according to the Irish Farmers Journal.
In the first instance, Coolmore is reported to have paid EUR 2.425 million, or almost EUR 38,000 an acre for a 64-acre farm at Parkville on the outskirts of Clonmel.
The price paid represented a premium of EUR 1.125 million on the EUR 1.3 million which had been sought when the farm was offered up for auction, and Coolmore secured the property in the face of competition from four other bidders.
Magnier s second and more significant acquisition over recent weeks is Killough Castle and its farm.
Located 4km from Horse and Jockey, the castle which dates from the 1400s sits on 471 acres of tillage land, grassland and forestry with a further 56-acre outfarm bringing the entire estate to an overall area of 527 acres.
While selling agent Sherry FitzGerald had been guiding a price of EUR 5.5 million for Killough Castle and its 471 acres with the outfarm subject to further negotiation, The Irish Times understands that Coolmore decided to acquire the entire.
The price paid is understood to have been in the region of EUR 6.5 million. Sherry FitzGerald declined to comment.
The addition of Killough Castle and Parkmore to Coolmore s portfolio brings its landbank in Tipperary alone to approximately 11,000 acres.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Man 'effectively admitted' causing crash leading to commentator's death, court told
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 464 words
Byline: OLIVIA KELLEHER
Body


OLIVIA KELLEHER
 A man who has pleaded not guilty to dangerous driving causing the death of GAA commentator Paudie Palmer in Co Cork allegedly sent text messages to third parties on the day of the incident where he admitted leaving the scene, a jury has heard.
Brendan Kelly, prosecuting, told a jury at Cork Circuit Criminal Court they would hear evidence that Bohdan Bezverkhyi (33)  effectively admitted  in his messages to others that  it [the incident] was his fault .
Mr Kelly said the Ukrainian national also indicated to gardaí during interview that he had been involved in a collision and then  panicked .
Mr Bezverkhyi, of Rigsdale House, Ballinhassig, denies dangerous driving causing the death of Mr Palmer at Dunkereen Cross, Innishannon on December 29th, 2022.
Mr Palmer (65), a sports journalist from Co Kerry, was involved in GAA coverage for Cork radio stations 96FM and C103FM for decades.
Mr Kelly told Judge Jonathan Dunphy and the jury that the State will say Mr Bezverkhyi spent several hours in his car at a petrol station in Crossbarry because of a flat tyre on the morning of the incident.
He said the evidence will be that after the tyre was replaced with a speed restricted space saver, the accused drove towards Dunkereen at about 9.50am.
He said Colette Downey, who lives near Dunkereen Cross, was in her kitchen and heard a  revving engine . She left her house and saw Mr Palmer s red Peugeot car up against an embankment.
The emergency services were called and Mr Palmer was taken to hospital, where he died on January 8th, 2023.
Death
Mr Kelly said the jurors would hear evidence from Assistant State Pathologist Dr Margaret Bolster the cause of death was traumatic brain and spinal cord injuries due to a road traffic collision.
He said it would be the State s case that Mr Bezverkhyi breached a stop sign, resulting in a collision with Mr Palmer s car. Debris from the grey BMW car driven by Mr Bezverkhyi was found at the scene, he said.
The trial heard evidence from Lorrinda Crowley, who works at Centra in the Crossbarry petrol station, who said she saw a silver BMW in the forecourt when she arrived for work on the day. She said a man came in and explained to her, using Google translate, that he had a problem with his tyre.
Garda Jacinta O Leary told the trial she was informed that a small car was causing an obstruction on the forecourt in Crossbarry. She said the man standing next to the car spoke to her in  broken English , saying  no drive, car broke .
She asked him if he had been drinking and he said he had not. Garda O Leary said she was not of the opinion that Mr Bezverkhyi was intoxicated in any way when she spoke to him. He was asked to move his car and was agreeable, and she and a colleague then left the scene.
The case continues.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



MATTHEW DEVEREUX House Devil H H H Self-released
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 359 words
Body


The last time Matthew Devereux released a solo album, it was a very different proposition. The Dubliner, best known as frontman of the 1990s Irish indie-rock stalwarts The Pale, flipped the script and leaned into instrumental ambient electronica on that 2003 record, Tap, Tap, Tap.
Two decades later, its follow-up sounds more in line with his day job in The Pale (who are still an active group), although remnants of that sense of experimentation linger throughout these 10 tracks.
The album s opening track, Haunted By, begins as a strummed acoustic song before cello and piano interlace with quirky effects, as Devereux sings that he has  grown a little philosophical, but at least I ve grown  and repeatedly asks the question  Would you rather be haunted by someone from the other side, or someone from this side?
The songwriter is undoubtedly earnest in his approach, but his propensity to fill every empty space with lyrics (some of them cumbersome and pretentious, others just plain odd, like Mrs Slocombe s  For all the time you spent setting fire to everyone / You could ve walked to the centre of the sun ) instead of letting each song breathe and unravel is ultimately his undoing here. Are Candy ( Airplane dropping candy on a city it wants levelled ) and Numbers ( The numbers have no sympathy, the numbers have no heart ) protest songs or simply stream-of-consciousness observations?
The overbearing, lugubrious tone is difficult to shirk, too; it sounds as though Devereux has perhaps been through a difficult period, as songs such as the detached-yet-exasperated Still Life Model and the existential Uncanny Valley suggest.
 That sense of aimlessness pervades the music, too   which is largely fine, although pitched somewhere between a Tom Waits-style moody murmur and a Depeche Mode/sci-fi-influenced electronic patter.
The Boy with X-Ray Eyes is a clear standout, striking a balance between atmosphere, texture and melody, with faint shades of southern gothic giving it a cinematic-soundtrack feel. Devereux s record as a musician has been long proven, but unfortunately this feels like either a misstep or a missed opportunity. LAUREN MURPHY

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Modern, detached homes at new development
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 12
Length: 490 words
Byline: JESSICA DOYLE
Body


JESSICA DOYLE
 Detached three- and four-bedroom houses are being launched to the market by Kelly Walsh Estate Agents at Homeland Group s new Watson Place development in Rathfarnham, Dublin 16. There will be nine properties available in its first release, including two two-storey three-bedroom houses (134sq m/153sq m) from EUR 925,000, and seven three-storey four-bedroom houses (194sq m-203sq m) from EUR 1.175 million.
Once completed, Watson Place will comprise just 16 two-, three- and four-bedroom homes surrounding Ballyroan House. The house itself, circa 1850, was home to Dublin tea merchant Joshua Watson, the new development s namesake. The old house is now being  sensitively restored and extended , according to the selling agent, to create eight one- and two-bedroom apartments.
This development will be the third by the Homeland Group in the area, joining previous schemes Silveracre and Bolton Park.
The detached houses at Watson Place have striking modern exteriors with a pitched-roof design and extensive glazing. A2 energy-rated, the homes are also covered by a 10-year Homebond structural guarantee scheme. Each house benefits from generous and private back gardens with paved patio areas. A Google Nest video doorbell is also provided as standard.
There are concrete floors and underfloor heating  throughout these properties, and they are fitted with triple-glazed, aluminium-clad, timber windows, and an air-to-water heat pump heating system.
The hub of the home is laid out as an open-plan kitchen/ dining/livingroom with contemporary fitted kitchen units, an island/breakfast bar, quartz countertops and splashback as standard. In addition, kitchens come fitted with a Quooker tap for on-demand boiling water, as well as Neff appliances, including an integrated pantry fridge, freezer, built-in oven, microwave, large format induction hob, extractor hood and dishwasher.
Utility rooms are fitted with storage and plumbed for a washing machine and dryer, while bathrooms and en suites have been designed with floor and wall tiles laid in neutral shades with wet-room style showers and minimalist-style sanitary ware.
The area is served by several primary and secondary schools, such as Ballyroan Boys  National School, Coláiste Éanna, Scoil Naomh Pádraig, Sancta Maria College and Loreto High School Beaufort.
There is also a good selection of sports facilities nearby, including Ballyboden St Enda s GAA Club, Bushy Park Tennis and Padel Club, Terenure College Rugby Football Club and Rathfarnham Athletics Club.
Rathfarnham and Templeogue villages offer local amenities, restaurants and bars while Dundrum Town Centre is only 7km for shopping and visits to the cinema. There are also several Dublin bus routes passing through Rathfarnham, providing regular services into Dublin city centre.
A show house at Watson Place, which was designed by Avenue Interior Design, is now available to view by appointment through Kelly Walsh.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



More than 4,000 people avail of First Home Scheme to buy property
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 16
Length: 285 words
Byline: CIARA O'BRIEN
Body


CIARA O BRIEN
 More than 4,000 buyers have been approved for the Government s First Home Scheme, designed to aid first-time purchasers, the latest update has shown. There has been a 118 per cent increase in homes bought under the scheme in the first quarter of the year.
The EUR 400 million scheme   a joint venture between the State and AIB, Bank of Ireland and PTSB   has provided more than EUR 100 million in supports for the completed purchase thus far of more than 1,500 homes since it was set up. It helps bridge the gap between a mortgage, deposit and the price of a new home.
The latest update shows an increase in the scheme s usage during the first quarter of the year, with 262 homes bought in the period January to March, 2024, compared to 120 in the same quarter a year earlier.
The number of new applications has also grown in the first three months of the year, rising 49 per cent to 927 compared to 623 in the same period of 2023.
A quarter of the approvals were for homes in Dublin, with 15 per cent in Kildare and 14 per cent in Cork.
More than 500 applications currently being processed are due to be decided shortly, with the majority expected to be approved. The average purchase price for houses under the scheme is EUR 379,000, with about EUR 67,000, or 17 per cent, expected to be provided by the scheme, on average.
Chief executive of the scheme Michael Broderick said it had had a strong start to the year.  Applications are up almost 50 per cent year-on-year, and that augurs well for activity levels over the rest of the year.
The scheme was extended in April last year to renters who want to buy their home from a landlord, and in September to include those who wanted to build their own home.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Mother of girl who died after being swept into sea settles Scouting Ireland legal case; Teenager went into water after scout leaders decided to stop at lighthouse, court told
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 597 words
Byline: FIACHRA GALLAGHER
Body


FIACHRA GALLAGHER  The mother of Aoife Winterlich, who died after she was swept into sea off Hook Head, Co Wexford during a scouting trip more than eight years ago, has settled her legal action against Scouting Ireland.
The 14-year-old, from Walkinstown, Dublin, died in hospital five days after being pulled into the sea by strong waves on December 6th, 2015, when scout leaders made an  ad hoc  decision to stop at Hook Head lighthouse during Storm Desmond.
Standing outside the Four Courts yesterday, Anne Winterlich strongly criticised the scouting organisation for not accepting liability for the tragedy for more than eight years.
 We have been trying for eight years to get Scouting Ireland to be held accountable. And finally, after all this time, they now admit full liability,  she said, flanked by her adult sons Martin, Jack and Craig.
 The heartbreak caused by Scouting Ireland s negligence, cannot be overstated. Their failures in duty of care have had devastating consequences. Accountability is required to ensure such tragedies are prevented in the future.
A sitting of Dublin Civil Circuit Court heard that Scouting Ireland accepted liability for the young girl s death this week. The case taken by Ms Winterlich was settled for a sum of more than EUR 54,000, the court heard.
Judge Christopher Callan said Aoife s death was  an unbelievable tragedy  for the Winterlich family and that Scouting Ireland, which often acted as a  great organisation  for many children,  fell short  in not accepting liability for it sooner.
Finbarr Fox SC, for Ms Winterlich told the court Aoife died following the  ad hoc  decision by scout leaders to make an unscheduled stop at Hook Head during a group excursion.
The group of teenagers were allowed to  run around the place  without guidance or instruction, Mr Fox told the court, and some of the scouts   including Aoife   made their way to the shoreline.
A  ghastly tragedy  then unfolded, he said, when Aoife was swept out to sea. He noted that it was  remarkable   only one child was lost in the waves that day.
Mr Fox strongly criticised Scouting Ireland for maintaining a full defence of the incident until this week, stating that it was  difficult to fathom  why it took eight years for the organisation to accept liability. He said the case, and how it transpired over a protracted period, had been  extremely distressful  for the family.
Judge Callan noted that the case was  an unbelievable tragedy  for the Winterlich family, one that was compounded by the death of Aoife s father some time after.
The judge said he hoped the settlement would bring closure for the Winterlich family, but he noted that the Aoife s death will likely  never leave them  and was a  huge burden  for them to carry.
Speaking to reporters outside the Four Courts, Ms Winterlich said it was hard to live with the fact that her daughter s death was  completely preventable . She said Aoife s bright future was  snatched away  by a decision made by Scouting Ireland  and that she was  disgusted  that the organisation took so long to accept liability.
 I gave consent for Aoife to travel with her scout group to a hostel in Waterford. On the way back the scout leaders made an unscheduled stop at Hook Head in Wexford, without parental consent. This was during Storm Desmond, which brought severe gales and gusts of 80mph,  she said.
 The children were left unsupervised for a significant period leading to my precious daughter being swept into the sea by the turbulent waves. Hook Head is not a place to leave a group of 14-year-olds unattended during a storm.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Mulroy happy Louth still moving in the right direction post Harte transplant; Players have responded well under Ger Brennan and are focused on returning to the Leinster final
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 21
Length: 771 words
Body


Life after Mickey Harte; nobody was quite sure how it would play out for the Louth footballers.
In the immediate aftermath of last September s shock announcement that Harte was jumping ship from Louth to join Derry, there were fears the Wee County s upward trajectory from his three years at the helm would be halted.
Truth be told, that story still has a way to run yet before its final few chapters take shape. But so far, so good for Louth in 2024.
Former Dublin star Ger Brennan s appointment initially steadied the ship and then, as the league progressed, there were clear signs the players had responded to the new management. There would be no malaise and no reaching for easy excuses.
 I think that was mainly the big aim for this year, to ensure that we didn t take a step backwards,  says Sam Mulroy.
 And while some results didn t go our way, I thought the group showed serious character to stay in Division Two with all the change that happened.
For three seasons Harte and his coach Gavin Devlin were in the Louth wheelhouse, and the Tyrone duo transformed the fortunes of the Wee County s senior footballers.
When Harte was appointed in late 2020 Louth had just been relegated to Division Four. But when he hightailed it to Derry last September, he left Louth in Division Two and with a team which had contested the 2023 Leinster final. So, definitely in a far better place.
Still, the nature of his departure stunned Louth   including those inside the dressingroom.
 [The players were] probably blindsided like everybody else,  admitted Mulroy.  It was a big shock and there was great disappointment at the time obviously, we felt we were on a journey.
 But it s kind of one of those things, you quickly move on, you have a job to do and no matter who is involved we have a responsibility to look after ourselves and it was a case of next man in.
Brennan, a two-time All-Ireland winner with Dublin, was that next man in. He assembled a management team that included James McCartan, a Sam Maguire winner with Down in 1991 and 1994, and Niall Moyna   who had worked with the Dubs during their all-conquering era.
Positives
Mulroy, rather than focusing on the negatives of Harte s departure, says Louth have been accentuating the positives of getting the opportunity to work with several more All-Ireland winners.
 There is a different dynamic, different philosophies, different thoughts. I think it has been interesting for us as players to marry them both together, which has been exciting,  says the Louth captain.
 Ger has been excellent in terms of listening to what we have learned and bringing that in with his style and, vice versa, the players have taken on board everything he has brought to the table.
 He s an All-Ireland winner and there are lots of All-Ireland medals in that management team with James McCartan and Niall Moyna, so it has been great to have those guys with that experience in our dressingroom.
 Ger was around for the start of that Jim Gavin era so there is lots of knowledge there. James McCartan is coming from maybe a different era again, so it has been nice to marry the whole lot together and try get a style of football that is suited to us as a team.
Mulroy also feels the mix of footballing cultures   the Tyrone influence of the previous three seasons and Brennan s Dublin approach this term   can only benefit Louth.
 I suppose it is a different way of talking maybe and looking at the game, the language the boys use and the way they see it can be different   and it s probably reflected in the styles of the northern football and maybe the Dublin style of football.
 It has been nice to marry those together and find a nice balance between them.
Louth begin their Leinster SFC campaign with a quarter-final against Wexford on Sunday in Portlaoise. Having retained their Division Two status, the next target is to navigate a way back to a provincial decider.
Aspirations
Ultimately, Mulroy feels this group of Louth players are building something bigger than yearly aspirations   they want to change how the county s footballers are viewed.
 For that younger generation, it s important that they have somebody to look up to, that they have a team to look up to within the county,  he says.
 In years past, you would have seen lots of soccer jerseys with Drogheda and Dundalk being in the League of Ireland, lots of rugby players have come from Louth too.
 You would have seen [kids] wearing Dublin jerseys or Kerry jerseys an awful lot more when I was younger. It s a case of now,  Can we change that narrative?  Make heroes and good teams out of Louth and give the kids something to strive for.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



New homes and the climate crisis
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 391 words
Body


Sir,   Whether it s achievable or not, Taoiseach Simon Harris s promise to deliver 250,000 new homes between 2025 and 2030 seems bizarre, first in the context of Ireland s obligation to reduce its CO2 emissions, and second in view of the number of vacant properties in the country.
The Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) calculates that, depending on the size and type of house being built, the construction of one unit is responsible for between 15 and 100 tonnes of CO2 emissions. Assuming an average of 50 tonnes of CO2 emissions associated with building a new house in Ireland, the planned construction of 250,000 units would represent 12.5 million tonnes of CO2 emissions. But that figure covers only the houses themselves. Extra access roads and civic amenities such as supermarkets will also have to be built to serve the occupants of those houses. Road construction alone is a seriously high CO2 emitter, with the construction of one mile of single-lane road estimated (by the UK s Institute of Civil Engineering) to be responsible for the emission of over 3,000 tonnes of CO2.
In 2022, the Central Statistics Office (CSO) calculated that Irish households, on average, consisted of 2.74 occupants, and that there were 166,000 vacant homes in the country, many of them vacant for several years. If occupied, those vacant homes could, theoretically, accommodate almost 700,000 people, while on the demand side, the CSO s most recent estimate of the number of homeless came to 166,000.
It would, of course, be grossly simplistic to suggest that all the country s vacant properties should be requisitioned to house the homeless, but there is a need for a much more imaginative and holistic approach to housing than just continuing to build new units. Bringing a vacant property up to a required standard is, in most cases, much more environmentally friendly in terms of CO2 emissions, and it doesn t require the covering of new land with concrete. Assuming a requirement of 0.2 hectare per house (including road access, amenities, etc), 250,000 houses would cover about 500 square kilometres.
Homelessness and climate change are the hot topics of the day here in Ireland, but it seems that little thought is being given to the influence that the solution to the one may have on the other.   Yours, etc,
SWITHUN GOODBODY,
Cappaghglass,
Co Cork.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



New migration pact will harden up EU borders; Concerns that reception facilities will now proliferate across Europe
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 405 words
Body


After years of faltering starts and winding negotiations, the long-debated and highly contentious reform of EU asylum policy finally cleared the European Parliament yesterday.
The new migration pact will harden up the European Union s borders and includes measures to help southern countries, often the point of arrival for asylum seekers, better shoulder that burden.
Eight years in the making, 10 Bills that made up the reform package were approved by the 705-seat parliament by margins of less than 30 votes in some cases.
Better life The measures will firm up asylum policy in an effort to discourage the flow of migrants fleeing to Europe to try to build a better life, who would not be entitled to asylum.
Human rights organisations say the move towards quicker timelines to process some asylum cases could increase the risk of vulnerable people s claims being incorrectly refused.  There are concerns new reception facilities such as those already opened on the Greek island of Samos, where conditions have been described as  prison-like , will proliferate across the EU s borders and become the norm.
The pact was opposed by MEPs in the left and Green groupings, who could not stomach it, as well as on the far right, who felt it did not go far enough. Fianna Fáil and Fine Gael MEPs backed the reforms, but the other Irish MEPs voted against the majority of its measures.
Many MEPs from the centre who were not happy with many aspects of the deal held their noses and voted it through.
Harsher proposals This was in part due to fears that going back to the drawing board would result in even harsher proposals being put forward in the next parliament.
For much of the last decade the EU has been struggling to respond to what in 2015 was dubbed the  migration crisis .
The current pact was proposed by the commission four years ago, but has its roots in previous efforts to reform asylum policy as far back as 2016.
What are not covered in the pact, but which will provide the backdrop to the policy, are side deals that have been struck with countries on the other side of the Mediterranean. The EU has agreements with Tunisia, Libya and Egypt, providing funding in exchange for help in curbing the number of asylum seekers trying to make the crossing to Europe.
Alongside those deals, the result of the vote yesterday  sends the message that the walls of  fortress Europe  are set to become higher and the barbed wire sharper.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



New three- and four-beds in west Dublin
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 6
Length: 521 words
Byline: JESSICA DOYLE
Body


JESSICA DOYLE
DNG New Homes is introducing 40  new homes to the market at the new Keepers Lock scheme, developed by Kelland Homes, in Clonburris, Dublin 22. This, its first phase, is set to include a range of three-bed homes, from EUR 435,000, and four-bed homes from EUR 525,000.
The development, due to be completed by November this year, will comprise 256 units when finished, including two-bedroom apartments, three-bedroom duplexes and three- and four-bedroom houses. The development is served by the amenities of Clondalkin village   a five-minute drive or 20-minute walk away   and is located beside the Grand Canal greenway, providing a route for daily walks, runs and cycles.
There is a total of 35 three-bedroom houses available in this phase, including three-bed mid- and end-terrace houses called the Daisy I & II (113sq m/1,216sq ft), priced from EUR 435,000.
There are two further three-bed options available at a higher price point, both of which are end-terrace with a side entrance: the Poppy (111sq m/1,189sq ft), priced from EUR 460,000, and the slightly bigger Lily, priced from EUR 470,000.
A-rated homes
 There are also two types of four-bedroom houses available: the semi-detached Clover (133sq m/1,429sq ft) of which there are four available, priced from EUR 495,000, and one detached four-bed called the Honeysuckle (133sq m/1,428sq ft), from EUR 525,000.
All A-rated homes in the scheme will feature grey fitted kitchens, a Neff oven and electric hob, and an integrated dishwasher and fridge-freezer. There is also a separate utility space. Bathrooms and en suites are tiled on floor and wet areas, featuring heated towel rails, sanitary ware and a twin shower head.
Every residence in the scheme will become a member of the estate s management company which will oversee the affairs and day-to-day running of the estate with fees  ranging from EUR 580 to EUR 620 a year.
Keepers Lock homes are covered by a 10-year Homebond structural guarantee and latent defects insurance and five years  mechanical and electrical defects insurance.
Of interest to commuters, Keepers Lock is less than a five-minute walk to Clondalkin Fonthill train station, which has services that take about 12 minutes to reach Heuston station in Dublin city centre, while the M50 is easily accessible and the Luas park-and-ride facility at the Red Cow is a 10 minutes  drive away.
Clonburris is a  new urban neighbourhood , according to selling agent DNG New Homes, which, it says, will eventually contain 9,000 residences.
First-time buyers looking to buy at the development have the option to apply for the Help to Buy scheme (on units priced below the EUR 500,000 threshold) to claim the lesser of EUR 30,000 or 10 per cent of the purchase value of a new home.
They could also apply to the First Home shared-equity scheme, in which the Government and participating banks pay up to 30 per cent of the cost of the home (20 per cent if also claiming Help to Buy) to fill the gap between a first-time buyer s mortgage and the cost of their home. In the south Dublin local authority area, the price ceiling for eligible properties is EUR 475,000.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



O'Doherty denies harassing woman after being arrested and brought before court; Journalist accused of breaching injunction obtained by mother of man who died
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 620 words
Byline: AODHAN O'FAOLAIN
Body


AODHAN O FAOLAIN  Gemma O Doherty has rejected claims that she harassed a woman whose son died by suicide and said any attempt to jail her for alleged contempt is  outrageous and unlawful .
Ms O Doherty was brought before the High Court yesterday following her arrest by gardaí. Mr Justice Conor Dignam adjourned to later this week an application that could see Ms O Doherty jailed over her alleged failure to comply with the terms of an injunction obtained by Edel Campbell.
The adjournment is to allow Ms O Doherty to have a lawyer in court and to obtain relevant legal documents. She was released after the hearing.
Under the terms of the injunction, which is to remain in place pending the outcome of the proceedings, Ms O Doherty is restrained from harassing or intimidating Ms Campbell, from Kingscourt, Co Cavan, and from disclosing any confidential information about the plaintiff and her family.
Remove
The injunction was granted as part of proceedings Ms Campbell has brought against Ms O Doherty over the use of an image of her late son, Diego Gilsenan, in the Irish Light newspaper, which Ms O Doherty edits. The court ordered Ms O Doherty to remove Mr Gilsenan s image from any media platforms under her control and to not publish any images of Ms Campbell and her family on any medium.
It is claimed that in a series of video posts last year Ms O Doherty made statements in breach of the court s orders. This led to the application against Ms O Doherty over her alleged contempt.
Ms O Doherty yesterday told the judge she has never harassed anyone and has never met Ms Campbell. She alleged she was defamed by Ms Campbell in a RTÉ radio interview.
She described the injunction, which was not appealed, as being unlawful and said she was not prepared to comply with it. She said the plaintiff s complaints were an attempt to prevent her from doing her job as an investigative reporter who cares about deaths that have been  covered up .
Ms O Doherty told the judge that  if you do jail me, it would be jailing me for being an investigative journalist, I would not like to be in your shoes .
It was accepted that she had published  a postage stamp sized  picture of Mr Gilsenan, but she said it was part of a story investigating the sudden deaths of young people.
Ms O Doherty also said she had posted online a copy of the coroner s report on Mr Gilsenen s death, which she said is a public document and something the court could not direct her to remove.
Injunction
David Kennedy SC for Ms Campbell, told the court his client wanted  nothing more  than for Ms O Doherty to comply with the injunction. However, she had refused to do so, leaving his client with  no option  other than bring the motion alleging contempt.
Counsel said his client was not complaining about the posting of the inquest outcome, but it is their case that the commentary about his client clearly amounted to harassment.
Ms Campbell has sued Ms O Doherty over the alleged unauthorised publication of the image of her late son following his death in 2021. She claims Ms O Doherty has wrongly and unlawfully used the image in an article on media controlled by Ms O Doherty allegedly linking unexplained deaths to the Covid-19 vaccine.
She secured an injunction restraining Ms O Doherty from harassing the plaintiff, or from publishing Ms Campbell s and her late son s images or any personal confidential material about them.
Ms Campbell further claims that the unauthorised and repeated use of her son s image amounts to harassment and a breach of her constitutional rights. She claims that it has caused her emotional pain, suffering and harm. Ms O Doherty rejects all of the allegations and says that she removed the image as a gesture of goodwill.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



O'Gara and Ryan adding a layer of red to La Rochelle's mentality; Head coach and his assistant have introduced their team to the rugby culture of Munster
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 18
Length: 834 words
Body


In La Rochelle, the street where he lives, Ile de Ré, has become Ile de Rog. This week Cork has become Rog Town, Ronan O Gara s staging post for the Saturday assault on Leinster in Aviva Stadium. The French side didn t go home after their stint in South Africa, instead taking a commercial flight from Cape Town to Johannesburg and on to Paris. From there it was straight to Ireland.
The team is lapping up what it is like to be Munster and where their coaches O Gara and Donnacha Ryan launched their own raids into Dublin years ago, with all the passion and enmity that goes with provincial rivalry.
 We met the mayor last night,  says Ryan.  We went out for a meal with the staff, it was great. The mayor just happened to be with the French ambassador in the restaurant. He came up and said hello and informed all the boys that Rog was given the  Freeman of Cork  and what a big accolade it is. Just to give the context to the staff.
 Erin s Own were playing last night. I was planning on bringing a few lads but unfortunately, we had to start late yesterday because the lads were still tired from the trip. We had to push everything back. We went out with the staff to a place with Irish music, it was fantastic. Some of the guys are going to dig a few holes on the golf course today and maybe go around town and meet up with a few of the Munster boys they played against.
O Gara is infusing his French team with a different kind of zeal. He s adding a layer of red to his players  mentality, painting a picture of what rugby means to Munster and for a French team facing an Irish side in a European quarter-final. He s loading them with more local goodwill than they could have imagined.
Position in the community
Prepping in Cork is about the players knowing about their coaches and O Gara s exalted position in the community. He makes it his business to know all his players  backgrounds. This week they are learning something of him, creating bonds and experiences, they hope this might count for something in the heat of a Champions Cup knock-out match.
 Yeah, yeah. Jeez, the first thing when we came into the airport, it was incredible,  says Ryan.  When we were going through security, the lads didn t have to hand their passports into the two lads at the desk. The French boys were kinda shocked by that level of familiarity.
 We get a lot of Irish people that come over to our games and the boys are very receptive to that. They really appreciate that. That s what it s all about. We got to train in Temple Hill yesterday. There were a lot of old coaches up there. Donal Lenihan was up there, Brian Hickey and the rest.
 So, obviously we get to share a few stories with them and introduce them to the players and staff from La Rochelle. It does give a bit of colour to the person   who you are and where you ve been brought up and played.
Still, the craic in Cork and golf around Fota Island s championship course is carefully measured.  We have to draw a bit of a line,  cautions Ryan knowing cold steel must replace bonhomie and Munster fables otherwise the coup that is winning over hearts and minds will be all for nothing.
While La Rochelle lost to Leinster in December, they have had the upper hand in previous seasons. It won t be beyond them to position themselves as underdogs again. Ryan also has the experience of being coached by Leinster s double-World Cup-winning coach Jacques Nienaber, when he and Springbok coach Rassie Erasmus were in Munster.
There are not many secrets to Leinster s play. How to counter it is the challenge facing La Rochelle.
 We played Leinster back in Deflandre earlier in the season and you could see there was a big defensive appetite there to get off the line and put pressure on,  says Ryan.  That s pretty much the South African model and Jacques mentioned before he had a 16-week plan to implement into the Leinster defensive system.
Line speed
 Look, I had the pleasure of being coached by Jacques in Munster, and Rassie, so very smart guys, they know what they re about and it s certainly the one clear thing you can see, that their defensive line speed is very good and at the same time their breakdown work in defence is very good too. So, it s something we have to make sure we put a bit of focus on this week.
Everyone is looking for percentages. But Ryan dismisses claims La Rochelle are psychologically fuelling up on the local affections and admiration that coalesce around the former Irish outhalf. Allowing the French players understand what winning means to their coach, he says, is less psych training than team bonding.
 Ah no. To be honest   the boys, they love seeing Rog in his home environment,  he says.  The boys have been made to feel welcome here and looking for any stories that are going round, so they can just knock a bit of craic out of us. We ve had a lot of people offering any bit of help we may need, you know,  if there s anything you need, let us know . That s what rugby is all about.
Canny O Gara? Or all mighty craic?

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



One of the features of IoT to business is low data and power usage at a low cost; With the majority of IoT systems built for 2G mobile networks, the old GSM network used by first-generation digital mobile phones, Three Ireland's aim is to facilitate the technology transition to the advantages of 5G
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 14
Length: 787 words
Body


Internet of Things (IoT) usage is increasing rapidly and now accounts for the lion s share of growth in the Irish mobile market.  It is growing at an even faster rate in Ireland than globally,  says Eóin MacManus, chief business officer with Three Ireland.  According to the latest Global Cellular IoT Devices market report, the IoT devices segment had a compound annual growth rate (CAGR) of 6.2 per cent between 2019 and 2022. The market was valued at US$18.73 billion in 2022 and is expected to reach $44.2 billion in 2029.
The growth rate was even more impressive in Ireland, he adds.  It was 28.1 per cent for the 2019-2022 period and 27.7 per cent when 2023 is included.
Putting those statistics in context, he points out that the overall annual growth rate in the Irish mobile market including voice, broadband and IoT was 9 per cent for the period from 2019 to 2023 but when IoT is stripped out it falls to just 3.1 per cent.
And Three has accounted for the majority of that growth in the IoT market.  Three takes IoT very seriously and we have a very strong focus on it,  says MacManus.
 Our own IoT business grew at an annual rate of 39.4 per cent between 2019 and 2023 and Three now holds a 74 per cent share of the market. We are the largest player by a very significant margin.
The use cases for IoT span every sector including transport, retail, security and manufacturing, he explains.  In the retail sector, IoT-connected sensors can monitor air quality indicators such as CO2 levels in real-time and adjust air conditioning systems to purify the air as and when required. This can reduce heating, ventilation and air-conditioning energy consumption by up to 40 per cent.
The applications in transport include in-car entertainment, maintenance and diagnostic applications, and much more.  It can also be used for fleet management to track and monitor vehicles wirelessly, to maximise efficiency and drive superior performance,  he adds.  It can report vehicle location, distance covered, speed, and fuel consumption, for example.
It can also be used to improve the efficiency of industrial processes.  IoT-connected sensors can monitor almost every aspect of the process and report any variations before they cause problems. In construction, it can be used in a variety of areas like health and safety compliance. Connected cameras can monitor if safety protocols are being observed and to identify hazards and risks. The technology can also enhance the security of business premises by connecting and managing CCTV cameras, monitors and alarm systems.
Key competitive differentiators
 Three s proven track record in the space along with its service offering are key competitive differentiators, according to MacManus. Those credentials include winning the connectivity provider contract for the ESB smart metering rollout in 2019.  The service level agreement for connectivity is higher than the vast majority of smart meter rollouts around the world,  he says.
 When businesses come to us for our services, the number of connected devices they are using can vary from single digits to thousands or even millions,  he continues.  We have been in the business for more than a decade and have developed significant expertise and capability over that time. Our Irish IoT arm is the centre of excellence for the Three Group internationally and it supports customers of every size in every sector. We provide our customers with physical Sims, IoT profile Sims and e-Sims, and a portal to allow them to manage all of the devices from a single dashboard. What we have done is develop an IoT ecosystem that offers our customers complete solutions that fix a lot of real business issues. Underpinning that is our award-winning Limerick call centre. The team there supports Three IoT customers across various markets in the UK, Europe, and the US as well as Ireland.
The company has also developed a nationwide low-power wide-area network (LPWAN) to help maximise coverage, lower costs and reduce the power consumption of IoT devices.  The new networks will support narrowband IoT (NBIoT) and long-term evolution mobile,  MacManus says.
The overall aim is to facilitate a significant technology transition. He explains that the majority of IoT systems were built for 2G mobile networks   the old GSM network that the first generation of digital mobile phones used.
 These networks are being phased out all over the world and are already gone in the US,  he points out.
 The LPWAN is the equivalent of 2G on the 5G network. It offers all the functions and features of 2G along with the advantages of 5G. One of the features of IoT is low data and power usage at a low cost. That will continue by using the LPWAN networks.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Pauw breaks silence to hit out at Caldwell and Gleeson; Ex-Ireland manager says she was 'destroyed' by player's criticism
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 845 words
Body


In the close to eight months since the FAI opted not to renew her contract as Republic of Ireland manager there had been radio silence from Vera Pauw, her only response to that decision coming in an interview with RTÉ in its immediate aftermath.
But the Dutch woman has finally had her say on what was a tumultuous final year in her time in charge here, both on a personal and professional level.
Speaking to Richie Sadlier on his Second Captains podcast, Episode, Pauw took aim at an array of characters she worked alongside in that spell, from players Diane Caldwell and Katie McCabe, to her successor Eileen Gleeson and FAI chief executive Jonathan Hill.
Pauw talked in depth about the emotional toll of being named in a report by the US National Women s Soccer League (NWSL) on misconduct by their coaches, coming, as it did, just a few months after she alleged that she had been a victim of rape and sexual assault three decades before by men who were employed within Dutch football.
 I didn t know how to live any more,  she said.  I thought, I can do two things: I can go to find help or I kill myself. I was not ready to kill myself, so I found help.
Once again, Pauw vehemently denied the charges levelled against her in that NWSL report, which were chiefly about  weight-shaming  her Houston Dash players, describing it as  ridiculous . But she said that  when people are accused of things, you re then in the position of  there s no smoke without fire  . For that reason, she believes she will never again get a job in football  in the western world .
Palpable anger
Pauw dates the beginning of the end of her time as Ireland coach to her interview with The Athletic shortly before the World Cup, when she again dismissed the NWSL allegations against her. There was palpable anger in the Ireland camp, not least from captain McCabe, about her engaging with the website on the issue so soon before the tournament, so much so Pauw said she knew going to Australia that her contract would not be renewed.
Pauw accused Hill of undermining her authority with her players by having  safeguarding  meetings with them following The Athletic piece, and claimed that a bond that had been  deep  with her squad was well and truly broken by the time they got to Australia.
 From the very first moment, nobody respected me,  Pauw said.  It was special to be at the World Cup, but I remember before the first game being on the pitch, I looked around and I thought, this is for yourself. You ve done everything, always, your whole life for others. This is for yourself.
And she threw a sizeable barb at her players.  I thought, do the best you can, make sure they play their best game ever, keep it simple, because they cannot grasp more than the simple things.
Pauw also recalled McCabe s end of tournament speech to the players and staff, who she thanked. Did she mention her manager by name?  Not specifically. I felt it. But I felt so much already during the tournament.  What stung, too, was the players  eagerness to leave the post-tournament gathering to go off and do their own thing.  They just left to go out without any decency. So that was it. You can imagine how I felt at that moment. I couldn t be bothered any more.
Patched up
Pauw said she has since patched up her differences with McCabe after two hour-long conversations by phone.  I hope that there will be a moment when I will have friends again in Ireland. Katie said,  Vera, please don t be a stranger . I said,  Katie, I hope that I will not be a stranger, because right now I feel I am a stranger to the team.
Differences with Caldwell might, though, be irreparable. Back in September, the defender excoriated Pauw s time in charge of Ireland, claiming that the team s achievements were  in spite of  and not because of her.
Pauw was, she said, left feeling  destroyed  by Caldwell s remarks which was  probably everything that she wanted me to feel .  I felt sorry for her that she needed to do this,  Pauw said. She was  disappointed  in Eileen Gleeson, her former assistant, for saying that Caldwell had the right to express her opinion. If one of her players had spoken like that about her previous manager, Pauw would, she said, have told her  you can go up to your room, pack your bag and leave the camp .  I was disappointed [in Gleeson] because two weeks earlier, we said nothing comes between us, we love each other.
Pauw is, she said, in  very intense therapy , her hope is that she will  find the reason to enjoy life again . She could only sleep without the aid of pills two weeks ago.  I m deliberately hurt so much. Why do people do that? Why do they harm me?
 Ireland was my safe haven. The whole of the country was standing up for me, I was thrown into a warm bath of love by the people. I have received so many messages from the people in Ireland,  Pauw said.
 I got one two weeks ago from a mother, her 10-year-old daughter said  Mum, I miss Vera so much.  That warms me so much. It gives me hope for the future. I feel that life is offering me sunshine again. Somehow I will find my way.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



PEARL JAM Dark Matter H H H H Republic
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 453 words
Body


Pearl Jam were the great enigmas of the early-1990s grunge scene. Eddie Vedder s band emerged as contemporaries of Nirvana, but their music looked backwards more than forwards. Their idols were Led Zeppelin and The Who, not Pixies and Sonic Youth.
Nor did they have any time for the Gen X aversion to  selling out .They regarded success not as a betrayal of deeply held principles but as sensible career progression. Yet they went where none of their peers would have dared by boycotting Ticketmaster over its outrageous service charges, a battle they lost.
They lost that battle. Yet along the way they acquired an enduring halo of righteousness. Pearl have also, to their credit, demonstrated a willingness to take their fans out of their comfort zone, as they did with Gigaton, their doomy (some might say plodding) album from 2020.
It s all change again as they return with their 12th album, Dark Matter, a tempestuous back-to-basics undertaking made with Rolling Stones producer Andrew Watt.
Watt is already part of the Pearl Jam extended family, having collaborated with Vedder on his 2022 solo release Earthling. On that project, the singer found so invigorating that he talked his bandmates into letting Watt oversee their next record.
You can see why Watt s work is so appealing to rock stars of a particular vintage. With last year s Hackney Diamonds he coaxed the Stones back to their classic sound while deftly steering them away from self-pastiche. They sounded like the Stones of yore   but never to the point of parody.
He conjures up plenty of magic on Dark Matter, a slab of rock n roll protein self-consciously in the tradition of the early Pearl Jam classics Ten and Vs. Although nowhere near as urgent as those albums   this is audibly the work of wealthy men in late middle age   it nonetheless lands its blows with gusto.
Vedder and company come out swinging on the album s opening track, Scared of Fear, where bulldozing guitars grapple for prominence against the frontman s throaty rumble. That melodrama is cranked up further yet on React, Respond, a crunching punk number dominated by Mike McCready s wrecking-ball guitar playing.
There are missteps, perhaps inevitable from a group on their 12th album. Vedder, once the long-haired outlaw of grunge, goes full embarrassing parent on Something Special, a Valentine to his daughters sure to have them rolling their eyes and mouthing  Daaaaad!  in mortification.
Still, after that one indulgence they are back on course on Closer Setting Sun, a power ballad that glimmers with an autumnal sheen. It confirms that, 30 years in, Pearl Jam are still conversant with rock s golden rule: be loud and uncompromising   and always sing it like you mean it.
ED POWER

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Period elegance on prestigious D4 road for EUR 10m
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 1
Length: 1097 words
Body


If you re a lover of period style and elegance, you ll find much to admire in this fine, fully refurbished house on one of Dublin s most desirable streets. When it last went on the market, in 2014, Victoria House was in the top 10 most expensive house sales of the year, snapped up for EUR 4.41 million, according to the Property Price Register. The buyers extensively remodelled and extended the house, sparing no expense to create a superb period home in walk-in condition with just about everything a wealthy buyer might demand including a home cinema, a hidden games room, sunroom, a bespoke Hampton conservatory, a richly appointed Clive Christian kitchen, and a self-contained two-bedroom guest apartment off to the side. There s even a room dedicated solely to storage, completely wrapped in floor-to ceiling cupboard.
The owners lovingly restored all the coving, cornicing and ceiling roses, and got their engineers to reinforce the feature staircase; they also hired Bloom gold-medal-winning landscape architect Jane McCorkell to reimagine the magnificent south-facing back garden to make it a tranquil space for relaxing and al fresco dining. The garden backs on to four acres of grounds belonging to Danesfield, the German ambassador s residence, so all you see behind Victoria House is a lush, green vista. A decade ago, this level of renovation would have cost a small fortune   if you were getting the same work done today, you d need a pretty big fortune, so it s a good thing that new owners will have absolutely nothing to do except settle in and enjoy this exquisite new chapter in their lives.
Number 81 Ailesbury Road is spread over a generous 550sq m (5,910sq m) of pure comfort and luxury, with no end of storage and living space, and is for sale through Sherry FitzGerald, asking EUR 10 million. This will be one of the more expensive house sales in Dublin this season, although number 7 Ailesbury Road, another superb, completely refurbished period home, is going for a cool EUR 12 million.
You enter the front garden of Victoria House via electronic security gates, and there is parking on the gravel drive for six cars, with charging points for electric vehicles. You go up railed granite steps to a pillared entrance porch with tiled floor and into a grand and gracious entrance hall, with ornate cornice, arch and stained glass window. Up a few steps to the left is the guest cloakroom/WC with lovely mosaic tiled floors timber-panelled walls with a mirror set in, and hanging and drawer space. To the right are the magnificent adjoining drawing room and dining room, separated by sliding double doors and both boasting intricate cornice work, centre rose and feature marble fireplace with cast-iron inset.
All the windows in this listed building have been skilfully replaced, including the twin sash windows to the front of the drawing room looking out on to Ailesbury Road. At the back of the dining room, a glazed French door leads out to cast-iron steps down to the back garden, which the owners installed.
At the end of the hall, the space opens out to an atrium-style reception area, with the feature staircase wrapped around it. Here s where you d put the 25ft Christmas tree when December comes. On the hall return to the back is a cosy living/family room leading in to a classic, light-filled kitchen filled with an extensive range of Clive Christian wall and floor units that chime nicely with the period features. There s a large island and lots of white marble worktops, plus a four-oven Aga, a large larder and integrated glazed display cabinets, plus a Miele dishwasher and Fisher & Paykel fridge-freezer. The kitchen had been moved from its traditional garden-level spot to this former reception room by the previous owners. The current owners considered moving it back down, but realised that this configuration brought the whole hall level to life, so they put in a classic kitchen with ornate details that would blend beautifully with the existing cornicing.
From the kitchen you step into the double-height Hampton conservatory, which has glass on all sides and above, making it the perfect summer spot to relax. A three-sided gas fire ensures the conservatory is also warm and cosy during the winter months. From here, another set of cast-iron steps lead down to the back garden.
On the first-floor return is a shower room with more of that tasteful mosaic tiling on the floor, and walls partly tiled in marble. The bedroom at this level has original cast-iron fireplace and two windows looking out to the back garden, and is being used as a home office.
The luxurious main bedroom suite on the first floor runs the width of the house, and has a beautiful custom-built wardrobe with hand-painted silk panels. A discreet door leads in to a gorgeous en suite with mosaic tiled floor and four-claw roll-top bath, recessed WC, and twin wash-hand basins set in a timber vanity unit.
There s also a large walk-in wardrobe/dressingroom with an added attraction   a big make-up storage unit concealed behind the mirrored end wall.
The second bedroom   a large double   looks out to the back garden and has a feature fireplace and an en suite. On the second-floor return is another bedroom looking out to the back garden.
There s a lot going on at garden level in number 81. Busy families can enter the house through the covered side passage and into the downstairs hall. To the front is a large utility room, plus a handy shower room and WC. At the end of the utility room, where the coal bunker used to be, is a nice, cool wine cellar.
The fifth and sixth bedrooms   both doubles, one with en suite   are at this level, one looking out to the front, the other looking out to the back. The great thing about Victoria House is that the garden level really is the garden level, and not a basement. To the rear at garden level is the bootroom that is a complete storage area, and behind a hidden door is the games room, which leads out to a sunroom   the lower storey of the Hampton conservatory.
To the left of the side passage is the latest addition to Victoria House: a self-contained luxury guest apartment, which measures 60sq m (527sq ft). It has its own hall, an open-plan kitchen/living/dining area with patio door opening out to the back garden, two bedrooms and a shower room/WC, and would make a great granny flat or living quarters for an au pair. There s also a garage adjoining the apartment.
At the end of the back garden is another nice feature: a small, charming summer house with wifi connection, ideal as a kids  playhouse or a yoga/gym area.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



PILLOW QUEENS Name Your Sorrow H H H H Royal Mountain
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 301 words
Body


Releasing three albums across the best part of four years could indicate troubling self-indulgence or, towards the other end of the scale, an admirable scratching of creative itches. Rarely does such material shine.
Pillow Queens  third album is an exception, the sound of musicians and songwriters sliding into a zone where things are about to take off. If we had thought their earlier albums   In Waiting, from 2020, and Leave the Light On, from 2022   had defined the band in sound and scope to the point where not much needed to be changed, we were wrong. Name Your Sorrow is like the Starship Enterprise heading for warp factor one.
Leave the Light On referenced Bluets, the American writer Maggie Nelson s book of prose poems, from 2009. Similarly, Name Your Sorrow is partly inspired by Atlantis: A Lost Sonnet, by the late Irish poet Eavan Boland ( the old fable-makers searched hard for a word to convey that what is gone is gone forever and never found it. And so, in the best traditions of where we come from, they gave their sorrow a name and drowned it ).
The album s dozen songs frame such involvement in heartache and emotional impairment, the search not only to absolve it but also to understand it.
So far, so worthy, but the cherry on top is that every track packs a punch.
Highlights? There are too many to name, but Pillow Queens  linking of Like a Lesson ( I thank my lucky stars you don t treat me like the rest ) with Notes on Worth ( I don t want to go home alone this weekend. I think I m worth the time ) is remarkably intuitive and wise. Factor in vigorous riffs here, fluid guitar solos there, irresistible earworms everywhere, and the sound of people in tune with life s turmoil and treasures, and you have an LP that s got  Album of the year  stamped all over it. TONY CLAYTON-LEA

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Recognising Palestine sends dangerous signal to Hamas; A unilateral recognition of a Palestinian state sends a dangerous signal and will be viewed as rewarding terror
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 1075 words
Body


When I became ambassador to Ireland in August 2023, I looked forward to a recalibration of relations between our two countries which had numerous positive elements, albeit against a challenging political backdrop. Many Irish commentators and politicians eagerly assured me that Ireland was not hostile to Israel.
Unfortunately, six months into the war that was launched upon Israel by Hamas, when we see the one-sided media coverage, and hear the often-vitriolic rhetoric of politicians, one cannot help but question this.
October 7th was an horrific event in the history of Israel and the Jewish people   1,200 of our people were slaughtered, hundreds raped and tortured, and hundreds more including children were kidnapped and sent into a living hell of captivity in Gaza, all by a Jihadi organisation whose own Charter is dedicated to the extermination of all Jews.
In most EU capitals there were strong expressions of solidarity with Israel, such as statements of support and public buildings being lit in the Israeli colours of blue and white. With the exception of vigils held outside the embassy organised by various communities, there were no such high-profile or official public displays in Dublin; in fact, there was an automatic expression of solidarity with Palestinians, and even Hamas. Politicians and commentators saw an opportunity to castigate my country for its possible response. This was even before the IDF began its ground operation in Gaza to release the hostages and defeat Hamas.
The ground operation is now used as justification for extreme anti-Israel discourse, which has escalated over the past six months. Support for my country, which is mostly expressed to the embassy, is now largely communicated in private for fear of attack. Furthermore, it appears that any show of empathy or humanity expressed toward Israel has been bullied out of public spaces due to an environment of hostility that has been allowed to prevail. It seems that in Ireland there is freedom of expression, but limited freedom of opinion.
Many Irish politicians, especially those in Opposition, have continually singled out Israel, not only for criticism, but for boycott and calls for my expulsion, all the while effectively disregarding any suffering of people in Israel. They have embraced the  Palestinian cause  seemingly unconditionally, which in essence gives support to Hamas and other jihadist movements.
The Irish Government, although officially condemning what happened on October 7th and calling for the release of those kidnapped, has scarcely condemned Hamas itself. There is no outcry or action against its genocidal jihadi character, its abuse of the people of Gaza whom it cynically uses as human shields, its abuse of civilian infrastructure such as hospitals, schools and mosques, and its indoctrination of the youth of Gaza into a cult of martyrdom. There is constant criticism of Israel s military actions, with no acknowledgment of the cynical tactics deployed by Hamas. In Ireland, Hamas is not held to any account, nor is it the subject of protest or pressure. Some, on the extreme left, even celebrate it as Palestinian  resistance .
For example, it has been reported this week that Hamas has attacked aid for Gaza organised by the Palestinian Authority; where is the Irish criticism of this cynical brutality by Hamas against fellow Palestinians? This is an example of why Irish  neutrality  is questioned and viewed as having a double standard when it comes to Israel.
The contagion of anti-Israel sentiment reached surprising levels last week when my invitation to the Fine Gael Ard Fheis was withdrawn in a worrying sign that Israel is being further demonised in Ireland. Perhaps a reason for this is that those who look at this conflict from afar seem to accept, at face value, all of the claims made by Hamas, while disregarding the impact and outcomes of the atrocities that Hamas have perpetrated in Israel. War is terrible, but drawing comparisons between the horrible suffering of each side oversimplifies the situation and ignores many important and complex factors.
Then there is the issue of anti-Semitism. Of course, criticising Israel is not anti-Semitic; it is legitimate to criticise any country, any government. To our concern, however, criticism of Israel in Ireland has crossed a line. Delegitimising Israel and Zionism as a whole is anti-Semitic. Zionism is the national identity of the Jewish people. Why then in Ireland do many people, including many politicians and commentators, think it perfectly acceptable to deny my people s national identity? Why is Zionism the only national identity called into question by some Irish people?
Many living here, from the Israeli and Jewish communities, have expressed to us fear and insecurity since last October. Extremists here have vilified the entire nation of Israel and Jewish people. Some Irish Jews are afraid to display their identity; some Israelis have left their high-tech jobs and moved out of Ireland. It is impossible to deny that anti-Semitism exists in this country; it most certainly does, as is evidenced in the lives of those experiencing it.
In Ireland s view of the war, there is almost no context at all. The truth is that it was Hamas that began this war, it is Hamas that keeps it going by holding our kidnapped people, bombarding us with rockets, and by its leaders pledging to carry out more attacks such as that of October 7th. The war could end if Hamas released our hostages.
When people call for an immediate ceasefire, do they understand what it means? Would they expect their government to walk away and leave their people in Hamas s terror tunnels in Gaza? A ceasefire is a bilateral arrangement that, so far, Hamas has both broken and opposed.
A unilateral recognition of a Palestinian state at this point sends a dangerous signal to Hamas and its supporters, since it will be viewed as rewarding terrorism. Any future workable agreement or resolution to the wider conflict is one that must be arrived at by the parties to it, and should be addressed separately from the current war.
It should not be forgotten that Israel has achieved peace with its neighbours many times before when a desire for coexistence has been present among all sides. Hamas is not interested in coexistence. Political solutions cannot be enforced by actors who ultimately do not have to bear the consequences of their input.
Dana Erlich is ambassador of Israel

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Regulator wants conveyancing reforms
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 364 words
Byline: MARY CAROLAN
Body


MARY CAROLAN Legal Affairs Correspondent   The Legal Services Regulatory Authority (LSRA) wants the Minister for Justice to give it powers to require solicitors to be more transparent about the costs of their conveyancing services prior to clients engaging them.
Having commissioned independent expert research on Ireland s complex conveyancing system, the authority identified enhanced costs transparency as one of three priority areas of reform of the system s operation. The other priorities are to increase awareness among consumers to enable them to make informed decisions when seeking conveyancing services from solicitors; and digitalisation of the conveyancing system and greater use of technology.
These reforms are  more pressing  than creating a new profession of conveyancer, the Minister is told in a report by the regulator published today.
The authority also published a detailed expert report by consultants Indecon on the Irish conveyancing system and a national survey by Ipsos concerning consumer use of conveyancing services.
LSRA chief executive Dr Brian Doherty said the  comprehensive  evidence gathered  clearly shows that conveyancing in Ireland is very much a paper-based system in a digital age, and there is not enough transparency in the market to enable consumers to make informed decisions .
 Enhanced competition
 Our recommended reforms are aimed at bringing about an easier, more efficient and more transparent conveyancing process, whilst also protecting and empowering consumers and promoting enhanced competition,  Dr Doherty said.
In its report, Indecon, having reviewed comparable international models, concluded Ireland has a  well-working  conveyancing market served by a large number of solicitor practices and there are high levels of consumer satisfaction with it.
Noting that almost 61,000 residential property transactions were recorded in 2022, and assuming an average conveyancing fee of EUR 1,800, Indecon estimated total residential conveyancing fees at EUR 109.6 million.
While there is a lack of  definitive data  on commercial conveyancing, it estimated commercial conveyancing costs at about EUR 25-30 million a year, possibly higher.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Rise in US inflation weakens hopes for interest rate cuts; New data shows inflation hit 3.5% in March against 3.4% expectation
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 316 words
Body


Traders slashed bets on imminent Federal Reserve rate cuts yesterday after data showed US inflation rose to 3.5 per cent in March, surpassing expectations and marking the second increase in a row.
The annual consumer price index (CPI) figure compared with expectations of a 3.4 per cent rise, according to economists polled by Bloomberg, while the core number was also greater than forecast.
CPI had previously risen to 3.2 per cent in February from 3.1 per cent in January.
Bond yields jumped and stock futures sank after the data release.
Futures traders drastically lowered rate cut expectations, pricing in between one and two quarter-point cuts this year, compared with six or seven at the beginning of January.
Before the inflation figures were published, markets had expected between two and three cuts this year.
Traders had also previously seen a July cut as a near certainty, but reduced their bets on that timing from about 98 per cent to 58 per cent after yesterday s report was released.
The two-year Treasury yield, which moves with interest-rate expectations, jumped by 0.19 percentage points to 4.9 per cent. S&P 500 futures fell 1.5 per cent.
Complicated task
 Even if the Fed s policy pivot toward cutting interest rates is still on the table for 2024, recent data have greatly complicated the task of finding the right time for a move that avoids constraining growth while also not prematurely declaring victory against inflation,  said Eswar Prasad, economics professor at Cornell.
The Bureau of Labor Statistics added yesterday that core inflation, which excludes changes in food and energy costs, remained at 3.8 per cent, the same rate as February.
Economists had expected a core rate for March of 3.7 per cent.
The benchmark federal funds target range is currently set at 5.25 to 5.5 per cent   the highest since 2001   in an attempt to rein in inflation.   Copyright The Financial Times

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Running out of time on auto-enrolment
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 350 words
Body


Auto-enrolment could prove very valuable to generations of workers currently not signed up to a private pension. That s the finding of EY tax partner Michael Rooney, who crunched numbers this week to show that a young worker drafted compulsorily into the scheme at the age of 23 when he is earning EUR 30,000 could expect to have a pension pot of EUR 590,000.
Even someone well into their career   at 38 and on the average industrial wage   could reasonably expect to accrue a pension pot of over EUR 344,000 by the time they retire, his figures show.
Rooney is the first to put some concrete numbers on what the move to compulsory workplace pensions might actually mean for workers at the sharp end. It s a useful addition to the information available even if his projections are necessarily subject to the vagaries of investment performance and wage rises.
Some similar practical engagement on the political side would be welcome. Workers and their bosses   on whom the burden, financial and otherwise, of making auto-enrolment a reality falls   are still being assured by Government that everything will be up and running early next year.
This is, of course, just the latest in a series of unrealistic deadlines set by the Minister for Social Protection and now Fine Gael deputy leader, Heather Humphreys.
Her new boss, Simon Harris, has already made it clear he wants the Government to run full term. That means an election in the first quarter of next year   before March 22nd. The notion that Coalition parties are going to start taking money from workers  pay packets weeks before they go to the polls is fanciful. Not least as their efforts to sell the idea so far have been somewhat ham-fisted.
If ministers really do want to sell the notion of auto-enrolment to workers and their employers in a way that secures buy-in, it is well past time for some straight talking. First up, there is little point dragging everyone too far down the road when it now seems inevitable that the entire project will be subject to some element of review from an incoming Government next year . . . and further delay.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Russia and Kazakhstan hit by severe floods; Deluge forces 110,000 people to move and swamps scores of settlements
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 462 words
Body


Floods engulfed cities and towns across Russia and Kazakhstan yesterday after Europe s third-longest river burst its banks, forcing about 110,000 people to leave their homes and swamping parts of the Russian city of Orenburg.
The deluge of melt water overwhelmed scores of settlements in Russia s Ural Mountains, Siberia, Volga and areas of Kazakhstan after major rivers such as the Ural, which flows into the Caspian, rose more 70cm beyond its bursting point to over 10m.
In Orenburg, a city with a population of 550,000 about 1,200km east of Moscow, hundreds of homes were flooded and at least 7,700 people were moved as the Ural river rose swiftly beyond critical levels.
Whole areas of the city were under water. Residents in Orenburg paddled along roads that now resembled rivers and waters lapped at the windows of traditional wooden houses. In Kurgan, a region which straddles the Tobol river, 4,500 people were moved and fears grew that the area would need to be evacuated of thousands   or even tens of thousands   more residents.
 The forecast is unfavourable,  Kremlin spokesman Dmitry Peskov told reporters.  The water level continues to rise in flood zones, large amounts of water are coming to new regions.
The flood situation was acute in parts of western Siberia, the largest hydrocarbon basin in the world, where the peak is expected in three to five days, and some areas around the Volga, Europe s largest river, the emergencies ministry said. Residents in Orenburg said it was the worst flooding in living memory, while Russian officials said it was the worst flooding in the area since records began. Kazakhstan said more than 97,000 people had been displaced.
Russia said 10,500 houses were flooded across 37 regions, most in the Orenburg region. Upstream on the Ural, which flows into Kazakhstan, floodwaters burst through an embankment dam in the city of Orsk on Friday.
In Kazakhstan, people worked through the night to build up dykes and strengthen embankments. A state of emergency remained in effect in eight of the country s 17 provinces, down from 10 at the end of last week.
Unverified footage from the Aktobe region of northern Kazakhstan, through which the Ilek, a tributary of the Ural, flows, showed dead cattle, settlements covered in silt and scores of collapsed mud-brick houses and embankments.
Winter snows
Spring flooding is a usual part of life across Russia as the harsh winter snows melt, swelling some of mighty rivers of Russia and Central Asia. This year, though, a combination of factors triggered unusually severe flooding.
Russian emergency officials said the soil was waterlogged before winter and then was frozen under very high snow falls which then melted very fast in swiftly rising spring temperatures and heavy rains.   Reuters

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Scalable Irish tech that can combat the climate crisis; From milligrams to kilograms in carbon capture and generating electricity from industrial waste heat, Enterprise Ireland's Commercial Fund is helping fund the hottest start-ups to address the climate crisis
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 15
Length: 844 words
Body


Enterprise Ireland s Commercialisation Fund supports third-level researchers to translate their research into innovative and commercially viable products, services and companies. Two of its current beneficiaries are engaged in the development of new technologies which have real potential to play a significant role in addressing the climate crisis.
The team at Pyramp   a soon-to-be spun out venture from TU Dublin   has developed a new thermophotovoltaic (TPV) technology to generate electricity from industrial waste heat. TPV devices operate quite similarly to solar PV, except instead of using solar energy, heat is converted into electricity with a superior energy density.
The second beneficiary, Sustainability Technologies, is engaged in the scaling and commercialisation of an innovative technology that efficiently captures CO2 from air. The technology offers an opportunity to support industries whose indirect CO2 emissions in the supply chain cannot be removed at source.
 We are addressing a key sustainability issue,  explains Pyramp founder Iftekhar Hussain.  We are the only company to offer heat to electricity generation at temperatures of over 1,000 degrees Celsius. We are the hottest start-up in Ireland.
The technology is similar to solar PV, he continues.  Instead of converting visible light to electricity, TPV converts the infrared part of the spectrum. And while the sun is around 150 million kilometres from the earth, our system can be placed as close as one metre away from the heat source. With solar, you can get 200 watts per square metre of panels on a good sunny day. With TPV you can get 12 to 20 kilowatts. It s an order of magnitude higher than solar PV.
 Lifesaver
Originally from Bangladesh, Hussain has been working in the renewable energy area for some years and studied at the University of Kingston in London before coming to Ireland in 2014 to begin work on a PhD at TU Dublin.
Having developed and patented a material to improve the efficiency of solar PV systems, he began to look at the potential commercial application of TPV for industrial waste heat recovery.  We received Commercialisation Fund support in 2021. That allowed us to start de-risking the technology and to deploy small prototypes to test in industrial settings. In 2023, we were approved for a second round of funding to further de-risk the technology. We are hoping to spin out the company in the second quarter of this year. We hope to have a system ready for the market by late 2025.
 The Enterprise Ireland Commercialisation Fund has been a lifesaver,  Hussain adds.  They gave us the funding to start developing the product. That was the first time we saw the system with our own eyes. It was only theory before that.
The carbon capture system from Sustainability Technologies is also nearing commercial reality. Founded by Wolfgang Schmitt, professor of inorganic and materials chemistry at TCD, and Dr Sebastien Vaesen, a research fellow at the Trinity School of Chemistry, Sustainability Technologies is engaged in the development of novel porous materials which can suck CO2 from the air. The material acts like a sponge. When air is pumped through it, the CO2 sticks to its internal surfaces. The CO2 can be released later for reuse or sequestration.
 We have developed units that capture CO2 at a low operational cost,  says Schmitt.  The technology is very energy efficient, and we believe the units outperform competitors on the market at present. Our aim is to develop and commercialise technology. We want to build units to a scale where the technology can make a meaningful contribution to climate action.
While captured carbon can be sequestered and stored, Schmitt s focus is on the circular economy.  We want to use the CO2 and transform it,  he says.  The CO2 from our system is very pure as it comes from the air. It can be used in greenhouses to boost growth. It can be transformed into products like sustainable aviation fuel and other fuels.
 Challenge
The unit under development will be able to capture five tonnes of CO2 a year, but that s not nearly enough.  To have some impact on climate change, we need to capture tens of thousands or millions of tonnes and then transform it. Our challenge is to raise funds for the company to build units to capture 100 to 500 tonnes per year. That will be a commercial product. At the moment, our job is to raise capital from venture capital and other investors and still scale the technology.
In the meantime, the team is working to improve the technology.  We want to have [the] best carbon capture technology out there,  he says.  Scaling a technology like this is quite difficult. It is quite capital-intensive to take it from the laboratory. You are moving from milligrams to kilograms. The commercialisation fund gave us the opportunity to scale it and bring it out of the lab. We are very grateful for that. The fund also provides some training; I m a scientist, not a business person so that has been important. We hope to launch the spin-out company within the next 12 months.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Sellafield is an innovation hub but with a toxic legacy; The 700-acre complex is a centre of innovation but also a nuclear dump that continues to pose a risk to Ireland and other countries
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 14
Length: 868 words
Body


In a piece recently in The Irish Times, London Correspondent Mark Paul reminded us that Sellafield has not gone away. The 700-acre complex is a nuclear dump for most radioactive material from all over the UK. It continues to pose risk to Ireland, Scandinavia and the rest of Europe.
Originally named Windscale and built as an ordnance factory during the second World War, the site was repurposed in 1947 for the production of plutonium for nuclear weapons. The UK government at the time believed that the US was becoming increasingly isolationist after the war, despite the UK having merged its own Tube Alloys nuclear weapons programme with the US Manhattan Project to produce the first nuclear bombs.
Weapons-grade plutonium is obtained by using nuclear fission to convert low-grade uranium. It is cheaper to produce than weapons-grade uranium, which was a major consideration for the UK economy, cash-strapped after the war.
Although a useful byproduct of the conversion process is the generation of electricity, the primary motivation at Windscale was always national defence.
Novelty
Given the novelty of the technology, and the unanticipated coolness from the US authorities, Windscale became a major centre for experimentation and innovation. Among the numerous innovations was the cooling of the early reactors using atmospheric air rather than pumped water, which substantially reduced costs.
Another was the physical arrangement of blocks of highly purified graphite, which were used to control the flux of neutrons and hence reactor power to compensate for crystalline dislocations in the graphite structure when irradiated.
John Cockcroft, who had shared the 1951 Nobel Prize for physics with Ireland s Ernest Walton, fought hard to have novel filters inserted into the air flow venting chimneys. He was concerned that any one of the 70,000 reactor fuel cartridges might crack, leading to a fire from oxidisation of the uranium. Ultimately the filters, colloquially christened Cockcroft s follies, were installed. They subsequently proved critical in capturing about 90 per cent of the radioactive particles released during the three-day reactor fire at Windscale in October 1957.
In 2017, the Irish Centre for High End Computing (ICHEC) ran simulations using historical meteorological data, coupled with more recent analytical techniques, to model the dispersion trajectories of toxic effluents from the 1957 fire. Despite reassurances to the contrary at the time, there appears reasonable evidence that Ireland was affected, although not as heavily as Wales, Scotland, southeast England and Scandinavia.
The UK s 130 metric tonnes of plutonium is now stockpiled centrally in Sellafield. It has been accumulated by reprocessing of spent nuclear reactor fuel originating within the UK and from overseas plants.
 Closed-loop  cycle
Reprocessing of spent nuclear fuel in principle forms a  closed-loop  cycle which ideally allows the fuel to be reused multiple times. In practice, worldwide, to date, the closed multi-cycle fuel loop has largely been aspirational.
Dublin is as close to Sellafield as it is to Cork. Dundalk and Belfast are closer. Just a fraction of a gram of radioactive plutonium is lethal. Plutonium also has a half-life of 24,000 years, meaning that after that period it will be half as radioactive as it is today.
Back 24,000 years ago Ireland was covered in an ice sheet up to 3km thick. Imagine if some of our prehistoric ancestors, perhaps after the ice receded, had left us with an incurable lethal legacy buried among their artefacts.
In a recent interview, Euan Hutton, chief executive of Sellafield Ltd, emphasised both the heritage of invention at Sellafield and its ongoing commitment to innovation.
Novel underwater robots, drone inspection flights and advanced glove boxes to protect operators are all being tailored for the management of lethal high-level nuclear waste. Hutton believes the UK can become a global leader in the multibillion global market for nuclear decommissioning.
Mark Paul observed, in his article, that Sellafield alone is a EUR 156 billion 100-year project and is viewed by some as a  gravy train  for extremely well-paid staff and contractors.
Sellafield now has about 700,000 tonnes of accumulated high-activity nuclear waste, including the plutonium stockpile.
The UK plans an undersea storage facility for its nuclear waste, about three times larger than Heathrow airport, with an access point from Cumbria or Lincolnshire. It is hoped that it will be built by the 2050s and be operational for a century before being sealed  for eternity .
It follows the worldwide lead being set by Finland, which expects its underground storage facility to be ready to receive nuclear waste next year and is designed to entomb it for at least 100,000 years.
Sellafield has been an epicentre of British innovation, once crucial to national defence and to national energy security.
Nevertheless, the legacy of all the prodigious innovation is a toxic bestowal for today and for generations to come, including in Ireland. It serves as a presage for how we use our own technologies and for their impact on future humanity, not least for environmental and climate change.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Simon Harris's cavalcade of hubris
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 251 words
Body


 Sir,   If this country were a comic opera, it couldn t attain greater peaks of farcicality than it did on Tuesday morning for Simon Harris s  coronation , not unless the libretto involved Spike Milligan and a pantomime horse. In 40 years of driving in Dublin, I have never experienced a more glacial movement of traffic than that which resulted from the Garda Síochána s closure of Merrion Square to facilitate this buffoonery, and I m old enough to remember what used to happen to the city on December 8th every year. Tectonic plates move faster. I finally arrived at my destination two full hours later than normal because of this absolute skit on the concept of traffic control, and I ll lay odds that thousands of employee hours were lost across the city, along with hundreds of bus and Luas journeys and school and college classes, too.
What next in this cavalcade of hubris? How about a detachment of French cuirassiers trotting through Stoneybatter in front of the Taoiseach s car on the way to the Áras? Because the pretension of that could not be any more bizarre than what happened in Dublin. A more cynical man might ascribe the closure to a political class so terrified of the people they re supposed to be representing that they re afraid to allow any ordinary citizen within shouting distance of Leinster House, but since that would actually indicate they have some idea of what the public is thinking, we can take it as read that it s not the reason.   Yours, etc,
DAVID SMITH,
Swords,
Co Dublin.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Sleek and stylish Churchtown four-bed for EUR 1.195m; High-tech, A-rated south Dublin home with maintenance-free garden and cool interiors
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 6
Length: 609 words
Byline: MIRIAM MULCAHY
Body


MIRIAM MULCAHY
 Number 9 Braemor Drive sits on one of a quiet warren of residential streets just off Braemor Road in the south Dublin suburb of Churchtown. The owners bought it in 2020 and proceeded to gut it and rebuild it completely, going out to the side, the back and up into the attic, creating a second floor.
It s now in walk-in condition with a sizeable floor area of 200sq m (2,152sq ft). The owner, who works in the construction industry, was not afraid to spend generously on quality materials throughout the house. It s an entirely smart and high-tech house, and this is evident as soon as the electronically controlled gate purrs open.
He and his wife wanted the exterior areas to be maintenance free, so the front drive is laid with a resin bond and a gravel effect. There is parking for two cars and an EV-charging point. An extensive bank of solar panels on the roof to the front points to the energy efficiency within   a similar bank is on the rear roof, making the most of the property s southerly orientation.
The front door opens on to a hallway with an attractive solid-oak staircase with glass balustrade. They used the space at the side of the house to extend, and there s an office/playroom on the right-hand side that could serve as a small fourth bedroom. The sittingroom, on the left-hand side, is painted a soothing shade of green and is warmed by a wide gas fire.
A large guest WC is painted in a moody burgundy and has wood panelling on the wall and the ceiling. There is custom-built understairs storage, and a large mirror outside the guest bathroom for those last-minute outfit checks.
Through a glazed door is the pièce de résistance of this property: a large kitchen and living area. The dark hues favoured by the owners continue here with a dark grey Kube kitchen, offset by pale quartz countertops. All appliances are top of the range, with an AEG double oven, a Samsung fridge and an Elica induction hob on the island with inbuilt extractor fan.
It s very much the smart home. The owner takes me through to the utility to show me how the battery unit for the solar panels work: he estimates he is in credit with the house s electricity bills from March through to October. The property has a Ber rating of A1, with triple-glazed windows throughout, smart lighting and CCTV.
The rest of this room is equally as sleek and dramatic as the kitchen, with two rooflights illuminating the living area with a huge TV. Sliding doors open up into the maintenance-free garden with new walls and fencing. At its end, to catch the evening sun, is a covered canopy area with seating and a gas-effect fire, with additional storage space for garden things hidden behind a slatted black wall.
Back inside this home, the streamlined, clutter-free vibe continues on the first floor, with two bedrooms, a family bathroom and a long, well-kitted-out walk-in closet. The owners went to Italy to source and buy everything they needed for the house s three bathrooms, and it shows in the quality of the tiling, the showers and beautiful baths and basins.
The main bedroom on the second floor is an elegant retreat, with a stunning en suite and hidden storage accessed through doors hidden under the eaves.
With their focus now on another project in the area, the owners aren t moving far. They love Churchtown, citing its proximity to Dublin city centre and the M50, which is a 10-minute drive away. Shopping is within easy reach with a cluster of shops on nearby Braemor Road, a Supervalu down the road at Churchtown and Dundrum Town Centre just a short drive away.
Number 9 Braemor Drive is on the market with DNG Terenure, seeking EUR 1.195 million.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Slovakian presidential election result another blow for EU solidarity; Clear runway now to realign country towards Budapest or Moscow
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 738 words
Body


Efforts by European leaders to hold together a coalition of staunch support for Ukraine in its war with Russia took another hit in recent days in Slovakia.
The election of Peter Pellegrini as president at the weekend will give the Kremlin-friendly prime minister Robert Fico a free hand in pushing through his agenda, which includes paring back aid to Ukraine.
Fico, a populist who has been one of the big beasts of Slovakian politics for years, returned to the prime minister s office after his left-wing party, Smer, won parliamentary elections last October.
The government he put together has so far signalled its intention to erode the independence of the country s public broadcaster, and put pressure on civil society organisations that receive funding from abroad. As such, Slovakia seems to be the latest country on the eastern wing of the European Union, after Hungary and until recently Poland, to lean away from the liberal values of the bloc.  Of more immediate worry for EU politicians and officials is the stance of Fico and Pellegrini on the fighting in Ukraine.
The prime minister has for many years been seen as being closer to Russia s orbit and during the elections late last year he campaigned on challenging the EU s unconditional support for Ukraine.
His coalition government in Bratislava has talked about cutting off military aid to Ukraine, while Fico has called for peace talks to be opened with Moscow.  The recent presidential election was seen as both a vote on the country s confidence in the government as well as a poll on the war in Ukraine. Pellegrini, a member of the ruling coalition, had faced off against Ivan Korcok, a former minister and pro-EU diplomat, in a second-round run-off.  The government candidate had manoeuvred to make Ukraine an election issue, painting Korcok as the  pro-war  candidate.
Slovak soldiers Misinformation about Slovak soldiers being sent to the front lines was rife in the campaign.
Pellegrini won a thin majority of 53.1 per cent, meaning after he is sworn in this June Fico s coalition will control the government, the parliament and the presidency.
Slovakia has a population of about 5.4 million people and shares a border with Ukraine. Anxiety about an escalation in the war played a big factor in the result, according to several observers.
Alena Kudzko, a director of foreign policy think tank Globsec, said Pellegrini s campaign  opportunistically  mobilised fears about the Ukrainian war to win votes.
 Much of this campaign was based on things that were not true,  she said.  It remained to be seen how far the Slovakian government would go in following up the rhetoric of the campaign.   There is a lot of uncertainty, which is an uncomfortable position for Ukraine,  Kudzko said.
In Slovakia the president mainly has a ceremonial role, but the outgoing office holder, Zuzana  Caputová, had been able to use limited veto powers to act as something of a check on the coalition government.
Despite the tough talk from Fico since he took over as prime minister, Slovakia has not yet copied Hungary and become a disruptive force at EU level.  Hungarian prime minister Viktor Orban held up an EU aid package for Ukraine worth EUR 50 billion for two months and in general has been viewed as a headache in Brussels.
Miroslav Wlachovský, former minister for foreign affairs, said when it came down to it Fico had so far voted with the majority of EU leaders.  The long-time Slovak diplomat, who was part of a technocratic cabinet last year that lasted several months, pointed out the country is still very dependent on funds flowing from the EU. Maintaining the two faces of Fico, as a seemingly amenable partner around the table at European Council summits and an illiberal populist at home, would not be sustainable, Wlachovský said.
 It won t work in the long term. Sooner or later with his domestic agenda, he will come into conflict with European values, then it will go down the hill,  he said.
Following the  blueprint  The government was following the  blueprint  first laid out by Hungary, he said.
 I m very concerned about the freedom of the media and freedom of civil society as we know it . . . and the rule of law in general,  he said.
Parliamentary elections are not due to be held again for more than three years, meaning if Fico can keep his ruling coalition together he will have a clear runway to firmly realign Slovakia towards Budapest or Moscow.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Solar eclipse the latest shiny object in culture wars; Trump peering at the sun is different to Biden's public safety announcement
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 845 words
Body


Herodotus   writing in the 5th century BC   contended more than once that a solar eclipse changed the entire course of history. First, the Medes and the Lydians were encouraged to broker a peace treaty under an inauspiciously darkened sky; and again, the Persian general Xerxes took an eclipse as a good omen for his planned invasion of Athens. The New Testament says the sky turned dark as Jesus was crucified. The Aztecs believed eclipses were a warning shot from the jaguar god; the Incas, meanwhile, were terribly concerned about the wrath of their own sun god.
If we think we have progressed past such primitive attempts to rationalise and understand the stars, we are very wrong. Monday s eclipse displayed no more intellectual sophistication than our Persian forebears, no more cool-headed rationality. In fact, there was perhaps no greater reminder of human atavism than Americans gathering outside to stare at the sky. The eclipse is as compelling to us now as it always has been and so, naturally, it quickly became a point of politics, a vehicle for the culture wars, a contemporary example of our base instinct for mythology.
The last  total  solar eclipse before Monday s happened on August 21st, 2017. Donald Trump and his wife Melania stood outside the White House to watch. Against the advice of medical experts Trump looked up, pointed his finger, and stared directly into the sun. It was a humanising moment for those of us who know they couldn t resist the threat of a burned retina out of primal curiosity. But, more than that, it was a political statement.
Different approach
Meanwhile, this week Joe Biden took a different approach. In a clip shared on social media, Biden is standing in the same spot where Trump and Melania stood seven years ago, but he is wearing protective eclipse goggles.  An eclipse is worth marvelling at. But don t be silly, folks   play it safe and wear protective eyewear,  the post read. It immediately and purposefully conjures 2017 Trump.
In the middle of the pandemic Hillary Clinton used the same image of a squinting Trump.  Please do not take medical advice from a man who looked directly at a solar eclipse,  she said. And so the eclipse became no mere celestial event but a symbol of moral fortitude, a lesson on how to vote, a display of values, an augury for Covid-19. Xerxes looking to the sun for advice on when to attack Athens made him no fool. Humans haven t changed.
Trump foolishly peering at the sun strikes a rather different figure to Biden s dorky public safety announcement. It is perfect shorthand for the Trump voter: one man s virility versus another s frailty. For the Democrat, it is a clear display of the wanton recklessness of Trump versus the cautious sense of Biden. It doesn t really matter which interpretation is closer to the truth. The contrasting images are just a simple metaphor, ready to be warped into the shape of long-held prejudice, ready to be adopted as a symbol for something that extends far beyond the realm of astronomy. Which politician can be trusted? When should we invade Athens?
I used to think   mistakenly   that these kinds of culture wars were a distraction from the substance of real politics; that serious minded people did not get caught up in the frivolities of things like the colour of a passport, the alleged race politics of Harry Potter, Joe Rogan and Russell Brand. I thought these things were deliberate ploys to divert attention from important matters of trade policy and infrastructure spending. I thought things could somehow  fall victim  to the culture wars. Mea culpa.
Robust correction
I have since come to realise   via a robust correction by historian Dominic Sandbrook   that this was wrong. Culture wars are no distraction from the substance of politics    they are the substance of politics , he argues. The eclipse was neat evidence of this as it became a metaphor far more powerful and captivating than any taxation manifesto could ever aspire to be, as it revealed our culture-war instincts are as ancient as the Persians.
If anything should have disabused us of the idea that there is no meaningful distinction between culture and politics, perhaps it is the pandemic.  Follow the science  was an adage as much about political allegiance as any statement of policy. Mask-wearing in the US is still a dividing force between certain coastal liberal elites and the rest of the country. Lockdown policy was as much a reflection of a country s values as anything else   Jacinda Ardern s New Zealand versus Boris Johnson s Britain a stark example of this.
Grand narratives of history too often focus on all the ways humanity has progressed but just as interesting is all the ways we do not change. The lure of mythology is a perfect example: astrology, organised religion, Republicanism, belief in national foundation stories, the flag, the monarchy. And the eclipse now is no different, not just in its ancient appeal but in its lessons: how to vote in November 2024; whether to wear a mask indoors; whether to broker a peace deal with the Medes.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Start and finish to remain in city centre; This year's path will contain only minor tweaks to usual route despite fears of major changes
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 21
Length: 612 words
Body


Organisers of the Irish Life Dublin Marathon have confirmed the start and finish locations for this October s race will remain within the city centre, with only minor tweaks to the existing race route.
Details of the slightly adjusted start and finishes were announced yesterday, with this year s race set for October 27th   starting on Leeson Street Lower and finishing on Mount Street Upper, remaining within the Dublin 2 area and ensuring the route will continue to be run through the city centre streets.
This represents only a minor adjustment to previous years, when the race started on Fitzwilliam Street Upper and finished on Merrion Square North. It means the Dublin Marathon will retain the same course consistency and familiarity.
 We are thrilled to confirm that the Irish Life Dublin Marathon will be on the streets of Dublin s city centre,  said Jim Aughney, Dublin Marathon race director.  Running the marathon is a momentous occasion for participants and being in the heart of the capital city makes that moment even more special for them and their families and friends who come out to support them.
 We also need to ensure a safe experience for everyone involved. We have worked closely with Dublin City Council on finalising the start and finish location. We are grateful for their support and look forward to making this event a success.
Finish
The agreement follows correspondence revealed last October where Dublin City Council and the National Transport Authority (NTA) sought to take the finish somewhere away from Merrion Square North for this year s race, given the  disproportionate adverse impact  the race has on public transport services.
Richard Shakespeare, recently appointed chief executive of Dublin City Council, added:  We are very proud as a city to host the fifth biggest marathon in Europe in Dublin City. The event brings celebration and vibrancy as well as significant social and economic benefits for the city. It is also a substantial operational undertaking that requires careful management. Together with the Dublin marathon organisers, we have developed a comprehensive plan that works for everyone.
When the prospect of moving the marathon out of the city centre was being mooted, Thomas Byrne, Minister of State for Sport, told RTÉ that the public transport concerns were  a bit overstated , and while further engagement was required, at least in his view the Dublin Marathon  would be a city centre event, just like it is in practically every other major city in the world .
Dublin Marathon organisers also announced other key operational updates yesterday, including an extended transfer window and refund option for this year s race.
Of the original sell-out entry of 22,500 for last October s race, only around 16,540 runners made the start, with 16,347 listed as official finishers   meaning around 6,000 running entries went unused, despite all paying the entry fee of EUR 110.
That represented over a quarter of the Dublin Marathon entry not taking part, far higher than most big city marathons, which typically expect an attrition rate of up to 20 per cent. It was also despite the introduction of a new early-refund option and an option to transfer an entry, plus a reduced overall entry, down from 25,000 for the 2022 event.
For this year s race, a new transfer window will open from Wednesday, July 24th to Monday, August 26th. In 2023, it occurred a month earlier in July. The refund window will take place from Wednesday, July 3rd to Tuesday, July 16th to allow for the resale of any entries.
The resale of places made available via the refund window will take place from Monday, July 22nd on a first-come, first-served basis.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Studying the relationship between physics and the mystical
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 8
Length: 859 words
Body


This year saw Cork (and, by extension, Ireland) claim the best actor prize at the Academy Awards for Cillian Murphy s performance in Oppenheimer. Christopher Nolan s biopic of physicist J Robert Oppenheimer, head of the Manhattan Project, has received almost universal praise in the West.
However, its focus on Oppenheimer as its protagonist has drawn criticism about the perspectives excluded, whether interned Japanese Americans or the Native American people affected by radiation near the New Mexico atomic test site.
In Japan, Oppenheimer opened in March, eight months after its US release. Screenings were accompanied by warnings about its potential to evoke traumatic memories of the Hiroshima and Nagasaki bombings. Responses have generally commended the film-making but bemoaned the lack of attention given to the more than 200,000 victims of the nuclear weapons that Oppenheimer and his team developed.
The film also generated some controversy among the ruling BJP party in India. During an intimate scene, Oppenheimer reads from Hindu sacred literature, which some viewed as sacrilegious. He translates a section of the Bhagavad Gita from Sanskrit to English, rendering it as  I am become death, the destroyer of worlds . This phrase is more commonly associated with the first successful atomic test; Oppenheimer told a 1965 television interviewer that the verse had come to his mind after witnessing the detonation.
A 1949 profile in Life magazine claimed that a longer section of the verse ( If the radiance of a thousand suns were to burst at once into the sky, that would be like the splendour of the mighty one ) had occurred to Oppenheimer. In the popular consciousness, the idea that the physicist actually recited the Bhagavad Gita at the first atomic test has taken hold. While this isn t supported by strong evidence, it does reflect Oppenheimer s interest in Indian religion, and raises an important point about the relationship between physics and the mystical.
Oppenheimer, raised in a non-observant Jewish family, never fully embraced Hinduism. However, he did deeply revere its sacred texts, both for their profound literary value and for their moral, spiritual and metaphysical perspectives. An accomplished polyglot, he had already learned German, Dutch, Greek, Latin and French when he began studying Sanskrit in 1933. Having moved to the University of California at Berkeley, he befriended a Sanskrit scholar and decided to read Hindu literature in its original form.
Recent work by the historian Elena Schaa demonstrates that Werner Heisenberg, the Bavarian physicist who worked on the German atomic programme, embraced a similarly aesthetic relationship with Catholicism. On the San Francisco Bay, the philosophical tendencies were more iconoclastic, a reflection of the nascent counterculture that also proved fertile ground for communist thought.
By the 1960s, the countercultural movement s pursuit of alternative lifestyles had moved to the exploration of consciousness and spirituality. At Harvard, Timothy Leary, who had completed a psychology doctorate at Berkeley in 1950 and was impressed by the work of its physicists, was promoting the value of psychedelic drugs. The physicists had continued to take inspiration from Eastern philosophy and notions of interconnectedness, the nature of reality, and cycles of death and rebirth.
This expansive view of physics, particularly quantum physics, interacted with a growing sense of antiauthoritarianism. Some physicists, such as John Stewart Bell, began to question the dominant theories in quantum physics, particularly the Copenhagen interpretation. This was a set of principles devised by leading physicists in the 1920s, but most closely associated with Niels Bohr, who dismissed the idea that physics should uncover the fundamental nature of reality, and instead thought it should concentrate on what could be said, scientifically speaking, about reality, based on observation.
Bell was unsatisfied with this approach and how widely it was accepted. Eventually, he demonstrated that quantum mechanics are fundamentally incompatible with classical understandings of reality. In basic terms, Bell s theorem challenged the concept of local realism, which argued that interactions between quantum particles should not be able to be able to move faster than the speed of limit, a sort of universal speed limit. Yet, in quantum entanglement, two connected particles can affect each other instantaneously, no matter the distance between them.
Albert Einstein had dubbed this phenomenon  spooky action at a distance , and assumed that it was proof of a missing variable in quantum mechanics. Bell argued instead that no variable could account for the interactions. This discovery affected not only quantum physics but also our understanding of the fundamental nature of reality, and forms the basis for new technologies such as quantum computing and cryptography.
In that sense, the interest in Eastern philosophy and alternative lifestyles that Oppenheimer helped to ferment affects us today as much as his atomic legacy does.  Stuart Mathieson is research manager at InterTradeIreland

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Supreme Court ruling may affect other SHD plans
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 425 words
Byline: ELLEN O'RIORDAN
Body


ELLEN O RIORDAN
 The Supreme Court has dismissed an appeal concerning the High Court s power to send quashed planning applications back to An Bord Pleanála for reconsideration.
The appeal has important implications for the work of the planning authority, and the court heard its decision could affect the outcomes of 53 first-time planning applications made under the now-expired strategic housing development (SHD) process that are yet to be determined. Some 10 other court cases were also awaiting yesterday s judgment.
The five-judge court unanimously agreed to dismiss the appeal against the High Court s decision to allow the board to reconsider an SHD planning application for 102 rental homes in Dún Laoghaire, Co Dublin.
The proposed development by Noel Smyth s Fitzwilliam Ltd is for apartments up to 13 storeys high on the grounds of St Michael s Hospital, Crofton Road.
An Bord Pleanála s April 2021 approval of the project was challenged in the High Court by Crofton Buildings Management CLG, manager of a neighbouring apartment complex, and neighbour Stephanie Bourke.
Quashed
The board conceded in the proceedings, accepting its permission must be quashed because it had failed to apply a required provision to the extent the decision materially contravened height objectives in the 2016 Dún Laoghaire-Rathdown development plan.
After the concession, the parties argued over whether the court should simply overturn the permission (meaning the developer would have to restart the planning process) or remit, or return, the application to the board for fresh consideration.
By the time the application for remittal was heard, the 2016 Dún Laoghaire-Rathdown development plan had been replaced with a 2022 version, while a new regime for large-scale residential development (LRD) had superseded the fast-track SHD procedure.
Remittal, as preferred by Fitzwilliam and the board, would allow the application to be preserved for decision under the SHD scheme. If quashed outright, as the challengers sought, the developer would have to make a new application under the LRD process, which would be decided first by the local council.
When agreeing to hear the appeal, the Supreme Court noted the question of which development plan should govern a remitted decision was of considerable importance, as the development plans of several local authorities have changed.
However, Ms Justice Donnelly said there was no real dispute during the hearing that the board is required to refer to the development plan that is in force at the time it makes its decision.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Tensions are building on trade; The US and China
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 462 words
Body


United States treasury secretary Janet Yellen ended a week-long visit to China this week with a welcome agreement to step up the economic dialogue between Washington and Beijing. But she left her hosts in no doubt about the Biden administration s growing concern about overcapacity in Chinese manufacturing, particularly in new industries surrounding green energy technology.
The European Union shares these concerns and Competition commissioner Margarethe Vestager this week announced an investigation into Chinese exports of wind turbine technology. The Commission is already investigating Beijing s subsidies of electric vehicles.
Policymakers in the US and the EU are haunted by the memory of the  China shock  that followed Beijing s accession to the World Trade Organisation (WTO) in 2001. Cheap imports of manufactured goods helped to keep inflation low in the West but at the cost of hundreds of thousands of factory jobs.
The destruction of parts of the industrial base in the US and Europe fuelled the popular discontent that helped propel the political rise of Donald Trump and other right-wing populists. As Yellen told her hosts in Beijing, the Biden administration will not allow a second China shock to threaten US players in the industries of the future.
China recognises industrial overcapacity as a potential problem but asserts that it is transient and can be resolved by global market forces and Beijing points out that both the US and the EU also subsidise manufacturers. But the scale of China s support for what it calls  new productive forces   and  the power of its manufacturing base give its exporters a competitive advantage.
The world needs low-cost, high-quality, green energy products to meet  its carbon targets and price is an important factor for drivers considering switching to an electric vehicle. But Chinese imports have already driven most European solar panel producers out of business and Brussels fears that other sectors could go the same way.
Trump has threatened to impose prohibitive tariffs on Chinese imports if he returns to the White House but Yellen did not specify what punitive actions the Biden administration is considering. Instead, she urged Beijing to boost domestic demand so that Chinese consumers and businesses will buy more of the goods that might otherwise end up as exports.
 Beijing is unlikely to agree to change the entire direction of its  economic and industrial policy but its willingness to engage in dialogue with Washington about economic rebalancing is a welcome and significant step. The US and the EU must protect their industry from unfair or uncontrolled competition from China but it is important that this should be achieved without descending into a trade war that would harm everyone s interests.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Tesco announces 7.2% sales bump and EUR 1.2bn share buyback
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 16
Length: 352 words
Byline: LAURA ONITA
Body


LAURA ONITA
 British supermarket chain Tesco has forecast rising profits this year and announced a £1 billion (EUR 1.17 billion) share buyback, as it lures more shoppers to its stores and consumer sentiment improves.
The company posted a 7.2 per cent increase in sales for the year to February, to £61.5 billion, as inflationary pressures  lessened substantially , while retail adjusted operating profit   which excludes results from Tesco Bank   rose 10.9 per cent to £2.76 billion. The company expects that to rise to at least £2.8 billion this year.
In the Republic, sales were up 6.8 per cent on a like for like basis over the past year, totalling £2.89 billion (EUR 3.37 billion). A spokeswoman said volume growth in fresh food had been  supported by an extensive refresh in 22 stores, with new and improved produce and bakery areas and innovations in coffee, hot food and food-on-the-go offers .
Reallocation of space
Home and clothing sales fell by 3.9 per cent due to some reallocation of space towards food.
Share in Tesco were up almost 5 per cent at 300p in afternoon trading yesterday.
Group pretax profit jumped to £2.3 billion from £882 million the previous year, when it took a one-off £982 million non-cash hit.
Tesco also announced plans to buy back £1 billion of shares over the next 12 months yesterday, following the sale of its banking business to Barclays. The supermarket group also said it would hand £70 million to about 220,000 full-time workers, worth roughly £300 per worker, due to the  strong  performance.
Chief executive Ken Murphy said customers were choosing to shop more at Tesco,  which is reflected in growing market share , adding its sales were boosted by its premium range Finest.
The grocer s preliminary results follow recent industry data showing  food inflation in the UK  fell to 3.7 per cent in March, the lowest level since April 2022, as price pressures continued to ease.
Mr Murphy said:  There is loads of uncertainty out there but I see a gentle improvement in customer sentiment . . . so on the whole I m feeling quite positive.     Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



The art of understanding baby stars; Dr Emma Whelan, associate professor, Maynooth University School of Experimental Physics
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 8
Length: 525 words
Body


What is your general area of research? I look at how stars are formed. That process begins with a clump of material that starts to collapse into a sphere, and as it rotates, it ejects matter and forms a disc of dust around it.
These jets or outflows from forming stars are important for the planets that form and orbit around it, like the way the Earth goes around the sun. The stars that are very active at producing these jets seem to create conditions that are good for forming planets relatively quickly.
How do you examine that process? We use telescopes and analyse the images they capture. We can see little gaps in the discs around forming stars, this is where planets could be forming. And we can take images of the jets, then work out from spectra how quickly the material in them is moving.
 Where are you looking at these clusters of baby stars? I focus on formations that are a few hundred parsecs away, that s about 900 light years from us. The stars I look at are about a million years old. All of these things are relatively near and new in astronomical terms. It s easier to capture high-resolution images of these ones that are closer to us.
 You are on a sabbatical at the moment: tell us how that works. A sabbatical is a chance to take a step back from teaching and admin roles in the university and focus more on research.
That s really important both for the university and for your own career. A lot of people take the opportunity to do that focus and reflection abroad, but we have a young child so I chose to go back to the Dublin Institute of Advanced Studies where I did my PhD. It s handy because I can still easily check in with my own PhD students now at Maynooth.
 What are you getting done in your sabbatical?
 It is going by very fast. When it first got approved, as a joke a colleague sent me an image of someone running free through the hills, but it s not like that in practice. I have been focusing on how to get funding for my research into the future. That often means looking at ways to apply the research, and writing proposals to get time on telescopes.
 What would you like people to know about becoming a researcher in astronomy and astrophysics? If you enjoy maths and physics, then an undergraduate degree in astrophysics is wonderful, I think. I did that in Trinity College Dublin. It gives you access to a range of skills and ways to solve problems. Then if you want to go into academic research after that, you have to realise it can be a tough road.
I was the first person in my family to go to university, and I am seeing how much hard work and sacrifice goes into being an academic researcher. It s the kind of job where you are thinking about it around the clock. I do enjoy it, though, and my husband is also an astrophysicist and an academic, so we understand each other s work environments.
 Do you ever get a chance to completely unplug from the research? Before our daughter came along, I enjoyed a lot of art   drawing and painting and knitting   and reading things that aren t related to work. Now we have fun that is built more around her, cycling to and from school and getting to spend time together.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Timely recognition; Ireland and Palestine
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 346 words
Body


Although Ireland in 1980 was the first EU state to endorse the idea of Palestinian statehood, turning this aspiration into actual recognition of that state has taken nearly a quarter of a century.
Micheál Martin s announcement in the Dáil on Tuesday that Ireland, and several EU allies, will now do so shortly is a welcome and important diplomatic acknowledgment of the well-established reality of Palestinian self-government in the West Bank, and a timely political admonishment of both Israel s war against Gaza and its refusal to advance negotiations on a two-state solution.
In 2014 the Oireachtas passed resolutions calling on the Government to  officially recognise the state of Palestine on the basis of the 1967 borders with East Jerusalem as the capital, as established in UN resolutions, as a further positive contribution to securing a negotiated two-state settlement to the Israeli-Palestine conflict.  To no avail. The Government s reluctance stemmed from its wish to preserve the common EU foreign policy, while attempting over a long period to move the consensus within the Council of Ministers to a position more critical of Israel. Ireland was not alone but has been seen as an outlier in its support for Palestine. Spain, Slovenia and Malta have also declared they will recognise Palestine.
Israel has argued, and until now most EU member states have accepted, that recognition would be premature, pre-empting the shape of agreement reached between it and Palestine in final settlement talks in the framework of the now largely moribund Oslo peace accords and their promise of a two-state solution. Israel has for some years refused to talk.
 We have agreed,  Martin told the Dáil,  that the undermining of the Oslo accords and therefore the agreement to create two states has reached a point where the accords  approach of recognition after a final agreement is not credible or tenable any longer.  The decision is also an important implied challenge to an unwilling Israel to accept a Palestinian Authority role in the administering of Gaza post-Israeli withdrawal.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Total eclipse of the Dáil as Houdini Harris does a disappearing act on first day
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 992 words
Body


Call off the hounds.
They ve found him!
Houdini Harris dropped a video an hour after the kerfuffle.
Cool as you like.
 Hello from Government Buildings,  he gurgled, which is where he had been all along.
Not a thought to all those members of the Opposition running around Dáil Éireann frantic with the worry, searching high up and low down for the new Taoiseach who vanished in unexplained circumstances just 24 hours into the job.
It was a major cause for concern.
TDs tried to piece together the final movements of Simon Harris before his Dáil disappearance. They narrowed it down to a brief photo call on the steps of Government Buildings at approximately 1pm.
But even though Harris seemed relaxed, they noted with growing dismay how he was flanked by hardened political lifers Micheál Martin and Eamon Ryan, both smiling aggressively at him.
They were further alarmed when the 16 members of the notorious Coalition Juniors gang formed a menacing doughnut around the young Taoiseach.
Three of them looked a bit dazed. This was because Emer Higgins, Colm Burke and Alan Dillon were initiated into the gang at a secret ceremony earlier in the day and were already suffering flashbacks.
Two veteran Coalition Juniors also looked shook. Fianna Fáil s Thomas Byrne suddenly found himself in possession of the Gaeltacht portfolio on top of his other responsibilities because none of the Fine Gaelers wanted it.
His party colleague Niall Collins, wearing the confused expression of Bishop Brennan after Father Ted kicked him up the backside, will have been struggling to come to terms with the sudden elevation to Cabinet of his Fine Gael rival in Limerick, Patrick O Donovan.
Nobody knew what happened after the group moved back indoors.
And that was the last anyone saw of Simon for some time.
For the day that was in it, Opposition TDs made a special effort to get to the chamber for the start of business at, er, two o clock in the afternoon. Wednesday s proceedings normally commence at 10am.
Mary Lou McDonald was eager to lock horns with her latest challenger. But when she arrived and looked across at the serried ranks of Ministers and TDs she saw, to her absolute horror, that there was nobody sitting in Simon s seat.
It was empty. Unoccupied.
The Taoiseach was missing.
A total eclipse of the Dáil.
She could scarcely believe her eyes.
She wasn t alone.
Opposition TDs stared blankly into the black hole of Harris but no Simon materialised from it.
A brave but unsettled Mary Lou managed to control her anxiety as she had a very important job of work to do.
By not fronting up in the chamber on his first day, Taoiseach Harris very kindly presented the Sinn Féin leader and her Opposition counterparts with an open goal.
No chance of Mary Lou turning down that particular gift horse. After she drove home her winner, delightedly outraged colleagues from the other parties queued up for their chance to hit the back of the net too.
They had been so galvanised by the Taoiseach s stirring words on Tuesday about how he is going to hit the ground running and get stuck into the tough business of leading the country immediately, if not earlier.
The Dáil was reminded of what he said to them in the same forum less than 24 hours earlier:  Let s get to work.
Mary Lou said she was ready to start. So where was the no-show Taoiseach?
 This is an absolute disgrace,  she complained.  This is wholly unacceptable.
Social Democrat Catherine Murphy couldn t see the point in having a Dáil Business Committee if the Government sweeps in with its majority, ignores decisions of the members and dictates the doings of the House when it so desires.
Government Chief Whip Hildegarde Naughton endeavoured to explain.
You see, Simon had to make or take four very important phone calls and ... and ... and that.
She said he always does her best to facilitate her colleagues on the other side of the House when scheduling business.
 But for today, the Taoiseach is not available.
Not a good look, in fairness, on his first day.
A roll-call vote was taken. The Government won.
Tánaiste Micheál Martin came in to vote. So did Green Party leader Eamon Ryan. And some other fella called Leo Varadkar who used to do the job held by Houdini Harris but was now smiling for Ireland on the backbenches and loving not having to wear a tie.
Mary Lou was  worried about the man who had just gone missing from Merrion Street.
 I want to know,  she implored the Chief Whip.  Where is the Taoiseach? He ought to be here.
Opposition TDs knew in advance that they were going to have this empty schedule foisted upon them, but they had no intention of letting it happen without putting up a fight.
They succumbed to a mass outbreak of delayed shock, which they do quite well.
Deputy McDonald couldn t believe the new Taoiseach wasn t coming in to face them for the short duration of Leaders  Questions because he had to make four phone calls.
 That s unacceptable,  sniffed Mary Lou, so perturbed she had to rush to the plinth immediately and record a video denouncing this ridiculous carry-on by the head of Government who promised only the day before that he was going to move mountains and get up and at it.
 I m here at the Dáil today for work ... and the Taoiseach hasn t shown up.
But he did, just not in the national parliament.
His people put a rival video up on social media shortly after the ructions to give his followers a brief outline of what he was up to.
 Hello from Government Buildings. First full day in job and a busy one: chaired a Government meeting, appointed Minister of State, set up a new Cabinet committee on disability and key calls with political leaders including the British prime minister and the president of Ukraine,  he said.
It should have been aired in the chamber so Opposition TDs could at least have had the chance to shout at it.
Do not fret. Taoiseach Harris will be in for his first Leaders  Questions next Tuesday, soothed Hildegarde.
But for now, they still ain t seen nuttin  yet.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Two age-old questions: 'What is consciousness?' and 'Is it cake?'
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 1115 words
Body


The 18th-century Scottish economist and wig aficionado Adam Smith once contemplated the specialised craftspeople involved in the optimal creation of a single pin. The wealth of nations is built on specialisation, he concluded, feeling quite proud of himself, and hundreds of years of classical economists and economic planners took him at his wiggy word. Flash-forward to 21st-century late capitalism and I m watching a Netflix gameshow called Is It Cake?, which involves  the most insanely talented hyper-realistic cake artists on the planet . That s a job now.
 We re f**ked,  I say to my wife.  Absolutely f**ked. Thanks a bunch, Adam Smith*.
(*Full disclosure: I probably don t understand the work of Adam Smith.)
Yes, I m taking the fact that  hyper-realistic cake artists  are so plentiful we can populate a popular gameshow with them as a sign that the jig is up for the human race. Who will want to do anything else once they learn that hyper-realistic cake artistry is an option?
Here are some sentences I worry I will hear later in my life:  Is there a doctor in the house?   Is there an engineer here who might stand over the structural soundness of this bridge?   Is there someone on board who might be able to fly this fast-descending plane?  All followed by:  I guess this hyper-realistic cake artist will have to do it.
When things go to hell, if there are only three spaces in your bomb shelter and a doctor, a farmer, a hypochondriacal TV columnist and  a hyper-realistic cake artist  are all begging to be let in, heed me now: in the interests of conserving civilisation take the doctor, the farmer and the hypochondriacal television columnist (so the doctor can practise) and leave the hyper-realistic cake artist to their fate.
And yes, I know all your children probably want to be  hyper-realistic cake artists  too (thanks to Is It Cake?) and they re probably at cake-art college because, like a fool, you encouraged them to follow their dreams instead of doing business studies and Mandarin. I d also suggest leaving them outside the shelter. It s over for them. We need to start again without dreams of foppish cakery.
Look, I get why Is it Cake? exists. For millenniam philosophers have asked  Why does something exist instead of nothing? ,  Why does God permit war? ,  What is consciousness?  and, of course,  Is it cake?  But that last question was pretty solidly answered in the very first episode of Is It Cake? (The answer: it is sometimes cake.) Yet, for some reason, the programme-makers persevere with their experiment.
Here s how it goes. In each episode, a wildly enthusiastic man named Mikey Day emerges on a revolving custom-made set. Much of this set is, we now know, constructed from the finest cake. However, we, the viewers, do not know which bits are cake and which conform to the normal rules of the universe as outlined by Newton and Heisenberg et al.
Mikey then challenges a gathering of eight hyper-realistic cake artists, who all seem like perfectly pleasant people, to identify what items among his set of everyday stuff are, in fact, cake.
Mikey demonstrates the truth by stabbing objects with a cleaver. Do not show your worst child this programme! Your worst child already suspects everything is cake, and I m pretty sure he owns a cleaver. And so we witness Mikey carve carefully through things and then eat clumps of the objects that turn out to be cake. He is the only person I have seen both figuratively and literally chewing the scenery.  It is cake!  he frequently cries, much like Charlton Heston cries  Soylent Green is people!  I presume that after each episode, Mikey runs through the streets hooting in this manner.
In the first episode of the third series, Mikey slices through, then chomps upon a decorative beer stein, an armchair, some pool balls and a lamp with a bright bulb in it.  Does cake light up?  he asks rhetorically, for this cake clearly lights up, but it is unclear how the science of this works, because there are no electricians now, just hyper-realistic cake artists. I can only assume cake conducts electricity.
The four contestants who prove to be best at cake detection are then called on to create their own cake lies.  I want to show my kids if you believe in yourself you can achieve whatever you want to do,  says one of them, but in a manner that suggests that if her kids wanted to be accountants or data analysts, and not hyper-realistic cake artists, she might disown them.
The four cake artists make: a bag of flower, a decorated tiki mug, a roller skate and a dartboard, all of which are, in fact, cake. Then these are placed alongside noncake versions of the same objects, and three guest comedians must choose which is cake. It s frequently surprising which ordinary-looking object is, in fact, a Baudrillardian simulacrumb. And it s compelling television, to be fair.
By the end of the episode, I am all in, convinced that the world is filled with cakey deceptions and only the hyper-realistic cake artists can save us. Looking around my sitting room, I wonder which of my gimcracks and gewgaws might have been replaced with cake, by the CIA, probably. What I need is a small cleaver.
One of the other most popular Netflix shows in Ireland this week is, apparently, Files of the Unexplained, a show in which  unexplained  phenomena are investigated. If reality shows like Drive to Survive and Full Swing are what Netflix has instead of sport, I m pretty confident programmes like Files of the Unexplained are what we ll soon be getting instead of  the news .
It forgoes things like evidence and just has a bunch of people tell us what they believe happened to them while eerie music plays. The counterargument is me telling you those things didn t happen. (If you put eerie music under me saying that, it counts as an investigation.)
Nationwide (RTÉ One) is a bit more old- school in its journalistic methods. It s a programme in which Anne Cassin, in a nice coat, roams the blighted outlands bringing hope from the old world (Montrose), much like Kevin Costner did in The Postman. Nationwide is a jewel in RTÉ s crown, to be honest, consistently covering interesting local stories and fascinating local humans in a manner that probably won t happen on Netflix unless those humans believe they were abducted or are secretly cake. (Only one way to check!)
Monday s episode saw Cassin wander with the designer Trevor Finnegan as he documented classic small town shop signage, and talk to the artist Laura Earley about Roscommon s mosaic-shopfront tradition. It s lovely.  At no point does anyone start gnawing at these beautifully crafted facades while ranting about cake. But mark my word, that s the future.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Two dioceses lose bishops as Catholic Church downsizes
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 362 words
Byline: PATSY McGARRY
Body


PATSY McGARRY  Two west of Ireland dioceses are to lose their bishops in what has been described as the most radical change in Irish Catholic Church structures in more than 900 years.
Administration of the dioceses will be taken over by neighbouring bishops.
Both Achonry and Killala are among the smallest dioceses in Ireland and take in much of Mayo and Sligo. Achonry has a Catholic population of some 37,000 with 30 priests in 23 parishes and schools, while Killala has some 36,000 Catholics with 23 priests in 22 parishes.
Bishop of Achonry Paul Dempsey is being appointed as an auxiliary bishop of Dublin, while Bishop of Elphin Kevin Doran has been appointed administrator of Achonry diocese.
Bishop of Killala John Fleming, who reached retirement age of 75 in February 2023, is to stand down, with Archbishop of Tuam Francis Duffy appointed administrator of Killala diocese.
This reduction in the number of Irish Catholic dioceses and bishops has been seen as inevitable for some time, not least due to the declining number of an ageing Catholic clergy.
Contrast
There is also the anomalous situation whereby Ireland,  with 4.3 million Catholics, has 26 dioceses and as many bishops (plus auxiliary bishops). By contrast, the Catholic Archdiocese of Los Angeles, the largest Catholic diocese in the US, has just over four million Catholics and is administered by one archbishop and six auxiliary bishops.
Both Achonry and Killala are suffragan sees of the Archdiocese of Tuam, and these changes were announced yesterday by Archbishop of Tuam Francis Duffy in the Cathedral of the Assumption of the Blessed Virgin Mary, Tuam, Co Galway.
Papal nuncio Archbishop Luis Mariano Montemayor said yesterday:  In due time, and following careful assessment and consultation, the present dioceses of Tuam and Killala on the one hand, and Elphin and Achonry on the other, may be governed by one bishop in each case, just as the dioceses of Galway and Clonfert are today governed by one bishop.
 If this process evolves still further, the associated dioceses may then merge fully under their bishop, and, in this way, the six dioceses in the province of Tuam will eventually become three.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Virgin Media Streaming TV EUR 15 a month
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 15
Length: 798 words
Body


Everything is moving online and now it s the turn of TV. Not just the online streaming services; those are, obviously, born on the web. But the standard TV that you pay for has shifted online, no longer dependent on dishes to deliver digital TV to your living room.
The latest in the market is Virgin Media, with its new Streaming TV product. This compact box replaces the TV 360 set-top box that Virgin Media unveiled here in October 2020 with a more up-to-date version of the product that keeps some of the best bits of its predecessor
There are many things to love about the new format. It is smaller, for a start, with a box that comes in even smaller than the Sky Stream box and the Apple TV 4K device. That frees up a lot of space under your TV, and gives you the option of wall mounting it with a few Velcro strips (handily included in the box).
It s more flexible too. In the past, you needed to hook up the box in a room where Virgin Media had installed a physical connection; multiroom viewing meant more connections, and it limited where you could put a TV.
Now you are only limited by the reach of your wifi   and if your home has blackspots, you can improve its coverage with a mesh network.
If you have internet coverage in the room, you can put a streaming box in there. Up to six streaming boxes can be accommodated on a single broadband account, which should cover almost every household scenario.
You are not limited to wireless internet though. The plug on the device can accommodate an ethernet cable, so if you prefer to plug in, you can. This is particularly handy if your wifi is patchy and you don t want to fork out for a mesh kit, but you need to be close to your internet hub.
On the mini box, you get the usual live TV and the familiar TV 360 electronic programme guide, alongside apps for streaming services such as Prime, Netflix and Paramount+ and on demand programming.
The only thing that is missing? Physical recordings. The new box allows you to record, yes, but its small size means there isn t a sizable drive hidden away inside. Your recordings are now in the cloud, and you get 500 hours of space before you have to clear out space.
There are good and bad sides to that. On the plus side, there is the obvious size advantage. Get rid of the physical storage and you can shrink the size of the set-top box.
And 500 hours in the cloud is a significant amount of watching, not limited by the size of a physical drive in the box.
But there are drawbacks to this shift. You can t record all channels, for a start. BBC is definitely out for now, due to rights issues. And not having physical recordings on a drive won t sit well with everyone.
There is one other important caveat that you need to be aware of. Before the launch of this product, you could get broadband from one provider and TV from Virgin Media. Now before you can sign up for TV with the provider, you have to be a broadband customer too. That is in line with similar limitations from Vodafone and Eir.
If you can live with that, the streaming service might just be for you. It also means you are guaranteed to meet the minimum speed requirements for the service   Virgin s broadband offering starts at 500Mb these days   and then some, so your TV service won t be hit with lag or buffering.
Getting set up takes only minutes, and if you want to make things really easy on yourself, the remote control for the box can be linked to your TV too. One remote control to master them all.
Speaking of that, the remote for the streaming box is largely the same as the regular TV 360 box, if a little slimmed down. Crucially, it includes voice control, which means you can call up programmes with the touch of a button and not have to scroll endlessly.
Good Smaller and more convenient than its predecessor, the TV 360 streaming box is a sleek, compact device that can be put anywhere in your home. All you need is an internet connection fast enough to cover it   and it works with mesh kits, too, so wifi blackspots aren t an issue.
Bad
No physical recordings, and some channels are out of the mix altogether. Also, if you don t have Virgin Media broadband, you can t get streaming TV. They now come as a package, which simplifies things in one way.
Everything else
 Up to six boxes can be included on a single broadband account, but you ll pay a fee for multiroom viewing. While the picture itself is pin sharp, as with other internet-delivered services, there may at times be a short delay on live sports events.
In which case, you might want to unsubscribe from notifications on those live feeds on social media, because they will give the game away around 20 seconds ahead of the broadcast.
Verdict
HHHH
 A seamless transition to streaming TV   the convenience outweighs the loss of the physical recordings.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Volunteers say they have run out of tents for homeless asylum seekers
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 490 words
Byline: SORCHA POLLAK
Body


SORCHA POLLAK  Volunteers providing food, bedding and clothing to male asylum seekers staying in a makeshift camp outside Dublin s International Protection Office have reached  breaking point  and say they have run out of funding for tents and sleeping bags.
Activists supporting the estimated 170 men camping out on Mount Street said resources are running out and that the State s reliance on grassroots organisations and homelessness charities to support homeless asylum seekers cannot continue.
Some 1,700 male asylum seekers are homeless and awaiting an offer of accommodation, an increase of 80 on last week, according to the figures from the Department of Integration. It is understood that some of the latest arrivals are sharing tents with other asylum seekers. The measures being taken by Government to deal with this issue are  reactive, temporary and ad hoc  and the situation outside the IPO is  now completely unsustainable , volunteers and activists will tell  Minister for Integration Roderic O Gorman in a letter to be delivered tomorrow.
 Breaking point   The volunteers who for four months have organised food, bedding and clothing have reached breaking point,  according to  the letter
.
 Similarly, homeless services such as Mendicity, Capuchin Day Centre, Lighthouse and Merchant s Quay are unable to meet the basic needs of these men. The residents of Grattan Street, Madison Court, Grattan Hall, and Grattan Court have an informal refugee camp on their doorsteps, with severe implications for privacy, health and safety,  the letter claims.
 Most importantly of all, the IP applicants themselves, most of whom have fled war or persecution, are deprived of the most basic dignities and comforts such as shelter, privacy, and access to sanitation.
 These men are also highly vulnerable to racially motivated assault, and there have been several incidents of assault, theft, damage to tents, attempted arson, and verbal abuse.
The letter notes the department s recently announced accommodation strategy but states that housing is needed immediately unless the Government wants to see  male IP applicants simply  pile up  on the streets of Dublin .
Róisín McAleer, of the Social Rights Ireland group, said those camping outside the IPO, as well as their belongings and bedding, had been  soaked  during recent rainfall.
 They re trying to dry them and it s an impossible situation,  she said.  The mental and physical deterioration of the men is very noticeable.
 I can see people losing weight, I can see their faces are pale and sickly looking.
Ms McAleer said volunteers have read the Government s accommodation strategy but feel there is  no urgency  in the plan.
 We need a deadline for housing these men   that this building will be open by this time and this is the money we have allocated.
 Because there s none of the detail in that plan and the lack of detail would make you cynical about the genuine impetus to act.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Well-preserved period home with stunning sea views; One of six houses on terrace in cul-de-sac at the foot of Bray Head, built around 1860 for British soldiers in need of rest and recuperation
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 10
Length: 588 words
Byline: FRANCES O'ROURKE
Body


FRANCES O ROURKE
 When an artist bought her Victorian home across the road from the sea in Bray 22 years ago, it didn t need much renovation. Her main focus in any changes she made was to respect the protected structure s original features   and to bring in the light.
And bring in the light she did, principally by using huge mirrors in many rooms, all painted neutral magnolia. She made her period home a warm, bright place, decorated and furnished in an original mix that includes turquoise silk curtains in the interconnecting reception rooms, pretty white dressers filled with coloured glassware in the diningroom and a deep red carpet on the stairs.
Number 4 Fontenoy Terrace, a 140sq m (1,506sq ft) four-bed, is one of six houses on a terrace in a cul-de-sac at the foot of Bray Head, built around 1860 for British soldiers in need of rest and recuperation. On the heritage website Buildings of Ireland, it s appraised as  a well-preserved example of a mid-Victorian house within a palace-fronted terrace whose proportions add grandeur to the streetscape .
It s now for sale through Sherry FitzGerald for EUR 945,000. The owner replaced PVC windows with double-glazed wooden sash windows and re-roofed the house but as a protected structure, it doesn t need a Ber rating. There s a sauna in a bedroom upstairs, a welcome spot after a morning swim, says the owner.
A glossy red front door opens into a hall floored, like the drawingroom and diningroom off it, with polished original timber floorboards. The drawingroom looks across the front garden directly on to the sea just across the road, the diningroom on to the back garden. Both have working stripped timber shutters.
A huge gilt mirror, 9ft by 7ft, an original period piece bought on Francis Street, dominates one wall, facing a smaller circular gilt mirror over the fireplace; a slightly smaller reproduction gilt mirror hangs in the diningroom.
Double doors in a wide arch connect the rooms, which have open fireplaces with pale marble mantelpieces. There s a panel of bells beside one of the fireplaces, once used to summon servants in this quite modest-sized Victorian.
A few steps at the end lead into a country-style kitchen/ breakfastroom, with a pale marble-tiled floor, cream Aga, cream units and a large pine dresser. Glazed French doors at the back open on to a steeply-tiered back garden bordered by the rail line at the top.
The back patio has a Mediterranean flavour, with whitewashed walls, colourful hanging baskets and blue pots on a two-tier patio. A garden set painted bright red fits into a sunny corner; 50 steep steps lead to a deck   with room for table and chairs   beside the rail line high above the house; it looks across the rooftop to the sea.
Upstairs, there are three bedrooms, two doubles and a single, and a family bathroom. The bed in the main bedroom at the front of the house looks straight out to sea: it s a peaceful room, with a cream carpet and white built-in wardrobes.
The single room next door is just as tranquil: it s where the owner goes to do yoga in front of the tall window facing the sea.
The sauna is in the corner of a good-sized double bedroom at the back of the house. The family bathroom is prettily decorated and fully tiled with white tiles with a strip of blue tiling.
Number 4 is in the centre of Fontenoy Terrace, with a long front garden; it s separated by a low wall from the road beside the sea that leads directly to Bray Head. It s about a 20-minute walk from the Bray Dart station at the end of Bray s seafront.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Woman's case over rugby injuries can proceed, judge rules
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 224 words
Body


The High Court has refused to dismiss a woman s claim over serious injuries she says she received while playing rugby with her local club some seven years ago.
Carmel Creaven is suing the Irish Rugby Football Union (IRFU), Tuam Rugby Football Club in Galway and a number of trustees and officers of Tuam RFC for alleged negligence and breach of duty arising out of an injury which occurred when she was in a lineout collision during a game on January 8th, 2017.
The defendants deny the claims.
The Tuam RFC/trustee defendants argued that the court should first decide whether Ms Creaven could maintain such an action because, as a member of an association, she cannot maintain an action against it, as she is trying to sue herself. They asked the court to have a preliminary hearing on the issue if necessary, or alternatively to dismiss the case against the club/trustee defendants.
Ms Creaven s lawyers argued it has not been established that she was a member of the club at the time of the incident in order to come within the criteria for a member not being allowed to sue him or herself. It was something that could only be determined through evidence, including oral evidence, they said.
Ms Justice Denise Brett yesterday refused to order a preliminary hearing and also refused to dismiss the case. The case will now proceed as normal to trial.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



'If Israel succeeds in Gaza'
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 191 words
Body


Sir,   Fintan O Toole has given us a comprehensive, indeed, graphic analysis of how Israel in its brutal invasion of Gaza has abandoned its human rights principles and undermined its claim to be the only truly democratic country in the region ( If Israel succeeds in Gaza, it will drag the West down with it , Opinion & Analysis, April 9th).
In terms of Israeli expansion, he quotes the words of David Ben-Gurion, who in 1938, saw an opportunity for the transfer of the Palestinian population to Arab countries, something that Israeli prime minister Binyamin Netanyahu is reported to be actively pursuing, although he does not confine this policy to any one country or region.
However, it is worth pointing out that 10 years later, perhaps older and wiser, Ben-Gurion counselled against the conquest of the West Bank, his priority being the need to focus on the building of a nation. After the Six-Day War in 1967 , he advised that Israel give up the Occupied Territories in the interests of long-term peace.
It is precisely that type of statesmanship that is now required but is sadly lacking in Israel.   Yours, etc,
MARTIN McDONALD,
Terenure,
Dublin 12.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



'What about a Fanta, clubbers?'
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 92 words
Body


Sir,   DJ Robbie Kitt is obviously too young to remember the dance-halls of 1952, as I am myself ( Should licensing laws be relaxed? , Opinion & Analysis, April 9th). However, if they were like the dance-halls of the Sixties, he s missed an important point: most were minerals only.  What about a Fanta, clubbers?
There d be fewer objections to the proposed night-club hours if they operated on that basis, and the street-cleaners in Temple Bar might be grateful as well.
Maybe there d even be more dancing?   Yours, etc,
MAIRIDE WOODS,
Sutton,
Dublin 13.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Atlético withstand late Dortmund fightback
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 149 words
Body


Atletico Madrid struck twice in a dominant first half but had to survive a late fightback from Borussia Dortmund before earning a 2-1 win in their  quarter-final first leg at Wanda Metropolitano.
The Spaniards, looking for their first semi-final spot in seven years, put the visitors on the backfoot with a frenetic high-pressing game and it paid off after four minutes when Dortmund keeper Gregor Kobel delayed a pass to Ian Maatsen and Rodrigo De Paul intercepted to slot in.
 Another defensive error allowed Samuel Lino, who will miss the return leg  after being booked, to double Madrid s lead in the 32nd minute.
Lino thought he had scored again  in the 75th but Kobel spectacularly palmed his point-blank effort wide before Sebastien Haller cut the deficit six minutes later to improve the Germans  odds going into next Tuesday s return leg. The Germans twice hit the woodwork late in the game.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Cowan skips to top of list
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 17
Length: 158 words
Body


That tradition of skipping the ball across the pond on the Par 3 16th hole has had a number of players putting their hands up as the first to do it. Mark Calcavecchia and Ken Green claimed to have started the custom in a practice round in 1987 which was disputed by Seve Ballesteros and Lee Trevino who stated they d done it in the early- 80s.
But, then, photo evidence proved them wrong too. Tom Kite had been photographed skipping the ball across the water in a practice round in 1979. So, it was Kite? No, that was a kite flying exercise too, as it has turned out.
Ben Crenshaw has claimed he was the second player to do it. The first? That, apparently, was Canadian amateur Gary Cowan (inset) who, as reigning US Amateur champion, was in the field for the 1972 Masters.
 Watch this,  Cowan said to Crenshaw during a practice round and proceeded to skip the ball across to the green.  Crenshaw confirmed Cowan s claim.  I was there. Gary used a 3-iron.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Dublin to Belfast train service
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 116 words
Body


Sir,   You report that the new Dublin to Belfast train will be hourly and will take under two hours after an investment of EUR 165 million (News, April 9th). When one reads further into the article, it emerges that this improvement is not going to happen any time soon. It is based on the fact that the Irish Government has pledged EUR 12.5 million in the project as part of the Shared Island initiative and that the earliest expected date of the new improved service is 2029. We are still talking about building a metro to Dublin Airport more than 20 years after it was first mooted so a five-year wait for the new service to Belfast seems quite optimistic.   Yours, etc,
LOUIS O FLAHERTY,
Dublin 9.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Dublin traffic plan
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 162 words
Body


Sir,   Presenting the report on the draft Dublin City Transport plan to the council s recent monthly meeting, executive manager for environment and transport Brendan O Brien is reported to have said that the public consultation process run by Dublin City Council on the plan received more than 3,000 responses which demonstrated a high level of engagement (  Bus gates  on Dublin quays to be implemented in August , News, April 8th).
Given that at the 2022 census the city council area had a population of 592,713, and Dublin city and its suburbs had a population of 1,263,219, and Co Dublin had a population of 1,501,500, the level of response received demonstrates an almost complete lack of engagement in the consultation process by the various stakeholders conducted by Dublin City Council.
It is difficult to conclude, therefore, that there is any significant level of support, as claimed, for the proposed plans.   Yours, etc,
JUSTIN O CALLAGHAN,
Booterstown,
Co Dublin.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Fenton suspended for Leinster quarter-final against Meath
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 148 words
Body


Dublin s Brian Fenton will miss Sunday s Leinster SFC quarter-final against Meath after the Central Hearings Committee (CHC) upheld his league final red card and imposed a one match suspension.
The midfielder was sent off after an incident with Derry s Eunan Mulholland in the closing stages of the game at Croke Park last month. In the clash Fenton reacted to an aggressive tackle by Mulholland   with referee Conor Lane showing the Raheny clubman a straight red card.
The Central Competitions Control Committee proposed a one-match ban on the basis of a Category 3 offence,  behaving in any way which is dangerous to an opponent . Fenton sought a hearing on the sending off, but the CHC has found the infraction proven and imposed a one-match suspension.
Fenton has the option to take his case to the Central Appeals Committee, but it is thought unlikely the matter will be pursued further.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Fine Gael   law and order
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 56 words
Body


Sir,   I note that Taoiseach Simon Harris has appointed new faces to the Cabinet.
He has immediately lost the confidence of the people by not taking the brave choice and backing up his  law and order  statements. He should have appointed a different Minister of Justice as a priority.   Yours, etc,
DENIS O SULLIVAN,
Enniscorthy,
Co Wexford.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



for EUR 295,000 By Elizabeth Birdthistle
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 3
Length: 59 words
Body


Situated at 49 John Street, Sligo, with its own off-street private parking, this four-bedroom recently restored townhouse is laid out over three floors. With 101sq m (1,087sq ft) of living space and a Ber of C3, it has a private rear courtyard with an outbuilding that could be converted to further accommodation. Price: EUR 295,000. Agent: DNG Flanagan Ford

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Irish accent has been an asset in UK
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 109 words
Body


Sir,   I was more than surprised to read Ross Hoey s piece on his negative experience of having an Irish accent in the UK in the last decade (  I learned to hide my Irish accent, or at least to feel deeply ashamed of it  , Abroad, April 8th). Having moved to the UK  in 2007, my experience is the polar opposite, and I would argue that in fact an Irish accent has been an asset. Indeed, I have found the English people to be the most tolerant and accepting of all accents and creeds. Sadly, the only pushback we have experienced on accents is when my Irish-born but UK-schooled children return to holiday in Ireland.   Yours, etc,
TOM WALSH,
Wimbledon,
London.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Key trio in running to return for Liverpool's clash with Atalanta
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 149 words
Body


Liverpool boss Jurgen Klopp has not ruled out Diogo Jota, Trent Alexander-Arnold and Alisson Becker being involved in Liverpool s Europa League quarter-final against Atalanta tonight.
All three have been sidelined by injury since February but have returned to training and look set to contribute to Liverpool s push for silverware over the closing weeks of the season.
There will be no flags on the Kop on tonight as fans stage a protest against ticket price increases next season.
Klopp admitted to mixed feelings on the issue, saying:  I understand the concerns and the discussion definitely. It s a tricky one from my point of view obviously to say.
 We want to have the people in the stadium, we want to make it available for everybody. There s a lot of good things the club is doing, but I understand 100 per cent where the supporters are coming from and I m pretty sure they will find a solution.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Limerick Voice named newspaper of the year
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 188 words
Byline: COLIN GLEESON
Body


The Limerick Voice has been named Newspaper of the Year at the 2024 National Student Media Awards.
The award, sponsored by The Irish Times and judged by the newspaper s Ireland and Britain Editor Mark Hennessy, was made following the death of the publication s editor Joe Drennan in a hit-and-run incident in October.
Mr Drennan was standing at a bus stop on Dublin Road, Castletroy after completing a shift at a restaurant when he was hit by a driver and killed. A man has been charged in relation to the incident.
Mr Hennessy described the publication s submission as  particularly poignant this year , and added that it made  determined efforts to report the community around them .
The Limerick Voice is produced by final-year journalism students in UL and published with The Limerick Leader.
Organisers said this year s awards received a record number of nominees, with Trinity College collecting eight awards followed closely by Technological University Dublin and University College Dublin.
Organisers also announced that its RSA Award  for Journalism Relating to Road Safety will be renamed the Joe Drennan RSA Award.
COLIN GLEESON

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Making sense of the referendums
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 200 words
Body


Sir,   Kathy Sheridan suggests, in her discussion of the  enough is enough  argument about the supposed backlash against Ireland s rejection of decades of social conservatism, that the referendums rejected on Women s Day were somehow of a piece with those that legalised abortion, divorce and same-sex marriage ( How would a right-wing party distinguish itself these days? , Opinion & Analysis, April 10th).
This is begging the question, for the advocates of the referendums never proved this to be the case. The backlash from the caring sector made it clear that the success of the care question would have shifted the burden of care onto families, enshrining a profoundly conservative understanding of disabled people and their place in society into the Constitution, along with a neoliberal understanding of Government s obligations toward their families.
And because the Government refused to explain what a  durable relationship  is   assuming that they knew themselves   we simply cannot say what that referendum would have meant.
The only real conclusion to be drawn from its failure is that the Coalition may have a problem with finishing its homework.   Is mise,
DESMOND MOLLOY,
Vienna,
Austria.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Medvedev loses his cool during victory over Monfils
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 136 words
Body


Daniil Medvedev was asked by the umpire not to shout at a line judge during his second-round victory over Gael Monfils at the Monte Carlo Masters.
The 2021 US Open champion was leading 6-2 1-2 when he angrily disagreed with two calls on the baseline and vented his displeasure at the official.
Swedish umpire Mohamed Lahyani twice came on to court to check calls and calm down Russian fourth seed Medvedev.
 Daniil please don t shout at him,  Lahyani said.  He (the line judge) can make a mistake as well.
Medvedev was 40-15 up in that game but lost his serve and then went 4-1 down before winning five games in a row to seal a 6-2 6-4 success and progress to a last-16 meeting with compatriot Karen Khachanov.
Defending champion Andrey Rublev was knocked out in a 6-4 6-4 second-round loss to Australian Alexei Popyrin.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



On view
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: PROPERTY; Pg. 2
Length: 62 words
Body


66 Ashgrove, Kill Avenue,  Dún Laoghaire, Co Dublin
EUR 695,000, Auctioneera Three-bedroom end-of-terrace house extending to 119sq m (1,281sq ft). Dating from 1958, the property which has been renovated fully   including rewiring and replumbing   had a new extension added in 2023 and has a partially floored attic. Ber A3 On View: Strictly by appointment at auctioneera.ie

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Rugby anthems
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 41 words
Body


Sir,   As Leinster Rugby struggle to have an anthem to inspire passion, perhaps they could use The Boys are Back in Town by Thin Lizzy, used by Dublin GAA footballers, but strictly on a loan basis.    Yours, etc,
 MIKE MORAN,
 Clontarf,
Dublin 3.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Soccer Round Up
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 135 words
Body


Tonight s Fixtures 8.0 unless stated Uefa Europa League   Quarter-finals, first legs: AC Milan v Roma; Bayer Leverkusen v West Ham; Benfica v Olympique Marseille; Liverpool v Atalanta. Uefa Europa Conference League   Quarter-finals, first legs: Aston Villa v Lille; Club Brugge v PAOK; Olympiacos v Fenerbahce, 5.45; Plzen v Fiorentina, 5.45.
Last night s results  Uefa Champions League   Quarter-finals, first legs: Atlético Madrid 2 Borussia Dortmund 1; PSG 2 Barcelona 3. English League   Championship: Birmingham City 0 Cardiff City 1; Bristol City 5 Blackburn Rovers 0; Hull City 2 Middlesbrough 2; Ipswich Town 0 Watford 0; Swansea City 3 Stoke City 0; West Brom 2 Rotherham Utd 0.  League One: Peterborough Utd 3 Port Vale 0; Wycombe Wanderers 0 Derby County 0. Scottish Premiership   Dundee P Rangers P.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



Three score and Tan
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 52 words
Body


Sir,   Further to  Grand National crucial to Mullins s chances of landing trainers  title  (Sports, April 8th), the great Vincent O Brien s 1954 Aintree Grand National winner was Royal Tan and not, as stated, Early Tan. O Brien s Early Mist won the race the previous year.   Yours, etc,
PAUL DELANEY,
Dalkey,
Co Dublin.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



World Athletics to award prize money to gold medal winners
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 196 words
Body


World Athletics will become the first international federation to award prize money at an Olympics at the Paris Games later this year.
Starting at this summer s Olympics in Paris, a total prize pot of $2.4 million (EUR 2.2 million) has been ring fenced from the International Olympic Committee (IOC) s revenue share allocation, which is received by World Athletics every four years.
This will be used to reward athletes who win a gold medal in each of the 48 athletics events in Paris with $50,000   along with the priceless Olympic gold medal.
The initiative by World Athletics also includes a commitment to extend the prize money at a tiered level, to Olympic silver and bronze medal winners at the LA 2028 Olympic Games.
World Athletics president Sebastian Coe described the decision  as a pivotal moment  in recognising the success of athletes on the biggest sporting stage of all.
 The introduction of prize money for Olympic gold medallists is a pivotal moment for World Athletics and the sport of athletics as a whole, underscoring our commitment to empowering the athletes and recognising the critical role they play in the success of any Olympic Games,  said Coe.
IAN O RIORDAN

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



No Headline In Original
The Irish Times
April 11, 2024 Thursday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 17
Length: 877 words
Body


All week, each of the 89 players in this 88th edition of the Masters have turned off Washington Road and driven through Gate 3, into Magnolia Lane, many of them in electric-powered Mercedes courtesy cars, where a private security guard has directed each one down the tree-lined avenue towards the colonial clubhouse.
There, the trophy, most recently with Jon Rahm s name engraved as champion, has been securely displayed. Teasing. Tempting. Beckoning.
Come Sunday, only one player will get to lift the Masters trophy and to have a green jacket placed on his shoulders. Even with the prospect of a weather-disrupted opening day, with lightning forecast to be in the air, the small size of the field and the prediction of sunny weather from Friday through Sunday would indicate a timely finish.
But, who?
Unquestionably, Scottie Scheffler   at this time and in this place   is the favourite. The 2022 champion has arrived into this week fresh off a week s break and with a run of 1st-1st-2nd on his last three tournament outings, which included a win in the Players Championship. If not quite Tiger-esque just yet, such a form line is reminiscent of how Tiger Woods, year on year, came and (on five occasions) conquered.
But, but . . . but! The subplots abound. There s the unknown factor of how the LIV players, among them Rahm, who have built-up to this first Major of the year on a reduced playing itinerary, will perform. Lessons from last year suggest that each of the 13 defectors to the start-up moneyed tour will enter the fray with expectations and with points still to prove.
Rahm, though, insisted the reduced schedule could work to his benefit rather than against him.   I feel physically better than I did last year. [And] once competition starts, it doesn t really matter. Once the gun goes off, whatever you feel is out the window; you ve got to go out there and post a score . . . . I feel fresh and ready for it.
Career Grand Slam
If Scheffler and Rahm, the last two champions, would seek to embellish their Masters reputations, and with good reason, then there are others yet to taste such glory lining up. Wyndham Clark, for one, the reigning US Open champion who is making his debut appearance. Ludvig Aberg, another aiming to win at the first time of asking.
And, also, two Irishmen. Rory McIlroy for one. Shane Lowry for two. Both Major winners in their own right, but not at this place.
McIlroy s repeat visits to the hallowed golfing terrain in the quest to complete the career Grand Slam has now reached a decade since his last Major title success, at the 2014 US PGA. Ten long years. Could an altered, increased playing schedule this year reap dividends? Certainly, there were positives from a third-place finish   albeit a distant one   in the Valero Texas Open from last week to indicate the world number two is running into form at the right time.
A year ago, the Northern Irishman strode to the first tee of the first round with great expectations. He missed the cut. Twelve months on, McIlroy   grouped with Scheffler for the opening two rounds, no bad thing   has kept things in check in a bid to play the long game.
Of learning from past failings, McIlroy observed:  I would say not trying to win it from the first tee shot. I think that s something that I ve tried to learn. It s a 72-hole golf tournament. I ve won from 10 strokes back going into the weekend. There s loads of different ways to do it.
 This golf course gets you to chase things a little more than other golf courses, if you make a bogey or if you get yourself out of position, because it always tempts you to do something you think you can do.
 Disciplined and patient
 I m pretty confident in my golf game. I think I can do most things, but sometimes you just have to take the conservative route and be a little more disciplined and patient. With a 72-hole golf tournament, you can be patient, you can be disciplined, and you can stick to your game plan. And that s something that I ve really tried to learn at this tournament over the years.
Those soundbites from McIlroy play out well. Delivering on them is the tougher part of the equation.
For Lowry, there is too a sense that he is also ready for the challenge. He has found a way to play Augusta National, a third-placed finish in 2022 the best of a four-year stretch that has seen him finish inside the top-25 each year.
Recent form, too, is good with a fourth-place finish in the Cognizant Classic and a third in the Arnold Palmer Invitational where he played in the last pairing in the final round with Scheffler.
 It s certainly a course where, if you re playing well, you can make it look easy. But you can make it look hard as well. You need to be clever the way you play golf and where you miss it. I think this golf course is more about the misses than the great shots this week. If your misses are in the right spots, you ll do all right,  said Lowry.
The prospect of being the first Irish winner of the Masters is one which Lowry would obviously cherish.  I have a 50-50 chance. I certainly hope if it s not him [McIlroy], it s me . . . er, I hope if it s not me, it s him.
The other 87 make for an uneven playing field, though. And, of them, world number one Scheffler is the one with most expectations.

Load-Date: April 10, 2024


End of Document



'I like to talk with people. Locals, they know me'; Taking over a newsagents in Dún Laoghaire has proved to be hard but rewarding work
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 1317 words
Body


Coming from a family steeped in retailing and shopkeeping, it s no accident that Rahul Mahajan took over the shop emblazoned Dun Leary s Last Corner Shop. In autumn 2021, after 35 years, John Hyland retired from running the tiny, packed newsagents spilling out on to the street on the corner of George s Street Upper and Clarinda Park West in Dún Laoghaire. The long-standing institution has continued under a familiar eye, that of Rahul Mahajan, who had been working for Hyland for a few years.
From Jammu city in Jammu and Kashmir near the Indian border, Mahajan s father had shops where Rahul worked after a commerce degree. It was almost an accident that he came to Ireland at all, having originally planned to move to Australia where his brother lives.  I was feeling very bored in India. I was thinking, what should I do? It s very hard to get a job in India.
After working with his father, Mahajan, with three partners, bought a government contract for the market, where vegetable and fruit trucks pay a fee to enter.  I used to work 365 days continuously, no days off, no breaks, 12-hour shifts. It s a very busy time over there!
After making a profit, he opted out after a year. Visiting his brother for a long holiday on the Gold Coast, he enjoyed the weather and the good life, and saw opportunities to make decent money. He wanted to do a Master s in Australia but just missed the required score in International English Language Testing System (IELTS). A visa agent suggested Ireland, where Mahajan had a good friend from Jammu.
He came to Ireland aged 25 in October 2015 on a student visa, did a six-month course in English and went on to study international business management at Griffith College. His father paid EUR 13,000 for college fees, and he brought EUR 5,000 with him. He needed to work as well, and  I came in here randomly  inquiring about jobs.
After a four-hour trial on Christmas Day 2015, he started part-time in early 2016 after finishing classes at 2.30pm. He wasn t interested in  working in the companies  and all along wanted his own business.  I m business-minded. From my childhood, my dad, my whole family, my cousins, are doing business over there and my dream was to do something. I was just waiting, waiting, waiting. I worked hard and saved a lot of money.
 One day I got a call from John. He said,  I m gonna close down.  I said,  John, I can do this shop.  He decided,  Yeah, I think you can, because you have experience in here and you know the people, and you have a good support.  John gave me help as well and my wife, she s good with the language and all the paperwork.
John Hyland and another friend in business helped him to set up and make connections with wholesalers.  I had no experience about anything, the till, shopfitters. I got a loan from the bank and from my parents, and I have savings. I started on  October 19th, 2021, in the Corner Shop, step by step. I m still learning.
Delivery day
That was a few days before his wife s delivery day, when he spent the whole day in the hospital, with Hyland looking after the shop. He s given a lot of advice.  He knows everyone, has experience. I teach all my staff you have to be nice. We care.
Mahajan worked 17- or 18-hour days for six months,  opening and closing myself , with Hyland covering while he went to the cash-and-carry.  I lost weight, 10kg. Then I got some staff. Then we had the baby and bought a house  near the sea in Co Wicklow in July 2023.  It s hard to get a mortgage.
The shop is very well known, and Mahajan talks about  all nice people who come in. I know by face all the people, I forget the names sometimes. I m happy. I like to talk with people. Locals, they know me. I know them as well. People come to buy paper, and go to coffee shop and read.
It s open late and occasionally there s trouble.  I say,  Just leave the shop.  In summertime kids come and steal sweets and chocolate and run away. Under 18, the guards can t do anything.
His culture is one of hard work, and he s ambitious.  I like to work, make money, you understand. I don t waste my time, do the parties and drinks and go out in the nightlife. I go couple of times but not every weekend. I don t waste my money. I just save, save, save.  It doesn t leave much time for hobbies. As a child he played cricket and did judo, karate and skating,  but not as an adult. It s a very hard life in India. You have to study. You need school and college for the good job, good life. Otherwise, if you re not educated, people in India say you re the worst man in the world .
It was in the shop that he met his now wife, Shalini Shivam. Originally from Bihar eastern India, she was studying data analytics in UCD, and  she came looking for a job as well!
There weren t vacancies, but Rahul suggested other places nearby.  We started meeting and chatting, then dating.
When she finished her Master s, she worked in IT in Kerry for two years and they travelled to spend weekends together, then she moved to a job in Dublin. Theirs was what Mahajan describes as a  love marriage, then arranged marriage . When they decided to marry, they told their parents.
While the young couple were in Dublin,  her parents went to my town, a long journey for two days, to meet my parents in Jammu  and they talked about the couple and their marriage. Both are middle-class, educated families. Their wedding in June 2018 was in Delhi, handy for both families, in a marriage hall, conducted by a Hindu priest.
He has  no complaints  about Irish people.  Some people are rude, they say, like,  Oh, you re Paki?  I just ignore. I m not a person who likes a fight or argument and give a response to anyone, just ignore. The nice people appreciate you re doing good, you re a hard worker. John taught me: listen to nice people, who teach you, who give you good ideas.
He is planning to open another, specialist shop nearby soon. These days he works five days and his free time is spent with his 2½-year-old daughter.  My staff and our childminder, they are really nice, like family. She s a local. She says,  I m your mother .
Mahajan hadn t taken a holiday in four years before a trip to New York last week. He s not homesick.  I feel like I live at home. I ve been in India two times, in 2017 and 2018, and I felt like I m a tourist. I say to my wife, I like home now,  he says.
Moving house
Culturally, there are differences.  The Government helps here for kids or schooling but in India they don t help like this. Parents have to pay every single thing. If a child is doing the bachelor or Master s they can t work, because there s no money, there are no per-hour jobs in India. Here you work six hours a day, you make EUR 60, but in India you work six or seven days.
His father died of a heart attack while his wife was pregnant, they were moving house, and Covid was peaking in India.  I was so upset at that time and I booked a flight. But my mum said,  She s pregnant. We lost one person but I don t want to lose anything else.  And after two days India locked down and there were no flights. Mum said, you will be stuck if you come.
Though his sister and brother both live in Australia now, his original plan to move there is no more.  I m not gonna go anywhere. I m happy here. I like it, a nice place I have in Ireland. I don t like busy cities.
After his student visa, he got a work permit, then permanent stamp four. He and Shalini have both applied for Irish citizenship, which requires them to give up Indian citizenship, though they retain OCI overseas cards, allowing them to travel there without a visa.  An Irish passport will be handy for anywhere in the world. I still will be Indian,   he  says.
New to the Parish A series about the lives of recent arrivals to Ireland
We would like to hear from people  who have moved to Ireland in the  past 10 years. To get involved, email newtotheparish@irishtimes.com @newtotheparish

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Adviser backs plan for Smurfit Kappa chairman
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 376 words
Byline: JOE BRENNAN
Body


JOE BRENNAN  Smurfit Kappa s decision to postpone the retirement of chairman Irial Finan, who has already served beyond corporate governance norms, has been accepted by a leading investor advisory firm as the paper packaging giant proceeds with a plan to merge with US peer WestRock.
Institutional Shareholder Services (ISS), which advises large investors globally on how to vote at annual general meetings (agms), said in a report that Smurfit Kappa s explanation for Mr Finan remaining at the helm  is acknowledged . It recommends that shareholders support his re-election at the company s upcoming agm on April 26th.
Mr Finan has been a director of Smurfit Kappa for the past 12 years. The UK Corporate Governance Code, recognised by Euronext Dublin as a standard for good governance, says non-executive directors should serve no longer than nine years.
Smurfit Kappa carried out a comprehensive review of the chairman s tenure in 2021 as it reached the nine-year mark, concluding it was in the best interests of the company and shareholders that it be extended by up to three years to early 2025.
However, the cardboard box maker said in its latest annual report that it has postponed the succession process as  continuity of the chair position during this time of significant change for the company was critical .
Smurfit Kappa announced last September that it plans to merge with WestRock to create the world s biggest packaging group with $34 billion (EUR 31.2 billion) of sales. The deal, effectively a takeover, is expected to be completed in early July, subject to approval by shareholders in both companies. Smurfit Kappa has yet to say when it will hold an extraordinary general meeting on the matter.
The deal was unveiled as the cardboard box industry was in the middle of a downturn, following unprecedented activity during the pandemic when demand for physical goods spiked. Smurfit Kappa s full-year box sales volumes fell 3.5 per cent last year, though it returned to growth in the fourth quarter.
Industry consolidation is gathering pace. US packaging giant International Paper (IP), which mounted an unwanted Smurfit Kappa bid in 2018, is reportedly closing in on a £5.72 billion (EUR 6.68 billion) formal offer this week for UK-based DS Smith.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



After talking a tough game, Harris delivers a nearly new Cabinet with no blood on the carpet; There were no axes wielded and precious few new faces in the Taoiseach's newly assembled Cabinet
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 1610 words
Body


Four versions of the same speech later, and Simon Harris was finally in charge.
His predecessor comfortably installed in the row behind him, languidly scrolling on his phone. His sole senior ministerial departure another row back, also engrossed in his phone.
The new Taoiseach had returned from his audience with the President, seal of office in the bag, ready to rule and ready to run the rule over his officer corps and wield the axe if he needed to.
He didn t.
There would be no need to get contract cleaners into Government Buildings to remove bloodstains from the carpet.
The end of an almost perfect day.
Now, at the age of 37, at the apex of his political career: he is leader of Fine Gael and freshly confirmed Head of Government, accepting the applause of colleagues in Dáil Éireann while his family watch from the gallery with heart-bursting pride. A stellar achievement.
Simon Harris had been setting out his stall for three weeks before his big day in Dáil Éireann. A speech on becoming leader. Another at the party s ardfheis. His first address as Taoiseach after Tuesday s lunchtime vote.
Then the last, most anticipated, one later in the evening when he returned to the chamber with his new Cabinet.
Or nearly new Cabinet, as it turned out.
Nobody got the boot. Former Minister of State, Peter Burke, got Simon Coveney s old job and former Minister of State, Patrick O Donovan, got the new Taoiseach s old job.
A nation was not agog. Taoiseach Harris s cosmetic enhancement of his Cabinet crew was something of a disappointment. Having shot from the stalls at a ferocious pace, knocking his rivals out of the contest in the early stages and repeatedly talking up a very tough game, he rocketed to the first fence and then tiptoed around it.
Muffled sniggers
In a three-party Coalition, individual leaders have a reduced number of jobs to hand around, but they still can make their mark. When the Cabinet of the Harris era assembled in the chamber, there was little difference from the Varadkar-era line-up.
The Taoiseach made his fourth speech, aka Aspirations Once Again, and announced his new signings.  I want Minister Peter Burke to bring passion and drive to the job,  he said of his new man in Trade and Enterprise, to muffled sniggers from across the floor.
But perhaps we are being too harsh on Taoiseach Harris. No point in spilling blood for the sake of it. Maybe he will become the Mr Motivator of the Fine Gael ministerial quota, drawing hitherto unseen levels of eh, passion and drive, from his charges. He didn t get to where he is today by being a pushover.
He has, at best, a year to turn around his Government and party s fortunes. That should concentrate the mind wonderfully and Harris is wonderful at concentration.
But on the day he became Taoiseach, it was only right that he should savour the occasion and celebrate it with family and friends.
Not only those who are close to him came to Leinster House. A group of 150 Fine Gael supporters from Wicklow also descended on Kildare Street, thronging the bar and getting stuck into a chicken lunch in the restaurant.
 There won t be an oat milked in Greystones tonight!  quipped one denizen of the fashionable seaside town.
The Taoiseach s family arrived at 10am in the morning and had a light breakfast in the private diningroom before heading for the Dáil chamber. Among them his parents, Mary and Bart, wife Caoimhe and children Cillian and Saoirse, and his grandmother Ann Cahill.
The children were complete dotes. Their dad stole every opportunity he could to nip up the Distinguished Visitors  Gallery to give them a few hugs.
But one of the most touching moments was when the new Taoiseach turned to acknowledge his  Nana .
This was not long after Heather Humphreys recalled the first time she saw Simon in Leinster House, remembering how she thought to herself:  Ah sure, he must be in on a school tour.
And here he was now, 13 years later. The Taoiseach talking about his nana   a rather sobering moment for those of us not in the first flush of youth.
There was a slight moment of hesitation and then everyone in the chamber applauded   not the Taoiseach, but his Nana Cahill, because politicians cannot resist a nana.
The old order was still in situ when Simon made his entrance in the morning, with Varadkar and Coveney still in their seats. He took a rose badge from his pocket (it s for Cystic Fibrosis) and handed it to Tánaiste Micheál Martin, who couldn t pin it on with butter fingers. Green Party leader Eamon Ryan, acting like his mammy, took it and pinned it on for him.
Leo Varadkar made his final speech as Taoiseach, offering  some reflections  before departing. Later on, Micheál cheekily wondered if he might be thinking about compiling his thoughts into a book.
Running commentary
Up in their eyrie behind their dad, Cillian (nearly 3) and Saoirse (5) kept up a quiet running commentary. They didn t lick it off the stones.
Minister for Justice Helen McEntee, wearing a stylish satin dress in a sophisticated shade of Eau de Nil, smiled at the charming scene. For a woman who was seen as the minister most in danger of demotion, she seemed remarkably relaxed.
And she held on to her job.
Senators watched from behind the railing at the top of the chamber. MEP Frances Fitzgerald, who is stepping down this year, watched the Taoiseach with a smile   she was the one who recognised his potential and gave him a job in her office when she was a senator.
Leo, meanwhile, echoed the view of a number of speakers when he declared he always knew Simon would be Taoiseach one day. At the end of his speech, he sat down with a broad smile.
Happy out.
And Heather Humphreys, who nominated Harris, counselled the Taoiseach to pay good heed to his father because  taxi drivers have their finger on the pulse .
He was seconded by a very nervous looking Peter Burke, even if it was rightly assumed to be a case of  winner all right  when he was the TD chosen to go after Heather.
The Opposition opposed the nomination and demanded an election.
Sinn Féin leader Mary Lou McDonald called for a general election and change.
She didn t get the first one, but she achieved the second, appearing at the morning session in a white jacket and arriving for second round at teatime in royal blue.
 It s a charade!  bellowed Mattie McGrath in a confusing contribution which some described as unintelligible, but that s because they didn t hear Danny Healy-Rae s one. Danny put the cat among the couldn t-be-bothered opposition pigeons by proposing his brother Michael for Taoiseach.
In a wide-ranging nomination speech, he took aim at the despicable Greens and all the main political parties who are ballyragging the decent farming people of Ireland day in and day out in the Dáil.
 I have never seen people more angry or disillusioned,  he bellowed.  Even last year, Eamon Ryan ensured that the Luas was painted white   nine carriages   and advising people not to drink milk. I ask each and every one of ye here today what would we be like if our mothers didn t give us milk when we were growing up and after being born   ridiculous stuff.
Above in the public gallery was a little knot of diplomats, dutifully taking notes. They looked very puzzled. Then they gave up and concentrated instead on trying not to laugh too loudly.
Richard Boyd Barrett called the change of leadership and election of a new Taoiseach episode  a jamboree . The Ceann Comhairle took him to task. It was no such thing, he insisted, but nobody in the chamber really believed him.
 The incoming Taoiseach has been in office for almost his entire adult life. Where is the new energy? Where is the new approach? Honestly, I cannot see it,  said Holly Cairns of the Social Democrats in a contribution which was so devoid of energy that her own colleagues couldn t even muster a decent round of applause.
When the new Taoiseach finally got his chance to speak, he reiterated the point made in his last two keynote addresses. But his references to his family   parents, siblings, wife and kids were lovely.
Hearts melted when little Cillian clapped his hands and cried  Daddy! .
Before he left for the Áras, members of the Fine Gael parliamentary party rushed outside and did their best to form an orderly guard of honour on either side of the front door with mixed success.
Excitement levels rose in the car park when they let out a big cheer, but it was only for the arrival of Heather.
Hugs and kisses
When the slightly shell-shocked-looking Taoiseach emerged, they hollered again and tried to grab him for posterity. There were hugs and kisses from the likes of Hildegarde Naughton and Helen McEntee and Alan Farrell, proving you have to kiss a few frogs on your way to the top.
The Harris family landed in the Áras with Cillian mad to see Michael D s dog Misneach.  He s three years old,  the President told him.  I m nearly three,  replied Cillian.
Afterwards, everybody returned to Leinster House where Julie Lyons and the catering team laid on lunch of Leek and Potato Soup or Smoked Salmon and brown bread for starters and a choice of turkey and ham, baked salmon in a prawn and prosecco sauce or a spinach and ricotta pasta bake.
Desert was a choice of a  Taoiseach  chocolate chip cabinet pudding or a raspberry roulade with mango coulis.
There was pasta and a special  Flossie  cake for the children.
The Taoiseach then showed them around his office in Government Buildings. Leo Varadkar had left a painting on Simon s desk as a welcome gift.
It was a very long day.
The Taoiseach pledged he will be a Taoiseach for all.
There is a lot of goodwill out there for him. He certainly has the energy.
Now, he merely has to deliver. It s a tall order.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Almost half of workers considering new jobs
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 342 words
Byline: COLIN GLEESON
Body


COLIN GLEESON  The labour market looks set for more upheaval in the coming year with almost half the workforce considering changing jobs, and almost two-thirds mulling asking their employer for a salary increase, according to a
 report.
Recruitment company Cpl has published its salary guide for 2024, for which it surveyed more than 670 people on their views on the labour market for the year.
It found that 49 per cent of respondents are considering changing jobs in the next 12 months, while 64 per cent are considering asking for a salary increase.
The report also indicated that hybrid working is here to stay, with two-thirds stating they avail of the practice, and 60 per cent indicating they would turn down roles that do not meet their hybrid working needs.
Reinforcing this, nearly four in 10 people said flexible and remote working  will positively enhance my employment by providing a better work-life balance and increased job satisfaction .
Among other key findings, less than 12 per cent of respondents think artificial intelligence (AI) will have a negative impact on their jobs over the next 12 months.
On the same subject, nearly half (46 per cent) think the impact will be neutral or have no impact on their roles, while four in 10 people think AI will have a positive impact on their jobs over the next 12 months.
Elsewhere, more than seven in 10 are considering upskilling this year, while 60 per cent think inflation will negatively strain their finances by increasing living expenses.
Cpl chief executive Lorna Conn said the labour market has undergone  significant change  in the past year.
 Technological advancement, changing employee needs and global events have all played a role in reshaping how businesses approach talent acquisition and management,  she said.  Organisations that are innovative in how they reach their talent goals put people at the heart of the employee experience.
Barry Winkless, chief strategy officer at Cpl and head of the Future of Work Institute, said the data shows the hybrid working model is  here to stay .

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



An Irishman's Diary
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 801 words
Body


At a Dublin bar counter on Saturday night, I watched yet another group of young tourists order a round of  Baby Guinnesses  and wondered how the all-powerful brewery thereby referenced had ever allowed this phenomenon to take off.
In case you haven t been out this century, the baby Guinness is a  shot  drink comprising three parts coffee liqueur   usually Kahlua or Tia Maria   and one part (the top one) Bailey s Irish Cream.
It s a miniature visual tribute to the famous pint of stout. And it costs about the same: EUR 6.40 in this case. But of actual Guinness, it contains none.
And all right, Baileys is part of the Diageo stable now, so big beer is getting some of the action here. Even so, three quarters of this ever-more lucrative trade is going elsewhere than the direction advertised in the name.
The brand larceny is all the more blatant because, long before the shot so described was invented, the term  Baby Guinness  was indeed used for some of the brewery s output.
Not to be confused with  Baby Power  (the miniature whiskey), it referred   I think   to a half-pint bottle. At any rate, in an Irish Times food column of 1959, the female writer gives a recipe for Christmas pudding involving a  baby Guinness  and jokes:  A baby Guinness is also very good for the cook!
With a somewhat different sense, the expression also featured in the headline of a 1907 Dublin court case in which a pub on Francis Street was charged with a breach of Sunday closing.
There were no miniatures involved on that occasion. The court heard that a woman had knocked three times at the pub s side door and shouted in:  It s all right, Patsey is watching at the corner.
The door subsequently opened and a jar of porter emerged, which the woman was advised to hide under her shawl and, if anyone asked, to say it was a baby.  A baby Guinness , quipped the prosecuting counsel. ( Laughter in court ).
    ***
That lawyer s joke was doubly apt, because not only can the St James s Gate brewery claim paternity on the  baby Guinness  name, it has had a long and somewhat notorious association with maternity too.
By an impure coincidence, the London Times ran a feature recently on the continuing success of actual Guinness ( It s boom time for the black stuff ), which has since inspired a series of nostalgic letters.
One was from a Margaret James-Moore, a retired medic, who recalled her younger days in Ireland:
 Guinness used to send crates of small bottles for nursing mothers at the maternity hospital in Dublin in 1963. Every evening we resident junior doctors went round the wards collecting the many unused bottles. A very welcome perk.
This lends a certain piquancy to one of the theories about how the Guinness-free  baby Guinness  originated. According to an unsourced Wikipedia entry, the cocktail can be traced back to the 1980s/90s and a now-defunct Dublin pub The Waxies  Dargle.
That was on Granby Row, just up the street from the Rotunda. And as the story goes, its in-house coffee and cream liqueur, called  baby Guinness , was by tradition offered to expectant or new parents.
If this is true, the success of a cocktail named for but not benefiting the brewery may be posterity s revenge on the era when stout was promoted as a health drink, even in maternity hospitals. As with many unplanned offspring, perhaps, Guinness s wild oats have come back to haunt it.
    ***
I read a funny thing in a book about literary Dublin recently.
A Writer s City by Chris Morash is a geographically arranged survey of the capital s literature. And in one chapter, it mentions that although JM Synge was born in 1871 in Rathfarnham, he and his mother moved to Rathgar in 1882.
Their new house was  about ten minutes  easy stroll from where [James] Joyce was born that same year at Brighton Square,  the book says, rightly. Then it makes this remarkable claim:  There is every chance that, as infants, they passed one another in their perambulators.
By my reckoning, Synge was nearly 11 at the time of Joyce s birth. And if he was still in a perambulator then, we would surely have heard more about it from the literary critics.
Maybe even the precocious Joyce would have recalled how they used to pass on the footpath and throw soothers at each other. The grotesque spectacle of a pre-teen Synge in a pram might have lent new meaning to the term A Portrait of the Artist as a Young Man.
If it were true too, the Playboy playwright s post-infancy perambulations would surely also have been commemorated in Dublin by the name of a drink.
Sooner or later, somebody would have gone into an off-licence and asked knowingly for a  J.M. Synge .  A what?  the helpless assistant would have replied. Whereupon the know-all customer would point to the miniature Midleton Redbreasts, or whatever, and clarify:  A baby 12-year-old, please.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Arsenal salvage draw with gutsy second half; This was Arsenal's return to the elite and its significance crackled in the air
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 855 words
Body


Arsenal had waited seven years to prove they could meet Bayern Munich as equals and, after a riveting night s work that leaves this quarter-final tantalisingly poised, they made their point. This second-half salvage job was all the more impressive given they had squandered an early lead and, for a time, summoned visions of the 5-1 routs inflicted in their last three meetings.
Serge Gnabry and a Harry Kane penalty had overturned Bukayo Saka s strike but Mikel Arteta s players showed guts to avoid any repeat against previously off-form opponents who had turned up resoundingly. They were rewarded when the substitute Leandro Trossard, with a marvellous piece of execution, equalised 14 minutes from time. For the next week at least, it answered those pondering which iteration of Bayern would arrive for this tie.
Arteta had remembered looking over and feeling the self-assuredness that oozed from their serial winners whenever Arsenal readied themselves for what, back in the mid-2010s, seemed an annual humbling. The only current reminders of that era on show here were Manuel Neuer, Joshua Kimmich and three of Bayern s substitutes; perhaps the vision of Kane preparing for kick-off was a more relevant sharpener for Arsenal s current brood.
Arteta knew that, for all the noise around Bayern s torments, Arsenal were facing opponents with the history and muscle memory of champions. He had called for the crowd, more partisan than ever due to a ban on away fans, to be a  wind  at their backs and how they responded: this was Arsenal s return to the elite and its significance crackled in the air.
Within 12 minutes the fizz became an explosion. Arsenal had already served notice that they might outmatch Bayern for intensity, and their insistent running soon bore fruit. Davies partly halted a Saka burst down the right but Kai Havertz was sharper than Gnabry to the loose ball and allowed Ben White to play a smart pass into the box. Saka let the ball run across him before whipping an irresistible low shot to Neuer s right.
Davies, already booked for a foul on Saka that rules him out of the second leg, had endured a torrid start and so had his teammates. Within four minutes of the opener a loose Gnabry header was seized on by Havertz, who played a marauding White through. A forward would surely have scored; White let Neuer smother and, while Bayern were evincing the defensive disarray that has marred their season, the miss was significant.
That is because Bayern always have a goal in them. The regret for Arsenal was that it felt so cheap. Gabriel Magalhães was under no pressure when collecting possession inside his own half but, spooked by David Raya s decision to advance 45 yards from goal, aimed a pass vaguely towards Jakub Kiwior. It was met by Leroy Sané, who recycled to Leon Goretzka; the midfielder then played in a bursting Gnabry for a smart finish against his old employers.
Just after the half-hour it was two and Arsenal could curse a defensive naivety that had resurfaced from nowhere. Sané was allowed to scythe into their area and, after Jorginho had missed a challenge and Gabriel pulled out of one, William Saliba clumsily intervened. Kane was always going to assume penalty duties and, facing down 60,000 jeers, stayed cool.
Saved the day
When Sané almost immediately streaked clear into an empty Arsenal half the scene recalled those humiliations of yore. White recovered at the last to save the day.
It was little surprise to see Kiwior, who had struggled at left-back, replaced for the second half by Oleksandr Zinchenko. Arsenal needed to strike a balance between rediscovering their earlier verve and avoiding further damage. For their part Bayern had something to grasp; they became happier to niggle and Kane took the idea too far when catching Gabriel with an elbow. The sanction could have been more than a booking.
Goretzka bobbled anticlimactically wide in the 57th minute and, despite Arsenal s need, a Bayern goal looked more likely as the hour approached. Arteta s side had lost their way and Arteta implored his public to dial the volume back up. But Bayern s resolve was exemplified when Eric Dier, mocked by the crowd earlier, thundered in to tackle Martinelli.
 On came Trossard and Gabriel Jesus, who conjured the ideas Arsenal had lacked since falling behind. It took barely 10 minutes for Jesus, tricking into the area and outfoxing Matthijs de Ligt, to tee up a swept first-time finish from his colleague. Kingsley Coman struck a post late on while Saka had a penalty shout dismissed and the tie remains deadlocked.   Guardian
ARSENAL: Raya, White, Saliba, Gabriel, Kiwior (Zinchenko 46), Odegaard, Jorginho (Gabriel Jesus 67), Rice, Saka, Havertz (Partey 86), Martinelli (Trossard 66). Subs Not Used: Ramsdale, Smith Rowe, Nketiah, Tomiyasu, Vieira, Nelson, Elneny, Hein. Booked: Partey.  BAYERN MUNICH: Neuer, Kimmich, de Ligt, Dier, Davies, Goretzka, Laimer, Sane (Coman 66), Musiala, Gnabry (Guerreiro 70), Kane. Subs Not Used: Upamecano, Kim, Choupo-Moting, Zaragoza, Peretz, Muller, Ulreich, Tel, Mazraoui, Pavlovic. Booked: Davies, Kane.  Referee: Glenn Nyberg (Sweden).

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Auto-enrolment could deliver strong pension pots for 'average' workers; EY numbers suggest workers could retire with pension savings of close to EUR 900,000
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 594 words
Byline: DOMINIC COYLE
Body


DOMINIC COYLE  Compulsory workplace pensions could deliver a pot of close to EUR 890,000 for a 23-year-old worker on the average industrial wage being signed up for the scheme when it comes into force, according to Big Four accountants EY.
Numbers crunched by EY tax partner Michael Rooney show that the auto-enrolment scheme pension, which the Government intends to put in place early next year, could deliver a guaranteed annual payment of around EUR 36,000 a year at today s annuity rates for a single person even after they had taken a lump sum of EUR 200,000 from the scheme tax free in line with current pension practice in Ireland. Allowing for a spouse would reduce that to around EUR 33,500 and, if allowing for annual increases of 3 per cent in retirement, to more than EUR 22,000 at the age of 66.
The pension would be payable in addition to the State pension, assuming that is still in operation at that time. It is currently paid at EUR 14,420 annually before any Christmas bonuses, living alone payments or household benefits package.
The Government intends to automatically enrol everyone earning over EUR 20,000 who is between the ages of 23 and 60 into a workplace pension scheme from next year, if they are not already members of an occupational pension scheme.
Initially, the employer and employee will pay 1.5 per cent of the worker s gross income into the scheme, with the Government adding an amount equal to a third of the employee s contribution   0.5 per cent.
This will rise to 3 per cent for worker and employer (1 per cent for the State) after three years, 4.5 per cent and 1.5 per cent after seven years and to 6 per cent for each of the worker and the company from year 10, with the State paying 2 per cent from then on.
EY crunched the numbers of the basis of someone being signed up next year at  age 23 and earning the average industrial wage of EUR 47,200 at that time. It assumes wages will rise by 2 per cent annually and that the pension fund will secure an annual return of 4.5 per cent.
In reality, wages and investment returns will not be smooth across the lifetime of the pension fund, and in any case, contributions are likely to be invested in higher-risk assets in the early years in search of stronger returns, while returns will be lower as people approach retirement and the risk of their investments is reduced.
Inflation will also eat into the value of that fund 43 years down the line when this notional worker retires so that the EUR 888,576 fund will not be worth the same as it is in today s money and nor will the annuity that it can be used to buy.
Auto-enrolled workers will not be obliged to invest in annuities on retirement. They will also likely be able to keep the money invested in an approved retirement fund-type product and draw it down as they need. Annuities may not be as good value as  other options, but they are risk-free to the pensioner.
Many of the workers being auto-enrolled will not be just starting work and some of those younger workers will not yet be on the average industrial wage. Mr Rooney said that, adjusting the figures to show a 23-year-old worker signing up when they earn EUR 30,000 could have a pension pot of around EUR 590,000 by the age of 66.
Someone who will be 38 when the scheme comes in and earning the average industrial wage could accumulate pension savings of EUR 344,000-plus by 66 on the same investment and wage growth basis as the other examples.
 The calculations are a clear indicator of what the scheme will mean for employees up and down the country,  Mr Rooney said.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Bank of Ireland reworks green mortgage rates
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 253 words
Byline: JOE BRENNAN
Body


JOE BRENNAN  Bank of Ireland has moved to rework its fixed-rate green mortgage range to offer customers discounts for homes with energy-efficiency ratings of A right down to G.
The new so-called EcoSaver mortgage will replace the bank s current green mortgage offering effective from April 18th for new business or existing customers who move to the new product from another one with the bank, it said in a statement yesterday.
Customers with a home carrying a Building Energy Rating (BER) of A would qualify for a 0.35 percentage point discount against the prevailing fixed-rate price for their loan product. The discount narrows to 0.3 points for B-rated homes, right down to 0.05 points for G-rated properties.
The prevailing five-year fixed rates for owner-occupied properties with a loan of less than 80 per cent of a building s value are, for example, 4.15 per cent for exiting customers and 4.75 per cent for new mortgage applicants.
 Rate reduces
 The more energy-efficient your home becomes, the more your EcoSaver mortgage interest rate reduces. Almost three-quarters of the housing stock in Ireland is BER C and lower,  said Alan Hartley, director of homebuying at Bank of Ireland.
The bank said its research shows that six in 10 homeowners plan to retrofit their home at some stage in the future   while one in 10 already has.
The move comes a day after AIB moved to take a greater slice of green mortgage activity by cutting rates on its fixed-rate products by 0.2 of a percentage point to a market-leading low.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Britain's 'elitist' foreign office mulls overhaul; Government ponders how to deal with 'offensive stereotypes' depicted in murals in its old colonial headquarters
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 788 words
Body


 If you can reach up to touch it, it s just gold paint. If you can t, it s gold leaf,  an official said as we swept through the Locarno Room, a vast gold and red reception chamber in the British foreign office. I was joining a group on a backstage tour of the grand building on King Charles Street, off Whitehall.
The lavish premises has for about 160 years been the headquarters of the government department that is now officially called the Foreign, Commonwealth and Development Office (FCDO). It was built during the Victorian era to celebrate the riches of Britain s empire and impress visitors with its might.
These days, however, the building, with all its colonial accoutrements, is increasingly viewed by some in Britain as a source of embarrassment to a nation that still grapples with the negative legacy of its conquering past. In particular, there is unease over one of its most prominent paintings, which portrays the entire continent of Africa as a little black boy offering up his fruits to the British Empire.
The building previously also housed the India Office, the old government department that used to run that country in colonial times, and which replaced the East India Company, which infamously plundered the region. There are still elephants carved into the walls above King Charles Street, while the spices of India that were sold to fill the empire s coffers are celebrated in the plasterwork inside.
Westminster remains in Easter recess this week and during such periods the frenetic day-to-day political agenda tends to give way to more reflective discussions. On Monday, a group of former UK diplomats and senior civil servants, headed by former cabinet secretary Mark Sedwill, published a report criticising the foreign office as  elitist and rooted in the past .
The report s authors argued the FCDO and its headquarters must be revamped to fit in with the modern era. They said a building with  fewer colonial era pictures on the walls  would be a good start to send a more appropriate signal to the world of what modern Britain is about.
While there is still some pride in the palatial nature of the foreign office building with its beautiful friezes, the sense of embarrassment at the colonial excesses of the structure was also openly acknowledged during the tour that I joined.
The most imposing part of the building is the famous old grand staircase that sweeps up from street level to the floor that houses the foreign secretary s office. Whenever a foreign ambassador is called in for a UK government dressing down, it is up these stairs they still must trudge.
The staircase is flanked by five enormous murals by the artist Sigismund Goetze, who painted them during the early  20th century; he died in 1939. A written description of the paintings on the staircase landing now acknowledges them as  deeply old fashioned  and filled with  offensive stereotypes .
The first mural depicts a beautiful Anglo-Saxon figure driving away people that Goetze referred to the  cruder races  of nearby lands. Irish ambassadors visiting the foreign office over the years must cock their eyebrows at that one. Another mural shows Britain as a reliable peacemaker amid other war-scarred European nations   Serbia and Belgium, for example, are depicted as little naked children comforted by Britannia.
It was also Goetze who depicted Africa as the little fruit-bearing black boy. His inclusion, according to the foreign office s written description, was to remind people, in Goetze s words, of  our obligations and possibilities in the Dark Continent .
Problematic description
The description acknowledges that the murals offend  the other nations of the British Isles , a term that is itself seen by many Irish people as a problematic description for these islands.
Meanwhile, up in the Locarno Room, a huge harp representing Ireland remains painted into the ceiling as part of the royal standard of the late Queen Elizabeth. The description also acknowledges the  ironic ring  to the murals  portrayal of Britain as a traditional peacemaker,  in light of centuries of successful warfare and imperial expansion .
 Today s FCDO is a dramatically different institution from the one for which Goetze painted his murals. Our ambition is to be an open, outward-facing country, whose relationships with countries around the world are based on co-operation, equity and mutual respect,  it says.
Meanwhile, British prime minister Rishi Sunak, whose parents immigrated from India, on Monday rejected through his spokesman the charge in the Sedwill report this week that the foreign office is  rooted in the past . Britain still may have a way to go before it resolves some of the internal arguments over its colonial history.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Bundoran was as glamorous to me as Las Vegas
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 9
Length: 664 words
Body


I was in Bundoran recently for a coffee in the Buoys and Gulls cafe, which has lovely windows with views of the ocean.
It was someone s birthday and there were slices of birthday cake on the tables. The other customers were young surfers and it was a pleasure to be mixing with them; they were chatting about surf and coffee, and camper vans and building mobile saunas in horse boxes. I joined the conversation for a while but at my age chatting with young ones is like waving at boats in the distance as they leave the harbour; their future is like an ocean before them, as I stand on dry land and wait for nightfall. They even invited me to join them for a drink later; they were heading for a pub and perhaps a more intimate phase of the evening.
I declined and instead walked back to my hotel, through the streets of Bundoran which were once as glamorous to me as the streets of Las Vegas. As a teenager, I d hitch from Cavan with a tent on my back and sleep in the grass just for the thrill of a night in the Astoria Ballroom with Dickie Rock.
It was the slot machines that made Bundoran feel like Las Vegas. The machines sometimes spewed out so many brown copper coins that old ladies would carry little bags with them for the winnings.
But as I walked back to the hotel, the slot machine parlours were closed. I was tempted by a few takeaways, but the thought of eating pizza alone on the street was too desolate a scenario for so late in the day.
Instead, I had a pint when I got as far as the Great Northern Hotel.
 It s very quiet,  I said to the only other customer at the bar.
 There s a poker game in session,  he said, indicating a function room where dozens of card players were clustered around tables clutching their chips and clinging to the hope of going home richer than when they came in.
 Why are you not playing?  I wondered.
 I ve had no luck this evening,  he admitted.
There was a break in the game later, and the crowd dashed to the bar for drinks and some to the front door for a smoke. Then, after about 15 minutes, they all went back in like Buddhist monks returning to the silence of their prayer hall.
Facing destiny
Friendship was blossoming at the bar. There were two pints under the Guinness tap for both of us, and I had paid for them before he could get a wallet out of his back pocket.
Then he bought a raffle ticket to support a local GAA club, and joked that he d split the winnings with me if he won, and insisted on taking my phone number.
 You write books,  he said,  don t you?
I admitted I did.
 I could write some f**king book about gambling,  he muttered.
 Why don t you?  I wondered.
 No time,  he replied.  I was on a truck all my life. Eventually, I had to get injections for trapped nerves in the back. I had no time for writing books.
The ticket he bought was sitting on the counter and his mind was clearly on the poker game. He swallowed the second half of his pint like it was milk, and said:  I ve changed my mind. I ll go back in.  And like a swimmer facing a cold ocean, he rose courageously to face his destiny.
 Here,  he said, pushing the raffle ticket across the counter towards my glass.  You keep it.
I tried to dissuade him, but he was gone down the corridor.
The following morning I walked into town to retrieve my car at the Buoys and Gulls cafe. I thought I saw dolphins on a distant wave so I got my Lumix camera from the boot and pointed it at them. But as I zoomed in I realised that they were only surfers in rubber suits bobbing up and down, their faraway laughter sounding like seagulls.
Two weeks later, I received a text from the man at the bar.
 We won EUR 50 on that ticket   they re going to send me a cheque, cos they have my details but I ll send you the money if I have your address.
 Keep the money,  I texted back.  And sure maybe we ll meet some time for a coffee when you re back in Bundoran.
We could watch the surfers wrestling with waves, I thought, or maybe spot a dolphin somewhere in the bay   if we were lucky.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



BYD's Dolphin is bound to make a big splash
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: MOTORS; Pg. 23
Length: 1073 words
Body


Naming cars after animals is always a fraught process. After all, the Triumph Spitfire sounds like a great car until you realise that (a) it wasn t, really and (b) it s actually named after a famous aircraft, not the small Antarctic bird.
For every Ford Mustang (good name, although a Mustang is a type of horse rather than a specific animal) there s a Nissan Bluebird. For each Plymouth Barracuda, there s a Reliant Robin. See what I mean? There are potential trapdoors everywhere.
What, then, are we to make of the BYD Dolphin? This mid-sized five-door hatchback is part of BYD s  Ocean Series  of cars, in which all the models are named for aquatic animals. Hence, the impressive BYD Seal saloon   a Tesla Model 3 competitor   and the small, and incredibly cheap, BYD Seagull, a compact electric hatchback currently for sale only in China.
BYD is itself seemingly a company comfortably sailing close to the rocks of whimsy, as its name is an acronym of Build Your Dreams. On our Dolphin test car, that phrase is written out in full on the tailgate, but BYD is apparently going to stop doing this for its European-market cars, as the levels of cringe are just too high here.
The Dolphin doesn t look much like a dolphin, but perhaps that s for the best. Dolphins (the watery ones, not the electric ones) are sleek and swift, and hugely intelligent (at least the ones David Attenborough films are) but their shape would not translate well to a road-going object, as Chinese rival Great Wall Motors  efforts with its Ora brand seem to prove.
So, instead, the Dolphin looks pretty conventional on the outside. It s slightly snub-nosed with its square headlights inset well away from the edges of the bodywork, but it s enlivened by the deep green and contrasting silver two-tone paintwork of our test car, and the jewel-like detailing of the rear lights.
Interesting inside
Inside, it s considerably more interesting. There in the centre is the same 12.8-inch touchscreen, which rotates from portrait to landscape and back again, as you ll find in the Seal and the strong-selling Atto 3 crossover. There s the same neat three- spoke steering wheel, the same high- backed bucket seats with soft  pleather  upholstery. It s all quite familiar, but here in the Dolphin it seems even more impressive.
Why? Partly because of the price tag   which currently starts at EUR 29,318 inclusive of grants and rebates, but which is set to fall further to about EUR 25,000 once the smaller-battery, 310km range model arrives in the next couple of months   but partly because BYD has clearly made an effort to make the Dolphin s cabin feel welcoming.
Where there are cheaper grades of plastic, such as low down on the dashboard or on the doors, BYD has added a slightly rough texture, which at least makes the plastics look more visually appealing.
Elsewhere, everything you touch and look at, from the click-click function of the circular air vents to the soft-touch surfaces of the dashboard itself, are all top drawer. The Dolphin might be one of the most affordable EVs on the market, but it sure doesn t feel like it inside. It s significantly higher in quality than its closest rival, the MG4, and pretty well on a par with the Volkswagen ID.3. Space in the back is very good, space in the boot is . . . adequate.
Only the touchscreen lets the side down. Yes, the rotating thing is cool for five minutes, but once you learn that if you re wearing polarised lenses you can t actually see the screen in its upright position, you just leave it in landscape. There is Apple CarPlay connectivity, but the menu layout is too fiddly. To get from, say, the podcasts screen in CarPlay back to the air-conditioning menu requires you to press and swipe the screen no fewer than three times, which is rather silly. Added to which, the driver s instrument screen behind the wheel   which is hugely welcome from a safety point of view   looks cluttered and slightly cheap.
However, the Dolphin redeems itself with its battery. Just as there have been carmakers   and Honda is the best example here   who were at the top of their game when making engines, so BYD is a battery maker first, and a carmaker second. And it shows.
The Dolphin s  Blade  battery, which is built into the structure of the car to improve stiffness and crash performance, is a lithium-iron phosphate battery, or LFP. LFP batteries are simpler and cheaper to make than the more familiar lithium-ion batteries to which we are used, but while they re less energy-dense for a given size, they are far more robust, meaning that you can fast-charge them, and charge to 100 per cent, to your heart s content. No more pussyfooting around at 80 per cent for fear of a monster repair bill down the line.
Fully charged, the Dolphin claims a range of up to 427km, and our car was showing 419 on a full battery. And it delivers that kind of range, too. If you re pounding the motorway, the range will likely slip to around 380km, but in more mixed driving   even with the air conditioning going   the Dolphin s battery hits its claimed marks. Our average energy use hovered around the 19kWh/100km mark, which is a little high, but skewed by lots of motorway miles. In more mixed conditions, the Dolphin easily averaged 16kWh/100km.
The downside? It will fast-charge only at speeds of up to 88kW from a DC rapid charger, which is a touch on the slow side. It s acceptable enough if you re not a regular long-haul driver, though.
Performance is fine. The Dolphin, as with most rivals, uses a 150kW or 204hp electric motor, but this one drives the front wheels, whereas the rival MG and VW cars are rear-driven. It matters little, because the Dolphin is no handling champ. It s fine, and feels entirely competent, but the MG seems more agile and nippy, with sweeter steering. The Dolphin counters with a cosseting ride quality, but it s quite noisy at a cruise, with a good bit of wind and tyre roar. 100km/h comes up in a reasonably perky 7 seconds, but it never feels all that quick, subjectively.
Impressive battery
Would that put you off? Or would the name be a barrier? Possibly; possibly not. And it s only with time that BYD will find out if its watery naming strategy actually chimes with European buyers. Given the price tag and the hugely impressive battery performance, there s every reason to think that it might. Or maybe BYD should just bung Chrysler a bunch of cash and ask for the rights to the Barracuda name.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Citywest office block guiding at EUR 6.2m
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 17
Length: 216 words
Byline: RONALD QUINLAN
Body


RONALD QUINLAN  Agent Lisney is guiding a price of EUR 6.2 million for 3016-3018 Lake Drive at Dublin s Citywest Business Campus. The
 property, a two-storey office block of 2,108sq m (22,965sq ft) with 74 parking spaces, comes to the market fully let to a range of well-established tenants including Pure Telecom, Schneider and Aspen Pharma.
The building features a brick facade and pitched roof, offering a flexible layout including cellular offices, large boardrooms, meeting rooms and an open-plan office arrangement. The property currently holds a Ber rating of B1-B3 but has undergone a Ber-improvement assessment that indicates its potential to secure an A3 rating.
It  is generating a passing rent of EUR 547,844 per annum and offers the prospective purchaser the opportunity to secure a net initial yield of 8.04 per cent and short-term reversionary potential to increase this to 8.5 per cent. The weighted average unexpired lease term  is 5.85 years to break and 10.55 years to lease expiry.
James Nugent and Thomas Byrne of Lisney said:  We expect this property to attract strong interest from a range of national and international investors seeking long-term income. Its prime location, stable income and Ber-improvement potential should all serve to enhance its appeal for potential buyers.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Clinical England prove too good for battling Ireland; James and Greenwood strike for visitors as England hold off a late rally to keep a clean sheet
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 18
Length: 930 words
Body


Ireland had one glorious chance to score. Naturally, it came from a Katie McCabe free-kick. As usual, the target was Louise Quinn at the back post.
Some clever decoy runners caught England cold as Quinn s ball back across Hannah Hampton s area was met by Anna Patten and Caitlin Hayes but the English-born, Irish defenders failed to make sufficient contact to nudge the ball into a gaping net.
It would have left England leading 2-1 with 11 minutes to play. It would have brought the house down.
Quinn stayed up front, as did McCabe, to give the 32,742 crowd their money s worth.
McCabe pulled a sneaky move, late on, when she pick-pocketed the English goalkeeper only for Hampton to recover and deny a consolation goal.
Chastising or educational night in Dublin, glass half empty or half full? The gulf in class between English and Irish football was laid bare at the Aviva Stadium.
Sarina Wiegman s smooth-as-silk outfit struck early through Lauren James and Alex Greenwood before taking Ireland on a tour of their own national patch of grass.
It was just the second women s international at the Aviva. The Irish battled themselves to exhaustion. The English strolled about, never leaving third gear. And still, they owned the night.
The problem was clear, Ireland had no out-ball. No respite. Backs to a green wall with Kyra Carusa always disconnected, miles from her teammates as the England back four quickly became a defensive two marshalled by the unflappable Leah Williamson.
It was only a matter of time.
Ireland were organized but never equal to the European champions. The Lionesses reached last year s World Cup final with an array of stars, each one technically superior to their marker here.
It took 11 minutes for James to tip-toe into the box, where the brilliant Chelsea player shot first time, a low-laser-beam that silenced the screaming crowd.
It was created by Keira Walsh being granted enough time to check and cross to the back post where Lucy Bronze out jumped McCabe. The Barcelona right-back s header hit Patten s shin and sat up for James to pounce.
That s how it went, upside down for Ireland, attackers like McCabe forced to mark defenders like Bronze.
Ireland could not escape the low block. The second goal proved as inevitable as the first; Jessica Park left fly with a volley that hit Ruesha Littlejohn s arm, prompting Finnish referee Lina Lehtovaara to award a penalty, which Alex Greenwood cooly finished.
Recycle
Greenwood s strike was neither high nor low but Brosnan dived the wrong way.
English players relished the chance to keep McCabe under wraps, with James and Park taking turns forcing her to turn and recycle possession. They seemed delighted by the Irish skipper being positioned 90 metres from their goal, a good 70 metres out of her lethal range.
The switch forward came too late. McCabe in the Lucy Quinn role, running off Carusa, would have forced Wiegman to think again.
There was one early chance, a brief moment at 0-0, when Carusa rushed towards halfway only to spread a wide pass that Lucy Quinn put her foot on, both of them missing Denise O Sullivan s lung busting sprint up the opposite flank.
England slowly reformed and regained possession. Granted, the moment demanded the sort of pass only McCabe or Walsh could unleash.
Still, Eileen Gleeson s team made it too easy for the visitors to dominate the opening 45 minutes. Irish possession never lasted longer than three passes.
It should have been 3-0 by the half hour. Another English penalty was given after Lauren Hemp skinned Aoife Mannion down the left and picked out Alessia Russo whose touch hit Louise Quinn s forearm. This time Greenwood slammed the ball off the butt of the right post.
Gleeson made one change at the turn, Megan Connolly replacing Littlejohn, as Ireland persisted with Mannion at rightback although McCabe was freed from defensive duties.
The arrival of Megan Campbell s long throwing abilities and Leanne Kiernan s vigour suggests that the starting line-up might have been different.
It should have been 3-0 on the hour mark. A gift; Brosnan s short kick out to Quinn was shipped left for Patten who was dispossessed by James. Brosnan saved terrifically from Fran Kirby s point blank effort after Beth Mead touched down James  looping delivery.
It could have been a humiliation. Instead, it was just a clean lesson in how possession football is played by one of the best English sides to ever grace Lansdowne Road.
 We are disappointed with the results,  said Quinn after a Nations League window that yielded two defeats, three goals conceded and none scored.  We know the level now.
REPUBLIC OF IRELAND: Brosnan (Everton); Mannion (Manchester Utd), Hayes (Glasgow Celtic), Louise Quinn (Birmingham City), Patten (Aston Villa), McCabe (Arsenal); Littlejohn (London City Lionesses), O Sullivan (North Carolina Courage); Lucy Quinn (Birmingham City), Payne (Everton); Carusa (San Diego Wave). Subs: Connolly (Bristol City) for Littlejohn (46 mins), Campbell (London City Lionesses) for Payne and Kiernan (Liverpool) for Lucy Quinn (both 60), Murphy (Wake Fotest University) for Carusa (70). ENGLAND: Hampton (Chelsea); Bronze (Barcelona), Williamson (Arsenal), Greenwood (Manchester City), Carter (Chelsea); Toone (Manchester Utd), Walsh (Barcelona), Park (Manchester City); James (Chelsea), Russo (Arsneal), Hemp (Manchester City). Subs: Kirby (Chelsea) for Park and Mead (Arsenal) for Hemp (both 56 mins), Stanway (Bayern Munich) for Toone (75), Daly (Aston Villa) for Russo and Kelly (Manchester City) for James (both 87). Referee: Lina Lehtovaara (Finland).

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Company that controls Irish genomic data incurs EUR 21m loss as revenue drops; Accumulated losses reached $121m at Genuity Science Ireland by end of 2022
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 455 words
Body


BARRY J WHYTE  Genuity Science Ireland, a company that controls an enormous database of Irish genomic data, incurred losses of $22.7 million (EUR 20.9 million) in 2022 as its revenue dropped again, new accounts show.
Formerly known as Genomic Medicine Ireland, Genuity made $7.1 million from selling access to its database, down from $8 million in 2021, and $17 million in 2020. Having made a loss for the year of $22.7 million, the company now has accumulated losses of $121.4 million.
The directors note in the accounts that the company has had to conduct a major restructuring, in which it  reduced the breadth of its commercial offering and significantly decreased the cost of its operating model .
It cut its administrative costs from $22.2 million to $13.6 million, a large chunk of which appears to have come from cutting its staff from 75 to 47 at the end of 2022, which reduced its wage bill from $12.6 million to $6 million.
It noted that, following the restructuring, it  anticipates some new customers/business in 2024 .
However, it noted that  there is no certainty that sufficient revenue can be earned in from the commercial offerings to cover the costs involved in running the business , leading to a material uncertainty over its ability to continue as a going concern.
Genomics Medicine Ireland, was founded in Ireland in 2015 by Daniel Crowley, Paul Thurk, Sean Ennis and Maurice Treacy, before being sold in 2018 to Chinese-owned WuXi NextCode. In 2021, WuXi in turn sold the company to Hibercell, a US-based biotechnology firm focused on development of cancer treatments.
HiberCell did not respond to a request for comment.
At various points, the taxpayer, through the Irish Strategic Investment Fund, has invested more than EUR 70 million into the company as it aimed to collect DNA from 400,000 Irish people for medical research purposes.
The latest accounts show that Genuity is reliant on HiberCell for short-term loans to keep operating.
The accounts state that, in HiberCell s most recent financial statements, for the same period,  a substantial doubt exists as to its ability to continue as a going concern due to uncertainty over availability of additional funding .
HiberCell has since secured additional funding from a new round of investment from what it described as  third-party investors .
The parent company is also  seeking to raise additional funding during calendar year 2024 in order to continue its ongoing clinical trials and to continue to provide short-term loans  to Genuity.
This will, the accounts state,  depend on a number of factors including public and private equity markets, the progress of its clinical trials, and many other factors; and receipt of this additional funding is not guaranteed .

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Consumers should benefit; Personal injury awards
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 339 words
Body


The Supreme Court ruling that personal injury award guidelines must be followed by the courts averts a potentially serious setback to the Government s efforts to reduce insurance costs.
The court found  by a four to three majority that it had been  unconstitutional to grant the Judicial Council the power to set the new personal injury guidelines. While this has implications for any future changes, the court also found that the subsequent independent ratification of the guidelines by the Oireachtas made them legally binding.
A constitutional challenge to the guidelines   which came into effect in April 2021   was inevitable given that awards made as a result of their introduction are significantly lower than the previous norms set by the Book of Quantum. In the case in point, damages for an ankle injury suffered by the plaintiff were EUR 3,000 under the guidelines and would have been up to EUR 34,000 under the previous system.
Further court actions cannot be ruled out. But the Supreme Court has set a high bar for any further challenges. The clarity brought by yesterday s judgment should have the effect of further encouraging claimants to avoid the courts in favour of the lower cost route provided by the Injuries Resolution Board.
The purpose of the IRB is to reduce the cost to insurers of settling claims, which should in turn feed through into lower premium costs for consumers and businesses. The IRB says that in its first full year of operation   2022   it generated savings in this regard of EUR 40 million, while average awards were down by 34 per cent.
The extent to which these savings   and the additional reductions in insurance company costs due to the application of the new guidelines by the courts   are being passed on to consumers is difficult to ascertain, given the opaque nature of insurance pricing. But the downward movement in awards indicates that lower premiums are now overdue. The industry must step up and deliver   and the Government needs to do all that it can to ensure that this happens.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Docklands apartment owners object to Ronan's plan for Citigroup's office
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 381 words
Byline: GORDON DEEGAN
Body


GORDON DEEGAN  Johnny Ronan s planned 17-storey, mixed-use scheme for Dublin s docklands  will have a brutal and disproportionate impact on the local residential environment  according to an objection by a management company acting on behalf of 186 apartment owners at Clarion Quay in Dublin 1.
Mr Ronan s Ronan Real Estate Group s (RGRE) planning application is part of a redevelopment of Citigroup s current European headquarters at 1 North Wall Quay.
The scheme involves the demolition of the existing six-storey office building and the development of four buildings in its place, ranging in height from nine to 17 storeys.
The RGRE firm, NWQ Devco Limited, is seeking a 10-year planning permission and in a report lodged with the application, planning consultant John Spain said that the  development  proposes to positively transform this waterfront location ...  with an exemplar design which is informed and responds to its ...  context .
Mr Spain  contended that  the design seeks to provide a significant gain to the urban area in terms of design quality, streetscape vibrancy and activation, social and cultural interests and ...  best-in-class contemporary workplace .
Chilling effect
However, in the apartment owners  objection, planning consultant John Bird argued that a grant of permission would have a chilling effect on the  provision of much-needed housing in the city.
On behalf of the Clarion Quay Management Company (CQMC), Mr Bird said:  A precedent would be set so that no resident of the city would feel that their residential amenity would be respected and that no protection would be given to transitional areas.
He said that his clients are concerned the proposal with its inevitable overlooking and overshadowing   would seriously affect the residential amenity and the enjoyment of the residences and shared spaces .
Mr Bird also said that  the proposed development would have a brutal and disproportionate impact on the local residential environment, the concept of city living, the 15-minute city objective .
 The secretary of the Clarion Quay Management Company, David Ward, told the council that  we have to say we are shocked by the proposal in its size, scale, but really in the way it has not considered the presence of Clarion Quay and the 300-400 residents .

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Downpours likely to continue disrupting farming
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 362 words
Byline: SARAH BURNS
Body


SARAH BURNS  Rain is likely for the next 10 days or so, Met Éireann s chief hydrometeorologist has warned, as farmers face challenging weather conditions.
Eoin Sherlock said there were  tentative signs  that high pressure would develop, resulting in less rainfall towards the end of next week. However, he said at around the end of the month and the start of May the high pressure would move away.
Mr Sherlock was speaking before a meeting of the National Fodder and Food Security Committee, which was focusing on implementing solutions to provide assistance to farmers.
Very wet
He said the northern half of the country would experience heavy rainfall  April 16th, and it would be  very wet  in parts of Ulster.
 There would probably be another week and a half of rain before  high pressure kicks in and gives us a bit of respite .
Met Éireann climatologist Paul Moore noted that last July had been the wettest on record and since then there had been a  run of very wet months . He said 2023 was Ireland s third wettest year on record, behind 2015 and 2009. The first half of the year had been a lot drier than the second half.
Minister for Agriculture Charlie McConalogue said it was a really challenging and unprecedented time for farmers in relation to  the length of this winter  which was  likely to continue for a while yet . He said it had been a particularly trying time for the tillage sector, and that everyone was hoping for the weather to improve.
Funding
However, the Fianna Fáil TD said the Taoiseach and the Minister for Public Expenditure had ruled out the possibility of a mini budget or of fresh funding for departments. He added that he understood the pressure the sector was under and would continue to assess the situation in terms of planting over the coming days and weeks.
Mr McConalogue later announced the introduction of a fodder transport support measure to provide additional assistance to livestock farmers most severely affected by the  prolonged exceptional weather conditions . A financial contribution is being provided to offset transport costs of hay, fodder beet, straw and silage for feeding where this involves a distance of more than 75km.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



DUP says Harris appointment is opportunity to 'reset relationships'
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 3
Length: 636 words
Byline: FREYA McCLEMENTSMARK PAULJACK POWER
Body


FREYA McCLEMENTS
MARK PAUL and
JACK POWER
 The election of Simon Harris as Taoiseach is an opportunity to  learn from the missteps of the previous administration  and  reset relationships  between unionists and the Irish Government, the DUP interim leader has said.
Gavin Robinson congratulated Mr Harris on his appointment and said he looked forward to engaging with him  in due course .
Addressing members and supporters of the North Antrim DUP Association in Ballymena yesterday evening, Mr Robinson said:  The Republic of Ireland is our nearest neighbour, and I want us to be good neighbours with sensible co-operation.
 This is an opportunity for the Dublin Government to learn from the missteps of the previous administration, which gravely damaged the southern relationship with unionists,  he said.
The former taoiseach, Leo Varadkar, was accused by unionists of threatening violence   which he vehemently denied   during the Brexit negotiations, when he used the example of the bombing of a customs post during the Troubles to emphasise to Brussels why there could not be a hard border on the island of Ireland.
He was also criticised for his support for a united Ireland, a potential pressure point which Mr Harris has already kicked into the long grass, saying to Sky News earlier this week that it was a  legitimate aspiration, but not a priority .
Mr Robinson said Northern Ireland was a  divided society, and progress has only ever been made through consensus .
Unsurprisingly, other northern parties also emphasised the need for the new Taoiseach to maintain strong North-South links.
SDLP leader Colum Eastwood welcomed the new Taoiseach s  abiding interest in the North , and said he looked forward to working with him  to strengthen North South co-operation, which has suffered as a result of the suspension of devolution in the North, to build on the work of the Shared Island unit, and to continue the important work of bringing the people and traditions that share our island together .
Partnership The leader of the Alliance Party, Naomi Long, said she wished Mr Harris  all the best  in his new role.  The tenure of his predecessor Leo Varadkar saw a close and productive working relationship further progressed between Northern Ireland and the Republic, and I am confident Mr Harris will continue to nurture this positive partnership between the North and South,  she said.
Meanwhile, although Westminster is practically deserted due to the ongoing parliamentary recess for Easter, Britain s prime minister Rishi Sunak and the man vying to replace him, Labour leader Keir Starmer, congratulated Mr Harris within moments of each other yestereday afternoon.
The Labour leader was first out of the traps, writing on X that he looked forward to working with the Taoiseach  as we seek to strengthen the ties of friendship between our two countries .
Exactly two minutes later, Mr Sunak took to the social media platform with a similar message. He said he looked forward to  forging even stronger ties  with his Irish counterpart  so we can deliver for people across these isles .
Ursula von der Leyen, European Commission president, also sent her congratulations to the new Taoiseach.  We will work hand in hand to deliver for the people of Ireland, and for Europe as a whole,  she said.
Mr Harris is due to travel to Brussels tomorrow, where he will meet Dr von der Leyen, as well as Roberta Metsola, the Maltese politician who is president of the European Parliament. The Taoiseach s first engagements will come ahead of a summit of EU leaders in Brussels next week.
US ambassador to Ireland Claire Cronin said in a statement:  As we mark 100 years of diplomatic relations, I look forward to working with the Taoiseach to further strengthen the partnership between our countries and the friendship between our people.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Ennis EUR 1.2bn data centre plan gets the green light
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 410 words
Byline: GORDON DEEGAN
Body


GORDON DEEGAN  An Bord Pleanála has given the green light to contentious plans for a new 200MW EUR 1.2 billion data centre campus on the outskirts of Ennis, Co Clare.
The Ennis data centre campus is to comprise six data halls covering 145 acres or 1.3 million sq ft of land adjacent to the Tulla Road on the eastern outskirts of Ennis near junction 13 on the M18 motorway.
Welcoming the decision, applicants Art Data Centres Ltd confirmed that the project would create between 400 and 450 permanent jobs when the data centre campus was fully operational, with up to 1,200 jobs in construction.
Construction work on the scheme is to take six years, and a company spokesman said yesterday:  Construction will commence as soon as possible in 2024.
The planned Ennis data centre has been six years moving through various stages, including strategic site assessment, zoning and planning.
 Great news
Chief executive of Art Data Centres, Tom McNamara, welcomed the announcement.  This is great news for this data centre campus and for Clare as the project will be a key pillar of the Ennis 2040 Economic Plan for the area.
 The infrastructure that is available in the Ennis site will assist government in national ambitions to deliver ongoing opportunities for the country in the tech industry. The power connection application can now be finally processed due to the positive planning decision.
The applicants initially pencilled for June 2023 as a construction start date, but opposition and planning delays at An Bord Pleanála resulted in the appeals board taking more than 18 months to make a determination.
In giving the go-ahead to Art Data Centres Ltd, the appeals board has stated that it had regard to the Government statement on the role of data centres in Ireland s enterprise strategy from July 2022.
The appeals board grant upholds a granting of permission by Clare County Council that was issued for the project in August 2022, and the scheme has been before An Bord Pleanála since September 2022.
The proposed development came before the appeals board after eight appeals were lodged by An Taisce, Friends of the Irish Environment, Futureproof Clare, the Clare Green Party and four individuals Dr Colin Doyle, Martin Knox, Colin Johnston and Christine Sharp.
In its appeal An Taisce stated that it recommended a refusal to the scheme as the project  would require a very significant amount of power, thereby generating a projected 657,000 tonnes of CO2 per annum .

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Escalating the conflict may suit Netanyahu
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 814 words
Body


As things stand, the Binyamin Netanyahu war cabinet plans to launch a major ground offensive on Rafah in the coming weeks.
The stated purposes are to free the surviving hostages taken by Hamas in its cross-border atrocity raid in October and to destroy Hamas itself.
Whether it would be possible to accomplish both by a ground offensive is uncertain. If the offensive is intended to annihilate the military strength and personnel of Hamas by aerial and land barrages and to occupy the remains of Rafah by street to street, house to house combat, what are the chances of rescuing alive and further unharmed the hostages who have survived until now?
If Hamas commanders and fighters understand that the Israeli government has decided on their physical annihilation, what are the chances that the fanatical leadership or the foot-soldiers in Hamas will free the hostages in advance of their own certain destruction?
Is it plausible that the hostage-takers will release their hostages in advance of what they consider to be their own inevitable  martyrdom ? Would their warped ideology permit them to reward Netanyahu with a substantial rescue of the hostages in addition to their own destruction? Or would their cruel and macabre calculus impel them to  take the hostages with them , thereby ensuring the downfall of Netanyahu and the political hawks who support him in the Knesset?
Are Hamas fighters to surrender themselves into long-term captivity? Or will the Israeli government quietly kill them rather than add, say, 10,000 to its population of prisoners and detainees held at present?
Shoot-to-kill option I have always suspected that mass graves rather than prison camps is the intended destination for captured Hamas fighters. The shoot-to-kill option is much neater from a long-term, flawed  Israeli perspective, rather than having to identify who are the Hamas activists who must be annihilated. How would they be distinguished from low-grade supporters of Hamas and apparatchiks of the Hamas administration in Gaza? While it may seem harsh to view the options in this way, it may also be realistic. Any deal involving survival of the Hamas leadership and the mass release of Palestinian prisoners currently held by Israel would probably spell the political end for Netanyahu and the hawks, even if it spared what remains of the buildings and infrastructure of Gaza from total destruction.
The aim of the Israeli right is to destroy Hamas no matter what the cost in terms of Palestinian lives. Total occupation of all of the Gaza Strip is a war aim. Expulsion of the Palestinian population from Gaza, or partial settlement of the strip by Israel, is a war aim of some of the far-right in Israeli politics.
Even Jared Kushner has articulated the idea to annex Gaza and to relocate its population to the Negev area of southern Israel. He sees Gaza as valuable real estate waiting for development once clearance is completed. There are echoes here of his father-in-law s famous bid to buy Greenland from Denmark. The curt rejection by the Danish prime minister earned her the description  nasty  from Trump.
Rebuild Gaza If annexation does not happen, who will rebuild Gaza for its people? Does Israel hope wealthy Arab states will rebuild Gaza for the Palestinians? Could that happen without a clear policy to integrate the West Bank and Gaza under effective Palestinian control with a view to establishing a two-state solution?
Or will the Israeli right simply play for time? Such a strategy might involve the destruction of most of Gaza, major degradation of the Palestinian population, temporary Israeli military administration of the wastelands, intractable negotiations and delay, all the while hoping that in time the world s gaze would be distracted to other issues elsewhere.
All of this was inevitable once the major western powers allowed Netanyahu the go ahead for his war of annihilation. It was obvious to me and I wrote and spoke about the likelihood of our ending up where we are, and where we appear to be going, if he was given his head.
It must have been equally obvious to those professional diplomats and strategists who we call  gamers  in Washington, London, Paris and Berlin.
The Israeli attack on the Iranian consulate building in Damascus was a calculated step in escalation. Iran will respond in some fashion. Does Netanyahu calculate that widening and deepening the conflict on a regional basis could yet rescue him, by portraying him as the man who is fighting an existential war for Israel s survival?
Biden and Blinken talk about red lines in relation to Rafah. Are more than one million Palestinians now to be herded north into the ruins of Khan Younis and Gaza city so that the Hamas fighters can be flushed out, cornered, and killed? What chance have the hostages or most of them if that happens? Just how does the US administration see this crisis ending?

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



EU examines Chinese wind turbine companies over subsidies
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 14
Length: 505 words
Body


Brussels has launched a subsidy investigation into Chinese wind turbine companies as it steps up efforts to protect its domestic industry from cheap competition.
Margrethe Vestager, the EU s top competition enforcer, said the investigation would examine whether Chinese companies participating in wind parks across Europe may have benefited from state support from Beijing.
The investigation will use the European Commission s new powers designed to clamp down on market-distorting subsidies from foreign governments as Brussels seeks to defend itself from unfair competition from abroad, including Beijing.
Investigators will examine  the conditions for the development of wind parks in Spain, Greece, France, Romania and Bulgaria , Ms Vestager said.
The investigation comes days after the commission launched investigations into two consortiums bidding for the development of a solar park in Romania, which include Chinese solar panel manufacturers.
In February the commission launched a similar probe into Chinese state-owned company CRRC s bid to supply trains in Bulgaria, which was half the price of a European competitor. CRRC later withdrew from the process.
Unfair trade practices
In a speech at Princeton University, Ms Vestager said Brussels should move away from playing  whack-a-mole  with individual cases and instead use its full powers to defend its interest against unfair trade practices by China.
 We saw the playbook for how China came to dominate the solar panel industry,  she said.  First, attracting foreign investment into its large domestic market, usually requiring joint ventures. Second, acquiring the technology, and not always above board. Third, granting massive subsidies for domestic suppliers, while simultaneously and progressively closing the domestic market to foreign businesses. And, fourth, exporting excess capacity to the rest of the world at low prices.
Ms Vestager said that as a result less than 3 per cent of the solar panels installed in the EU were produced in the Continent. Several manufacturing plants have closed in recent months, saying they cannot compete with Chinese imports.
China s exports of green technology have ballooned in recent months as it opens factories. A surge in imports of electric vehicles prompted the commission to open an anti-subsidy investigation last year, which should conclude in July and could lead to tariffs.
Chinese officials claim their products are simply better.
Peng Gang, minister for economic and trade affairs at the Chinese embassy in Brussels, wrote on Monday that EU-China collaboration was a  win-win . He noted that some in Europe had attributed the success of Chinese companies to subsidies   while the EU was at the same time offering large subsidies to companies that were struggling to be competitive.
 The secrets behind Chinese products going global have never been the so-called subsidies, but diligence, innovation and competitive awareness of generations of Chinese entrepreneurs,  he said.   Copyright The Financial Times Limited 2024

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



European court's climate case verdict has big implications for Ireland; As the EU's second biggest carbon emitter per capita, Ireland is likely to be in the dock for years to come for not doing enough
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 607 words
Body


There is a global wave of litigation, as communities, especially young climate activists, attempt to secure their human rights and hold governments and fossil fuel companies accountable for a dangerously overheating world.
Of hundreds of cases dealt with, whether before a national or international court, the success rate is modest. But it is safe to say litigants across the planet will be emboldened by a European Court of Human Rights (ECHR) decision delivered yesterday.
The Strasbourg-based court ruled the Swiss government violated its citizens  human rights by not doing enough to stop climate change. It rejected similar cases brought by young Portuguese people who claimed their human rights were infringed by the climate policies of 32 countries including Ireland, and a French MEP.
The outcome is likely to have implications for other governments including Ireland s because they are parties to the European Convention on Human Rights.
A group of older Swiss women claimed they were particularly affected by global warming with increasing frequency and intensity of heatwaves posing a life-threatening risk. Six Portuguese youths argued climate-fuelled disasters such as wildfires threatened their right to life and discriminated against them based on their age.
The ruling sets a precedent applying to all European countries, said Irish lawyer Gerry Liston of Global Legal Action Network (Glan) which led the Portuguese case.  It means all European countries must urgently revise their targets so that they are science-based and aligned to 1.5 degrees. This is a massive win for all generations.
The ruling is a historic victory for climate justice, said the Centre for Environmental Justice run by Community Law & Mediation in Ireland. The court declared, for the first time ever, that the Swiss government s inadequate action on emissions (and by extension the inaction of all parties to the court) is a violation of article 8 of the European Convention on Human Rights, which protects the right to respect for private and family life.
The court president, Judge Siofra O Leary, stressed it would be up to governments to decide how to approach climate obligations.  The court finds that there were some critical lacunae in the Swiss authorities  process of putting in place the relevant domestic regulatory framework. This included a failure to quantify, through a carbon budget or otherwise, national greenhouse gas emissions limitations,  she said.  The respondent state had previously failed to meet its past greenhouse gas emission reduction targets by failing to act in good time and in an appropriate and consistent manner.
That finding is likely to send a chill down the back of the Irish Government, as Ireland is the second biggest carbon emitter in the EU on a per capita basis, and is unlikely to meet its first legally binding five-year carbon budget. Ireland stood alone when in its defence it stated the risk the applicants face is no greater than risks inherent to life in a modern city, when in reality they face extreme weather and temperatures in excess of 40 degrees for prolonged periods if the planet remains on its current trajectory.
The Government is facing a challenge to its 2023 Climate Action Plan, brought by Friends of the Irish Environment, who argue it does not set out with sufficient specificity how emissions will be cut in line with the carbon budget. That action and the ECHR verdict, which is likely to prompt other cases because of ongoing failure to adequately address climate change, means Ireland is likely to be in the dock for years to come for not doing enough   just like the Swiss government.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



European ports show the way in offshore wind development; Bigger quaysides, deeper harbours, the ability to cater for trucks longer than 100 metres and large landbanks are key going forward
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 14
Length: 1210 words
Body


The scale of what is required to be a big player in the supply chain for Europe s emerging floating wind farm sector is beyond most people s grasp, according to Jesper Bank, chief commercial officer of the Port of Esbjerg in Denmark.
He displays an impressive drone shot of the vast quayside space currently being used to service offshore wind, with an array of turbine towers and blades neatly laid out before shipping to the North Sea.  These pictures are ready for the museum,  he says at a briefing in Bilbao on the fringes of the recent WindEurope annual gathering.
 There s a capacity issue today; in five years  time it will be a tremendous problem,  he adds.
Since 2001, 23.6 gigawatts (GW) of offshore wind turbines have been shipped from the port. The bottom line, he believes, is no port is specifically designated for offshore renewable energy. That means bigger quaysides, deeper harbours, the ability to cater easily for trucks longer than 100 metres and large landbanks.
Designers today are developing 18 megawatt (MW) turbines with a 280-metre rotor diameter, he says; soon it will be 20MW and even bigger.
This might be considered a matter for Europe s megaports and of little relevance to Ireland, but it is State policy to have 20GW of offshore wind by 2040, rising to 37GW by 2050 to generate up to 10 times more electricity than national demand   and hence become a renewables exporter (of electrons or green hydrogen) with ports matching that ambition.
Bank s presentation shows how Esbjerg is pivoting to become one of those specialist ports. Given what it once was   a modest fishing port   there are big lessons for Irish ports wishing to do likewise. He repeatedly highlights the social impacts reaped at each stage of its natural progression.
Once employing 10,000 jobs in fishing, overfishing meant switching to oil and gas, which generated 2,400 jobs from the 1970s on. Since 2000, more than 4,000 jobs in renewables have been generated, as oil companies turned into renewable energy companies in the region, ranging across installation, manufacturing and servicing wind farms.
Companies there represent the entire wind industry supply chain   which will soon include green hydrogen production.
 There s true innovation,  he says, pointing to its battery system development. There is a rule of thumb which, he suggests, means the installation of 1GW in the broadest sense is equivalent to 10,000 full-time equivalent jobs.
But with the ever-increasing size of turbines, vessels and logistical equipment, combined with a dramatic increase in market size, port capacity has become a bottleneck.
 Regional or global perspective
 Investments are lagging behind, as the need for adequate port infrastructure is increasing,  he says.  The offshore wind industry needs more investment than a local market can support. To justify the necessary investments, it is important to adopt a more regional or global perspective. This is the main lesson learned from the experience of Port Esbjerg, which can help the industry reach its full potential.
Spain and France are planning to scale up offshore wind with emphasis on floating wind, belying suggestions it is an immature technology.
Port-La Nouvelle, near Narbonne, in southern France is the only port with dedicated facilities to build and assemble offshore floating wind turbines close to the best windy location in the western Mediterranean, says Thomas Debize, its floating offshore wind project engineer.
The port is publicly owned by Occitanie/Pyrénées-Méditerranée, the second-largest region in France, and privately managed. It is spending more than EUR 680 million enlarging facilities, with funding secured through the regional government to ensure it does not transgress EU state aid rules.
New deep-sea infrastructure is under construction and due to be in use by 2026 to  increase the existing traffic and expand into new activities like those related to marine renewables, hydrogen production and low-carbon logistics , Debize says.
The port will expand from 60 to 210 hectares, and water depth will reach 16 metres to accommodate ships up to 80,000 deadweight tonnes. Some 40 hectares will be dedicated to storing and assembling turbine parts.
In tandem with this, the port is supporting two floating pilot projects. A joint venture called EFGL is building three 10MW floating turbines 16km off the coast of Leucate and Le Barcarès close to the Spanish border, while Eolmed is installing three 10MW turbines 15km off the nearby coastal town of Gruissan.
Backing at regional-government level derisked the port s expansion, Debize says. The priority now   having got the private sector on board, including Euroports   is to ensure a skilled workforce is integrated into the region  to be ready for the commercial [wind] farms  coming down the tracks.
The emphasis is on flexibility because of likely changes to turbine size and the type of technology used.
A Wind Energy Ireland national ports study last year found that only Belfast s D1 facility is entirely suitable to support fixed-bottom construction, with limited infrastructure to support floating wind infrastructure. It highlighted how funding is the crux issue but demonstrated how State support for port infrastructure is common throughout Europe.
Case studies in the report also highlighted the positive societal impact generated by port infrastructure projects, including those at Port-La Nouvelle, which attracted private investment following the success of the initial partly state-funded projects.
 The establishment of these port hubs has served to act as a catalyst for the supply chain with a significant number of jobs created around the offshore renewable energy port locations,  it added.
Strategic investment model
Challenges in funding offshore renewable energy ports is not unique to Ireland. Across Europe and the United States, ports and the supply chain are experiencing similar issues. In Scotland, a partnered approach with the Scottish government is in place, with developers working alongside the government on a strategic investment model for ports and supply chains.
A similar model could be adopted in Ireland, the report found, with collaboration likely to be more conducive to solving funding problems. A strategic investment model for Irish projects could identify  strategic projects  through a robust framework and would be the first step in providing Government support for development of offshore renewable energy ports.
Debize backs the case for a network with other ports across Europe.  Co-operation is key, especially for floating wind in the Mediterranean. This is where Port-La Nouvelle wants to be   with Italians ports, with Spanish ports.
That mindset needs to be adopted in Ireland, says Barry O Sullivan, chairman of the Shannon Estuary Economic Taskforce. He believes the Shannon estuary should be seen  as the green front door for Europe , such is the depth, shelter, wet storage capacity and offshore wind speeds nearby.
With world-leading international and indigenous companies already in Ireland, he says  we have the capability  to have a facility of that scale, and that is not being naive.  We have every natural advantage they have and more, because they don t have the wind speeds we have.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



First-quarter jet deliveries lowest since mid-2021 as Boeing eyes slow recovery
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 12
Length: 389 words
Body


Boeing deliveries in the first quarter were the lowest since mid-2021, highlighting how far the plane-maker has to go on its road to recovery from a near-catastrophic incident early in January.
The company handed over 29 aircraft in March, a slight improvement from the 27 delivered in each of the first two months of the year, for a total of 83 in the quarter. The majority of those planes were 737 Max jets, underscoring that model s importance for Boeing s bottom line.
Boeing has slowed the pace of work on the 737 family to give workers and suppliers breathing room to catch up on damaged or missing parts and get its production lines back in order. The steps are part of a broader effort to bolster the quality of its workmanship after a unnerving near-miss in January involving an airborne 737 Max that lost a large fuselage panel.
 We won t rush or go too fast,  Boeing chief financial officer Brian West said at an analyst conference last month.  In fact we re deliberately going slow to get this right.
US regulators have capped narrowbody output at a 38-jet monthly pace until they are satisfied the quality measures have taken root. But production continues to be well below that level, with Boeing delivering just 24 737s in March. Still, that figure is an improvement from February, when it only handed over 18 of the jets.
Wide-body jets
In the quarter Boeing delivered 16 wide-body jets, but none of its 777 freighters. Bloomberg reported earlier that the plane-maker has been grappling with a shortfall in supplies, including the General Electric Co-made engines.
Orders rebounded during the month even with Boeing s manufacturing travails, a reminder that demand is booming for new aircraft with output constrained at Boeing and Airbus.
The US company booked 113 gross orders against two cancellations in March. The tally included 85 Max 10 aircraft for American Airlines, eight 777X passenger jets for Ethiopian Airlines and another 20 of the twin-aisle jets for an unidentified customer. Five jets were also removed from its backlog under US accounting rules for at-risk orders, although the deals remain on Boeing s books.
Boeing tallied 131 gross orders during the first quarter, and 125 net orders including cancellations and the accounting adjustment. The company holds an order backlog of 5,591 aircraft.   Bloomberg

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Future might not be long arriving for Ireland's women
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 18
Length: 800 words
Body


Three moments that summed up Ireland s first half at the Aviva. It s 0-0. England think there s been a foul just outside Ireland s box but the referee surprises them by waving play on. Ruesha Littlejohn suddenly has the ball in a huge amount of space in midfield. Lucy Quinn has space to run on to a pass into the left channel   but Littlejohn overhits it and Quinn has to run all the way to the sideline to keep it in, by which time England are back in shape.
England lead 1-0. Katie McCabe hustles Lucy Bronze into a mistake, Ireland win the ball back, McCabe races down the left into space, but Lucy Quinn plays the pass too far ahead of her captain and England collect.
England lead 2-0. Ireland switch it from right to left through the back line and finally a ball is spinning out towards McCabe, who is unmarked and finally going to receive the ball in space   this is what the crowd s been waiting for . . . but McCabe miscontrols the ball out of play. Louise Quinn gestures desperately from the centre circle to FOCUS.
Ireland s game plan is pretty much as it was against France   as it s been in all their big matches over the last year, whether the coach is Eileen Gleeson or Vera Pauw   contain and counter.
Playing mostly without the ball is OK if you can be efficient when you win it back, but Ireland have not. Just before half-time McCabe gets the ball in midfield, tries to dribble, is surrounded by three English midfielders and dispossessed.
Method football
In the spaces between these moments, England had calmly and methodically been winning the game. There was no great ingenuity to the goals they scored. They came from the patient application of simple, effective, method football. Build up patiently from the back, push the wide players high, pin the opposition back, switch the play, get crosses into the box, see what happens.
The first goal came from a big inswinging cross from Keira Walsh on the left which found Lucy Bronze waiting on the far side. Bronze s header struck Anna Patten and fell at the feet of Lauren James, who cracked it into the net first time.
The second came from the penalty spot after Ruesha Littlejohn handled a Jess Park shot. Ireland couldn t complain too much about the decision. Alex Greenwood sent Courtney Brosnan the wrong way from the spot.
Soon after it transpired that the Finnish referee, Lina Lehtovaara, was something of a handball fundamentalist. This time Louise Quinn was the unfortunate Irish player penalised, but the ball had been kicked directly onto her arm by Alessia Russo from less than two feet away and the award was ridiculously harsh.
It s not always easy scoring two penalties in one game though: even Harry Kane has been known to struggle. Greenwood, who had shot into the bottom left corner with her first effort, decided to change direction. She struck it well, but the ball hit the base of the post and bounced across the goal to safety.
A score of 3-0 would have felt harsh at that point, particularly on Brosnan, who earned the acclaim of the crowd after saving a James shot from range and would go on to make a second superb stop from Fran Kirby in the second half.
Depressing
Looking back, that save seems a turning point in the game. If the first 60 minutes was a rather depressing display of English superiority, the last half-hour turned into a game in the ancient tradition of Lansdowne.
Megan Campbell comes on and her long throws give Ireland a new weapon. The first, from the left, is headed away from under the English bar. The second is from the right. With the English players defending in the box, Katie McCabe runs over to offer the option of a short throw and an inswinging cross. Campbell ignores her and goes with the throw, again England scramble it away, but not far. Play is quickly halted for a foul on Kiernan.
McCabe s free-kick is knocked back across the six-yard line by Louise Quinn  . . .just the wrong side of Caitlyn Hayes. It was the best Irish move and chance of the game. Hayes would go close again at the far post from McCabe s cross. Now Ireland are playing with confidence.
McCabe nearly has her moment of glory when she charges down Hannah Hampton s attempted kick out and chases the ball across the open goal. She gets there, turns and shoots from a narrow angle, straight at the keeper. Three team-mates in the middle shout their frustration.
There are no more goals   2-0 is respectable. In the last half-hour Ireland made it a real contest. As for the familiar Irish problems of the first hour, it comes back to what Damien Duff keeps saying: academies, player development, patience. It s encouraging that nearly 33,000 fans came to watch this game on the night of the biggest men s Champions League matches of the year so far. For the women s team, the future might not be long arriving.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Gavin and co grapple with an age-old challenge
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 20
Length: 963 words
Body


In Over the Bar, Breandán Ó hEithir wrote about the 1946 All-Ireland football semi-final and how infuriated he had been by his near namesake Micheál O Hehir s radio commentary and  his famous phrase,  For the life of me I don t know what the booing is about .
 I was sitting in our house in Inis Mór,  he continued,  wishing I were in Croke Park. It was a wet day and the booing started early on, and I was familiar enough with games to know exactly what crowd reactions were about, particularly when frees for a certain team followed the booing.
Antrim had emerged from Ulster with a short passing, running game, which Kerry disrupted by taking out the intended receiver. It was cynical but brutally effective.
It led to an Antrim protest that Kerry had brought the game into disrepute, which was rejected by Central Council.
It is a long time ago now and the outrages are unlikely to feature in the consultations of Jim Gavin s Football Review Committee with the GAA public but it does focus on a continual theme: the game as originally conceived, catch and kick, and the tactics, permitted or not, devised through the decades to circumvent it.
Reformations bring counter-reformations, which was where Kerry s brisk approach to the 1940s outbreak of possession football arose.
Kerry officially became the game s brand leaders in the 1940s, rising to the top of the roll of honour, which was a fair achievement given that Dublin had eight All-Irelands on the board before Kerry s first. Even now, only three counties have more than eight All-Irelands.
In The Madness of Football, the Irish Examiner s excellent podcast history of trends within the game, the paper s reporter Maurice Brosnan, who co-presents with historian and columnist Paul Rouse and former Mayo manager James Horan, who is a member of Gavin s FRC, provides modern statistical data on old matches.
In reviewing the 1966 All-Ireland final, overwhelmingly won by Galway for their three-in-a-row, Brosnan points out that the traditional game played by Meath effectively doomed their challenge because they couldn t win primary ball such was the Galway defenders  superiority in the air.
Traditional play
There was no attempt by Meath to vary play and that final featured only 24 hand passes. Last year s championship saw an average of 421 per match.
Having historically mastered traditional play, Kerry for a long time regarded it as a duty to see off attempts to innovate ways around that heritage. In the 1960s, Down broke the ball at centrefield to decommission Kerry s high catching just as Tyrone 40 years later countered it by swarming the catcher on their return to earth.
Uncontested kickouts are equally a modern attempt to play around that middle area.
That was beginning to impact on sensibilities when the late Eugene McGee chaired the 2012 Football Review Committee. FRC member Paul Earley observed that hurling was more exciting than football because it provided more contests for the ball.
The inexorable rise of hand passing exacerbated that contrast. The 2012 FRC decided against intervening on the issue, recommending that the ratio to kick passing be monitored.
That ratio had progressed from 1:1 in the 1970s to 1.8:1 in 2000 to 2.3:1 in 2010 but during the latter stages of the 2012 All-Ireland championship the ratio dipped to 2.1:1.
According to McGee, were the ratio to stretch to 4:1 or 5:1 the GAA would be obliged to act.
In fact, Rob Carroll s Statistical Analysis Report   Football 2023, published last autumn, reveals that the ratio has remained more or less stable since 2016, ranging between 3.1 and 3.5 but over the eight years, averaging 3.25, still within Eugene McGee s red line.
Ball in  play time
At Gavin s launch of the current review, he unveiled the FRC mission statement:  Gaelic games will be the most enjoyable amateur games in the world to play and watch .
That mission or vision of enjoyment has a long history. The 1971 McNamee Commission warned that unless the games were  attractive to players and spectators, improvements in structure or methods of organisation will be of little use .
By 1990, a football work group chaired by Dublin s Tony Hanhoe addressed average ball in play time of 11 minutes per half with a range of proposals to speed it up. The purpose according to Hanahoe was  to develop a more enjoyable game for the players and a more attractive spectacle for spectators .
Eugene McGee launched the 2012 report, declaring the objective of  making Gaelic football a bit more enjoyable for everyone and a bit more attractive .
Primary concerns to arise from that consultation were refereeing standards and cynical fouling. That had also troubled McNamee 40 years previously.
 We were particularly concerned about the high incidence of the deliberate fouls on an attacking player to prevent a score,  read the report but crucially, the commission made no recommendation on a suite of proposals from a coaching workshop that addressed the issue.
This was despite having noted that,  The solution appears to lie therefore in making it  expensive  to foul a player deliberately .
McGee s FRC notably introduced the black card to punish defined acts of cynical fouling.
Aesthetic satisfaction
In introducing The Madness of Football last December, Paul Rouse pointed out that the game has always been in crisis going back 100 years, to the question posed by the Irish Independent:  Is it true, after all, that Gaelic football is dying?
The context is modern but Jim Gavin and his impressive committee will be grappling with an age-old challenge: how football is played to the aesthetic satisfaction of spectators and the enjoyment of its players and how to counter foul play that seeks to disable advantages of skill and imagination.
You wish them well.
  sean.moran@irishtimes.com

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Germany denies complicity in Gaza genocide at ICJ
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 6
Length: 465 words
Byline: PETER CLUSKEY
Body


PETER CLUSKEY
in The Hague
 Germany has rejected claims by Nicaragua that it facilitated genocide by Israel in Gaza. It told the UN s highest court that the bulk of its military exports to Israel since October 7th have been  defensive    while reports that it has  defunded  the Palestinian refugee agency Unwra were incorrect.
On the second day of a two-day hearing at the International Court of Justice (ICJ), Germany s legal team dismissed Nicaragua s case as  one-sided , based on  misrepresentation  and, most notably, failing to explicitly acknowledge Israel s right to exist.
 Germany has learned from its past, a past that includes responsibility for one of the most horrific crimes in human history, the Shoah [Holocaust],  said Tania von Uslar-Gleichen, lead legal adviser to the German foreign ministry, opening its case before the court s 15 judges in The Hague.
 That history is why Israel s security is at the core of Germany s foreign policy. It is raison d etat. That is why Germany s actions have been firmly rooted in international law. And it is also why Germany firmly rejects Nicaragua s case as having no merit in fact or in law. The record must be set straight.
On Monday lawyers for Nicaragua asked the ICJ to order emergency measures obliging Germany to halt its military aid to Israel on the grounds that there were legitimate concerns that it might be  facilitating genocide  in Gaza.
Nicaragua also wants the court to order Berlin to reverse its decision to stop funding Unrwa, a decision it alleged was taken on foot of Israeli claims that 12 Unrwa employees had been involved in the October 7th attacks by Hamas which, according to Israeli tallies, left 1,200 dead.
Bombardment
More than 30,000 Palestinians have since been killed in Israel s ground and aerial bombardment, according to the Hamas-run health authority. Israel, however, denies that its military campaign is genocidal in intent, saying its aim is to prevent a recurrence of the Hamas attack.
Another member of Germany s legal team, Prof Christian Tams, told the court that since October 7th, 98 per cent of arms exports to Israel were not  war weapons  but general equipment such as helmets, vests and binoculars.
 There has been talk of military shells and munitions, but this is deliberate misrepresentation , he said.
 There are no military shells. There are no munitions.
Prof Tams also said that even immediately after allegations that 12 Unrwa employees had been involved in the October 7th attacks there had not been any blanket  defunding  of the agency, as Nicaragua had alleged.  Germany took a temporary decision but, contrary to what Nicaragua has alleged, has since resumed funding Unrwa on the West Bank, in Jordan and elsewhere.
The court is expected to rule on emergency measures in weeks.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Government to formally recognise Palestine as a state; Tánaiste in talks with other EU and Arab foreign ministers on move
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FRONT PAGE; Pg. 1
Length: 523 words
Byline: PAT LEAHY, CORMAC McQUINN , MARIE O'HALLORAN
Body


PAT LEAHY, CORMAC McQUINN and MARIE O HALLORAN
 The Government will formally recognise the state of Palestine in a long-awaited move expected to take place in the coming weeks.
Hours after Simon Harris was elected Taoiseach, Tánaiste and Minister for Foreign Affairs Micheál Martin told the Dáil the approach of delaying recognition  is not credible or tenable any longer .
He said he had been in discussions about recognition with other countries involved in peace initiatives in Gaza, adding:  It is my intention to bring to Government a formal proposal on recognition when these wider international discussions are complete.  But be in no doubt, recognition of a Palestinian state will happen,  Mr Martin said.
It is understood that Ireland and some other EU states will announce formal recognition of Palestine once a peace initiative   expected in the coming weeks   is under way. Sources were reluctant to put a date on this but said it would be  sooner rather than later , and was a matter of weeks rather than months.
Mr Martin said he had been in discussions with other EU and Arab foreign ministers about how  a joint formal recognition of Palestinian statehood could be a catalyst to help the people of Gaza and the West Bank and in furthering an Arab-led peace initiative .
It is understood Mr Martin has recently been in discussions with the foreign ministers of Jordan, Egypt and Saudi Arabia, and well as  like-minded EU countries  including Spain, Slovenia, Malta and Belgium, on the initiative.
Mr Harris is to travel to Brussels tomorrow for discussions with European Commission president Ursula von der Leyen and European Parliament president Roberta Metsola, and later to Warsaw, where he will meet with European Council head Charles Michel and several EU prime ministers, including Polish leader Donald Tusk. They are expected to discuss the situation in Gaza and the proposed recognition of Palestine.
On Friday, Spanish prime minister Pedro Sánchez will visit Mr Harris in Dublin, where the two men will also discuss plans for the joint recognition.
As expected, Mr Harris was comfortably elected Taoiseach by the Dáil yesterday afternoon with a majority of 19 votes, having secured the support of several Independent TDs to bolster the Fianna Fáil-Fine Gael-Green numbers.
Shake-up of MInisters of State
Later, having been formally appointed to the role by President Michael D Higgins, Mr Harris named his new Cabinet, promoting Longford-Westmeath deputy Peter Burke as Minister for Enterprise and Limerick TD Patrick O Donovan as Minister for Higher Education. Hildegarde Naughton remains as chief whip, but with an expanded role as Minister of State for Special Education and Inclusion, while, as expected, Paschal Donohoe, Heather Humphreys and Helen McEntee   along with all the Green and Fianna Fáil Ministers   remain in their previous roles.
There will be a significant shake-up of Ministers of State today. Sources expect Dublin Rathdown TD Neale Richmond to be appointed as Minister of State for Finance.
He is set to replace Jennifer Carroll McNeill, who was named as the new Minister of State for European Affairs.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Harris must show he has substance; Election of new Taoiseach
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 460 words
Body


After the back-slapping and bonhomie of last weekend s Fine Gael ardfheis, it was down to serious constitutional business for Simon Harris yesterday. His election as Taoiseach and the Cabinet reshuffle that followed mark the arrival of a new and untested figure into the country s highest political office.
The comfortable majority of 19 with which Harris was elected sends a strong signal that this Government, despite its slim majority, remains in control of its own destiny, including over the question of when to call a general election. So the new Taoiseach is faced with a two-fold task: to steer the three-party Coalition safely down its final straight and to lift his own party s standing among undecided or persuadable voters.
A striking feature of Harris s rapid ascent is how few substantive achievements he has had to show along the way. His eight years in Cabinet have not included significant economic or financial portfolios. An impressive performance during the early months of the pandemic do not fully obscure an otherwise underwhelming tenure in the Department of Health. Nor has he had the opportunity to articulate a full vision of Ireland s place on the international stage, in particular its relationship with the EU and the post-Brexit UK. It remains to be seen how well-developed are his positions on the delicate state of political affairs in Northern Ireland.
What does Simon Harris stand for? His performance since he became leader has done little to answer the question. The callow banalities in which he indulged in his ardfheis speech may have elicited whoops from the party faithful, but did little to suggest that here was a politician of substance. A vow to increase the number of homes built  in the State to 250,000   over five years, contradicting everything this Government had previously said,  smacked of unseriousness.
His maiden speech as Taoiseach, while also short on detail, was more sober and reflective of the gravity of the occasion and the challenges which lie ahead.
His promotion of Peter Burke and Patrick O Donovan to Cabinet brings some measure of refreshment and renewal to the Fine Gael team. But the party s heavy emphasis on the energy of its new leader only amplifies its core problem, the fatigue which inevitably accompanies 13 consecutive years in power.
Prior to the announcement of his elevation, Burke had told the Dáil that he and his Fine Gael colleagues knew what Simon Harris was capable of. The country as a whole cannot say the same. The new Taoiseach now has an opportunity to change that. He will be constrained by a tight timeframe and the requirements of coalition government, but he must still swiftly find a way to move beyond the purely performative if he is to have any chance of success.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Harris not some fresh-faced ingenue who got the top job by accident; Cabinet choices indicate a concern for geography and the next election
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 805 words
Body


Outgoing taoiseach Leo Varadkar probably summed it up best. He always knew Simon Harris would be taoiseach, he told the Dáil in his valedictory speech yesterday. He just didn t think it would be so soon.
Harris is not just the youngest taoiseach ever; he faces, probably, the greatest step-up of anyone who has assumed the highest political office in the land. He has not held any of the finance or economic portfolios, or foreign affairs, nor has he led the Opposition. By the standards of those who normally come to the office, or its foreign equivalents, he is undoubtedly inexperienced.
That is not a barrier to success. The great generation that founded the independent Irish State was pretty wet behind the ears. Michael Collins was 31 when he died; Éamon de Valera was president of the First Dáil at the age of 36, a year younger than Harris is now. More than half of the first cabinet of the Free State was under the age of 35.
But just as experience is no guarantee of wisdom, so youth is not, in itself, a virtue. The qualities that Harris will need to be a successful taoiseach and a successful leader of his party are the same at 37 as they would be at 47 or any other age: an even temperament, self-belief, strength of character, the courage to take on problems and not seek to avoid them; stamina, both mental and physical; judgment; and, maybe, a fair dollop of luck.
Even Harris s opponents concede his political skills and his communications abilities. The ability to manoeuvre himself into the position where he was unopposed for the job which is, after all, the most sought-after in the political world   a jungle stalked by wily and ruthless beasts   speaks of an ability to plan carefully and move fast. He is not some fresh-faced ingenue who has arrived here by accident. He is good at politics.
What did yesterday  tell us about how the new taoiseach will run the remainder of the Coalition s term of office?
His Cabinet choices indicate a concern for geography that reflects the proximity of the next election. Fine Gael under Leo Varadkar was sometimes accused of being too Dublin-centric and at times too posh-boy. That did not help the causes of Neale Richmond or Jennifer Carroll-MacNeill, both among the ablest of the junior ministers and who could reasonably have expected to be considered, at least, for elevation.
The promotions are all for TDs from outside Dublin   Peter Burke of Longford-Westmeath to the Department of Enterprise and Limerick s Patrick O Donovan to Higher Education. Galway West s Hildegarde Naughton remains in the chief whip s office and is also to be Minister for the West.
The idea behind this seems to be that, all of a sudden, Fine Gael sounds more like a party of rural Ireland. Though the idea that potential FG voters in Cork or Kerry or Tipperary will be delighted with a Munster minister from Limerick seems like a far-fetched notion. Cork FG voters weren t even that impressed with a Cork minister the last time.
Harris has said that he wants FG Ministers to concentrate on a small number of priorities. How he wants his Government to give expression to these is something he will have to figure out and then discuss with his Government partners, who are   it is fair to say   on a state of high alert about the new Fine Gael leader s political ambitions.
This is underscored by an important truth about this Coalition   that its constituent parts will be, as we approach the next election, simultaneously electoral rivals and Government allies. That is going to be tricky to navigate. It is one of the chief conundrums facing the new taoiseach.
There are essentially two competing narratives about Irish politics right now. They were apparent in the Dáil debate yesterday morning  before the vote on Harris s appointment, and again  in the evening when Harris named his new Cabinet for Dáil approval. One, led by Sinn Féin and propounded by most of the Opposition, is that Ireland has been appallingly governed for decades and is in need of radical change. The other   the Government s central case   is that while the country has problems, they are being addressed, and that it is on balance a good place to live.
Of course, your perception of each of these narratives might depend on your own circumstances. But their enduring strength means that, in many respects, the most acute political competition is not between these two schools of thought   but rather within them.
In other words, Sinn Féin s main competitors are other parties and candidates on the left who share their analysis; and Fine Gael s rivals for those centrist votes will be Fianna Fáil, as well as those Independents who voted for him yesterday.
Managing that inevitable competition in such a way that it does not derail the Government s coherence will be one of the new Taoiseach s most challenging tasks.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Hearts may rule heads when it comes to Irish unity; Eight key points to bear in mind when weighing up the estimated EUR 20.5 billion a year price of a united Ireland
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 950 words
Body


The recent report by the Institute of International and European Affairs (IIEA) on the estimated costs of Irish unity, prepared by John FitzGerald and Edgar Morgenroth, is timely and valuable.
Matthew O Toole of the SDLP put it well when he said that, while he didn t necessarily agree with the conclusions of the report, it asks serious questions that need to be answered.
It would be foolish to repudiate the report rather than offering, over time, the measured responses that it deserves.
Well-researched, clearly presented reports by distinguished academics like this one will enable Ireland, when the time eventually comes, to avoid the folly of the UK s Brexit referendum in which experts were dismissed out of hand and the practical consequences of which were contemptuously brushed aside.
The IIEA report could be seen as one inoculation, in a long-term vaccination programme, against the Brexit malady.
The core conclusion of the report is that funding Irish unity would put huge financial pressure on Ireland, as much as EUR 20.5 billion a year, resulting in an immediate major reduction in our living standards.
However, far from closing off the debate about Irish unity, those somewhat dramatic headline figures should help to stimulate the necessary discussion. That is what seems to be happening.
The following eight points could usefully be borne in mind in contextualising the report s findings.
First, a number of other studies have reached different conclusions about the costs of Irish unity. It is not, of course, sufficient to brandish one report with a view to dismissing another.
Various academics However, further engagement, over time, between the various academics involved will be important.
Second, every study must make certain assumptions. The authors of the IIEA report sensibly mitigate against some of their assumptions by setting out alternative calculations in relation, for example, to who would pay for existing Northern Ireland pensions and for Northern Ireland s share of existing UK debt.
Third, the report acknowledges that a significant rise in productivity in Northern Ireland could substantially reduce the costs of unification. It is not possible to quantify that effect.
Fourth, FitzGerald and Morgenroth acknowledge that no account is taken of the wider economic effects of Irish unification, which could be both positive and negative.
While one should be wary of an optimism bias, it is not impossible that a new, agreed and united Ireland, with a fully integrated economy, would benefit from exceptional economic dynamism and growth.
Fifth, if there is one thing that everyone should be able to conclude from the report, even if they don t fully agree with certain aspects, it is that Irish unity should not be rushed.
Taking time is not only politically wise; it makes economic sense. The report notes that it is likely to be at least two decades before the productivity gap between North and South could be substantially narrowed.
In practice, we may well have something not far short of those two decades during which the necessary substantive progress can be made on that productivity gap. Substantial time will be required before any referendum can be held on Irish unity.  Moreover, in the event of a positive vote, there would then have to be a further lengthy period of transition before unity would actually take effect.
Sixth, half of the overall additional costs set out in the report relate to increasing Northern Ireland welfare payments and public sector pay rates to bring them into line with those in the South.
If the prospect of those additional costs might indeed impact negatively on opinion among southern voters, it is intriguing to reflect on the dramatically positive effect they would have on a unity referendum in Northern Ireland itself.
Seventh, I would not dismiss the idea of significant, if not necessarily game-changing, financial and other support from the European Union.
Our EU partners have always generously supported the Northern Ireland peace process. I remember being told at the first small meeting in the European Commission in 1992 to explore possible peace funding, which I attended as a member of commissioner Ray MacSharry s cabinet, that the absolute maximum EU funding would amount to EUR 10 million, a figure which later grew to billions.
I believe the UK would also be relatively generous in its support for Northern Ireland at least for a long transitional period. US investment could flow like never before.
Cost factors Finally, most importantly, the decisions that will eventually be taken about Irish unity, both North and South, will be at least as much about politics as economics. Cost factors will understandably play an important role.
But historical and international comparisons suggest that profound decisions of this nature can involve heart more than head.
It s useful to recall for example, the permanent refrain of the apartheid regime in South Africa that the non-white population there was better off, economically per capita, than the population of other African countries. That argument counted for nothing.
The people of Northern Ireland will in due course take their own decision about their preferred future. When that happens, issues of identity and allegiance will probably have at least as much influence as economic considerations.
If and when the public in the South has to make its decision, I find it hard to imagine that any factor would weigh more heavily than the weight of history.
However, FitzGerald and Morgenroth have helpfully reminded us of some immensely significant economic factors that must be addressed. Bobby McDonagh is a former ambassador to London, Rome and Brussels

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Heat records alarm climate scientists
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 7
Length: 307 words
Body


The world has experienced its warmest March on record, capping a 10-month streak in which every month set a new temperature record, the European Union s climate change monitoring service said yesterday.
Each of the last 10 months ranked as the world s hottest on record, compared with the corresponding month in previous years, the EU s Copernicus Climate Change Service said in a monthly bulletin.
The 12 months ending with March also ranked as the planet s hottest ever recorded 12-month period, Copernicus said. From April 2023 to March 2024, the global average temperature was 1.58 degrees above the average in the 1850-1900 pre-industrial period.
 It s the long-term trend with exceptional records that has us very concerned,  Copernicus deputy director Samantha Burgess told Reuters.
 Seeing records like this   month in, month out   really shows us that our climate is changing, is changing rapidly.
Copernicus s data set goes back to 1940, which the scientists cross-checked with other data to confirm that last month was the hottest March since the pre-industrial period.
Already, 2023 was the planet s hottest year in global records going back to 1850.
Extreme weather and exceptional temperatures have wreaked havoc this year.
Climate change-driven drought in the Amazon rainforest region caused a record number of wildfires in Venezuela from January-March, while drought in southern Africa has wiped out crops and left millions of people facing hunger.
The primary cause of the exceptional heat was human-caused greenhouse gas emissions, Copernicus said. Other factors pushing up temperatures include El Nino, the weather pattern that warms the surface waters in the eastern Pacific Ocean. But despite El Nino easing in March, the world s average sea surface temperature hit a record high, for any month on record, Copernicus said.    Reuters

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



How are car manufacturers responding to the slowdown in EV sales?; China's electric-car makers stay confident but many EV brands elsewhere are hedging their bets
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: MOTORS; Pg. 23
Length: 1310 words
Body


The slowdown in sales of electric cars has moved beyond a mere concern, through a possibility and into accepted (and, indeed, locally observed) fact.
Figures from the Society of the Irish Motor Industry for March showed that registrations of new electric cars (not technically the same thing as sales, but a close corollary thereof) had fallen a shocking 41.1 per cent compared with March 2023. In an overall car market that rose 8 per cent so far in 2024, new electric car registrations fell 14.3 per cent in the first quarter of this year.
This is not a local phenomenon. In the UK in December, the Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders reported a huge 34 per cent drop in EV sales, and while there were some mitigating circumstances   December 2022 had seen a glut of EV deliveries as car dealers tried to clear a backlog of orders   nonetheless the figure raised eyebrows, not least because there was a commensurate rise in sales of diesel-engined cars at the same time. There was an increase in diesel sales in Ireland in the early months of this year, albeit with smaller numbers.
So, is the electric car sky falling? No. Should we be worried? A little, yes.
What s happening now is that we ve reached a point on the bell curve of new technology adoption where everything slows down, or comes to a temporary halt. Electric car technology is the future   governments across Europe and the world have decided that it should be, after all   but even so, as described by Dell Technologies, we ve now reached a point in sales where the early growth   driven by tech- and novelty-hungry early adopters   has come to an end, and now we have to wait for the  early majority  and  late majority  customers to come around to the idea.
This may take longer than anticipated, and these are substantial cohorts of buyers. Early and late majority buyers, combined, make up 68 per cent of the total market, according to Dell s research. Dell s description says early majority customers have  even higher expectations for ease of use than innovators and early adopters  and  consciously adopt an innovation and are not the early arrivals or the latecomers. Therefore, innovation takes longer to get to the target, ie taking longer to welcome new stuff into their day-to-day use.
Battery technology
Those customers are going to be hard to convince, and while both battery technology and the public charging network have improved out of all recognition from their 2012 starting points, the fact is that for many people pure electric power still seems like something that won t work for them.
It doesn t matter if they re   technically   wrong in that respect, and shouting at such people on social media, or smugly pointing out that you drove to North Africa and back in your EV won t change their minds. They want to see conclusive proof that EVs are the right solution for their transport needs. Governments constantly tinkering with the taxpayer-backed incentives that encourage people into EVs doesn t help.
Until then, electric sales may well flag, and we have no idea how long that might take. Indeed, it might well take until the 2035 cut-off date for the sale of cars with combustion engines, at which point whether you re an early or late majority person, or a  laggard  (the last of the holdouts) you ll simply have no choice.
Between now and then, car companies wishing to stay in business are rapidly pivoting to try to keep these doubting buyers happy. Renault, for one, performed a dramatic volte-face when it announced this week that it will continue to offer both a fully-electric model and an equivalent with hybrid internal combustion power in every segment for the foreseeable future. That means that the much-hyped all-electric Renault 5 will be sold alongside a hybrid-engined Clio for some time yet. This comes hot on the heels of Renault s abandoning of a stock-market float for its Ampere electric car specialist division, citing unfavourable market conditions.
Nissan has responded to the crisis in EV sales by slashing the price of its sharp-looking Ariya electric crossover in some markets. In the United States the Ariya has seen a price cut of $6,000 while in Ireland Nissan has introduced a base model of the Ariya, called the Engage, which offers a 404km range for EUR 43,500. Tesla has   once again   chopped its prices, reducing the cost of a Model 3 and Model Y in the critical Chinese market, but oddly has chosen to increase the prices of the same models in the US. Ford, meanwhile, is offering as much as EUR 18,500 off the price of a new Mustang Mach-E to American buyers, but that is an offer that applies only to cars preregistered as dealer demos.
Possibly the most dramatic response to the dip in electric car sales has been from Fiat, which has, according to the Italian newspaper Corriere Della Sera, been sounding out its suppliers about the possibility of retrofitting the current electric-only Fiat 500e with a petrol or compact hybrid engine, as a way of replacing the current, aged, 500 hatchback. This follows on from Fiat s sister brand Jeep, which originally conceived the compact Avenger model as an electric- only offer, but which already has a petrol- powered version on sale, and more hybrid variations to come.
Even mighty Tesla is not immune. In the first quarter of this year Tesla delivered 386,810 new cars globally, a fall of 8.5 per cent compared with the same period last year, and well below Wall Street s expectation of more than 450,000 deliveries. The low 2024 figure has been exacerbated by shipping problems caused by the conflict in the Middle East, as well as problems with its factory near Berlin, where a fire set by environmental activists interrupted the factory s supply of electricity. Tesla s share price took something of a tumble in the wake of those figures.
In the face of such electric challenges, some are standing firm. Jaguar has confirmed that it will effectively cease the production of internal-combustion engined models in June, when it phases out the XE, XF, E-Pace, and F-Type, leaving only the F-Pace SUV still on sale alongside the all-electric I-Pace as we await the arrival of the first new-generation all-electric (and significantly more expensive) Jaguar models.
At Polestar, chief executive Thomas Ingenlath reckons all the EV doubters are just digging a hole for themselves. Despite recent financial travails for Polestar, which has consistently missed sales and delivery targets, Ingenlath told the Daily Telegraph recently:  There s an incredible threat and danger if you don t embrace future innovation and believe in that technology   the electric drivetrains, the innovation in battery, the innovation in modern electronics and software. If you don t participate in that and think you can wait, and customers are ready for it, it s an incredible trap.
Increased tariffs
So, who s right? The Renaults and the Fiats, who are starting to cool on their electric ardour, and prepping to keep combustion engines around a while longer? Or the Polestars and the Jaguars betting the farm on batteries?
Well, perhaps there s a simple answer to this. Even as it looks more and more likely that the EU will hit Chinese carmakers with increased tariffs in November, in an effort to protect the European car industry from what are seen by some as unfair competitive practices, China s BYD is investing in another seven huge cargo-carrying ships to help its massive electric car export drive, while rival SAIC (which owns the MG brand, among others) says it s looking to buy or build 14 such vessels in the next three years.
Whether you re an early electric car adopter or a laggard, China s EV carmakers are still betting big. Even though both companies   BYD and MG   will launch new hybrid and plug-in hybrid models in the coming months, there s no slowdown in EVs where China is concerned.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



How would a right-wing party distinguish itself these days?
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 10
Length: 838 words
Body


The growing demand for a proper right-wing party or  return to traditional values , like whiplash, is hard to pin down.  Enough is enough  won t crack it. Some things we know: some proponents have a need to assert their righteously fair and balanced credentials and show how thoroughly they ve ingested the messages of the referendums. In short, they need to demonstrate unflinchingly how unwoke they are. Others, like de Valera, whose 1937-era words are bafflingly deemed precisely on point for 2024, only have to examine their own hearts to know what the people need and listen, someone has to put a stop to the gallop of the woke mob. Twelve years of it   if you date it roughly from the death of Savita Halappanavar   is plenty. Yet to many of us, 12 years is a blink compared to the aeons it took to get abortion rights and same-sex marriage to the polling booths. Think of all the preceding decades dominated by depressing battles for the right to basic contraception, the failed 1986 divorce referendum riddled with the right s crude distortions, the infamous Eighth Amendment and the 1992 X case when a 14-year-old rape victim was refused the right to  travel . In fact, Emily O Reilly s 1992 book, Masterminds of the Right, would be a useful memory aid right now.
Terrified couples Only 12 years ago, I interviewed tense and terrified couples in secret places about their heartbreaking journeys to Liverpool to terminate longed-for but unviable pregnancies diagnosed in Ireland. The silence and stigma surrounding them in their world of grief should haunt us all.
In much of the spiky, ad hominem commentary following the recent referendums, the phrase  enough is enough  often quivers on the margins with its implication that great numbers of people have made enough huge sacrifices by voting for compassion and understanding, but that s all over now. Can that be true?
Is it possible that those pivotal votes are being conflated with the so-called  culture wars    race, gender, language   that have ripped through other countries, but left Ireland relatively unscathed?
One suggestion (offered here in good faith, note) is that  enough is enough  reflects the inevitable, occasionally stupid, temporary imbalances that mark the transition from an oppressive theocracy to a secular, more compassionate and equal society.
The #MeToo movement which convulsed much of the world in the wake of Harvey Weinstein s criminal exposure is a case in point. It was a dam burst with just cause, but it levelled all before it, eventually hitting a point where even renowned feminist Margaret Atwood was deemed a  bad feminist  for supporting a Canadian academic whose university had gone public with vile rape accusations before any formal inquiry.
The fact that the vast majority of women still do not or cannot pursue their assailants tells its own story, but the broader effect of #MeToo was to propel employers into action, put serial offenders on notice and make more women aware of their rights.
Where inequality, oppression or injustice exist, eruptions are inevitable and overbalancing will occur. If the right-wing party of some people s dreams had existed then what would it have done? Would it have reassured women? What would it want to dilute, reverse, create or promote now?
The right-wing party often mentioned in this context, the Progressive Democrats, was born in a decade when the country was  banjaxed  as Gay Byrne put it succinctly, unemployment was over 17 per cent, interest rates glanced off 20 per cent; hundreds of thousands were emigrating, the IRA was rampant and Desmond O Malley had lost the Fianna Fáil whip for supporting the New Ireland Forum report. His expulsion in 1985   for  conduct unbecoming , incredibly   was triggered by his refusal to join Fianna Fáil s opposition to the introduction of contraception, which tells us much about that era and the eruptions since. The PDs were socially liberal (mostly), favoured privatisation and low taxes and the Boston economic model over Berlin, and offered a newish model to a despairing young urban business class. Yet, from 1985, the party dwindled from a high of 14 seats on its first outing to a disastrous two in 2007.
Seventeen years later, the economy is booming with near full employment. So how would a right-wing party distinguish itself now? Indications are they would begin by eviscerating all the damn lefties in thrall to the NGOs, the Hate Speech Bill, the Green Party in particular, plus big swathes of all the others   the so-called  woke gallery , in short.
Early signs of success are already in evidence, as demonstrated by the spectre of the  single, unvetted, military-age male  bouncing from far-right trope to the heart of parliament just before Christmas, when the six-strong Rural Independent Group piled on with a Dáil motion about  unvetted single males .
The barely existent  culture wars  fade away like the barely imaginable battles over working women or contraception. Immigration becomes the new front. And the world burns.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Hvivo on track to hit future growth targets
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 423 words
Byline: CIARA O'BRIEN
Body


CIARA O BRIEN
 Hvivo, a pharmaceutical services company formerly known as Open Orphan, said it remained on track to hit its future growth targets after another record year in 2023.
The company is set to begin paying annual dividends, subject to approval at the upcoming annual general meeting, with around £1.4 million (EUR 1.63m) shared out among shareholders at 0.20p per ordinary share. The company paid a one-off special dividend of £3.1 million in 2023.
Revenue at the company, which specialises in testing infectious and respiratory disease products, rose 16 per cent to £56 million, and expects to hit £64 million this year, it said, as its human challenge trials business showed organic growth. Human challenge trials are a type of clinical trial for a vaccine or other pharmaceutical involving the intentional exposure of the test subject to the condition tested.
Earnings before interest, tax, depreciation and amortisation rose 44 per cent to £13 million.
Hvivo said it ended the year with a weighted order book of £80 million, with 90 per cent of 2024 revenue already contracted. It expects to reach £62 million in revenue for 2024, with the company targeting £100 million in revenue for 2028, with the majority achieved through sustained organic growth of the human challenge business, expansion of services, and strategic bolt-on acquisitions.
 In 2023 we experienced yet another year of growth in the human challenge trial sector, driven by increased recognition among Big Pharma and biotech firms of the compelling evidence supporting the efficacy of Hvivo s human challenge trials in expediting the development of novel vaccines and antivirals,  said Dr Yamin  Mo  Khan, chief executive of Hvivo.
 Our exceptional financial performance, marked by record revenues, margins and profitability, coupled with the significant number of volunteers inoculated, underscores not only the expansion of the market but also our ability and capacity to meet the increasing demand.
London
Hvivo is set to open a new expanded facility in London s Canary Wharf in the first half of this year. The new facility will house quarantine bedrooms, advanced laboratories, an outpatient unit and corporate offices, and will facilitate further growth in revenue.
The company said it intends to commence its first challenge trial in the unit this month.
Hvivo was formed when chairman Cathal Friel reversed his pharma services business, then known as Open Orphan, into Dublin-listed drug clinical trials manager Venn Life Sciences. It rebranded as Hvivo in 2022.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



John Laing eyes investment in Dublin Metro
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 13
Length: 416 words
Byline: BARRY O'HALLORAN
Body


BARRY O HALLORAN  Convention Centre Dublin operator John Laing Group is interested in backing the proposed metro rail line connecting the city with the airport, according to its chief executive, Andrew Truscott.
John Laing, which took over the convention centre contract last year in a deal with the State, is opening an office in Dublin as it eyes further opportunities in the Republic.
Speaking ahead of the announcement today, Mr Truscott said the group, which focuses on investing in infrastructure, was interested in backing the planned rail line from central Dublin to the airport and Malahide in the north of the county.
He agreed that frequent postponements had left many sceptical about the State ever building the Dublin Metro, but pointed out that businesses such as John Laing frequently encountered this.
 I acknowledge that there s always a risk that projects just don t happen,  he said.  But if I did not commit time to something because I thought  it s not happening , then I would not get a lot done.
Mr Truscott noted that John Laing invested in the Sydney Light Rail system in Australia, which was subject to similar doubts when it was planned.
 If you talk to anyone in Sydney now, they are absolutely delighted with that system,  he added.
John Laing provides capital for new infrastructure development, so would invest in the line, enabling other organisations to design and build it.
The group has businesses in the UK, Europe, US, Colombia, Australia and New Zealand. It has backed road and rail developments, hospitals and schools, power lines and other big engineering projects.
John Laing says that it has supported more than 150 infrastructure developments across these territories.
Lured
The Republic s established public-private partnership system   where private organisations collaborate with the State to build infrastructure   lured the group here, according to Mr Truscott, who said it was  comfortable working in Ireland and with Irish stakeholders .
Along with the convention centre contract, the group also acquired primary care centre operator Valley Healthcare and telecommunications mast company Towercom in a single deal last year.
Mr Truscott says John Laing is keen to grow these businesses. It has expanded Valley Healthcare from 18 or 19 centres to around 30 while it is looking for new sites for Towercom.
The company is exploring other avenues here including social housing, an area where it has yet to invest in any of its markets, and university accommodation.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Keaveney drug driving case adjourned until June
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 218 words
Body


A former TD accused of driving under the influence of cocaine has had his court case adjourned until June.
Cllr Colm Keaveney, with an address at Kilcrevanty, Tuam, Co Galway, faces one count of driving with cocaine in his system. The offence is alleged to have happened on  June 12th last year at  Cummer in Tuam, Co Galway.
The case against the 53-year old, a former Labour and Fianna Fáil TD who is a sitting councillor on Galway County Council, came briefly before Tuam District Court yesterday.
Cllr Keaveney was not in court for the short hearing.
It is alleged he drove a vehicle with cocaine in his system and that the concentration of the drug   known as benzoylecgonine   in his blood was greater than the legal threshold, contrary to the Road Traffic Act of 2010.
Cllr Keaveney was first elected to the Dáil as a Labour candidate in 2011. He then became an Independent before joining Fianna Fáil in 2013.
He lost his Dáil seat in 2016 but was elected to Galway County Council as a Fianna Fáil candidate in 2019.
Defence solicitor Gearoid Geraghty said he had got disclosure and he needed to speak with his client. He applied for an adjournment.
Judge James Faughnan granted the request. The case has been put back to a sitting of Tuam District Court on June 11th for a plea or a date for hearing. JOHN FALLON

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Kildare footballers face season-defining weekend
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 20
Length: 507 words
Byline: GORDON MANNING Kildare'
Body


GORDON MANNING  Kildare s unravelling during the league was swift and brutal but there remains a sliver of thread on the spool   and so there remains a chance to salvage something from their season.
Kildare were not only relegated from Division Two but they finished the competition as one of only two sides throughout all four divisions not to pick up even a single point   Limerick joining them on that ignominious list.
It was a league campaign blighted by defeats, questions over Glenn Ryan s future and even a post-match verbal exchange between the Kildare manager and a local reporter.
So, after seven consecutive league losses, they are probably one of the few teams delighted to see the provincial championships starting in April, for it provides them with a chance to reset and start afresh.
For Kildare, the pathway ahead is clear   they have two knockout championship matches to save their year. The first of those is against Wicklow in Portlaoise on Sunday, with the winner of that then meeting either Wexford or Louth in a Leinster semi-final.
Should Kildare get to the provincial decider they will snatch a place in the All-Ireland SFC and consign Westmeath to the Tailteann Cup. Should the Lilywhites fail to beat Wicklow or win any possible subsequent Leinster semi-final, then the Tailteann Cup is their lot for the summer.  For Kildare it feels the stakes could not be much higher.
Scoring return
 You just draw a line in the sand and essentially the championship is a different competition, there s no point dwelling on what happened in the league, that s over and done with now,  says Kildare midfielder Kevin O Callaghan.
 The consequences from that we ll face next season, not this season. Now we just have to build on the performances that we put in towards the end which did progressively get better as the league went on. I know the results didn t but our performances did. If we just draw one small thing from each match and put that towards the championship preparations, that s all we can do.
One area Kildare clearly need to see an improvement in is their scoring return, the Lilywhites posted the lowest tally of the 16 teams in the top two divisions. They finished with a total of 82 points   an average of 11.7 points per game.
 Our defensive structure was very good in the last few games,  adds O Callaghan.  We probably let ourselves down in terms of our shooting efficiency or maybe the taking of our chances but we were creating as many chances as the teams we were playing.
 What we let ourselves down on during the league was the taking of those chances. If we start taking those chances, we won t be far off it.
The poor league campaign led to Kildare players receiving some criticism online and O Callaghan admits he didn t escape the trolls.
 Obviously it s never nice seeing bad things said about you online,  he says.  Some players might obviously struggle, and if they do hopefully they talk to somebody about it. It s water off a duck s back for me, I ve heard it all before and I ll hear it again, I m sure.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Kildare town land with full planning for 168 new homes seeks EUR 7m
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 17
Length: 283 words
Byline: RONALD QUINLAN
Body


RONALD QUINLAN  Agent Coonan Property is guiding a price of EUR 7 million for 12.35-acre (4.9-hectare) site with full planning permission for the development of 168 homes on the outskirts of Kildare town. The
lands at Southgreen are being offered by sale by way of tender on Wednesday, May 15th.
Kildare town is an area of proven residential demand and has seen the development of a number of new housing schemes over recent years.
The site secured planning permission from An Bord Pleanála (Ref: ABP-318401-23) in February for 168 new homes comprising a mix of houses, duplex units and apartments. The site has the benefit of access to all services and is located in an area zoned Objective  C1  New Residential under the Kildare Town Local Area Plan 2023-2029.
The lands are situated within a short distance of Kildare town, Tesco, the hugely popular Kildare Village shopping outlet, and a number of primary and secondary schools. Local amenities include the plains of the Curragh and the Curragh racecourse, and the Irish National Stud & Gardens.
In terms of its accessibility, the site is approximately 600m from the town s train station and within a short drive of the M7, and the wider motorway network. Naas and Dublin city centre are 29km and 61km away respectively.
Will Coonan of Coonan Property said:  We expect to see strong demand for this property as it is exactly what the market is looking for given the current housing demand from commuters within the greater Dublin area.
The solicitor for the sale is Margetson & Greene Solicitors of 35 Lower Baggot Street, Dublin 2. Further information on the site is available from Coonan Property by phoning 01 628 6128 or by emailing info@coonan.com

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Man stuck skulls on neighbour's wall, court hears
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 590 words
Body


BARRY J WHYTE
 A Dublin man involved in a boundary dispute with his neighbours stuck dead animals  skulls on their wall, directed diesel fumes into their garden, shone high voltage lights at their house and made a  malicious  allegation to Tusla, the Court of Appeal has heard.
Paul Tully, of Kimmage Road West, Dublin, is involved in a long-running dispute with Gary Delaney and Denise Doorley over a boundary between their home and a house Mr Tully owns in Crumlin.
Mr Tully is appealing against a Dublin Circuit Court decision from February in which Judge Jennifer O Brien made an order restraining him from  watching and besetting  his neighbours  house and from  harassing, intimidating and abusing the defendants and their two children .
In that ruling, Judge O Brien also ordered Mr Tully to pay EUR 20,000 towards rebuilding a boundary wall between the two properties, and that he should give them an additional EUR 40,000 for  a level of persistence and oppressiveness causing eight years of hardship  to Mr Delaney and Ms Doorley. She also ordered Mr Tully and his wife, Mary Tully, to pay EUR 35,000 each in compensatory damages.
The Tullys had initially taken the case in relation to what they alleged was an encroachment onto their property related to the boundary wall of an extension to the house, a claim that was later ruled out as statute-barred on the grounds of time.
As part of their counterclaim, Mr Delaney and Ms Doorley alleged that Mr Tully had tried to  force them out of their home  with  an onslaught of harassment, intimidation and abuse .
The court heard Mr Tully had damaged a shared boundary hedge between their properties, installed high voltage floodlights which he directed at their kitchen and their son s bedroom, and erected nine CCTV cameras, some of which were pointed into their property.
Mr Delaney and Ms Doorley claimed Mr Tully placed a skull on their boundary to intimidate their children; that he backed a truck onto the boundary and left the engine running; that he threw children s toys and other debris into their garden, and that he placed a  foul-smelling industrial bin directly adjacent to where the defendants  children play .
Their counterclaim also noted that Mary Tully made what they described as  a malicious complaint to Tusla and the gardaí regarding the treatment of the defendants  daughter .
Tusla later stated in correspondence that  no childcare concerns were established  and that the case had been marked closed.
Harassment
In July 2023, Mr Tully received a criminal conviction in relation to the harassment and was given a nine-month prison sentence in relation to the matter. The sentence was suspended for two years. Mr Tully has appealed against the criminal conviction, with his case set to be heard in November.
The Tullys are also appealing against the decision of the Dublin Circuit Court.
Representing the Tullys in court yesterday, Barney Quirke SC argued that Mr Tully had been  railroaded on this case at every turn  and was the victim of  a grave injustice . He argued that  the intimidation and harassment was the other way around  and that the Court of Appeal would  hear the true story of what has happened between these two parties .
Mr Quirke made an application to adjourn the appeal saying that certain expert witnesses were not in the country .
David Dodd BL argued for Mr Delaney and Ms Doorley that the application for an adjournment should be refused, saying his clients have  been through the wringer .
Judge Niamh Hyland granted the adjournment until April 25th.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Man who landed at airport without ID jailed for two months
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 299 words
Body


A man who landed at Dublin Airport without a passport or identity documents has been jailed for two months.
Abrhe Biniyan, who has no fixed address but said he had been living in Eritrea, was arrested and charged with breaching the Immigration Act last week.
Biniyan, who said he is aged 20, was initially remanded in custody but pleaded guilty after spending six days in custody on remand.
The case resumed before Judge Treasa Kelly at Dublin District Court.
In evidence, Garda Aidan Fitzgerald said the accused was stopped at the airport on April 3rd and had  no passport, no ID .
It was unknown where he had flown in from, but it was believed to be another European country.
The court also heard that gardaí  can t be 100 per cent  about his identity.
He has now applied for international protection here, but after his fingerprints were taken, gardaí learned he had also applied for asylum in Finland.
Defence solicitor Eoghan O Sullivan assured the judge that his client had sufficient English to understand and did not need an interpreter.
Biniyan did not address the court but instructed the solicitor that he had to leave Eritrea, in east Africa and  fled the country due to political difficulties there .
Mr O Sullivan asked the judge to note his client came from a country with a horrendous human rights record. His brother was also in Finland, the court heard.
Mr O Sullivan submitted that the accused was entitled to apply for asylum here and implored the judge to consider his lack of prior conviction or income. The offence carries a possible 12-month prison term.
Sentencing, Judge Kelly noted that  he needed to have a passport or ID document to come into this country  and  gardaí do not know exactly who this man is .
She backdated his jail term to the date he went into custody. TOM TUITE

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Masters fare a nirvana of a kind for golfing shopaholics
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 21
Length: 827 words
Body


The giddiness of the eclipse   part of which managed to cast its shadow over Augusta National on Monday, with the floodlights, rather dramatically, turned on so that multimillionaire golfers and a handful of amateurs on the driving range wouldn t be inconvenienced   had been replaced by a different kind of anticipation for those queuing to get into the merchandise shop.
Actually, to call it a shop would be a breach of the trade description act. Here, it is more akin to an upmarket department store.
Those in the line, starting at the top of the hill close by the short game practice area, know it will be a matter of inch-by-inch, foot-by-foot, shuffling towards the entrance door which in reality is only a tease as the orderly queue then snakes its way upwards and backwards along ornate walled corridors through corralled ropes inside the building before the true entry point to the promised land is reached.
The couple in front have been through the ordeal once already today.
 We were here at seven o clock,  says the woman of their first early-morning venture,  got everything shipped . . . now we need to get some more, to take home ourselves.
Home, it happens, is Missouri and, like many others, they re beneficiaries of the public lottery for tickets. (Tip to prospective Irish Masters goers: get your name on the lottery. It s international! And it truly is a lottery).
It s unlikely they re alone in that pursuit of shopping to excess with repeat visits on their one day in Augusta National. This is nirvana of a kind for golfing shopaholics and the 30,000 sq ft facility   twice the size of the old merchandise shop   has a vast array of memorabilia, from headwear (hats are the most popular item, one purchased every second with baseball caps from $32) to Peter Millar shirts ($110) to ball markers ($22) to postcards ($12) to umbrellas ($45), luxury Swiss-made watches and commissioned jewellery and bracelets.
Oh, and garden gnomes; which are daily sell-outs since becoming a surprise hit back in 2016 and offered for resale on sites like eBay for inflated prices. (This year s foot-tall gnome is wearing a Masters bucket hat, blue sweater and plaid trousers, costs $49.95 and there is a limit of one per customer).
On each and every branded piece of merchandise is the tournament s logo, a yellow emblem of the United States with a red flag positioned in the bottom right where you would find Georgia.
The exclusivity of the Masters merchandise, with no official online sales and only in-person purchases, with buyers filling bags not just for themselves but for friends and families, has also made it the biggest income earner of the week.
Manic
 Even greater than ticket sales or concession (food) outlets, and, yet, the operation   once inside   is smooth and seamless with none of the manic fervour of the old-styled New Year s Day sales.
It s cashless, to no surprise, but with 64 points of sales, and those patrons who have heard the traditional greeting of,  Welcome to the Masters  on walking through the entrance gates, have purchasing items at the top of the hit list along with whatever golf they manage to see.
In my own case, the primary acquisition was a Masters branded (everything is branded) Tilley broadbrimmed sun hat (apparently the best you can get, according to my dermatologist) and which were sold out on my visit to the store last year. I didn t leave it so late this time. Success. For $99, only a tad more than you d pay for an unbranded one back home.
Eating and drinking, of course, is a necessity and items to be consumed must be purchased in the concession stands located around the course (a new state-of-the art one has materialised in the year since Jon Rahm won a year ago, close by the 18th tee and second green, with an underground service area with lifts for restocking).
You can t pack your own ham sandwiches and bring your flask of tea here. There is no rip off. The staple diet of food items has changed very little since my first attendance at the Masters back in 1991. Egg salad sandwiches ($1.50, favourite). Pimento Cheese sandwiches ($1.50, not my go-to. Ever!). Pork Bar-B-Que ($3, if needs must). Masters Club ($3, mood dependant). Ham and Cheese on Rye ($3, thumbs up). Classic Chicken ($3, yep!).
Even the price of breakfast items (sold up to 10am) would make a Dublin cafe blush in some shame. Freshly brewed Masters blend coffee retails for $2. A blueberry muffin costs $1.50. A bowl of fresh mixed fruit is $2.
For those who must, the price of a beer   in a plastic container than is itself a keepsake as evidenced by those stacking one into another as the day progresses   is $6 (the unbranded import beer reportedly is Stella, the Crow s Nest IPA is Blue Moon) and a glass of wine is $6, while bottled water and unbranded soft drinks (surely Coca Cola) cost $2.
It might break the bank for many to get to Augusta National, but   once inside   there is no rip-off. Part of the mystique, if you will.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



McIlroy trying to normalise routine in latest bid for green jacket; Curtailed press conference just part of the world number two's ever-changing methodology to finally crack the code at Augusta
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 21
Length: 508 words
Byline: PHILIP REID
Body


PHILIP REID in Augusta   The two Irishmen sat side-by-side. One of them had a green jacket. The other wants one badly. John Carr, the moderator of a press conference, is a long-standing member of Augusta National; and Rory McIlroy s latest attempt to get a matching jacket for his wardrobe depends on whether   at the 16th attempt   he can lay claim to another Major title here, the last piece of that sought-after career Grand Slam.
Not that the quest for the Slam got much airtime. In a pre-tournament press conference confined to 10 minutes at McIlroy s behest and which allowed just eight questions, this perhaps brought a further example of the Northern Irishman s ever-changing methodology to crack the code in seeking to win over hallowed golfing terrain.
McIlroy has played more frequently than ever this spring in the build-up to the Masters and the fact he only drove up Magnolia Lane half an hour before the scheduled meeting with the press also provided an indication that his two-day reconnaissance visit last week in advance of playing in the Valero Texas Open (where he had a PGA Tour season s best third-place finish) had him in a comfort zone that required little intrusion.
For this latest bid for a famed green jacket, McIlroy has sought to normalise his routine. Hence the late arrival. Hence self-determining the length of the press conference.
 This is my 16th start in the Masters, so I feel like I ve done it quite a few different ways, and I guess I m just trying to bring a little bit of normalcy into what I sort of try to do week in, week out. I play 25 weeks a year, and there s no point in doing anything different this week compared to other weeks, I guess.
 I wanted to play quite a bit leading up to this just to feel like my game was sharp or, if it wasn t sharp, to try to get it in the best shape possible. I feel like I made a couple of good strides in that direction last week in Texas.
 Relaxed
 I came up here last week to play two practice rounds at the start of the week. I feel like I ve already got most of my prep work done. So, It s just about going out there and being relaxed and being in the right frame of mind. And the more I can do that, the more I ll be able to execute on the golf course,  said McIlroy.
Except, what McIlroy has done hasn t been entirely normal. He has played more   the Texas Open providing his first top-10 of the PGA Tour, having jumped out of the blocks earlier this year with a runner-up and a winning start in back-to-back weeks in Dubai on the DP world Tour   and, also, paid a visit to Butch Harmon for some extra clarity on his swing.
 He s part sort of psychologist, part swing coach. Like I always joke about, you spend four hours with Butch and you go away with two swing tips and 30 stories. But you always go away hitting the ball better.
 So, yeah, it was a really beneficial trip for the technical side of things, which I think I made progress in that department last week, especially with my strokes gained approach numbers, which is what I really wanted to do,  he added.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



McKillen jnr completes sale of majority stake in Dean Hotel Group
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FINANCE; Pg. 16
Length: 762 words
Byline: RONALD QUINLAN
Body


RONALD QUINLAN Property Editor  Developer Paddy McKillen jnr and his business partner Matt Ryan have completed the sale of the Dean Hotel Group to British property group Lifestyle Hospitality Capital (LHC) and Elliott Investment Management, the New York-headquartered investment giant founded by billionaire Paul Singer.
The deal, which The Irish Times understands was finalised recently, values the hotels at about EUR 355 million and gives LHC and Elliott a stake of more than 70 per cent.
Although the EUR 355 million valuation is substantially more than the EUR 250 million that had been guided for the group when it was first brought to the market by Eastdil Secured in a confidential sale and managed back process in February of last year, the deal with LHC and Elliott comprises eight hotels and the businesses of a further two under development as opposed to the five venues that were included in the initial offering.
At the outset of the sale process, codenamed Project Dagda, Mr McKillen jnr and Mr Ryan s development company Oakmount had been seeking a buyer for a portfolio consisting of the Dean Dublin, the Mayson, the Devlin, the Dean Cork and the Dean Galway.
Although several parties expressed an interest in this original portfolio, it later came to include the Clarence Hotel on Wellington Quay, the Leinster Hotel that recently opened for business on Lower Mount Street, and the Glasson Lakehouse near Athlone in Co Westmeath.
In the case of the Clarence, Mr McKillen jnr and Mr Ryan acquired the landmark property s freehold interest from its longstanding owners, U2 s Bono and The Edge and their business partner Paddy McKillen snr, just weeks before they agreed the sale of the wider Dean Hotel Group. The duo s Press Up Entertainment Hospitality Group had been operating the hotel for several years after securing the property s leasehold interest in 2019.
Brands
Quite apart from securing ownership of the eight hotels already in operation, LHC and Elliott Investment Management have also acquired the businesses of two Dean hotels that are due to be developed in Belfast and Birmingham. Ownership of the properties themselves is set to be retained by Oakmount.
The overall hotel portfolio will continue to be managed and operated by the Dean Hotel Group under its own brands, with Mr McKillen jnr and Mr Ryan working in partnership with LHC and Elliott Investment Management to drive the group s expansion in Europe and the United States.
The ultimate holding company above the Dean Hotel Group and Press Up is Keillan Limited, registered in the Isle of Man. Press Up is behind brands such as Wowburger, Elephant and Castle, the Irish franchise for Wagamama and Stella Cinema in Rathmines. Mr McKillen jnr owns 50 per cent of the parent company, while his father, property developer Mr McKillen snr, owns a further 25 per cent. The remainder of the group is split evenly between Mr Ryan and Liam Cunningham, a long-time associate of Mr McKillen snr.
A majority stake in the Dean Hotel Group has now been sold to an investment vehicle that is managed by Lifestyle Hospitality Capital, which is led by Keith Evans, a hotel deal-making veteran, and backed by funds advised by Elliott Investment Management.
Mr Evans, a former senior executive in Starwood Capital s European hotels business, was chief investment officer at Ennismore, the UK-based boutique hotels operator behind the Hoxton chain, between 2019 and the start of this year. He was heavily involved during this time in Ennismore s setting up of a high-end hotels joint venture with France s Accor.
The Dean Hotel Group is the seed portfolio of the new LHC venture.
Elliott, founded by Mr Singer in 1977, has almost $60 billion (EUR 56.5 billion) of assets under management and is best known as an activist stock market and private-equity investments. Real-estate-related investments account for about $3 billion of its assets.
The sale of the Dean Hotel Group comes  four years after Mr McKillen jnr and Mr Ryan abandoned a plan to raise up to EUR 50 million through the sale of a 45 per cent stake in their Press Up Entertainment Hospitality Group business to investors.
The intended share sale had related to Press Up s  trading operations only and did not involve any of the Oakmount-owned properties in which its bars, restaurants and hotels operate.
Press Up had previously engaged Goodbody in early 2018 to assess its funding options, including an initial public offering (IPO) of shares on the stock market, with a view to raising as much as EUR 60 million.
The proposed IPO did not proceed.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



McManus opts for Townend to ride I Am Maximus in National; Champion jockey aiming to pull off jump racing's unofficial 'Triple Crown' in single season
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 22
Length: 597 words
Body


Paul Townend will be reunited with I Am Maximus in Saturday s Randox Aintree Grand National, as he targets a first win in the world s most famous steeplechase as well as a rare big-race hat-trick.
Ireland s champion jockey landed both the Champion Hurdle and the Gold Cup at last month s Cheltenham Festival, so victory on I Am Maximus would complete the unofficial  Triple Crown  of jump racing s most coveted prizes in a single season.
Trainer Henry De Bromhead pulled off that feat in 2021, but it would be a singular accomplishment for a rider.
Townend landed last year s Irish Grand National on I Am Maximus, but Jody McGarvey has ridden the horse in his four starts since, including winning the Grade One Drinmore Chase back at Fairyhouse in December. McGarvey also did the steering when I Am Maximus scored in February s Bobboyjo Chase.
However, the JP McManus team have opted to side with Townend this weekend, while their number one rider, Mark Walsh, will be on board the Cheltenham Mares  Chase winner, Limerick Lace, in Saturday s highlight in Liverpool.
 Lucky
 Mark has never ridden I Am Maximus and the fact Paul Townend had won the (Irish) National and knows him means he rides,  McManus s racing manager Frank Berry said yesterday.  Jody has been lucky on him too, but he will be on Janidil. Meetingofthewaters will be ridden by Danny Mullins.
Capodanno is also part of a notably strong McManus team in the National as the owner bids to record a third win in the race. The De Bromhead-trained Minella Times pulled off the feat in 2021, while Don t Push It recorded a famous success in 2010 under Tony McCoy.
I Am Maximus was closing in on the favourite Corach Rambler in National betting yesterday. Last year s winner eased slightly to 5-1 with some firms. I Am Maximus is a general 7-1 next best in most lists, while Meetingofthewaters is 9-1 alongside last year s runner up Vanillier.
Opposition
Before that, McManus s principal interest when the Aintree Festival starts tomorrow will be how his hugely promising novice Corbetts Cross fares against senior opposition for the first time in the William Hill Bowl.
Last month s Gold Cup runner Gerri Colombe represents Gordon Elliott against Shishkin who will defend the Bowl title he won a year ago. Shishkin was forced to miss Cheltenham when illness swept through Nicky Henderson s yard.
Corbetts Cross s inclusion in the seven-strong field was a surprise. At seven he will be the youngest in the race and it will be just his sixth start over fences having scored impressively in the National Hunt Chase at Cheltenham last month.
It is the latest  left field  move by trainer Emmet Mullins who will saddle the 2022 winner Noble Yeats in Saturday s National and he could wind up topweight if, as expected, Conflated is switched to Friday s Melling Chase.
 We had the option of the Aintree Bowl and the Grand National, but with the ground going the way it is we are going to run in the Melling Chase on Friday instead,  Conflated s trainer Gordon Elliott reported.
Leopardstown s role in defying the elements and keeping the domestic racing programme afloat recently will depend on the Co Dublin course passing a 7.30 inspection this morning. Parts of the course were unfit for racing yesterday.
If it gets a green light, then conditions should be no problem to last year s Gladness winner Goldana in the featured Heritage Stakes.
The opening fillies  maiden has been won by subsequent top-flight winners Savethelastdance and Above The Curve in the last two years. Found s sister Rubies Are Red can prove the solution this time.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Moloney back in squad after three-year absence
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 574 words
Byline: JOHNNY WATTERSON
Body


JOHNNY WATTERSON  The elephant in the room was  why now?  Why after 2½ years was Cliodhna Moloney back in the Irish squad and expected to be one of Ireland s matchday hookers against Wales in Cork this weekend.
The Exeter Chiefs player has not featured for Ireland since November 2021 following a women s rugby revolt, with Moloney raising her head by posting critical comments about the Irish Rugby Football Union (IRFU) on social media.
Moloney accused Anthony Eddy of  slurry spreading  in response to comments made by the former IRFU women s director of rugby. She was subsequently an eye-catching omission from the 2022 Six Nations teams, and has not been back in an Irish squad until this week.
The 31-time capped 30-year-old was invited back by coach Scott Bemand, and is now a possibility for Ireland s third Six Nations match on Saturday following back-to-back defeats to France and Italy.
 We d been in comms for a reasonable while,  said Bemand.  We d been tracking how she s playing. We got to a point where we feel it s the right time. We re carrying two hookers within the 36. Look, obviously it s going to be very dominant in the headlines this week. The conversation was very informal. I knew her, known her for a good while, in a previous role came across her quite a lot.
 We had some ongoing informal conversations. I ve been in England, I ve bumped into her, crossed paths. She knew that she was working hard around performance and there d be a point that we may look at her or may not. It s an opportunity that s presented itself. We base everything around our on-pitch performances. We feel this is the right time, we feel she can add to it, so she was pretty pleased to say  yeah I d be up for coming in .
Moloney was not part of the Irish squad that travelled to Dubai last October and competed in three rounds of the inaugural WXV3 tournament, where the team earned wins over Kazakhstan, Colombia and Spain to win the event. But Bemand, who was appointed last July as head coach, reiterated that the selection of Moloney was all to do with timing.
The new chapter harks back to March of 2022, when the IRFU formally accepted all 30 recommendations of an independent review following the failure to qualify for the women s Rugby World Cup in 2021. The IRFU also issued a formal apology for  the lack of any confidence, or perceived lack of interest, that the IRFU have had in the women s game .
Rebuilding process
In response the players  representative group, which included Ciara Griffin, Claire Molloy, Lindsay Peat and Moloney, welcomed the IRFU s acceptance of the recommendations and their publication, adding that the announcement by the IRFU was a welcome first step on a journey towards a new era for Irish women s rugby.
In the rebuilding process Ireland lost all five of last year s Six Nations matches and hope Wales will be a turning point in this year s competition.
 There s a timing piece and I think Cliodhna . . . I had a conversation with her a good while ago,  said Bemand.  She has just knuckled down and been getting her performances sorted, putting her hand up. We just feel now is the right time. The time is right for the group, the time is right for them, and hopefully now they can . . . Some of them have already had an opportunity to put their best foot forward in the Six Nations and let s see how Cli goes this week. If she trains hard, she trains well, adds to the group, then it s a possibility.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Music shaped by the wild ocean waves   and a pause during a pandemic; Littoral, the piper Leonard Barry's new album, draws inspiration from growing up near Banna Strand in his native Co Kerry
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: FEATURES; Pg. 8
Length: 848 words
Body


Journeys and relationships are at the core of Leonard Barry s new album. Taking its inspiration from the sea and all things maritime, Littoral is a collection of tunes that resonates deeply with this north Kerry piper, who has carved his own path with his three solo albums.
 My work over the years with Dublin Simon Community taught me a lot about those two words,  journeys  and  relationships ,  he says, referring to  the housing and homelessness charity.  You re looking at people, some of  whom are very chaotic in their behaviour, and you re observing them on their journey, trying to forge a working  relationship with them to make that journey better for them.
 Some journeys don t end well, other journeys are still going, maybe not so positively, and some are still going really well. I remember working with one lady who came in for a detox, and by the time I had left the job she was volunteering with us. To see and play a small part in the journey is very powerful and humbling, because some of the most resilient people I have ever met were in my various jobs with Dublin Simon, especially in the detox unit.
 Working in Simon teaches you a lot about yourself,  Barry says.  As chaotic as their lifestyle can be, some of the people I worked with are the most resilient people I have ever met, because to survive in that world you have to be.
Much of the shape of Littoral emerged during the dramatic stop that the pandemic imposed on Barry s musical career.  During the lockdown we had a lot more time for reflection,  he says.  I started thinking about my journey. From Kerry to Kilkenny, and then on to Dublin and to Sligo, and how I ended up by the sea again, which was not my intention. It just sort of happened.
Barry grew up in Kilmoyley, not far  from Banna Strand in Co Kerry. The sea was always in the background, and its reappearance in his life through his  move to Sligo has proven pivotal. Before our talk, he says, he took to the beach to think about all of the colour and shade  that informed his richly textured new collection, which was produced by the Mancunian piper and whistle player  Mike McGoldrick.
 What I wanted to do with this album was to track each part of that journey,  and I think that, together, all of the sets of tunes reflect where I ve come from and how I got to here.
Barry has chosen some fine company on Littoral. Kevin Burke, The Bothy Band s fiddle player, contributes some very tasty accompaniment to a set of three slides learned from the playing of the Sliabh Luachra musicians Terry Teahan and Johnny O Leary. Dervish s Andy Morrow, Michael Holmes and Brian McDonagh add further subtle colours to the mix with tunes whose provenance can be traced to Clare, Fermanagh, Sligo, Dublin and Brittany. One of Barry s distinguishing features is  his ability to meld tunes from disparate backgrounds, some of which would not normally be associated with the pipes, and imbue them with a remarkable sense of belonging.
 If you just take that tune The Pipe in the Bob   that was the first tune I heard on a cassette that my uncle gave me of The Bothy Band. That s followed by The Fly in the Porter, a tune that I picked up here in Sligo, and The Stolen Purse is a tune that I would have played in the Cobblestone,  Barry says, referring to the Dublin bar.
He s thrilled that Kevin Burke   also now resident in Sligo, having lived for decades in the US   appears on Littoral.  Who would have thought that all those years down home, when I heard that tune for  the first time, Kevin would become a  friend and play on my album,  he says.  We re lucky in Irish music that players  we look up to and have listened to all our lives are so accessible. It s pretty unique.
Barry was glad of the chance to step away from the demands of touring during the pandemic. He took advantage of the supports that the Arts Council provided and set up a modest recording studio at home.  Then I started playing tunes,  he says, smiling.  And because I wasn t gigging and running around the place, certain tunes started coming back to me. I started keeping a diary of what I was playing, and that s really how this album came together.
Littoral is a collection where  the  tunes picked the guests , he says. With McGoldrick not just on production duties but also playing flute and bodhrán, and with Alice Allen playing cello, Barry has brought his pipes on a new journey, one that s steeped in autobiography.  I feel so lucky to be playing with these top-drawer musicians,  he says.  Each one brought their own lovely texture to the tunes. I was surrounded by really good people who I trusted.
Like so many traditional musicians, Barry is thrilled too to see Burke reunite with his former bandmates in The Bothy Band.  He just said to me:  It s still so bloody powerful.  I get emotional just thinking about that. That s what I hear in this music. There is such creativity and power in it.
Leonard Barry begins a tour of Ireland and England on Thursday, April 18th. His Irish dates, between April 24th and 28th, include Galway, Westport, Sligo, Dungannon and Dublin

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Newly elected Harris pledges to be 'Taoiseach for all'; Taoiseach sets up committee on children, education and disability at Cabinet meeting
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 2
Length: 572 words
Byline: MARIE O'HALLORAN
Body


MARIE O HALLORAN
and JACK WHITE
 Simon Harris set up a new committee on children, education and disability last night at his first Cabinet meeting as Taoiseach. He had made the announcement earlier in the Dáil while unveiling his Fine Gael Cabinet reshuffle.
In his first formal speech as Taoiseach, Mr Harris said he was  determined to put a focus on disability  and  break down silos across Government .
Earlier, in front of family members sitting in the Dáil s VIP section, Mr Harris was voted in to the role of Taoiseach by 88 to 69.
He  sincerely  promised  to be a Taoiseach for all. No matter your political persuasion, I will work with you and for you and for the country that I know we all love. I will be a Taoiseach who will listen.
Rewarding
The debate started with former taoiseach Leo Varadkar s last address in the role, when he described his 13 years in Government as  the most fulfilling and rewarding time of my life. But today is the beginning of a new era for my party, a new chapter in my life and a new phase for this coalition Government .
There was a debate both before Mr Harris s visit to Áras an Uachtaráin to receive his seal of office, and afterwards, when he announced his new Fine Gael Cabinet.
The second debate repeated much of what had been said earlier.
At the Áras, he was welcomed by President Michael D and Sabina Higgins. In the State reception room, the President signed the Warrant of Appointment and presented the Seal of the Taoiseach and the Seal of Government to Mr Harris, formally becoming the 16th and youngest Taoiseach at the age of 37.
Mr Harris s wife Caoimhe and his children Saoirse and Cillian were present, alongside his parents Mary and Bart and other members of his family.
Palestinian state
Tánaiste Micheál Martin confirmed to the Dáil to applause that he would bring a formal proposal to Government to recognise a Palestinian state when  wider international discussions  are complete.  Be in no doubt, recognition of a Palestinian state will happen,  he said. He was also in  no doubt that war crimes have been committed  in Gaza.
Green Party leader Eamon Ryan, the most heckled Minister in the two debates, told the House he will bring a memo to Government setting out how to achieve a just transition to a carbon-neutral State.
Sinn Féin leader Mary Lou McDonald repeated earlier criticisms of the Government, adding that their soundbites and slogans had  gone into overdrive, in a brazen effort to paint something new, when it is not .
She said the Cabinet was like the last guest at a party who has worn out their welcome, but  just won t go .
Abandoned
Labour leader Ivana Bacik welcomed the Tánaiste s announcement on Palestine, but was sorry more women were not being promoted to Cabinet.
Social Democrats leader Holly Cairns pointed to Mr Harris s claims of  new energy , but said  there s little else that s new about this Government .
People Before Profit TD Richard Boyd Barrett said one third of Fine Gael TDs were  abandoning ship  because they knew they had failed the public  on the most basic things . Earlier, he was brought to task when he described the proceedings as a  jamboree .
Ceann Comhairle Seán Ó Fearghaíl told him  it s not appropriate to describe the election of a Taoiseach as a jamboree . He added,  let s have regard and respect for our Constitution and the role we play here .
In the final vote, the Dáil voted by 87 to 68 to accept the new Government.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Nienaber could be point of difference for Leinster
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: SPORT; Pg. 19
Length: 1036 words
Body


Standing pitchside in the company of TNT Sports rugby anchor Craig Doyle after Leinster s Champions Cup victory over Leicester last Saturday, we were joined by the man-of-the-match Jamison Gibson-Park.
The scrumhalf had scored a hat-trick of tries, two of which were down to running classic upfield support lines, while the third was a trademark short-side of a ruck interplay with hooker Dan Sheehan. Gibson-Park was as unruffled physically as if he was conducting a pre-game chat.
A brief conversation ensued about the win over the Tigers, a stuttering, patchy performance that contained some nice, well-executed strike plays, but also passages of substandard stuff, the focus and accuracy not where it needed to be.
What became clear is that talk in the Leinster dressingroom immediately post-match had already shifted to Saturday s European quarter-final against La Rochelle. Gibson-Park suggested that the influence of Jacques Nienaber could be a point of difference for Leinster this week.
We have already witnessed how the World Cup-winning Springbok coach has changed the way that Leinster think about setting up the matchday 23, on the basis of a 6-2 bench split in a number of matches. When Caelan Doris switched from number eight to pack down at openside flanker in the final 20 minutes of the Leicester game, it looked a little bit more than simple rotation.
What struck me was how big the backrow looked with Ryan Baird, Jack Conan and Doris and I began to wonder if it might be a forerunner of how the team will line out against La Rochelle. It would be a shift away from the traditional shape of Leinster teams, but consistent with Nienaber s preferences based on his time with South Africa.  Leinster possess the players to set up that way if required.
Leo Cullen and his fellow coaches will have some interesting conversation points when it comes to selection. James Ryan has been a significant loss since undergoing bicep surgery last month following a training ground accident.
Cian Healy picked up a leg problem and that s a setback. His introduction during the Tigers game along with that of Jason Jenkins and Conan underlined the importance of the bench when impacting a contest; all three made valuable contributions to help push the province out of sight on the scoreboard in the final quarter.
Ross Byrne s fitness will lead the conversation around the number 10 jersey. If he s available there s still a debate to be held about which way to use the Byrne brothers and whether younger sibling Harry starting is the better fit.
If Ross is ruled out, then Ciarán Frawley will have his hat thrown in the outhalf ring, while, if Garry Ringrose is ready to play, I d advocate selecting him on a wing specifically for this match.
The pool match where Leinster recorded a first win against La Rochelle in the French club s backyard should have little direct relevance when it comes to Saturday s game. On a miserable evening, where neither team really wanted the ball, Leinster found a way to use the weather more productively than their hosts and walked away deserving winners.
Improved fortunes
Since that match in December, there s been a lot of rugby played and  there are signs that French players have emerged from the grieving process of the World Cup to rediscover their best form. The return of a well-rested Grégory Alldritt, back to some of his best form, has coincided with improved fortunes for La Rochelle.
The French club expended a huge amount of physical and emotional energy in clawing back a 16-point deficit against the Stormers in Cape Town last weekend, an outlay that would have come to nothing if Manie Libbok had managed to land the conversion that would have given the South African side a win.
La Rochelle survived, but at what cost? The French club have been on the road since last Thursday, lots of air miles, hotels and a very unusual  on the fly  build-up to a match in spending five or six days away from home, their latest port of call, Cork.
Professional rugby players are nothing if not creatures of habit, but those familiar routines have gone out the window this week with La Rochelle turning into the Traveling Wilburys. Long-distance commuting extracts a tariff mentally and physically.
I remember my own playing days. We were due to play the Newcastle Falcons team that included Jonny Wilkinson and Inga Tuigamala at Kingston Park on a Sunday, but a frozen pitch saw the match rescheduled for Headingley in Leeds the following Tuesday. From there we caught a charter flight to Toulouse to play a second European match five days later. We followed a commonsense approach in dialling down the physical side of the preparation, but mentally we never got on the plane from Leeds.
Leinster have earned their home comforts this week and they have to make sure that it counts. In previous editions of this match, they have arguably been guilty of playing too much where La Rochelle were happy to bring their physical advantage to the table and dominate the final quarter.
It would be grossly unfair to suggest that La Rochelle are a one-trick pony, but they were able to rely on power to reel Leinster in, once they got to grips with the Irish province s ruck speed. This has been an area that Leinster have struggled with against the French club, where they have been in a winning position coming into the last 20 minutes, but have surrendered that advantage under intense pressure.
It was on a wet night in La Rochelle where Leinster turned the tables slightly as they focused on trying to stop La Rochelle rather than seeking to outplay them and did so to great effect. There is a tightrope to be walked between frustrating another team s attack while keeping the scoreboard ticking over on your part.
The great American football coach Vince Lombardi said:  Winning isn t everything, it s the only thing.  Leinster don t need to be perfect; they just need to win. These are the matches they wanted where they ll hope that Nienaber can impart some advice and direction that gets them over the line in a seminal knockout game against a team that has proved to be their knock-out nemesis. Key to that will be the ability to sustain standards from first to last whistle with no drop off.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Personal injury guidelines ruled legally binding; Supreme Court finds woman not entitled to assessment under earlier guidelines
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 5
Length: 546 words
Byline: MARY CAROLAN
Body


MARY CAROLAN Legal Affairs Correspondent  The Supreme Court has delivered a landmark ruling that judge-approved guidelines slashing awards for mainly minor personal injuries have legal effect and are legally binding.
Mr Justice Peter Charleton, who presided over the seven-judge court, said the result of Bridget Delaney s case will affect thousands of personal injury cases currently awaiting judicial analysis  and multiples of that  into the future.
 The case is thus of systemic importance,  he said.
The majority decision means the guidelines, which became operational in April 2021, are legally binding but any changes to them will require legislation. The guidelines are currently under review by the Judicial Council and it is believed amendments may be proposed.
The Supreme Court has indicated the guidelines should only be departed from where there is no reasonable proportion between them and the award that a judge independently believes, for stated and properly explained reasons, they should issue.
In separate judgments yesterday, the court ruled by four to three that section 7.2.g of the Judicial Council Act 2019 giving power to the Judicial Council to make guidelines is unconstitutional in its present form. The guidelines amounted to a form of  hard  law and the making of them was contrary to the independence of the judiciary, the majority held.
Mr Justice Gerard Hogan said, while he  completely  supported the idea of guidelines as they lead to legal certainty and predictability, lower costs and  greater efficiencies , the judiciary could not be invested with power to make guidelines which have the effect of altering the substantive law.
However, he was among six of the seven judges who held the guidelines were subsequently independently ratified by the Oireachtas, and given legal effect, by the provisions of  the Family Leave and Miscellaneous Provisions Act, which came into force on April 24th, 2021.
A majority of four rejected Ms Delaney s claim she had vested property or personal rights to have her application for damages for an ankle injury assessed under earlier guidelines by either the Personal Injuries Assessment Board (PIAB) or by a court.
The court has indicated, given its findings and the importance of the case, it is prepared to grant Ms Delaney her full legal costs.
Book of quantum
In a personal injuries action against Waterford City and County Council, Ms Delaney claimed, due to the council s negligence, she fractured her ankle after tripping and falling on a public footpath in Dungarvan on April 12th, 2019. She required medical treatment and physiotherapy, and used a walker boot for several weeks.
After she submitted an application to the PIAB in June 2019, it used the guidelines to assess her claim in May 2021 at EUR 3,000. In High Court proceedings, Ms Delaney argued her claim should have been assessed under the guidelines  predecessor, the book of quantum, at between EUR 18,000 and EUR 34,000.
She claimed the PIAB acted outside its powers and breached her rights in assessing her claim under the guidelines and the Judicial Council acted outside of its powers in adopting the guidelines.
After the High Court rejected her case, the Supreme Court agreed to hear an appeal due to the importance of the issues raised.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Potentially dangerous chemicals confirmed at airport; Substances detected during assessment of ground water, surface water and soil
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: IRELAND; Pg. 4
Length: 583 words
Byline: MARK HILLIARD
Body


MARK HILLIARD  A two-year investigation at Dublin Airport has confirmed the presence of potentially dangerous  forever chemicals  at a number of sample sites across its campus.
The chemicals, often linked to health issues including cancers, were detected during a comprehensive risk assessment of ground water, surface water and soil sampling.
PFAS (per-and poly-fluoroalkylated substances) have become a legacy problem globally, including in airports where firefighting foam containing the chemicals was once used.
The findings of a 28-month monitoring programme undertaken between 2021 and 2023 will be published today.
DAA believes the report, conducted by environmental consultancy Fehily Timoney, might help improve knowledge around the broader problem believed to affect dozens of individual sites across the country.
 As one of the first organisations in Ireland actively working to address PFAS, DAA hopes that the comprehensive data being made public today enhances the understanding of the potential scale of this issue,  it said.
Detected
The highest groundwater concentrations were detected at the site of the airport s former fire-fighting training ground, where PFAS foam had been used before being replaced in 2013. Traces were first detected there in 2016.
Further testing at the airport, and at more surrounding sites, will now be established to  develop an external risk profile  for surface and groundwater. Ongoing engagement with Fingal County Council and the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) to assist  in forming the scope  of future action was also recommended.
Separately, historic and unregulated waste disposed at Castlemoate House to the northeast of the airport has been linked to PFAS detection there.
Surface water monitoring was also carried out at 12 off-campus locations within 4km of the airport, although PFAS levels were found to be significantly lower there than onsite. The next phase of its programme will include  a more extensive period of monitoring  outside the campus, DAA said.
 Based on the findings of this report, it is recommended to quantify the risk from PFAS present in soil, concrete, groundwater and surface water at the airport and further investigations should be carried out having regard to the process outlined in the EPA s Guidance on the Management of Contaminated Land and Groundwater at EPA Licensed Sites,  the consultants said.
Global PFAS contamination sites go far beyond airports and include landfills, manufacturing sites, pharmaceutical plants and even in more remote areas.
DAA has cited an investigation run by Le Monde and the Forever Pollution Project which has identified about 90 sites in Ireland either contaminated or suspected of being contaminated, and 44,500 globally.
Cancers
First produced in the 1940s, PFAS are used in a wide variety of products from frying pans to fire-fighting foam, and clothing. They do not break down easily and have been linked to human health issues, including cancers and infertility.
Last November, dozens of investment firms, representing trillions of dollars in assets, wrote to the world s biggest chemical companies to demand their phasing out, as well as transparency around production.
Although some groups of PFAS are already subject to controls, the EU last year began considering a wider ban in what could become its most extensive piece of regulation of the chemical industry.
In the last quarter century, almost 10,000 legal actions have been taken alleging the chemicals have caused harm.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Relationship between NGOs and the State
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 253 words
Body


Sir,   Contrary to what Collette Bennett seems to imply, most people have no problem with the concept and activities of NGOs and charities that are formed to bridge gaps that sometimes arise between the provision of vital services and those in need (Letters, April 9th). But the situation in Ireland has morphed into something completely different. Rather than filling gaps, charities have morphed into primary agencies for the delivery of many social goods and services that ought to be under the direct control of the State, with a Government Minister taking full responsibility and accountable to the public at large.
What many people most certainly have difficulty with is Ms Bennett s assertion that NGOs and charities are  partners  to the Government in the  delivery of essential health, social, and community services . It seems charities and NGOs here now see themselves as deliverers of core services rather than attending to those who fall through unavoidable cracks in the system. This is a very dangerous concept that allows Government Ministers to take a back seat and the result of that is plain for all to see. The housing crisis, for example, stands out particularly. The provision of social and affordable housing was handed over to charities as part of the sweeping housing policy changes introduced 20 years ago. We now have a staggering 500 approved housing charities.
Putting the case for less charity and more justice was never more urgently needed.   Yours, etc,
JIM O SULLIVAN,
Rathedmond,
Sligo.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document



Richard Shakespeare's vision for Dublin
The Irish Times
April 10, 2024 Wednesday


Copyright 2024 The Irish Times All Rights Reserved
Section: OPINION; Pg. 11
Length: 546 words
Body


Sir,   Reading the interview with Dublin City Council chief executive Richard Shakespeare ( Dublin City Council s new chief:  If I can help climate efforts by making it a little more difficult for motorists, well then that s what I ll do  , News, April 6th), it seemed to me he was allowed to issue the equivalent of a  prepared statement  containing questionable assertions such as  We do crisis well in the city , apparently because after last November s riot, rubbish was cleared away and the asphalt was repaired. Amazing.
What about the dozen other crises the city is currently undergoing? He says,  I have to confess I was immensely proud of all our staff.  How is that a confession? I am proud of those staff too, but I don t welcome doe-eyed fawning. That was laid on with a trowel, to quote Celia from another Shakespeare s As You Like It, and I didn t like it.   Yours, etc,
PETER LYNCH,
Blackrock,
Co Dublin.
Sir,   As expected as the first cuckoo of spring, we receive another update from Dublin City Council promising progress on the markets in Dublin ( Dublin s Victorian fruit and vegetable market finally to reopen , News, April 6th). The new chief executive Richard Shakespeare is correct to draw attention to his shortcomings in the matter, but is characteristically vague on what is actually envisioned for this dedicated market space. He parochially digs at the English Market in Cork, yet this a true food market that has against the odds survived in a very supermarket orientated Ireland and is genuinely accessible to all comers.
What I suspect he has in mind, particularly with the extraordinary budget of EUR 25 million, is a glorified  Time Out -style market, that will focus on ready to eat food, tourism and leave very little for the locals of Dublin.
I would take this opportunity to remind the Dublin City Council executive that both the Fruit and Vegetable Market and the Iveagh Market are lawful markets that have market rights, that have in both cases been denied to the people of Dublin by the council. Those rights should guarantee the liberty to enter the market to buy and sell produce.
Putting a collection of takeaway food vendors and restaurants where there should be a vibrant, accessible and bustling produce market is straight out of the cuckoo playbook.   Yours, etc,
TOBY SIMMONDS,
Cork.
A chara,   I am delighted to hear the Dublin Fruit and Vegetable Market will be opening and that Dublin s need for greens and legumes will be satiated.
However, it could be suggested that the council get a bit creative when leasing out the space.
During Culture Night in 2022, the council made the Victorian market available to a group called Night Moves. This involved a DJ, a light show, music and dancing until after midnight. I remember thinking for days after how this roaring success was unlike any other events available in Dublin. It was exactly the kind of support that is needed for Dublin s struggling night life as highlighted by the Give Us the Night campaign. The council should make a provision for the new operator to allow a late-night event in the market once a month. Mr Shakespeare has already envisioned use of the building from 10am until 10pm. Why not think even bigger and go beyond midnight?   Is mise,
JACK DOORLY,
Dublin 8.

Load-Date: April 9, 2024


End of Document
